      "identifier" : [
         "71612"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "SONS OF CANADA",
         "WALTÉE ALWR",
         "SONS 0F CANADA SHORT STUDIES Of CHARACTERISTIC CANADIANS 'BY AUGUSTUS BRIDLE DRAWINGS DYt F. S. CHALLONER R.C.A.9 O.S.A., ETC. TORONTO LONDON \u0026 PARIS J. M. DENT \u0026 SONS LTD. i916",
         "PREFACE As a general i-nie, a man must be a native of the country in which he dlaims the rights of citizenship. This is broadly true in connection 'with Germany, France, Russia, and Great Britain, but it is not tmue of Canada, nor yet of Australia or the United States. There are Canadians of ail classes who were bon on the soil, but there are also typical Canadians, with full citizen rights, who hall from, ail the civilised lands under the sun. This volume deals, as its title indicates, with typical modern Canadians, but it is not a treatise on racial de- velopment or on the evolution of a spirit of devotion to a new and composite country. It is a book of impres- sionistic studies of a numnber of the outstanding Cana- dians, in various walks of life, who' have built up the present-day Canada which is distinguished alike for its industriail greatness ai4d its romantic traditions. These studies attempt to, do some ainount of justice to the patriotic efforts of certain men whose naines are wel known through the mediumn of the press, but who are little more than naines to the general public. Au attempt has been made to provide a record of strenuous personal work done by men whose daim to public recognition lies rather in what they have done for Canada than in their descent or famnily connections. But this volume is no mere record of self-help, whlle it is re- cognised that the men of whomn these chapters tell owe as much to Canada as Canada owes to them. They are mien whose chief dlaim to distinction probably lies in their complete adaptability to the environinent in 'which they found themselve; and they must therefore be necessarily judged rather by what they became as",
         "Preface Canadians than by what they were before Canada laid a compelling hand upon their lives and fortunes. The stoxy of the strenuous 111e suggests the achieve- ments of the railad kîng, the great financier, or the notable politician; but this book does flot deal only with men who have made their names \" familiar in our mouths as household words.\" is purpose is also to show that certain mon have deserved weU of their country who have neither made large fortunes nor taken a place axnong their country's legisiators. Canada is not so crude as to depend entirgly upon her inillionaires and industrial leaders for her full development, and an effort has been made to ptove that the work of the so-called \"'lesser \" men of the country has had its full share li building up tbis modemn and very vigorous nation. XI ail cases the author has tried to, get down to first principles, and to, show the real character of the maxi under consideration, leaving the reader to formn bis own judgment of that character from, the facts, supplied. The book is froma the pen of a writer who although not bom li Canada dlaims to be a Canadian because bis work as a pioneer has been done ini the Dominion.",
         "CONTENTS PAGE Hîs RovAL HIGHNESS TEP, fuxE 0F CONNAUGERT. 1 SIR WILLIAM MACD0NALD--AI Educational Multi-philan- thropist . .3 SIR ROBERT BORDEN-A Gentlein,.n Premier I JOHN ROSS ROBERTSON-A Benevolent Despot 21 SIR WILFRiD LAUIERB-mhe Chevalier of Quebec. . 29 GENERAL. STEELE-.-Courage. . . . - . 41 *BARON SHAuGHNEssy-System and Temperament. 49 - PREsiDENT FALCONER-A Dispassionate President. . 59 SIR WILLIAM MAcxENziE-WilHianl the Conqueror . 67- SIR CLiFoRD SirroN-The Sphinx of Public Life . 79 PRoFEssoR JAxEs MAvoR-A Mutab]e Mentality . . 7- HEzNRi BouRAss.-A Parochial Patriot. . . . 95 ARzcEBiisHop BRucHE-si-A Sociologicai Prelate . . 107- SIR WILLiAu PrrEERsON-Collegiumn et Imperium . . 117 WALTER ALLWARD--A Quiet Interpreter . . . 123 SIR JOHN EATON-A Capitaliser of'Public Interest . 131 DRt. A. S. VOG;T-The Chorus-master . . . 139..ý REv. ALBERT CARMiAN-The Uncompromising Cleric .14 SIR SAM HUGREs-HObnailed Boots . 15 .î7 . COLONEL GEORGE_ DENisoN-Spurs and Sentences. . 167 SIR EDMuND WALKE-.-A Master of Axuenities . 17. SIR AnAx BEcK-The Miunicipaliser . 85 Sm WiILLiAu VAN H-oR.NE-Prodigious 1 . 193 -- E. Wvvir GEIE-R, R.C.A.-Temperaniental Eîquipoise . 203 SmR W=iLAM MuLocx-A Radical Reformer. . . 207 C. A. MAGRAT-A Genuine We: ±erner . . . 215 .,.SIR GEORGE POSTER-A Constant Critic . . 2- AiURROLz SiuzoR COTE-Le Peintre . 229 Sm MAX AITEE-N-TIie Keats of Finance . . . 235-*- Cor-. SmR HENRY 1DELuxrr-Our Unprofessionai Showman 245 LORD STRATECONA-The Land-Son Viking . .253-- Two PÈRrs DE MusIguE-Deux Pères de Musique . 261 Two PAINTERS oIF ONTARio--Foil and Counterfoil. . 269 Rxv. J. A. MAcDÔNAL-The Gaelic Orator . . 275 Vii",
         "LIST 0F PORTRAITS' WALTER ALLWARD RIS ROYAL EIGRSS CONqNAUGur SIR ROBERT BoRDEN SIR WILFRD LAuRiEtR BARON SHAUGRNESSY SIR WILLIAM MACKENZIE PROiriSSOR JAMES MAVOR ARCEBISROP BRUCHESI DR. A. S. VOGT. SIR SAX HUGHES SIR EDMUNID WAucER SIR WILLIAM VAN HORNE SmR WILLAM MULOCK SIR GEORGEL FOSTER SIR MAX ArrEKEN LORD STRATECONA THE, DURE 0F *Facing page i 16 * 3i 49 * 68 * ,, go * *, 110 * 144 Pb 16z * 176 * a, 193 Pb, 209 * ,, 224 * ,, 241 Pb* 256",
         ";I :~Y;~4\u003e",
         "SONS 0F CANADA HIS ROYAL HIGHNESS THE DUKE 0F CONNAUZGIIT CANqADiANs are somewhat fastidious in the matter of Governors-General. H.R.H. the-D'ýke of Connaught lias spoiled us. Before bis time we had experience of many first-rate Governors, some of whom added to their celebrity after leaving Rideau Hall. When a mxan lias been vice-regent of Canada hne is qualified to fl any gubernatorial post in the Empire. When the Duke of Connauglit leaves this cou2ntry it is to be hoped that lie consents to act as the Ring's representative in no other overseas dominicin or crown côlony under th 'e sun. The inherent demaocracy of Canada was neyer at such a higli pitch of expression as since the term of our most aristo- cratie governor. Soldier, statesman, gentleman, mnan of the -world, and a Royal Governor embodying ail the typical graces of the Victorian era Pmiost of the rugged proverbial virtues of John Bel hiniseif, we shail always remember Arthur, Duke of Connauglit, as in rnost re- spects the simplest, sincerest Governor we ever had. We shall neyer know how mucli of the Canadian army, both in nunibers and in loyal fighting quaiity, wa-s in- spired by the presence among us in a suprexue capacity of a Royal Governor who is buiseif a trained soldier of the highest rank in the Empire. The Duke's sbrewd and active interest in the miulitia systexu that becatue a great army and in thxe overseas dominion that lias beconie itself a centre of empire sentiment, lias always won the admiration of Canadians. In paylug respect to lus Royal Higlness as a Duke, an Emperor's uncle, and a psollshed instinctit gentleman of the first",
         "H.R.H. the Duke of Connaughi rank in any of the world's aristocracies, we sometimes look to him more klythan to some of the more pre- tentious -aristocrall- .-':ose tities are in direct ratio to their standingin politics or finance. Twenty-six years ago, the Duk? of Connaught paid his first visit to Canada. During bis stay in Toronto an orchestral concert was given in the Horticuliural Pavilion. The Duke was flot present, being socially engaged elsewhere. Just before the last number on the programme the conductor, whose career is sketched briefly ini this book, turned and said to, the audience: \" Ladies and :gentlemen,-In recognition of the fact that His Royal Highness, the Duke of Connaught, son of Rer Majesty Queen Victoria, is in- the city, the orches- tra wiIl now play' God save the Queen,'so, that you may have an opportunity to put on your wraps while we perform, the last nurnber on the programme.\" The compliment is now extended by people of many languages to the person of the Duke of Connaught him- self. In so, doing, the people of Canada, more or les represented. by the characters impressionised in this book of sketches, have a hope that îhe Duke of Con- naught counts it not the lea-st distinguished part of an eminent career that for a term of years in the evening of bis life he was privileged to become a citizen of Canada. As -a true gentleman is always a democrat at heart, we believe that Ris Royal Highness will much oftener 'be proud of bis Canadian citizenship, than he will be conventionally amused at any of the superficial defects of oui Canadian bra*nd of democracy.",
         "SIR WILLIAM MACDONALD TEE greatest educational philanthropist in the British Empire-so far as the expenditure of millions for education is concerned-is a paragon of paradoxes. Money-making is as natural to Sir William Macdonald as measles to, childhood; but he lives almost as simply as a street-car conductor. Indlividually the richest man in Montreal, he lias given away more than he has kept. Too conservative to, use a telephone until a few years ago, he has spent millions on modemn scientiflc education for other people. A man of public interest, to the core, right in the fore- front of modemn movements, that benefit society through practical education, lie has neyer held any kind of office where any man could cail him anything but plain Macdonald. So plain and simple in his tastes that for most of his life he drove to business in a series, of old- fashioned gigs and phaetons, in a moment of unguarded weakness he accepted a titie fromn Queen Victoria and scarcely knew what to do with it. A firm believer in domestic happiness he has always steadfastly refused to marry. And thougli he has made millions out of manufacturing tobacco, lie lias neyer smoked a whiff or taken a chew in his, life, and once threatened a nephew of bis, with retirement back to Prince Edward Island if lie did not give up cigarettes. If there is joy in practising what you do -lot, preach, Sir William. Macdonald should be the happiest man alive. There neyer was, a Canadian Dickens to transcribe this, F man to a charactersbip in a novel, or lie would have become one of the monuments of literature. Since the memory of most, men living Sir William has lived in a plain old terrace on Sherbrooke Street not far fom McGilI University. When lie first went there the place was -probably somewhat stylish. W'hile other rmoney barons of 14ontreal built modern casties, at West-",
         "Sir William Macdonald mount, Macdonald kept bis terrace, whose only mark of pious care was the polish on the brass knockers and the knobs. The door opens into a dark hall and the hall leads off abruptly into a library of many books. Here at a lectern stands or used to stand Sir William, black coat, squidgy black bow loose under a negligent collar, gl.asses over bis sharp nose-reading, reading, bis only pastime. The books are many and various; the house is ahnost gloomy; the wallpaper reminiscent; on the walls flot even a good oil painting. Some years ago Van Home and Strathcona tried to interest Sir William in pictures. It was no use. There was no reality in pictures; much more in books. And the old man often went down to business,, even since bis knighthood, in an overcoat that used to be grey till time made it somewhat green- always with that muffler at bis chin, clatteuing away in bis rickety gig to the dingy old offices on Notre Dame a few steps from his beloved Bank of Montreal, up the creaking rickety staircase that neyer knew an elevator, into rooms that would have given the blues to any but a man wlio cared nothinig for mere comfort or decoration, but all for business. Sir William was born in Prince Edward Island. His father was President of the Legisiative Council, P.E.I. Ris grandfather was John Macdonald, eighth chiei-of the Clan of Glenaladale, founder of the Scotch settlements of Tracadie and tbree other places on the Island, and captain in the Royal Highland Emigrant Regimnt i the Revolutionary War. Further back than this the genealogist, does not go, to the Highlands where the ancestors of tbis littie maii of compressed dynamics must have been giants of the mosshags. The line direct ends with William Macdonald, who may have concluded that it was no use to have children that wouldihlerit bis money and perhaps, go to the dogs in spending it. William Macdonald was a littie wire-edged bundie of energy when. he turned bis heels upon Prince Edward Island i 1854, and took an amazing journey up the St. LawreiiS. The Mo'ntreal that \u0026fst knew Macdçànald was",
         "Sir William Macdonald a jumble of historical monuments, untidy docks, dirty, dark streets, thriftless French and diligent Anglo-Saxons, and one littie university with less than a hundred students. What led hlm to manufacture tobacco nobody has ever explained. He would have made as much money had he decided to, make sugar, cottoii, or luniber. But tobacco was a Canadian institu-tion. Luniber camps were as much in need of tobacco as a modemn army. Hard tack, fat pork, and molasses needed plug tobacco to complete the luxury of living. The tobacco made by Macdonald was one of the first CanadÂan-made to.go to the outpost places; smoked and chewed in lumber camps, mining camps\u003e Eskimo igloos, prospectors' tents, and Indian tepees; in half-breed shacks and factory yards; on trains and steamships and trails; in the outer- most marches of the Arctic where the hip-pocket and its plug are a constant joy; on the soft blowing Pacific where the weed from Montreal is as common as canned salinon; on the cod-banks of the Atlantic where the fisherman's pipe is the joy of living; and even in down-, town clubs of Canadian cities you wili find men who, scorning the :fine-cut and the patent package, discreetly haul ont from, the hip-pocket a plug of Macdonald tobacco and proceed to demonstrate the joy that comes from the art of getting ready to smoke. Neyer to lie forgotten is the flrst chew of tobacco I ever saw a man take. Hie was a timberjack in the hard- wood bush of western Ontario, about to notch, a five- foot swainp elin which he and his mate would afterwards bring down with a crosscut saw. He took the black treacly plug from the hip-pocket, looked at it with ahnost maternaI tendemness for a moment, bit off a corner, and prepared himself to enjoy the taste of that'chew until the swanip elmi should go down. \"What kind is she, Bil? \" asked his mate. \"Oh-Mcdonalds--downiii Montreal.\" 1 remember seeing that brand advertised on the bcard fences; but I amn not sure whether it was one of Mac- donald's plugs or another sort alinost equaliy fanious which. furnished bushwhacker wags with the bogus fw.e-",
         "Sir William Macdonald cent pieces that they sometimes dropped into the church collection plate. There*was great stimulus to the imagina- tion in .one of those plugs of tobacco. Molasses laden, gurnmy and black, it told the story of the tobacco plant grpwing lilce weeds, packed and baled and ported to the wharves of Montreal, whopped with fragrant empliasis into the warehouses of Macdonald, ripped and tom loose, sorted and stripped, flavoured and pressed, stamped and ready for the case, the counter, and the camp. Every plug of that tobacco had in it the almost cosmic frugality of William Macdonald. In that sharp-]ined, eagle-eyed face eould be seen the limes of the proverb, \"Waste not, want not.\" A plug of tobacco in the making was to hlm a personal. product, or why should the bush- man wink and say piously-\" Oh, Micdonald's \" ? High wages and dear tobacco-leaf reduced the size of the ten-cent plug as Macdonald Lïmself began to shrivel a bit into the pucker of age. Plantation owvners in the south knew what a hau(l buyer was Macdonald, who .figured ini fractions of a cent on cost of production. A iactory hand who wanted a raise of pay witbout a corresponding increase either in the work or the cost of living must be inquired into by Macdonald. He -knew bis workmen. Whatever methods were in vogue in bis factoiies or in his buying and selling, machlnery must be explained to -ary commission by hiniself, neyer by a subordinate. If a Macdonald employee met with an accident or feil sick, he .became the personal. care of the firm, who professed to look after hlm, better than any paternal, lodge or insurance society. Without chick or child or hobby but bis business, Macdonald was the phantomn at every man's elbow. Why should any man waste time or material? Why should customers get less for their money because employees were allowed to squander in the factory, or because the head of the firn wainted a winter trip to the Bermudas? W7hy should customers pay a biglier cost of production because some foreman wanted a more elaborate building or because other men with far less business on their books had luxurious offices? There was",
         "Sir William Macdonald no0 objection to electric liglit wý,hen it came, because it was a better and more economical light. Modemn machinery was allways welcome, so long as it turned out better goods at no hig her cost, but the interest on investnient must be carefully watched along with the depreciation. As for the telephone-did it flot make men lazy? Did most men transact any real business by long-distance conversations?, Why should a talk be interrupted by an impertinent bell? No, the telephone must be postponed. Macdonald tobacco could be produced without it-for a wbile yet. If Macdonald was always a personaliser of bis busi- ness, it was because he was a man wvith one idea at a turne and but one lifetime in which to work it out. Hie was a concentrator. Plenty of bis friends, had so many ambitions that they spent balf their turne presiding at directors' meetings. Most of the successful men lie knew were directors or presidents of hall a dozen comapanies each. Macdonald could always find plenty of room for bis personal energy in the one-man business of wbich he was the creator and the head. If lie had time and energy to spare lie found some way to invest it in that business-no other. Optiniistic; prornoters of rnining companies, land companies, gas and power companies neyer got mucli encouragement froin Macdonald. Wliy should lie lend bis naine to, a dozen other concerns of whici lie knew nothing and had flot time JLo learn? Every mnan to, bis trade; the cobbler to, bis Iast; Macdonald to bis tobacco, bis one directorship in the Royal Trust-and bis stock in the Bank of Montreal. Ay, the bank! that was a great tbing, a natural, neces- sary bandmaid to business and a source of wealth. And William Macdonald rernains to-day tzhe liéaviest share- liolder in thie Bank of Montreal. Clubs again; why did s0 many men lie knew belong eacli to hall a dozen clubs? Relaxation, sociability, business acquaintance, social standing-psli! Macdonald needed none of tliese tbings. He liad a comfortable home, rnany books, plenty of tbings to, think about- and ideas ta'king sliape for the future.",
         "Sir William Macdonald He had become a very ricli old mani. Hie had no family on which t.i spefld, money, no sons f0 whoma he could leave if. But fliere was a way for the lone mani Macdonald to prove that lie was not living forw'ealth and bank shares and business and self. He had neyer been uncharitable; but lie had neyer believed in indiscriminate charity- especially in a new country like Canada where self- help was the law. But he knew how t0 give where bis judgient found it was needed. And whenever he camne to, the full measure of bis giving there should be no mani li Canada, past or present, who could be set down by the newspapers as giving more-or as much. But it would neyer do to dissipate millions in riotous giving. Whaf Macdona.ld chose to part with for the sake of the comrnunity and the country in which he had accumulafed wealth must be as sbrewdly adininistered as the business Iy which he begaxi f0 inale his money and the bank in which so mucli of it was wisely invested. The world has known for a good xnany years what Sir William Macdonald has done f0 recreafe McGill University; how bis moxiey anid practical wisdom, have changed McGill from a college with a classical turn to a great modemn university with its fingers on every phasp of twentieth-century life. But the sunxiy opti- mists who imagined that because lie was givixig niillions f0 educaf ion he was ergo an easy mark for sociological benevolences were sometimes grievously jolfed'. It was not very long after liebegan to give large sumsn to the cause of education that he received a eall at his factory office from, a maxi who had a benevolent hobby, a large but very needy down-town Methodist churdli ini Monfreal. Time after time the affairs of that big church, now worth at least a million dollars li foot front ages, lad corne before fhe General Con.férence. It became the perennial problemn-how to save it to Mefhodism in Canada. Macdonald was flot a Mefhodist. Born a Roman Catholie, lie had pretty welI. givexi up interest in aIl churci maffers. The visitor fouxid the millionaire, as usual, liard to",
         "Sir William Macdonald get at. He was received by a dour and burly Scot7 who as major-domo in a bareleg regiment wou.ld have been immense. \" Y're wantin' to see Mr. Macdonald? \" lie repeated. deAy, he's in. But what is it y'd like to spier hlm aboot?\" The visitor evaded the point. \" Weel, lII teil hlm y're wantin' to see bim.\" In a few moments the caller was Jet into the office, where lie stated bis benevolent business to the keen- eyed and wary pbilanthropist. He knew the caustic tongue of Macdonald, its withering irony, and its tactics of the claymore. Persuasivel', and discreetly he told the story, adding that a Methodist customer of Macdonalds who was a delegate to the Conference and purchased Macdonald tobaccos by the canlot, had asked him to, elicit from tihe head of the firm what lie would do to save this grand cathedral of Methodism. The sharp eyes of the tobacco magnate gleamed with sudden interest. This was a plausible human suggestion. He called bis clerk. The moment seemed auspicious. \"Find out,\" lie said rapiclly, \"' what the account of Mr. --is with this firm.' The cailler waited wvith nervous expectancy. He knew the yearly aggregate was v'ery large, and surmised that with Scotch justice the magnate would \"'make the punisbment fit the crime.\" The clerk returned with the figures. Macdonald did not reacli for bis peu and his cheque book. \"Write Mr. -,\" lie snapped, dethat bis account with us is closed forthwith.\"- The clerk gasped witli axnazement. deSay that the account is closed,\" nepeated Macdonald. deIt makes no difference how large it may be. Mn. - can't uise bis connection with this business to, hold it up for a donation to any cause, no matter if it is a churcli.' Philanthropies are neyer pried out of Macdonald. When lie establislied the Macdonald Agricultural College and Normal Scliool with a large model farm attached at St. Anne de Bellevue up the Ottawa, lie spent millions",
         "Sir William Macdonald on a project that lie considered would be of some use to modem education in Canada. He did the saine thing in a sinaller way by founding the Macdonald Institute, a sehool for domestic science at the Agricultural College ini Guelphi, Ontario. Hie pursued the saine modemn set of ideas ini bis establishnment of consolidated rural sehools, believing that the old ted schoolhouse with its isolated régime was too mucli a part of the backwoods era in Canada to, be keeping up with the -times. If the affairs of these philanthropies, totafling more than $15,ooo,ooo, %have got into print, it was through no publicity enterprise of Macdonald. In 1898, after lie had begun to spend millions on education, he was kniglited by Queen Victoria. liow lie came to accept a titie is stili a inystery. The orily sign lie gave of liaving done so, was to discard bis old horse and phaeton and buy a smart coupé with a quick-stepping, well-groomed horse dlrivfen by a coachmnan. So this strange old man of stnbborn ways goes about Montreal with the mystery of the paradox always about bim. lis body is drying up, but bis soul goes marching on. lie is the dour old Scot 'with the twinkle in *bis eye and the spring of incurable energy in bis ]imbs. He lias the grit of a lion and the tenacity of bis race at its most incorrigible heiglit. No one ever heard of bis giving any opinions about liow to mun a nation. He neyer instructs senators or parliamentarians. Hie speaks froin no platform. H-is private politics are like bis religion, and bis business and bis. pbilantbropy largely a personal matter. -He takes no stock in grand opera or ini music of any sort. Mere amusement is no part of bis programme. If tlie world must be amused-so let it be. Macdonald amuses bimself. A1il there is of Macdonald outside the great 'business whicli bis per- sonality made possible lie ern..oodies in the tbings that swallow bis surplus millions. And if at any turne the shade of tlie old founder McGill could be consulted lie would probably be courteous enougli to agree that the name*of tlie big Anglo-Canadian University in bi-lingual, Montreal sliould be clianged to Macdonald University.",
         "SIR ROBERT BORDEN ic. wiil be recorded ini history as the f\u003eremier who at New Vear 1916 called for a total Canadian Army of 500,000 men; wliose government commandeered 15,Ooo,ooo bushels of wheat at terminal elevators and sent it to Europe; whose Finance Minister opened a domestic war boan of $50,ooo,ooo, wbxch was subscribed twice over; whose Parliainent, up tilt the beginning of 1916, had already voted $2ooooo,ooo of a war loan. Men, înoney, materials-going out. Little but credit coming in. Every moitai thing done by the Borden govermnent running into, iTillions-expenditure; anid flot a soul on the oihpr side of the House to make a word of protest. Yes, the country is very loyal to the nation-making idea represented by Sir Robert Eorden, the first Premier who ever governed this country by impersonality. This unstageable man almost woke Up to find himself Premier in 1911. Years before lie had begun to, talk about getting the Liberals out. Since 1907 lie had theorised about what his party would do if ever they-got in. The Halifax Platformn (see Hansard and the newspaper files) contains ail the recipes enunciated by Mr. Borden at Halifax, just before a general election. I\u003eerhaps Sir Robert Borden could recite that document to-day. If so\u003e lie smiles. That Halifax Platform is ini the National Museuin along with the National Policy, No Popery, and the Jesui'ts' Estates -Bib. Sir Robert Borden is cafling for soldiers-and more soldiers; millions of money and more millions. Rail- ivays and steamships are carrying out troops and wheat; factories malzing munitions; faims, offices, and stores sending men into camps; financiers raising war funds galore; -wo*men knitting, sewing, and organising and belping to recruit. Canada is not now being railroaded,",
         "Sir Robert Borden Europeanised, and subdivided. Gone into the cold per- spective of history is the dealock over the Naval Aid BUll in 1912~. Fast going into bistorical oblivion is the Natîonalist Party that helped to elect Sir Robert Borden Premier. So he goes with that Derby hat and thick overcoat, trudging a bit sidewise up Parliament Hill on winter days to -the office of the Premier in the East Block- the man who neyer laughs in public. Step by step lie cogitates. Resolutely he holds on his way. Courteously he bows to a member or a niinister. On into bis room, face chiselled like bronze for an Egyptian god, grey hair punctiliously parted aniidships, faultlessly groomed, a tbick grizzled moustache, and a steady eye-alwaysseem- ing to have plenty of time, forever seeniing to inake up bis mind, discreetly shuffiing over papers, reflectively reading; sucli a seriôus, meditative man. His secretary is staccato;- Borden-always skowly polite and for the most part gently reasonable. In an hour lie may con- scientiously get through a load of detail work and is ready for the first of a Une of miscellaneous callers. A green thiize door opens and you face the Premier, at whose back a slow wood fire is burning, on bis riglit a big Gothie bow window overlooking the campus. He rises, greets the visitor in a tbick basso yoice of unaffected cordiality, and motions him to sit i a chair which is discreetly screwed. to the floor on the end of bis desk. And until the interview is over this man of slow mind and overwhelming sincerity says neyer a word that somehow does flot seem to be part of a moral message. Hie is the unstageable, unspectacular Borden; the man from Halifax, the lawyer who was born to be a judge, the citizen who was neyer cut out for politics, the gentleman who ordinarily neyer could bave got flirougli life without becoming a churchwarden. In September i915 the Prime inister spoke bMfre a vast audience i the Arena at Toronto. He bad just returned from an extensive visit to the lines of battle and to England. Fresh fr-om the headquarters, of General",
         "Sir Robert Borden Joffre and Sir John Frenchi, from the trenches on the firing lines and the hospitals behind themn; only the other day speaking on the sanie platforma with Premier Asquith and Right Hon. Mr. Balfour; dined and con- * ferenced; entertained by the King; given the freedom, of the Cit of London at the heart of Empire-the Premier of Canada spoke to i0\u003e000 people as thougli he were reading a story sent in a letter. Sir Robert Borden cannot pretend to be what hie is flot by nature, who, in moulding hlm left out most of the power of expression and compounded the man of duty, public service, conscience, absolute honesty of purpose, and the determination to be a statesman. Had he been created even io, per cent. a politician, he mnight have stopped to acquire some of - the tricks of oratory for the sake of swaying the crowd that deliglits in the power of the spoken word. If he were less thoughtful, lie iniglt be more a man of action, no matter what forma the action miglit take. Less than haif so modest, lie miglit have cast decorum to the winds and proceeded to, tear a passion to, tatters. Less altogether than he is of an admirable -citizen lie niight have condescended to become for one hour something of an actor. No man ever camne before a united people in this coumtry with more to say-when lie said less. He seerned wreary. Filled as lie was with the sentiment of an Emapire being tried out in a great war whose outlines lie liad actuaily seen, whose smoke lie liad smelled, whose ravages lie had witnessed, lie acted as thougli le had been forced upon the stage to tell about it, and would be glad when the show was over. The impressions lie liad got reinained bis own. By a whim of reation lie was denied the rare joy of translating those-impre-ssions to the multitude, in an age whe.n demagogues are on ahnost every Street corner shouting their heads off and saying nothing. What does it matter whether the crowd be ten thou- Sand in a tabernacle or a hundred in some country churcli? The message must be the sanie. The personality of -the speaker in expresion must be the samne. The eàme~ 13",
         "Sir Robert Borden stage .setting must do fot all the shows;- the saine plain, untheatrical, and mostly undramatic actor. Climaxes and big inspirational moments must be avoided. Thrills are dangerous and are followed by inevitable reaction. [t is no business of a Prime Minister to be a reviva.list. As a. leader of his party in the House, as a debater, as a dignified, clear-headed parliarnentarian with the moral mastery over both himself and his party, the Premier is always admirable; a man whom it would be a. pride to point out to any stranger wishing to see Canadian manhood in its most honest, straightforward embodiment. There he must be left. If the party or the people wish to drag him out for a show, they must be sure to provide actors enough to coniplete the bill. It is of prime importance to remember how, when, and under what circurustances so impersonal a figure ever came to be Premier of Canada at a time when a world war is making marionettes, of national figues the world over. The Borden fainily migrated as United Empire Loyalists to the valley celebrated by Longfellow in the poem IIEvangeline.\" Robert Laird Borden was bomn in the very village of which the poet prattled* so musically in the opening lines: \"In the Acadian land *on the shores of the Basin of Minas, Distant, secluded, stili, the littie village of Grand-Pré Lay in the fruitful valley. Vast xneadows stretched to the eastward, Giving the valley its name. ... Sea-fogs pitched their tents and mists from the niighty Atlantic Looked 'on the happy valley, but ne\u003eer from their stations descended: There in the midst of its farras, reposed the Acadian village.\" And we may well imagine that the Borden homnestead, was the prettiest pastoral glinipse in many a mile. \u003eThe Borden family, with that grave, serious.sincerity spark- ling now and again into moderate mirth, attended to al -duties devoutly, to church religiously, and lived amid an environnient of perpetual peace. Robert laird Borden went to one of the littie acadeniies that were dotted almost as thick as Iight- 14",
         "Sir Robert Borden houses over the land of Evangeline and Sam Slick. While stil a young man lie became some sort of pro- fessor in a littie New jersey college; afterwards came back to study law in Halifax, where in after years he became a comfortable, unpretentious lawyer; where lie attended churcli regularly at wooden old St. Paul's overlooking the mighty harbour and the square onice clanking with the ing's soldiers, where up till a few years ago lie seduiously sang in the choir amid the quaint relies of a bygone.age. No man can be a good Haligonian without a due sense of the historic and the decorous. In Hàlifax the past gazes pensively at you on every corner; not romanticaily as in -Quebec, but with a subdued, respeetful aspect that makes you forget the once roilicing deviltry of lialifax's niilitary régime. The pomp of military days lias become the manners of the present. Garrison parades, society teas, church services, monuments, and old buildings continually remind the touxist that the first essential of civilisation is eminent respectability. There are business concerns in Halifax conducted by the same genteel snuff-taking methods that characterised the days of the Prince Consort. The English accent is- everywhere. No true Halligonian cares for modernity. Old St. Paul's churcli was built of lumber fetched in sailing vesspis from Boston. It is cra full of relics. Halifax is the Boston of Canada and dignifiedly resents any bilposter, real estate methods of getting on in the world. To be a-decent Haligonian you must neglect a respectable part of busi- ness for society, politics, and religion; flot forgetting the soldiers, a.t the ci:tadel and the young officers on the Niobe. Which, with the charmed outlook over the greatest harbour in America, is precisely what makes Halifax one of the maost delectable cities in Canada in which to enjoy life. R. L. Borden was a good citizen of Halifax. He had about hima ail the decoro.us, -amiable qualities that make Halifax very.largely wbat itused to-be. Y-ou-note this genteel persistenicy in the Premier's face; - a sort of moral and physiognomica. tenacity that beongs rather to, the 15",
         "Sir Robert Borden middle-class a±:istocrat, respectable in trade, religion, and politics. The Sir Robert florden of to-day, if he were habited in a brief cutaway, clinging check trousers, mutton-chop whiskers, and full black cravat, might easily be imagined doffing his colonial, top hat at the gate of wooden old St. ?aul's, the littie Westminster Abbey of Halifax. Ail through the earlier triumphs and later degeneracies of the Conservative party under Sir John Macdonald, the unpretentious lawyer remained ini Halifax, not even attempting to get a. seat ir. the Nova Scotia Legisiature. In 1896 there was at least one surprise from the land of joseph Home an4 Charles Tupper. R. L. Borden was elected to the House of Conimons for Halifax. His leader was Tupper who remained, head of the Opposition until the election, of igoo, when the Conservatives were again defeated. There seemed to bebut one man of the old Macdonald Cabinet with political acurnen enough to lead anything more fractious than a nice family horse. That was George E. Foster, who was regarded as a cold, isolated. ixpssibity. What was -to be doneP In suçh a predicament the Conservative party did sometbing just to ease their own feelings and stop a gap-tiil the Lord should send theni another Macdonald. They- chose Robert Laird Borden from Halifax. With ail bis obvious respectability, sincerity, integrity, patriotic enthusiasm, and average, everyday capacity. for uninspired days' works, they thrust this scion of a Loyalist house into the chair of Macdonald. And the Caucus went off biting its finger nails as -much as to say : \u003c'Now, then, we've picked the honestest muan ini Canada to lead what the Liberals tried .to prove was the most cornipt party organisation in Canadian history. What are you going to do about it?\" Sucli was the condition of a temperamentalparty now led by an untemperamental -nan. Whither? No man knew. There seemed to be no C.anaan now that Ma.c- donald wes en The~ more aaiy k;yal Conctrvative trieci Z6.",
         "Sir Robert Borden % te elucidate Borden, the more desperate the pliglit of kis party seemed to be. After ail Borden might be only a stop-gap. Some other star might loom over the horizon. Borden seemed willig enougli to please. At ait events lie could rally the party on the .left sufficiently to keep Laurier and his college of dazzling experts from having it ail their own way mn-a two-party House. And there was littie else left to do. When R.IL. Borden had the magnificent moral courage to take the leader- ship of the Macdonaldites iu Canada, lie knew that he had about as mucli personal volition in the case as the brazen serpent had when it was lifted up by Moses. But he had no intention of blazing any brilliant trait. It would talie haif a lifetime to obliterate the ghost of John A. R. L. Bbrden cahnldy sat and waited. Hie was conscious of no great gifts as a leader. lis experience lu Parlia- ment had been limited; in politics mucli less. He knew nothig lu actual practice of the devious ways of winning elections. Yet lie came from a land where elections at that time used to be taken more seriously than lu any other part of Canada. Great movements were bomn during that decade igoi- i91i; the new great West, the immigration era, the British Preference -begun in 1897-the second and third transcontinental railways, the birth of a greater and more prosperous Canada, the Ataskan Award, the rise of the Nationalist party to its balance-of-power status lu Québec, and the glorification of Laurier the magnetic Frenchi Canadian to almost the giddy height once enjoyed by kils great rival John A. Macdonald. In ail these onward marches of men and events, Robert Borden was little more than a somewhat per- plexed, often baffed, but forever liopeful spectator ; until the election of i907 when, atter the creation of two new western provinces andj.he redistribution of seats, lie toured the country from, coast to coast enunciating what was then known as the Halifax- Platform. But the Halifax Platform left leader Borden by the wayside once more. Hie worked and waited and hung 17 B3",
         "Sir Robert Borden on. There were not wanting sigus; thougli le was neyer prescient. In 1911 the Taft-Fielding manoeuvre from Wasbingc- ton revived the ancient spirit that, in the early Mac- donald days liad carried the party to victory. Borden came out uncompromisingly in opposition to the reciprocity pact. Already lie liad to bis credit an un- mistakable stand on the question of direct aid to the British Navy as opposed t0 what was afterwards called the separatist Canadian navy of Sir Wilfrid Laurier. In the election of 1911 anti-reciprocity swept the country with the dimensions of a popular sentiment. Borden tlie patient Acadian gentleman and undoubted patriot was at tlie crest of the wave. Alinost before lie had Urne to forecast the event lie found himself Premier, at the liead of a rejuvenated party elected to a considerable extent by independents and Nationalists. Wliat lias liappened since is too near to be treated as even recent history. The battie ini Parliarnent over the Naval Aid Bill defined tlie positions of the parties on Imperial questions, even wlien it united them on a general principle of remairaing loyal to the Empire. The country liad swung back to its old attitude of opposing any form of continentalism. Tlie Premier of 1911, Up tifi the present, is mucli the same man as tlie Borden of 1901., wlien lie became leader of the Conservative party. Men like Borden neyer under- go revolutions. Tliey evolve. Sir Robert Borden neyer rises above the level of bis work, because bis work alviays seems to bim the greatest tbing in life. Personal ambition lie neyer had, or if lie had lie kept it concealed witli consummate actorsbip, of wbicli no one suspects him. Chicanery lie neyer understood. He is a moral figure wlio sornetimes finds hirnself at tlie mercy of a flippant, adventurous world. Conscious of certain limitations lie lias tried to owricome tliem. Once a pliotograplier, anxious to get rea]istic action pictures of Mr. Borden during the carn- paign of i907, enticed bim on to tlie roof of a Toronto liotel. wliere lie liad the Opposition leader enact a series",
         "Sir ]Robert I3orden of oratorical poses which were published by party organs as genuine pictures of Mr. Borden speaking. That is about the limit, of Sir Robert Borden's guile. Work, duty, responsibility, citizensbip, national de- velopment, Empire - these are the daily fare of the Premier. He is flot a natural, leader. He bas, no great sagacity ini picking men. Unable to dominate a Cabinet by personal mnethods or party tactics, lie must depend largely upon moral power and political purpose. Between the Naval Aid debate and the outbreak of war the doininating force in the Cabinet seemed to be some- where in a line betweem, Hon. Robert Rogers and Sir George Foster, neither of whom could, have led the party, although one looked after the elections and tlie other led the House. Since the war most, of the sliop- window business of the Cabinet lias been transacted by General Sir Samn Hughes. The Minister of Militia somne- times finds a Cabinet rather an encuxnbrance. But lie lias not yet managed to dispense witli the Premier, mucli of wliose political business for the past two years lias been to regulate and explain General Hughes. Tlie war increased the Premier's responsibility, but eased bis task. When the cail of tlie Empire made ail men get a thriIl of patriotism Sir Robert rose to the occasion. Witb the moral duty of upliolding thie Empire the Premier lias no hesitation in calling for soldiers and money. Wlien the war is over and the country is again absorbed in domestic problems, the real test of Sir Robert Borden will corne.",
         "JOHN ROSS ROBERTSON ONcE-mn the year i915-there was a lad who desired when he grew Up to be MYayor of Toronto. Sb lie asked bis father what lie should do to win his ambition besides reading the Telegram. Wliereat bis father asked him: \"Johnnie, wlio\u003es the proprietor of the Teleramn?\"P \"Old John Ross,\" said the lad. The father mildly shook him. MiWhat's that again? Say it again.\" \"Old John Ross,\" repeated Jobnnie, ivriggling away. \"That-s what you cail hlm. I know bis last naines Robertson, but I didn't think it mattered.\" \" Well, if you ever get to be Mayor of Toronto by the choice of the people, my boy, you'll have to go and talk to Mr. Robertson. He looks after that.\"- Johnnie's consuming ambitken was to grow up and have a real heart-to-heart ta]k with the owner of the great paper in bis upstairs office. He knew where that was, just at the corner of Bay and Mlelinda Streets, over- look-ing the line of delivery autos and the screamlng newsboys and the hundreds of people who watched the great presses in the basement wvaiting for copies that they niight rush off and get jobs. He knewv that the inside of this temple of news was quite magnificent. He had been up the marbie stairs with the iron balustrades, had peeked into the reading room, had seen rushlng reporters and ail sorts of busy people ln a large number of small rooms; and once lie had seen the owvner himseif looldng like the wrinkled ideai of a great man going up into bis office wbich Johnnie knew was the real power- house of Toronto politics. One niglit mst befôre Christmas i19'5, Johnnie dreamed that ai last lie was up spylng at thc keyhole to, see how Mr. Robertson really looked in that office. He dreamed that lie saw mauy pictures on the walls, bronze",
         "John Ross Robertson figures here and there, a deal of fine furniture, a lot of red rugs, and a large fireplace just visible through a thin white sheet that hung d;ver it. But as yet there was no Mr. Robertson. Suddenly a light shone into the roomn and it seemed to corne direct froin the City Hall dlock up the street. A figure came on the screen. It was like one of the cartoons on the front page of the Telegram; a large tiger with John Ross Robertson's head, and under it: \"«The Tammany of Toronto.\" That faded and there came another: the saine face, this timne arising out of a solen-n mass of robes, and under it: \"High Priest of the Masonic Order.\" That vanished and the next was two figures; one of them an old-fasbioned person called Dr. Samuel johnso4i whose head was the City Hall dlock, and the other a quaint personage whose head was Mr. Robertson; and this one was called: ceThe Boswell to Dr. Toronto.\" Last of all came what to Johnnie was somewhat the best of ail. And this one, which seemed to corne down out of the fireplace, was a combination of Santa Claus and somne other great indly figure who had about bis robes a host of littie children that once had been il and now were well again. And this picture was called: \"\"Friend to the Sick Cbildren of Toronto.'- When that picture *was gone the boy woke Up. The owner of the Torontto Telegram was born in Toronto. Had he corne to it from, an Ontario village or sinall town he might be like some of the other wealthy men in that city, too busy malring money to take any interest ini municipal govermuent except to advertise its defects. His father was a dxy-goods merchant. His ancestors reachback in a direct Uine tofDuncan Robertson, chief of the clan of Struan Robertson, dating back- to 1347. Seven years before Robertson's birth Toronto was incorporated as a city. Its population then was under So,ooo. In the lifetime of Robertson that has -been multiplied by ten.",
         ".John Ross Robertson His youth was spent at Upper Canada College w,.here lie showed bis interest ini people and tbings by starting a paper called the Gollege Times, issued once a month from a back room in bis father's house, where lie biniseif stuck the type, ran the hand press, and bundled up the copies to lug out to the college. When lie attended the Model School he edited Young Canada and sold articles to the Globe and the Christian Guardian. At the age of twenty he started a sporting paper. Hie was him- self an expert amateur athlete, famous at hockey- basebail not yet being invented. He had the sporting- man's7 interest in out-of-way corners, wayside greens, rowing courses on the Bay, nooks and crannies and land- marks on the island, back-country glens that -have since growin into fashionable Rosedale, the charmed canyon of the Don, and the picturesque gorge of the Humnber. At the age of twenty-five Robertson was a self-taught newspaper man with bis own publishing plant and job press and a p-!ace on the staff 'of the Conservative paper called the Leader. Hie afterwards helped to found the Telegrapk, which ran five years, went to England as correpondent and business manager for the Toronto Globe, and in tbree years hie was back in Toronto manag- ing the Nation, a weely edited by Goldwin Smith. Here began a somnewhat remarkable friendsbip'be- tween the most fanious literary figure in America and the man who was about to, originate the Evening Tele- gramn. Goldwin Smith had the faculty of taking a deep interest in ail sorts of people as mucli unlike himself as possible. Robertson Nvas one of them. We have no record that Robertson ever endorsed the Professor's views on commercial and political. union between Canada and the Unit2d States. But when Robertson confided to Goldwin Smnith that lie had an ambition to start an evening paperin Toronto the Oxford Professor generously placed $ioooo at bis disposaI. With much less than this ainount the astute pioneer bought the plant of somne defunct paper and camne out with bis ]ittle Telegram, sold for a cent a copy, the coppers piously lugged to, the bank every day in a patent pail by John Ross Robertson.",
         "John, Ross Robertson Toronto was then a city of about zoo,ooo people with an old-Glasgow area of warehiouses and Scotch clerks, English bricklayers, imaporýted servant girls, an Irish colony in what is now St. John's Ward, with a large population ofHebrews and Italians, two or three budding millionaires, a host of oratorical politicians, a thriving university with a Scotch presi,-dent, and a number of respectable alIdermen with no salMi. lI tbis slow but higbly initeresting city Robertson catered to, a small workaday populace with a paper wbich soon set the fashion for looking on ils front page for a job, an employee, or a lost brooch. Hie had an original idea and he worked ic wefl. How the idea prospered through haxd times and good management was tersely expressed by the proprietor himnself rnany years later at an Associated Press meeting in New York. \"Gentlemen,\" he spluttered as lie stuck bis eyeglasses on bis nose, \"\" I hear you discussing the prernium system as a bribe to people to, take your papers. The Toronto Telegran lias 8i,ooo circulation in the city of Toronto and has neyer asked a maxn for a subscription.\u003e' When Robertson started the Telegram in 1876, al the newspapers li Toronto combined had less than 8i,ooo- circulation. What this mani is who remains our most conspicuous example of personal journalismn since the days of Edmund E. Sheppard on Saturday Nigs Can neyer be told except by examining 1dm with the saine jealous care that lie hirnself lias *expended on the landrnarks of Toronto. Hie is hirnself Toronto's most interesting Lnldmark. Absolutely and petulantly imipressive, tota]ly demo- cratic and simple, bigotedly a friend of the people, and always favourable to, a rumpus-this self-erigendered interpreter of a restless deniocracy neyer could have been conventionally cribbed li a common sanctum. There was always the street, the landmark corner, the mani wlose nose was out of joint--or ouglit to, be-the crank witli a message, the red-rag uprooter, the sinigle- taxer, the innovator, and the muckraker. AI these and 24",
         "John Ross Robertson as many otbers may find in the Telegram the glorifted embodiment of their voice in the affairs of a common- wealth. No man ever bas too lurid an indictment of the intake pipe or the ensemble of an art exhibition to be denied the columns of the Telegram. \" Confound you! \" blurted Robertson one day to an artist while raxnpaging in bis office over a sketch of some old landmark which the artist was raaking. \" Why don't you get mad, sir? Wby don't you ever get mad? \" Let a citizen representing some needy cause coi-ne to the Tel egram proprietor for a donation\u003e and listen -£o the abuse lie gets, the cholerie thumping of the table, the foaming tirade of language; tili he takes bis bat inc despair. \"Wait a bit! Give me your address,\" snaps the irascible philantbropist. And he jots it down. Next day along goes a cheque, with a note adjuring the recipient neyer to breathe a syllable of this. A few years ago one of bis old proof readers \u003clied. R\u003c',bertson bad known hlm intimately and bad abused him like a pickpocket times witbout number, tiil tbe man feit neglected without .a scolding from the eagle- eyed edi-tor-mn-chief. He was in Europe wben arrange- ments were being made for the xnans funeral. The office cabled him. There was some doubt meanwhlle as to whether one or two carrnages could be hired. A cable from, Robertson settled it. There could be a score of carrnages if need be; be would pay ail bis. Very next time one bears of hlm be is thick into a plot to discard ail merely respectable candidates for tbe mayoralty and to logý-roll into the chair somebody at wbom ail smug, Sabbatb-going ratepayers sbould 1ifr their bands li deprecation. This newcomer may be a pure neophyte who, by splitting a vote, may get the chair and become a mannikin for the Tdegram*-wiho wiil see that lie measures up to the potentialities of the position.* Or lie may be an adventurer bold enougli ta startie the council chamber by rising again and again to a point of disorder. He is the Telegramn norniee. Let the people elect hlm, and that coilege of municipal 25",
         "John Ross Robertson wisdom will see that he sobers down and broadens out to the needed dimensions of a chief magistr.te. [n 1915 the Telegram got into the mayor's chair a man who surprised even himself by winning the election rnany thousands ahead of Mis nearest opponent, a fellow- controller of good standing. The scene at the Telegram offices the night of the election was quite beyond the power of any descriptive artist on the staff to portray. Froin the lower Bay Street point of view it was the greatest victory ever achieved in Toronto. As a municipal adventure it was that and more. The author of Land- marks knew it. Neyer since Toronto emerged from the tops of the maples had there been such an obvions declaration of the whims of the generai populace, a majority of whom, read the Telegram. The newspaper boss of themunicipality had triumphed. He had carried the Telegram to another milestone of achievement. Still the Landmarks came ont, week by week some new light on a dark corner, when it seemed long ago as though every historic cranny of the city had been rummaged by this anianuen.:s of the archaic. With a fresh black Panatella in bis teeth the proprietor sticks bis thumbs in bis -waistcoat and remembers that on yondei~ corner, now a hole in the ground with teamn of borses 'and picks and shovels busy there was once a faxùily by the naine of -~ a grand-aunt of soins- body iu which was married to the balf-brother of the man whose uncle was chief of police in the year that the old brewery was pulled down to niake room for an orphans' bome-whi-ch would be somewhere about half- way between the year that Mackenzie's rebels- marched to Montgomery's Tavern and the year that- Colonel Denison's father organised the militia of Toronto. Meanwhile there is hockey. The genial boss goes to, the gaines; sits in bis fur-lined greatcoat at the rink- side, haïvk-eyeing the players of to-day, remembering as in a Homeric dreani the experts of long ago. Hockey is neyýer dead; masonry is neyer dead; municipal muddles are always on baud;. the people on Parliainent Hil are ail wrong again; Laurier bas blundered-G.oxns school",
         "John Ross Robertson question or other that takes the Telegramn for a day or two further afield than Toronto. But wait a moment-to-norrow evening no invita- tions out; old cronies that miglit have corne to, the bouse rnust be telephoned to stay away. It is the even- 'ing before the nurses and the hundreds of aiiing children up at the Children's Hospital are to be trekked away to the Island Home. The hot days are at band. The big brick building is noisy, dusty, and hot. The cbildren -most of them too poor to have weIl-dressed. parents- rnust be got ready for the grand cheerful procession down the streets to the ferryboats across to, the Lake- side Home on the Island. The nurses mnust be directed. To-morrow the big bouse of littie ghost lives will be alrnost deserted for the siumner. And in the morning of that day the busy city pauses for a moment to take off its hat to the genius of the crotchety philanthropist who made it the one grand hobby of bis career to carry out the Christ idea as far as he niigbt arnong the children. Here also lie is boss. No nurse and no doctor, no parent or guardian mnust interfere. The self-centred benevolence of the mnan who created the hospital and the greatest nurses' home in Ainerica rnust be permitted to play the genial despot. It makes no difference for a while wbo is Mayor of Toronto or wbat the aldermen are doing about the intake pipe. That wiIl corne to- rnorrow. Next day the grand -crank of benevolence notices that for days a man bas not been on bis assign- ment-why? \"'Sick at borne,\" is the laconic response. Up cornes a rig and in an bour the Telegram chief is in tbe iii man's bouse; finds lie bas more needs than his salary-and raises bis salary. Once there was a campaign to raise money for ex- tension to an Infants' Home. A lady subscriptionist called upon Robertson, supposmng that lie would be one of the first men to contribute for that purpose. \" Oh!1\" snapped Robertson, taking a scurrilous rampage round bis rug. '\" Oh!1 No---sorry to, say I",
         "John Ross Robertson have a littie affair of my own up there on College Street. You understand--?\"' \"Why, yes, Mr. Robertson, but-\" 'Well, weli!1 That's answered, isn't it? Good morningi\"' Next day the lady canvasser reported the failure to the head of committee. \" Dear, oh dear!'\u003e\" was the response. \" I wouldn't have liad you go near him for a donation-for anything.\" \"Ol-why flot? \" \"Well, you see, for months now every pint of certified niilk left at the Infants' Home lias been paid for by the mani who bult the Children's H-ospital.\" Three years ago a rare collection of old sketches, prints, etcbings, pen-and-ink reprints, and originals, al illustrating more or lessi remote periods ini the history of Canada and its attý, was presented to the City of Toronto by the author of Landmarks. As; a civic insti- tution this gift is quite as unique as the remarkable and historic citizen who made it. By and by cornes Chiristmas Eve. John Ross Robertson is flot at home. No, lie is up at the Hospital Christmas Tree; and lie is Santa Claus in a coonskin coat witli sleigh-bells jingling and a benign white beard that is a mere apology of a make-up for hlm. The laugliter of tlie children is the music of bis sonl From cot to cot goes the benevolent fakir, liandlng out gifts and good cheer. And when the snow-flakes, drive up and down the street on the nortli wind lie goes home, huinching under lis cap the burly, lopsided old bene- factor, smoking a long black cigar and thinking lie sees i the face of the clouds or tlie quiet of his roomn the joy-faces of littie children made glad by hlma and the work which lie lias made the one grand hobby of a strange temperamental career.",
         "SIR WILFRID LAURIER AN aged actor sat by a club fireplace in Toronto a year or two ago and cailed up the pleasing shades of Henry Irving. Among the multi-coloured stories he told of that great actor was one wbich rather topped them al as a bit of daring flot unniixed with mild blasphemy. «LIt was at the funeral,\" he said in a voice that mingled pathos with a tang of diabolical humour. \"LIt was a tremendous pomp as it should have been. Lt was a great stage scene as it couldn't help. It was brimful of pageant and sorrow was that setting, and none of us that had worked with Henry Irving ini life begrudged him one iota of it. But there was a turn in that scene that none of ùis expected. The day was cloudy as befltted so solern an occasion. But at a pause in the organ and the service there came, as I remember it, such a beautiful blaze of light through the stained-glass windows, and it fell upon old Sir 'Enry there in his coffin with ail the glory of a great sunset. And some wag turns to me and he says with snûling awe, ' Lor bless my soûl!1 'Qo but Sir 'Enry ever could have arranged that? '\"Y Let those who kIxow Sir Wilfrid Laurier best fit the story on as they choose. I know of no other unconscion- able mixture of great qualities and opportunising melo- draina that suggests the great French-Canadian leader so vell as Henry Irving. Laurier's whole life has been an almost continuous play. W'hen he flrst becarne a Commoner at the age of thirty-three, lie was too pas- sionately chivairous to be aware of bis place on the stage of professional politics. When he becanie Liberal leader in- 1887v, le was so fervently obsessed with the doctrine of free trade that he ahnost satisfled Goldwin Smnith. When lie became Premier in 1896, he was the first politician of Quebec and the most outspoken protagonist of British institutions axnong ail our English-speaking '29",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier orators. On that subject lie could orate with as rnuch near-sublimity as that peculiarly decorative style of oratory would permit. Between 1896 and 1911 Laurier displayed himself as the champion of the British pre- ference; as a sort of poetic world figure at jubilees and imperial conferences; as the friend of the dual language ini Canada; as the sometixnes doubtful champion of the Ultrainontane element in politics; the joint-author with Mr. Fielding of a high tariff for revenue; in Quebec the voice of the Frenchiuan; in Tory and British Toronto the equally perfervid apostie of the British connec- tion; in the House of Commons as the projector of the Canadian navy; in the West as the man who had de- clared himself '\u003ca democrat to the hit \"; at university conclaves as an inveterate disciple of the intellectual movement; among rustic folk, whether Frenchi or English, as the prin'ce of easy entertainers and the originator of the phrase \" follow my white plume'\u003e; finally, in 1911, as the fatalistic devotee of restricted reciprocity-which with other elements best known to hizuseif defeated hlm., Since igii he lias been a leader who holds a defeated but hopeful party in the sure grip of genius wedded to experience, and in spite of the stars in their courses fighting for Sisera stil indulges a vision that lie wiJl once again be Premier of Canada. In sucli a career and such a man there is a vitality for which we can find no parallel iu Canada but that of Sir John Macdonald. Laurier's whole life lias been much of a paradox. Ris early tastes were for literary studies. He may have liad some -inclination for the priesthood- and what a cardinal lie would have made 1 In law witli- out politics lie would have been only less brilliant thaL lie lias been as a statesman and a politician. There is no learned profession in which he would not have been a strikidng figure and a great achievement. But lie was neyer profound enougli to becoxue a philosopher nor intense enough for a tremendous bigot. As a man of culture Laurier is best expressed by bis love for historical reading and bis mastery of formai expression. 17is reading of Englisli history and literature 30",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier has been extensive. Some, of bis Frencli-Canadian disciples of an earlier day complain that lie has, Anglicised himself too muci. B-is speech in the bi-lingual debate disappointed tliem because it did flot go far enougli. Tliey allege that lie lias become an old Tory incapable of expressing the highest aspirations of his race which as a great Liberal in 1896 lie did so well. That is the extreme Quebec point of view. The extreme western opinion of Laurier is that lie lias no magic on the prairies; neitlier for that matter, they say, lias Borden. îlhe West has, littie regard for the personality of political leaders wlio depend so mucli upon personality. Tlie West wants radical men. Laurier is too old to, be a radical. In the West lie is accounted too mudli a Frenchinan; in Quebec too littie; in Ontario--less of an Anglo-Saxon entliusiast than lie was twenty years ago. With so many cdintrary reputations in a land of many cross currents in politics it is tlie best part of philosopliy ini Laurier to, retire somewhat into himself. 1-e lias a good library and stili reads much. Only a couple of years ago lie was re-reading Dickens and an Englisl version of Uncle Tom's Cabin, a book wbicli as a young man lie liad \u0026-rst read ini Frendch. Be stili studies, democracy by the historical method. There are books and essays lie niglit write. Be wiIl perliaps neyer write tlem. In pure art lie lias achieved no distinctive progress. In pictures he does not pretend to be even a dilettante; and in mnusic lie has neyer sliown any passionate pre- ference for anything but mediocrity. This is scarcely a criticism. Laurier is himself--or lias been-tie subject for the painter, the theme for the poet, and the motif for the musician. With so many exquisite qualities, the wonder is, tiat lie ever became a successful politician. In a bigler key he miglit have liad mucli of tlie astute blending of opposite traits tlat made Disraeli sudh a conundnnn. Being a Latin instead oi a Bebrew, lie lias beconie tlie adroit master of niany superficialities. He is at tlie saine time a past grand-master at tlie art of inspiration; a man who in bis old age refiects tlie aura of wlat le used to be, or what it seemed lie miglit lave",
         "Sir -Wilfrid Laurier become in a country that once paid bornage to the personality of politicâi leaders more than it does at the preseiit day or perliaps ever will do again. It is the animazing humanity of the man-cail it huxnanism if you wil-tbat bas kept his political vitality so high. At the age *of seventy-five there is, no orator in Canada who can better and more Iegitimately sway a multitude or a Parliainent, always by ineans, of a strong sense of rlietoric and a facile if flot deep-seated instinct for dramatic: effects. There are limes when Sir Wilfrid is dramatic; turnes when he is obviously theatrical. As a stump speaker he prefers the limeliglit and naturally gets it. As a debater ini the Hlouse he clings to form sometimes at the expense of substance; As the champion of what he considers in some parts of Canada an oppressed minority, he rises to a lieight of .expression which is very close to real draina not without sincere and untheatrical passion. Even wlien silent lié expresses mucli. Merely bis look of inscrutable gravity mn the House is eloquent. He scans, tlie-face of an Oppo- sition speaker with a strange penetration. Laurier is used to following debates. Ne man in Parliament to-day bas bad sucli experience in the value of the spoken word. No parlianientarian bas a greater sense of the im- portance of wlihat a Comnion's speech feels like in the newspapers. In ail tbe arts of expression fhat please botb friend and political foe, that convince the neutral and that sway the multitude wbether in Frenchi or English, Sir Wilfid lias 11o peer ln this country. He was born to, be a xnarvellously expressive mian; to, get im- pressions easily, to make bimself iristinctively one wtith whatever crowd or clique or creed lie may liappen ta be arnongst, and in becoming the voice of the assembly to preserve a native dignity that nevger permits even a yokel or a mere jingoising patriot ta, become in the least degree familiar. Accordlng to the lime and the place and the occasion ht- is eîther the climax of sociability or the acme of nnstudied and inipenetrable reserve. To bis close political friends lie is seldom, aloof. But lie miay be to, one 32",
         "F",
         "S'ir Wilfrid Laurier of bis own Ministers-when he had them-as inflexible as the moral law; in the next room half an hour later the master of \"'sunny ways \" to some stranger whom, lie miglit neyer meet again, bu t for that one occasion missing no opportunity to be sociable and to some extent very cbarxningly frank. Durlng the summer of 1915 a you.ng Canadian artist painted a portrait of Sir Wilfrid which now.haugs in the Legisiative Building at Quebec. Day after day as the ex-Premier watched the portrait grow on the easel ln that room of bis on IParliament Hill, lie found occasion to give advice to the artist. \"'No,\u003e he said, \"'you must flot put into that portrait the sunny ways of wbich the newspapers speakc so often. You must make me appear as a ruler of men.\" And it 'was so. Dualities of this kind are flot uncommon. 0f all pro- fessions polities most causes au otherwise simple mani to become complex. Laurier was neyer lntended by nature to be, an austere Roman. He bas becorne such by circumstance and habit. We shall neyer begin to understand hm until we recognise in hlm a particular species, of double culture. Even then he is not obvious. The first lime I saw and heard Laurier lie addressed a political meeting lu Toronto in :r895. The speech was an orational lecture on British institutions. At thaL. lime the Frencli-Canadian leader had corne to a climax iu the study of a thlng that bad fascinated hlm, since bis days at college. In that particular place the spectacle of the greatest Frenchi Canadian of bis time eloquently expounding tlie virtues of British constitutional goveru.. ment was very imnpressive. One- migbt bave naively sunnised that to reacli sucli a height of vindication lie had renounced some of bis Frenchi Canadianism. But lu the last days of the parliamentary session of igi6 Laurier enuuciated a defence of two languages in a]mos t passionate terms. In :[895 be expressed an lutellectual preference. In 1916 lie fell back upon aýtemperamental instinct. Between the two lies the alluring if somewhat",
         "-Sir Wilfrid Laurier tortuous career that makes this man the master illusion of our polities. Méost of what maires Laurier consununately interesting is to, be found in bis temperanxuent. That is Gallic. It is the fashion to say that lie is typicalliy an aristocrat. Buit lie was flot born so in the village of St. Lin, son of a land surveyor, attending the village sehool, tauglit by a curé who must have seen in him the embryo, of a possible cardinal. He has perliaps greater finesse than the average aristocrat. Hie lias not been denied the luxury of interpreting the commion people. Neither lias lie ever permitted, himself to be seduced into any simula- lion of a man in overails. One of bis Cabinet colleagues tells liow upon a certain occasion Sir Wilfrid went on a trip among the river-drivers; how lie fared with men ini camp and sat on the river batik to watch. the logs tumn- bling downstreamn. But Rt is not on record that lie was ever seen-as tlie late Sir James Wihitney often was- about the Parliament buildings in bis shirt-sleeves. Laurier was neyer known to be negligent in bis attire. He would as lief be accused of bad syntax as suspected of being slovenly i the smallest degree about bis clothes. M-e is one of the best-dressed men of the times, in any country. In bis young days lie miust. have been some- tbing of a dandy. Neither is lie of spirituelle physique. He lias neyer wrestled witli any peculiar -infirmity. Hie is a strong, well-kit figure; bis hands are large and bis shoulders by no means narrow. Hie lias tlie physical virility to endure liard scriminages and-the sbrewd sense to spare birnself any tests of endurance that are not necessary. PersonalIy lie is charming. Ris smile is ahnost femin- ineiy magnetic. Mis Eng]ish speech lias a délectable Iimp that contrasts oddly witli bis Anglo-Saxon fiuency. Having learned Englisli largely thraugli reading of literature lie lias imbibed the culturraà form and omitted most of the vernacular. Laurier using slang would be more sliocldng than Laurier in overalis. There is that fastidions uerfection of form about Laurier which ilings a kmnd of glamour about bis simplest 34",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier actions. He is neyer ungraceful. He is always somewhat poetic. When to lis grace and his excellent form. and lis poetry he sometimesadds zeal eloquence lie becomes a * remarkably higli expression of personality. When, as often in lis most obvious political stunip speeches, lie becomes theatrical, the effect on the crowd is that of a pleasing concession to the temper of the moment, upon those who know hlm best that of a somewhat irritating compromise with himself. We must have here and there a higli priest of form and expression. We owe that to our parllaxnentary traditions\u003e which may Lecome obso- lete in an era of government by business, but will long survive as a ritual. These are matters of form. Laurier is mucli more. He bas been accused by some adniirers of being a states- man. It is flot on record that he ever confirmed that. \"I am. a politician -\" was one of bis latter-day sayings. By that lie meant nothing uncomplimentary to himself. Had lie tried being a statesman as Edward 13lake did- *impossible! He had the exaniple of Blake, who retired from bis party and let Laurier succeed hùm on a matter of political principle. Blake's successor was not of so retiring a character. It must be admitted that Laurier loves politics wbich in Canada is a much more variable art than in most countries. There is no intimate turn, no legitimate trick of Canadian -statecraft, that lie lias not practised as a master. The stranger may think lie lias fathomed a perfect gentleman in an hour of casual conversation. But lie bas flot touched the outside of the essential Laurier. No man could have headed the Liberal party as lie lias done in Canada for jtxst about thirty years, ha]f of that time an uninterrupted Premier, without becoming more of a strategist than is required for polite conversation. It must not be forgotten that Sir Wilfid Laurier is the first Frencli-Canadian Premier of confederated Canada. It may be a good while again Mèfre a Frenchi Canadia-n takes sncb a place. No man will ever have the opportunity to do so mucli towards nationalising",
         "Sir Wi lfrid Laurier the two root races of this country. Boru and by tempera- ment a French Canadian, he has put the weight of bis intellectual development on Anglo-Saxon ideas. He has become a magnificent hybrid. In so doing, even had there been no more Canada than Ontario and Quebec, Laurier must have made himself a political expert of uncommon character. In this he had a shining example in Sir John Macdonald, the Ceit who captured Quebec and neyer leamned the French language well. But in the gentie art of capturing Ontario, with a much greater handicap due to No Popery, the P.P.A., and the Orange vote, Sir Wilfrid had littie to suifer by comparison with Sir John. At the samne tirne he set out to capture the new West wbich came on the political map ini bis Premiership and largely by means of the development programme undertaken, by bis Government ini partner- ship with three great ýystems of railway. When to these we add the task of pleasing Conservative British Colum- bia, and on the other side of the continent the Maritime Provinces which neyer became unanimously converted even to Confederation, it must be adxnitted that Wilfrid Laurier had need to be much more than a statesman in order to keep himself at the head of his party. Hée is indeed a politician. And no Canadian politician ever appreciated power more than Sir Wilfrid. When he wished to be depicted as a ruler of men, it was not merely as head of a Cabinet, but as chief of a great party and farst citizen in the country as Premier. The Liberals were quite as willing to, concede him the power even to the extent of letting him. dominate the party. Liberalism has become a species of Latirieîism. With so indispensable a duality at the head of it there was nio other way. Under Laurier and in partnersbip with bira, Liberal platforms have changed to suit the time, the place, and the occasion with quite starting resuits. \" Consistency, the hobgoblin of littie minds.,\" has neyer been much of a virtuous obstacle to party goverament in this country. Unredemption of promises and renegation of platforms, is the first charge to be formulated against .auy new govermcnt, some- 36",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier times almost before -the last polling booth lias been heard from in the wilds of Cariboo. As both parties are accused of it, we must conclude that in a new country which stili prefers constitutional government to revolutions, it must be a form of political. development as necessary as immigration and increase of trade. What are the distinctive traits of Sir Wilfrid as a practical politician in the business of government may be left to a grand jury of his associates. Most of them have made it a practice neyer to tell him unpaiatable truths. They understand lis preference for optimism. Laurier has a genlus for dodging uncomfortable details. This he genîally explains by admittirig whimsically, \"«I was always a lazy dog,\" which he scarcely ineans. No mere exquisite could have doue what lie lia-, done iu practical politics. No dilettante would have had the sagacity to pick out associates wlio could Iighten bis labours. Laurier's first Cabinet was a coilege of experts, some of whom, such as Andrew Blair and Israel Tarte, he let go when lie found thev were not absolutely tract- able. Dissension lie neyer could tolerate. He himself stood for a united Canada in race and language. Hie would have a uuited Cabinet. Wlienever he found it necessary to let men go lie did it swiftly and witliout apparent remorse-thougli lie kept bis friendship for men even. when lie politicaliy exiled tliem. Witli ail bis genius for mauaging men and governing a party by tlie art of leadership, there lias always been an element of good luck in the Laurier career. His Premiership covered fifteen years of uuparalIeled expan- sion ini this country. It was an era of prodigal, spending and not mucli accounting. Publicly and privately men were forgettiug the liard times past and somewliat mortgaging tlie roseate future for the sake of accomplish- ing big business. Laurier's governmeut took the lead. We liad a great country. Bverybody said so. Borrow- iug by liundreds of millions, levyiug for population on almost an-y decent country, pushing out two new trans- continental railways to rival t0-he C.P.R., building great public works for posterity-tiere was no lack of faitli 37",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier in Canada during most of the Laurier regime; and it neyer became necessary for the Laurier governiment to do much national .stocktaking. In fact, Laurier suited our temperament. On the whole, we shall always be glad lie was Premier for so, long. The country needed nmen with imagination. Laurier's first Cabinet caused most: of us to gasp. H1e had ransacked the Provinces for experts, most of whom were also men of good standing. The plain people were weary of political ear-hling coupled with liard times. La-arier's smashing of the old sin-accumnulating Con- servative machine made it possible to begin an era of new, even if somewhat fantastic ideals. The advent of a great Frenchi Canadian to the Premiership was itself something of a romance. After the long bedevilments of National Policy and No Popery it was a relief to, take as llrst citizen a man wlio liad neyer believed in tlie N.P. a.nd neyer clisbelieved'in the Pope. That romance niiglit have been brief had the new Premier, then just nicely into his fifties, not been known to both parties as a man of botli great eloquence and political, sagacity. Laurier had a genius for discerning talent in other men. Is own talent was for leadership. In most other departments of statecraft lie reniained a splendid amateur. Laurier's leadership belonged to the Hlouse, the party, and the people. As a parlia-trentarian he stands higli, thougli as a parliaxnentary expert lie is second to at least one of the members of bis late Cabinet. As a debater hie is eminent, but less distinguislied in pure debate than, one member of the present Cabinet. As an orator lie lias always main'tained the higliest traditions of parliamentary usage as expressed by Gladstone, Briglit, and Edward Blake-and Laurier. He is a master of stately formn in English. H1e loves the climax and the resounding period whose worst because rnost complicated expression w-s the regular form. of bis old leader and predecessor, Edward Blake. What lie may be ini Frenchi is best understood by *those who know that language. But the speeches of Laurier as recorded in Hansard over a period of forty years reacli much -the 38",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier highest level of parliamentary literature to be found in that ainazing wilderness of great, mediocre, and bad speeches. On the stump Laurier's eloquence is vastly different. Here he is often best represented by the newspaper report, the camera\u003e and the moving picture. He knows ail the artful devices that catch the promiscuous crowd. He knows equally how to hold the habitant who speaks littie or no English, thie Ontario audience that knows no French, and the mixed audience anywhere that takes its politics from the nearest dispensary and its forensie sensations froin whatever orator that best knows the gaine of twanging the racial or-the national harp. For whatever devious ways Laurierism has pursued in this country we have ourselves to, thank. Ontario has neyer been satisfied to take the natural consequences of a great French Canadian uniting races by means of a party, but has tried to make an Anglo-Saxon out of Laurier, which is temperamentally impossible. Quebec was flot content to have a French-Canadian Premier and race leader ini one man: she must have a leader of French Canada outside the old parties ini the person of Henri Bourassa. The West grew politicaliy weary of the whole race problem. as it applied to the East, and expected of a Liberal lea*der even greater concessions than restricted re.ciprocity which defeated the party in 1911. The wonder is that in trying to please such a variety of people, Sir Wilfrid has managed to retain bis supreme hold on the party. That is a proof of his genius for leadership. Any successor to Launier in that office nmist play a gaine considerably different from, bis. We may have to find a substitute for old-line politics in some forin of unemotional business goverinnent. The success- fui party leader of new Canada may have to be less of an orator, less of a political manipulator, and much more of a shrewd sociological student who knows less about parliament, party, and sectional issues and more about national probleins that must be solved in the naine of",
         "Sir Wilfrid Laurier the whole .people. But that kind of man must become a student, even if flot a disciple, of Laurnerisma. 1'olitics, even in a new country, is essentially a busi- ness of looking backward. We leave it to, the sociologist and the econoxnic dreamer to look ahead. In ail our Canadian retrospect among figures bistoric, martial, clerical, adventurons, we shali neyer behold one of finer mould or greater patriotising significance than Wilfrid Laurier-who at this time of writing expects again to be Premier of Canada at an age when an average maxi of business considers hixnself too old for anything but to, take the chair at a directors' meeting. 40",
         "GENERAL STEELE Now that the philosophy of courage has taken hold of the worl - it is more than coxnmonly interesting to consider the character of a man who so far as popular reputation goes seems neyer to have had any fear. Major-General Steele, now doing a somewhàt conven- tional turn as camp commander i the south of England, enoy the distinction of originating many of our heroic egns about the North-West Mounted Police. From. the day when, in 1874, at the age of twenty-:five, he swung out to the plains as troop sergeant-major amnong the red- skins, until the day he pulled up stakes at Capetown and resigned as commander of the South African Con- stabulary, Sam Steele bas 'been the legendary hero of this country. None of our poets ever had-the courage toli iortalise him as Kipling did \"Bobs.' Nevertheless, with a few minor aniendments as to size and the like, we could fit that ecstatic eulogy on to Sam Steele, who completely satisfies the Homeric imagination of the small boy, the grown mani, and the doddering veteran with bis quaver and stick. Ail the dare-devil haloes wom by jack Sheppard, Dick Turpin, and Buffalo Bill, seem to have been taken for remnants to make a becoming aureole for this Canadian rougli-rider. He belonged to the saine robustious era of Canadian Iiistory as Ned Hanlan, the worid's greatest oarsman, John Murray, the fabulous Canadian detective, and Donald A. Smith when be was the conqueror of the north. Steele is fodder for the heroising imagination. In recal]ing bis exploits and bis constructive work as a plainsman lawgiver, we indulge a fondness for the good old days in our development when the IUgood mani\" was he who could knuckle the",
         "General Steele busliwhackcing buily into a snivel or ride with the majesty of the law redcoated and alone into a camp of redskins. Ail this is very boyish admiration. But no new country is worth while without it. Canada has had a fair average of these immnortalising lieroes, whose claim to national regard was not that of intellect\u003e nor of art, nor even conventional, saintly religion, but the quality of the mnan who had nerves of steel, muscles of iron, and the moral fibre of John the Baptist. Boni ini Ontario, Samn Steele took to soldiering ini the days of the Fenian Raid, being then a youtli of seventeen. When lie foilowed the lure of the great West, after the organisation of the mnounted police, he had already learned much of the acadenuic: side of soldiering. He was born to be a soldier. There is no great general or cominon ranker in any of the great armies now struggling in Europe wlio lias any more of the prime quality of the great soldier than has Major-General Samn Steele. We prefer to eliminate the badge of rank. Steele rnight have ail the ranks, titles, medals, and crosses of nuilitarism, and neyer be greater by means of tliem than lie was when he came before the imagination as plain Sam Steele, the greatest rough-rider and lawgiver we ever had in tlie finest body of picked, plainsmen ever known in the world. It was the man Steele, commonly known as Samn; the man on the horse who lef t a trail of red courage ail over the land that begins at Rat Portage and ends at Herscheil Island ini the region of the North Pole, and afterwards fiung a loop of darixng and spiendour over the kopjes and the veldts of Southi Affica from, Mafeking to Capetown. As a military figure this man belongs to tlie same empire category as Gordon, Roberts, and Kitchener. He is flot and neyer was a rnilitary genius. H1e was a bold personal force tliat counted for mucli before we ever heard of modem war organisation. Ze xvas tlie complement of the six-sliooter and the huinan end of a carbine slung over the saddle. A batteiy of siege guns would have added nothing to the personal prestige of Colonel Steele. Khaki does not distinguisli him. Uniforms neyer did 42",
         "General Steele more for hlm than to make hlmi startlingly conspicuous as a redcoat to the ripressible redskin. He could have togged himself in a deerskin coat and been as tremendous. But he was one of a superb man-organisation that in a formative and critical period of nation-development dotted itself sparingly over a vast no-law land recently taken over from the ironclad regime of the Hudson's Bay Company and Donald A. Smith. As the administra- tor of law Steele and the few men who were bis seniors in planting the police posts ail over that furpost and buffalo-range land were the legitimate successors to the resident governor and bis scattered staff of factors at the trading-posts. Mere law without trade was-a strange thing to the red man. These redcoats who stuck up littie barracks shacks anywhere on the prairie were the embodimxent of sheer law built upoxi maxi-force, discipline, and physical courage. They were a daring lot. The presumption of a corporal's guard pitching camp on the Old Maxi River and beginning to boss the natives along with the w1aisky smugglers, the blockade runners, the borderland bad mien, the riotons navvies building the C.P.R., and the turbulent miners in the Rockies, was an example of suiperb audacity. The building up of a mounted police morale such as became world-famous on the great plains of western Canada depended upon just such men as Samn Steele. He dlaims no individual credit; brusquely and modestly regarding himnself as the associate of strong men who planted law li the terrorless and made it possible for civilisation to march li there with ' no greater fiare-up thaxi onie brief civil war in the shape of a rebellion. Before the police went out i 1874, there had been the frrst of these outbursts. it was fitteexi years before the next. By that time Steele had clixxbed bigh in the ranks of the Mounted Police. During the pre-railway epoch from 1874 to 1881 this no-fearing maxi on a horse became a famillar figure fromn end to end of a law-making land. When the whisky smugglers anid the restless red men were put under the crixnp of haif a battalion of redcoats",
         "General S£ee1e operating- froma far scattered posts the railway-building era flung a new burden on the schedules of the tralsmen. The work of administering the North-West was alwaysý a comparatively simple matter when its own internai 4 proi-lems were the chief thing. The irruption of the railway navvies changed the situation. It was necessary to double the force. The meni who built the C.P.R. were tougli characters;- otherwise they neyer would have gone into such a crude country. They weere more un- tractable than the Indians. Inspector Steele had charge of the police in the mouantain section where the toughest of the navvy gangs concentrated. Ordinary darmng such as kept the natives in awe made a feeble impression on these men when they 'were tinder the double influence of liquor and slack pay. In the whole moiutain section there were seven police posts with a total force of twenty-flve officers and men to keep order axnong more than a thousand navvies. At Golden City, one of the police posts, there was a strike for payment in full impromptu, which on the C.P.R., as manager Van Horne knew, was not always practicable in sucli a coumtry. A nmber of miners joined in with the strikers, who becaxne a mob. One of Steele's men rode into the towvn a.nd began to arrest a drunIr and disorderly leader. The mob rose in fury-and Sergeant Fu2ry camne on the scene from barracks. because bis chief Steele was sick abed. Fury, a bulldog littie man, with two c3nstables, went to, a saloon to get the desjperado. The mob rose. Fury posted back to barracks to get orders froma Steele as to how fax he should use violence. These police were always economic of their shootingý- irons. Steele froin bis bunk ordered absolute shooting of all resisters. For the third time the desperado was taken and the mob followed. When the constables camne to a wooden bridge neax barracks, the mob wvith kuives and revolvers began to, rush the bridge. Fury turned to cover bis men. It was no use. The maob's whiskified blood was Up. It was then that the unexpected came. And it was Steele who from bis bunk came rushing down the road,",
         "General Steele the iron, unfaltering maxi who with bis six-shooter in bis haud flung hirnself on the bridge axid shouted that he would shoot dead the first man who attempted to cross. Steele could shoot. He was the human end of a fire-armn. * A bullet from bis direction meant more thaxi ten from some men. There were guxis enough to, have riddled hlm. * He knew it. But the instant moral force of this sick ins-pector with the one sure gun anid the steady eye and the nnfiinchlng nerve made it impossible for a single mob guxi to go up or a foot to strike the bridge. The arrest was completed and the mob dispersed. That was merely an episode i the work of this maxi who, when the Rebelon of 1885 broke out following the near completion of the C.P.R., took command of the cavairy arm of General Strange's force operating from, Calgary northward. The last spectacular episode i that upheaval of the Indians and the half-breeds was the trackIng of the band of Big Bear which laid siege to Fort Pitt, drove out the thirty-odd police on a scow dowxi the river, and took prisoners ail the civilians, toting them away among a thousaxid redskins i their carts to the bogs of the Beaver River. Pitt was burned. Steele anid bis men went out north to, corral Big Bear. At rimes during the long marches and encamxpments of soldiers from the east li that Rebellion the question was asked, \"Where are the Mouxited Police? \" That was a serious question li the region of Prince Albert, where muddled orders and lack of understandixigbetween the police axid the troops made the police mucli less effective thaxi they should have been. It was neyer a query i the area from. Calgary to Fort Pitt where Inspector Steele was operatlng against the forces of Big Bear. Had there been more mnen of the type of Steele, or had such a maxi as Steele, who, knew the Ixidians a.nd the half-breeds, been given either more jurisdiction before the outbreak or a bigher command alLer it took place, the littie war li a big land mlght have been averted or ended sooner. ÊýThe xiext ten years saw the Mouxited Police established as a powerful force, flot only along the line of tlie new",
         "General Steele railway anid its branches north and sou-h, but on every outpost liundreds of miles fram the railway. Inspector Steele rose to the post of Superintendent, atterwards toi that of Commissloner with headquarters at Regina. As chief of the greatest constabulary li the world after thirty years of rougbing and toughing, the mani of steel li more thaxi bis naine became fanious as a great biendt of anah ax. H olde one the frest ciieyndt of ana oHis ma.1l knol e the W res a that were converting that country froma semi-barbarism to civilisation, and he was himself the greatest force of them al. As Commissioner of Police in the Territoriesi lie was as inuch, the dictator of that vast incompre- hensible land as Donald A. Smith had been. as head of the great fur company operating from Huadson's Bay. The great movements of population were just beginning li that decade between the completion of the C.P.R. and the discovery of- the Kiondike li the land of noi police. The riders of the plains becaine flot only police, but civil administrators and magistrates, making, dis- pensIng, and lnterpreting law, welding together the disjolnted elements li a new country, carrying out tIhe policy first begui li 1874 of compelling respect for law in a land of natural violence. They absolutely axnazed the rougli-riders across the border by the mechanical ease with whi:ch suci a. scattered force of men ruled a country that by violent methods would have needed a small army. Eternal restraint and the couxage of reserve was the force that always made the mxen under Steele sucli a trexnendous factor i establishing law. The guxi was pulled seldom, but with marvellous effect. The law, not the rûuzzle of the carbine, was made the great force. And it was again the law tha. i 1897 had to be re- asserted in a new and even worse lanid after the discovery of gold i the Yukon. lI this xnan-swallowing counxtry that attracted niany of the desperadoes along with some of the ornaments of civilisation, Colonel Steele, with a sma]I body of police, becaine the chief enforcer of civilised rights. He had gone through too many nerve- 46",
         "General Steele testing scrinu-nages in bis tbirty-one years of trail and barracks on the plains belcw to be daunted by the law- defying menace of the Yukon. Here was a land where nature was so devilish that man-law was a mere whiin. But in this no-law country Colonel Steele as rigidly en- forced the moral riglits of a community as ever lie had done on the prairies. His erilightening iron régime in the Yukon camne as strenuous prelude to his work as the commander of the corps known as the Strathcona Horse ini the South African War. From the edge of Allaska to the toe of South Africa this pioneer in community-maing swung down to the cail of country and Empire-whatever that niight mean. His old friend and predecessor, Strath- cona, had furnished the regiinent. Steele took commnand of it. The work of the Strathcona Horse in Africa was only a natural sequd. to the best work of the Mounted F Police in the Canadian 'West. They were the one small force that to the Boers seemed most like themselves; * the tireless and fearless plainsmen who knew the law of the trait, the code of the armfys and the ethics of the community. After the war was over Colonel Steele remained as the head of the South African Constabulary. Lord Roberts left a big work for Kitchener to L-iish iu that * country. Kitchener left a big work for Colunel Steele who, when lie returned in 1906, knew that seif-govern- ing South Africa was then able to look after its own trails and the enforcement of its own laws. H1e camne back to Canada as a plain soldier wliose best work in three periods was doue. When the greatest of ail wars came and the Empire again seemed to need Samn Steele, at the age of sixty- five he put himself at the service of the country, for which he had already done mucl more than the average statesman's work. H1e helped to organise forces in the West, both in Manitoba and in British Coliubia. He was freely discussed. as the probable commander of the second Canadian contingent. As Major-General Steele lie went to Engla.nd, where lie was given the poat of 47",
         "General Steele camp commander for ail the Imperial forces iu the south camps. It may be that this veteran will neyer get to the front. Whether lie does or flot will make no difference, to the reputation of bis work as a great dispenser of law in new coznmunities, whether lu the arctic or the antarctic regions, or in the temperate zone. Nothing but age can abate the force of such a character. Nothing but a soldiering instinct and a plain sense of duty ever would have ide such a force spend itself in a work that neyer could make him rich lu what some men cal their dedlining years-. Samn Steele is just about the age of many of the great generals directing this war. He is a year or two older than Kitchener, Joffre, Hiindenburg, and Cadorna. Inu all but military genius lie is as great a soldier as any of these. Doubtfnil indeed if any of these world-recognised great soldiers lias quiteý as mucli of the no-fearing quality that stamps the warrior bold lu any age. Quite as pro- blematical, too, if any of.them sacrificed mnore by spend- ing a big force in the work of camps, barracks, and armies instead of building up a fortune or a big business lu civil life. Samn Steele lias the kcind of primai force that makes a man eat lu action ludependent of the precise age lu WhCh hemay happen to live, or of any mere organisa- tion to which lie may belong. And it is quite certain that even the world\u003es greatest war machine was neyer so perfect an organisation of morality and manhood as the marvellous police system, x.7hose esprit de corps and tremendous efficier.cy at low cost was for some. turne under Colonel Steele the admiration of the civilised world.",
         "la, i",
         "BARON SHAUGHNESSY SUDDENLY, almost impetuously, he left his desk and stepped to one of the many big windows that flood the President's.office with light. A regiment was marching past. The street below throbbed with bugles and drums. Silently he watched it when his own figure was in sharp relief against the light-the studious black clothes fas- tidiously fitted, the black necktie, grey hair, moustache, and goatee; erect as a soldier on parade, he looked in silhouette like a first cousin, in larger physical size, of Lord Roberts, who was also an Irishman. For a full minute he stood watching, like some general at the saluting base. That battalion might have been marched into the huge C.P.R. building and hidden in ambush when half the occupants would never have known it. All the battalions thus far organised in the two chief cities of Canada would not equal in number the army of men employed by the C.P.R. from the President's anteroom to the outposting end of the steel, round the world and back. The cost of organising, equipping, and sending abroad Canada's army up to that day had been considerably less than the capitalised assets of the world's greatest transportation system. The machine of the blustering war-lords from the Rhine is no more complicatedly perfect than that which comes to a head at the mahogany desk of Baron Shaughnessy, close to the cough and the clank of mile upon mile of trains in the yards and the hooting of ships that put out to sea with the name of that transportation and travel system on them. Any child could have made such comparisons as he watched Shaughnessy there by the window. Canadians have made a national habit of symbolising the C.P.R., which becomes as necessary to national business as oxygen to the chemical composition of water. It is an 49 D",
         "Baron Shaughnessy axiom about the offices that any man may drop but, as years ago did Van Home and recently McNicoll, and the great humanised machine go on with no more obvious shock to its meclianism than pulling a finger from a bucket of water leaves a liole. But the C.P.R. minus Shaughnessy would, at least, be a different thing to tbink about. Thirty-four years that globe-girclling systemn of tracks and traffie lias known this man wlio camne to it in 188:2 as purchasing agent under Van Homne. At tliat tixne lie had neyer been an officer or even a clerk in any of the departments of construction, traffic, or intelligence in the railroading State of Wisconsin wliere lie was born. He left a country rushing ahead with 50,000,000 people for a slow-moving giant of a land witli less tlian 5,000\u003e000\u003e a couple of thousand miles of railway, no city of more tlian ioo,ooo, scarcely a millionaire, wooden ships build- ing at Quebec a2nd St. John, an overgrown furpost at Winnipeg, no %lieat corning out of the West, and notj an elevator west of Owen Sound. Twenty-four years later the second son of this man at the 'windowv, then a youtli of twenty, travelled round the world--every mile of tlie journey on trains and slips of the systemn headed by bis father. Fred Shaughnessy alterwards went into the brokerage business and the local militia. In i916 things lad changed again even more swiftly than ever tley had in the ï-ost lieadlong days of tlie first great transcontinental, whose slips and trains were 110W canymig out soldiers, munitions, and war supplies instead of fetcbing in immnigrants. That battalion marching past the window would be on tlie water -within a week. Another was being organised at Montreal, the Irish-Canadian Rangers, wliose adjutant is tlie eider son of Lord Sliauglnessy. Several montîs befre that the 6oti liad gone across witli Captain Fred SIaugI- nessy at the lead of a company, second in command under hlm tlie husband of bis sister. Tliey were now- somewhere in France. Probabiy tlie President was thinkzing of these tlree 50",
         "Baron Shaughnessy as he heard the bugles. More than a year now through the C.P.R. he had been purchasing agent for the British War Office. Less than a month before he had made a speech in Montreal criticising the unorganised, senti- mental methods of recruiting new battalions before earlier units were up to full strength. He had intimated to the Government that he would make such a speech. Only two of the Cabinet had objected, the Ministers of Militia and of Public Works. The former at the same dinner openly vented his hostility, and in Parliament a week previous he had told the country that his work of organising the Canadian army had been equal to the task of building the C.P.R. He could think of no other comparison so obviously convincing. There were public men who in public endorsed Hughes and in private agreed with Shaughnessy. Patriotism is a many-headed thing. The man who waves a flag and thumps a drum gets a crowd. Three thousand men had already gone from the C.P.R. into the khaki camps, all of them on six months' full pay. \"Why not? \" asks the professional patriot. \"See what the country has done for the C.P.R.\" Not even Shaughnessy denies that. The country and the C.P.R. grew up together. Political critics have sometimes asked which was supposed to be the greater, the whole or the part. Does Canada control the rail- ways or do the railways own Canada? has been a monumental query. Canada owns one railway, the Intercolonial, half of another, the Grand Trunk Pacific, has guaranteed bonds for a third, the Canadian Northern, and years ago gave land grants to the C.P.R. enough to make it the greatest land corporation in the world. The total capitalisation of these four systems, if it were possible to appraise it, must come to something near a thousand million dollars. The present aggregate value no man is able to compute. The ultimate value of these roads is far in the future: depending upon the people taken into the country by the railways and the steain- ship. lines under their control; upon the lands made productive by immigrants; upon business fostered and",
         "Baron Shaughnessy to some extent created by the railways; upon the rail- way adverti*sing of Canada abroad; when not a mile, nor a car, nor a water-tank of any of these systems would be worth estixnating in dollars at any time in the future if the arniies and the fleets of nearly ail free peoples were not organised for the purpose of keeping the Prussian card index out of such places as Canada. Very likely Lord Shaughnessy realises that as well as any one. He is temperaunentaily and by descent an Irishman; as Irish without the poetry as Tom Moore who made a wayside station on the C.P.R. famous in verse. Without harping on railways for a theme he went from point to point as energetica]ly and concisely as a prairie train. He seemed to, gather momentum as he went.. Now and then as he swept into some peculiarly pictliresque phase of his subject his voice whistled as shxill as a piccolo. Personal to some extent the con- versation must be; but not for long. No matter how raptly Lord Shaughnessy loses himself in the subject, he has no inclination to.forget-hmself. Which causes one to reflect that lie was born an American. With Irish blood and American breeding, even the early stoicism of the organising C.P.R. failed to, repress in hlm the bubbling audacity of the primai ego. And -it must be remembered that few men living can look back upon so remarkable an evolution of a man and a system. One might illustrate by John D. Rockefeller and Carnegie, except that Shaughnessy is not a plutocrat and was only in a secondaiy sense a creator of the great railway system. Before hlm there -was Van Home. Before Van Home there was Strath- cona. Prior to these-the wilderness. Part of his tumnultuous flow of well-ordered talk that spring morning concerned his predecessor, for whom. he had always the profoundest admiration and whose name he pronounced musically \"Van'orne.\" The two mren difiered as radically as hydrogen and oxygen. The eclectic imagination of Van Home was necessary to so nebulous a project as the C.P.R. Shaughnessy, less* brilliant, less showy, perhaps less daring, manipulated 52",
         "Baron Shaughinessy the matter-of-fact details in those pioneer days wbile his chief sketched out the huge picture, wrestled with financial problems, and worked bis psychics upon governinents and politicians. . WhnShaughnessy arrived in Montreal as purchasing bought for Iess than the value of the C.P.R in 1898 when he became President. In an ahnost mediaeval city of priests and habitants, stone walls and churches, a mountain and a big river and a bank or two, he bought steel rails and tamarac ties, picks and shovels and dynamite, pork, beans, and \" blackstrap,\" overalls and shirts, crowbars and donkey engines, handcars, monkey- wrenches, oll-caxjs, plouglis, and scrapers, and whatever grading machinery there was in those days, minus our modemn coughing pioneer the steam shovel. Ifany man in America knew the rail-head value of such com- modities it was this man Shaugbnessy, the slin, swift- moving Irishman whose eyes were as keen as the hawk's. Caada was a crude land. The C.P.R. was a primeval i monster. This was to be the first direct ocean-to-ocean railway in the world to cross an entre continent. Like the con- quest of Canada it required imagination, and more. We shail neyer quite understand the peculiar psychic combination of that experimental epoch after Con- federation when certain men banded together to, produce unintentionaily the Pacific Scandai. With the practical wisdom of nowadays we are sometimes inclined to think that the junta of Scotchmen who projected the railway for Van Homne and Shaughnessy to build were flot always the most honourable of gentlemen. Democracy always reserves the riglit to, cail the C.P.R. a few savage naines. We forget that in the days when Edward Blake, Irishi as lie was, predicted, that sucli a bighway would neyer pay for its axie-grease, it would have been considered good management to retain the services of the devil himself if that could have built. the road. The building of the system evolved the mani of temperament, Thomas Shaughnessy. He would have.",
         "Baron Shaughn1essy been a.big man under any other circumstances. Had he been a mere understudy to Van Home be would have been too small to succeed that giant of construction. Had he been merely an Irishman he might have been dis- couragcd. When Van Homne left the presidency in 1898, there was considerable speculatkon as to the reason. The wonder stili exists after the man is dead. H1e wvas then in bis prime of activity, *fifty-five years old. According to bis own theorem no man cornes to the sul-conscious co-ordination of details necessary to control a vast system until he is sixty. H1e was five years under bis own estimate when he handed over the transcontinental which he had helped to create, just at the tirne ,,ïhen it had corne to be regarded as one of the world's greatest systems. In 1898 Canada had just begun to rediscover itself. In the five years immediately following that the C.P.R. carried in more people and'ported out more products than it had done in the thirteen years between the driving of the last spike and the retirement of Van Horne. In the decade after 1898 the C.P.R. becamne a world- girdling system, with ships on every sea, its literature displayed ini every country of Europe, and its stocks bought and sold under every flag. Canadians themselves have always looked upon the C.P.R. as a sort of super- system in relation to governments, parties, politics, and other business corporations. If a C.P.R. man of any prominence was sbifted or promoted the news becanie a national fact. If the corporation applied for an increase of its capital stock the fact was sniffed at by alarnnist inembers of Parliament and editors as something approxi- mating to, a national calamnity. \"'Cutting a melon \" became as apropos of the C.P.R. as \" axle-grease \" and '«\u003ctwo streaks of rust across the prairie \" had been in the days of Edward Blake. Lt was a saying of Van Horne that the greatest tbing he ever did for the C.P.R. was to put Shaugbnessy into it. Was that another of bis cryptic humours? Perhaps not. For a couple of years before bis resignation he had left the bu]k of bis work to his astute and untiring 54",
         "Baron Shaughinessy assistant. He had the notion that he was unwell. Fond as he was of saying that lie had neyer been tired because lie neyer worked, there were signs that the giant liad grown weary of one thing and had become a sort of eclectic. Van Horne with ail his tremendous creative energy was a superb dilettante. He had a finger in almost every pie. 11e bad reached the end of the pioneer con- struction stage, and on the operating end the road had already begum to pay dividends. He had probably corne to the end of lis purely rornantic tether. Merely to, operate a system which ini the main liad been created was flot primai enough for hini. He had dabbled much ini books and mucli more in art. H1e was coilecting pictures and curios, ransacking the Orient for treasures. 11e was himself painting. H1e had a desire to, live among objects and atmospheres of art. And for a while lie did; until he discovered that bis primai energies developed on the C.P.R. made him, hungry to, railroad Cuba after the Spanish-American War. Whatever the philosophy of Van Horne it was prob- ably flot equal to, the task of adniinisteiing the system which he liad done the major share to create. He liad shot bis boit in projecting the system. To carry it further, with ail its bewildering complications of freiglits and tariflis, steamship Uines, paiace liotels, irrigation adven- tures, land policies, immigration agencies, and concurrent wrestlings with both governments and Railway Com- mission, needed the hand of a man with a greater concen- tration of purpose and more patient with conflicting details. To manage the C.P.R. in competition with other transcontinental systems was no work for a man of Gargantuan hobbies. It was and is the task of a man witli a single tenacity of purpose, who, whatever bis private inclinations, neyer permits bis humours to enter mnto bis business. Siný:: Van Home retired the system. lias evolved tliousands of miles of new highway. It lias also evolved Thomas Shaugbnessy. That spring morning as the President heard the. bugles and drums of a restless Canada marcbing to war, lie talked freely about Canadian affairs. Eje spoke",
         "Baron Shaughnlessy with the diiect rapid-fire organisation of argument that marks the mani who is accustomed to simpfifying and foeussing a myriad details. He had mastered the C.P.R.: no man had ever done it so thoroughly. And ne spoke with an almost..evangelical sincerity. The war-he spoke of that frst; reiterating the views for which he had been. criticised and for wkicli he pre- dicted that Canada would yet decide that lie was riglit. He pointed out the need for a national register of men and resources in a time of war, a measure wbich lie said sliould have been tundertaken long before-although one does not recolleet that in the early days of the war lie ever said, so. But to him the war was a passing phase. Tremendous and testing as it raiglit be, he chose still to regard this country as a land of the future. Canada had not shot lier boit in one spasm, of glorified expansion since 1898. The problems created before and since that time had nlot gonie on the sheif. From, bis almost unbroken flow of ta]k that morning it would seem that lie hoped to take part in a stili greater movement of national co-ordination after the war. The necessity for consolidating aur resources, for developing our -G«wn raw material. for getting mo--ý and more men on to the land, for revising our systtm, of immi~atonfor a saner programme of railway building 'without paralleling existent Unes, for getting more of Grea~t Britain and less of continental Europe-bis views on some of 'these questions were already known ta tlie Government. H-e spoke of the Frenchi question, If any Nationalist concetvedthie idea from wliat lie liad said about organiscd recruiting that lie favoured the parochial let-alone palicy, they were sadly mistaken. What lie meant was that race elifferences sliould be obliterated in a tinae of national struggle; that if the Frenchi Canadians wislied ta get more riglits and freedom under the Goverument of Canada they should stimulate recruiting and be able ta say wlien the war was over that they had shown, their enthusiasm, for the Empire. To bis mind Frenchi Canada had greater riglits under the Britishi North America Act",
         "Baron Shaughnessy than it co'uld ever have under an independent Canada. To bis mind aiso, Home Ruler as lie is, Ireland needs no0 better measure of Home Rule than Quebec already lias under the Act of Confederation. Did lie, therefore, favour or expect in bis time, or in the days of any man living, an independent Canada? By no0 means. He looked forward to, a greater future for the greatest overseas dominion under the British flag than without it. He advocated some practical form of Imperial co-ordination by a joint commission; in matters of Imperial defence, in trade -ome form of mutual preference-and lastly in political administra- tion, wbicli to bis way of thinking liad better be left to corne as a tried resuit of co-operation along otlier lines. 0f course, there are those wlio allege tliat wlien a ma lias a baronage from the British~ Crown, what other pliilosopliy could lie profess than some attacliment to the Imperium? Let Iliat pass. Sliaugbnessy knows more about the raison d'être and tlie value of bis, titie than anybody else. And lie probably enjoys as mucli as Van horne could have done the paradox of an Irish Amnican, becoming a Cnadian peer. As to. th. business necessary to develop Canada among the nations wlien the war is over Lord Shaugli- nessy spoke briefly and freely. He believed that we shall have to revise our system of immigration. Instead of dragnetting Europe for people and testing their fitness tio be Canadian citizens after tliey arrive, there sliould be a siffting at the ports of emigration or at governinent depots established in Europe. He made it quite clear that the C.P.R. intends to pursue a land policy which wil make it easier for capital-less immigrants to settie and become producers. It was quite as clear that lie intended ýhe C.? R. to pursue its own policy in- this regard quite independent of what other transportation systems or tlie Govemnment itseif miglit do in the inatter. It was the talk of a many-phased man of affairs who bas corne to, the time of life wlien lie sees tbings in national perspective; a mnan always in earnest, forever",
         "Baron Shaughnessy ini touch with things as they are, neyer too big to observe the smallest detail, neyer too mucli of a political theorist to cease being a thinker of C.P.R., and neyer so, much of a C.P.R. man that lie sits back and makes light of national problems or of the men who are working tim out. The war was stili the first great problem. Hie had no need to say so. It was evident in aIl lie said. The bugles and the drums were banging below. lie listened. The drums petered off again. Irisbxnen have always been credited witli learing and seeing some things to v\u003chich many other people are blind and deaf. This mani, grandfather and organising man of affairs, centralising despot and clear-headed critic - how could lie that balmy spring morning of the open windows know that bis second son, Captain Fred Shaughnessy of the 6oth C.E.F., was dead. at the front? lie seemed to know notbing of that. The cable and the telegrapli had not yet spoken. The newspapers had as yet no headlines concerning that son's death. Those came two days later. Meanwhile it was courteously permitted, to the visitor to indicate when the interview sliould end. Lord Shaugbnessy genially shook hands-a warm, impulsive Irishi grip, and went back to bis conferences of the morning while the bugles blew.",
         "FRESIDENT FALCONER AT forty year of age Robert Alexander Falconer, D.D., becaxne Prsdent of a University which since the day of bis birth and before it had been headed by old men. Imagin9-King Lear and Horatio, Abrahamn and the younger Pitt, Sir Daniel Wilson and R. A. Falconer. Yet when Falconer was a post-graduate youth of twenty-five, Sir Daniel's fearsomely benign white wbiskers, snowy locks, and wintry cape- were the erudite symibol of intellectual achievement in Queen-s Park. In those days, when Sir William Dawson was head of McGiIl, it was taken as an axion' that to be caput of a college was to, be a great, and fa:7 as possible a venerable, scholar. Oh\u003e the prancing paradox of change 1 The older the world gels and the more wisdom a university accumu- lates, the youqnger the mani at ils head. Neyer had so, youthful a person as Robert Falconer been President of a great Canadian university. There miust, have been a pack of courage in this beardless educator who looked lilce a youth, when he consented to go up from the headship of the Presbyterian College li Halifax to manage a great imiversity fuIll of sage professors. \" Varsity \" was reeking with classic memories of Dr. Wilson; Professor laudon who succeeded him; Maurice I-utton, still the Principal of University College, who has inemories of to-morrow and is stili a mani of to-day; Paxton Young, the venerable matheinatician in the tower; and old Dr. McCaul, the first president of King's College. Dr. Falconer was no sage. His scholar- shlp was of the cold, exact type, souud as a good bell, incapable of exaggeration or of hot rhetoric. We do not forget that t:ere had been already a profound con.rast between Sir Daniel Wilson and President Loudon. Sir Daniel was a sort of aged Lear with 59",
         "President Falconer knowledge in place of misery. He was the sublimely picturesque whose two books, one on etbnology, the other on left-handedness, entitled hlmn to a status as a student of manldnd from the cave-men era down to bis own tinie. He spoke with a grand pageantic passion, read his marveilous lectures on history from. generation to generation of youtbs just to please hiniseif, and was in ail things mucli of a bgrd and a prophet. President Loudon was cold mathematics and science; uninspired, unpretentious, punctilious, as impatient with the head- long follies, of hot youth as Daniel Wilson had for the most part been blind to them. The régime of President Loudon, covering the period shortly after the great, fire of i890 until 1907, saw the genesis and evolution of the modem democratic uni- versity out of the old college on the campus sacred to its diligent dons and its serious-minded aduit students. That decade and a hall saw the rise of co-education and practical, science right tkrough the precaxious age of \"bloomers,» bicycles, and academic mining outfits, down to the tume when \" the sweet girl graduate with golden hair\"* at Convocation took her place alongside the masculine B.A. who took bis football as seriously as he imbibed Homer and Euclid. This inconsiderate deniocracy of learning had reached a clinax i 1907, when Dr. Falconer, the exegetist and principal from, Halifax, entered the Head Office of the University of Toronto. Since 1895 the University had gone through two revolutionz born of this restless democracy. The second vas terminated by a Commission wbich, nominally headed by Goldwin Smith, the dean of aIl coilegians in Canada, but in reality by Mr. J. W. Flavelle,business man, had. found it vise to c-oncede to the new protestantism a change of government. Dr. Falconer was thc' choice of that Commission. Hol vas selected in a business way by a body conducted on business principles. The affairs of the University, from, the paloeontological exhibits in the museuni to the latest dernonstration of modemn science in the laboratory, had been co-ordinated with cold, dispassionate care. 6o",
         "President Falconer The general defect in the University was, it seemed, nothing more than the lack of a business system and the failure to assimilate the hordes of youths viho came st.aling in from, towns, villages, and farms. New move- ments had been born, new tendencies were developing in a fast-moving age; and the University stili, clung to the King's College cap-and-gown ritual, when it needed more typewriters, more Iedgers, more waIl space, a central heating plant, a larger number of boilers, inills, machines, and electrical equipment-more factory co- ordination, more obviously frank correlation with the affairs of the great busy world outside, and a more discursive acquaintance with young democratic; humanity. At that time one newspaper owned by a graduate of the University had boldly nominated three or four young business organisera with covert B.A.' after their names as possible presidents. The Commission smiled at the audacity of the idea; and after cah-aly surveying the needs and the available mnen made up its mind to, do just what nobody expected it to do. There had been all sorts of hectic and shrewdly expectant ilimours. Would the new President be a scholar from Oxford or Edinburgh, or a co-ordinating intellectualist furnished with a business system from Chicago or Yale It 'was a momentous decision to, maice. For months the vexed affa.irs of this seat of Iearning had occupied column after column in the newspapers. So much was the choice of a new academic general manager a matter of popular curiosity that an excitable ne'ws-paper man intercepted the proofs of the Commission's report on their way for final revision and gave bis paper a \"scoop\" on the contents. The choice of a President was not of course t'fe only issue involved; but it was, the one item that epitomised all the others. And when the nanie of the new President was at last announced, the public treated itself to a sigh of romantic disappointnient. The new head of the University was to corne from no renowned seat of learning in either the old wor]d or the new. -ne was to have no retinue of titles after his",
         "President Falconer name. He was to be the author of no great book, and the disôoverer of no scientific principle. He was flot even to be a mani weil known to any but a few collegians outside his own* Province where lie had tauglit and rnanaged a sectarian university, and the littie Province of Prince Edward Island where he was born. He was to be a Presbyterian preacher, a professor of exegetics, and a classicist of some reputation. It was very absurd. Alunini ail over Canada hummed and hawed over this arbitrary choice of a cold calculat- ing Commission, and said there was either great method or'mucli madness ini it. The tzovus homo from Halifax was flot even fairly forty years of age. And there was ruinour that even lie had hesitated a long while before deciding to accept. The Commnission, with haif the worid of vise men from which to, choose, with a great reorganis- ing university to offer the new President, with lixnitless opportuni:ty, and a. sa1ary at least equal to that of the Canadian Prime M4iniister, had doubts for some tume whether Robert A. Falconer, D.D., from Halifax would not decide to cheat opportuuity by remaining in tte head office of bis Preshyterian University. Hesitation was natural Had R. A. Falcorer regarded this cail to, duty tbxough the spectacles of twenty years ago, he must have refused to accept. But conditions had changed. R. A. Falconer was the resuit. He was a very brief while at bis new post befre he demonstrated that he stood as solid ini bis boots as though lie had been in thema a lifetime. To the critical gaze of elderly professors, and the yet more nicroscopic scrutiny of skylarking students, he seemed equally impassive. That somewhat theological gravity of bis helped hlm here. Falconer was neyer an obvious emotioniser. He carried no heavy port of encyclopoedic wisdom. He had no visible anxiety to, impress any one with aught but his, holdfast desire and intention to be colour- lessly just to every one, froni the learned Principal ol University College down to the stoker in the boiler- room. To hira the caretaker's progr-amme was as mucli a department of university conduct, as the chair of 62",
         "President Falconer Oriental languages. There ivas a place for ail. It was the first duty of -the new President to allocate, to cognise, to keep godly counsel with hin'self when in any manner of doubt, and presently to catechise sorne one in great simplicity to ftnd out. Patience, unswerva2ble impartiality, judiciai, acumen, tireless study of details and the graduai Co-ordination of parts-Falconer had, or achieved, them aIl. The young theologian of forty had a reorganising task that rnight have fascinated any adventurous soul, or driven hlm to buy a ticket back to whence he came. He was expected to reform; therefore reforrn was possible. No other work like this would ever corne across bis path. It was an honourable difficulty. Yet, though the public nxight consider bis youth, he was expected to do the work of a grown maxi. Outwardly the new President seldorn irnpressed any one as being confronted by any great predicament. That colly dispassionate face told no taies. Not given to habituai smiles--usually a truffe Calvinistic and dour ini expression-he was not taken too seriously when he failed to be merry. And it was a very littie while it scered until he found other work to do besides managing a unîversity from a head office. Faiconer has one genial besetrnent. It is-public speech. He has talked more in public than any other University President we ever had i Canada, except two-the late Pricipal Grant of Queen's and Sir William Peterson of McGill. Like Grant, he, too, is a preacher; therefore, talk cornes with easy grace. But with what a difference 1 Grant wvas a forensic who rnade a hobby of politics and was a thorn in the side of mis- government. Faiconer is a universaiist wvho is apparently as much obsessed by the Y.M.C.A. movernent as by the exigencies of politics. Principal Peterson is a pro- pagandist who openly carrnes the burden of the Emnpire Falconer believes i the Empire, but you neyer catch bim carried, off bis feet by any gust of ernotion concern- ing the old flag. He is as likely to be moved by the consideration of -the treble clef and the utility of garbage",
         "President Falconer destructors as by the need for reorganising the Imperial Parliainent. He always appears dispassionate. To some he is cold. 'Y'uth does- fot at fiist warm to Falconer, who neyer bubbles or sparkles or loses hirnself in hurricanes. There is no obvious propellant force about this inan to over- awe the plebs. It is known to the students that the President, confronted wvith any entanglement-such as overlapping of departmènts or Hallowe'en eruptions- will cail councils, cross-examine, and probe, foldir.g his amias in grave senatorial scrutiny until the via media be found, or the blame allocated, and the penalty adjusted. But when that cornes, it is in no manner through the personal force of the mnan, but by means of hlmn as the full-armed delegate and enibodiment of the University. One might say that Falconer is an ideal clearing- house for ail college activities. He studies bis University as though it were a railway. It costs so niuch, earns se much, loses somiuch, needs froni the Government so much-annuaily and Per capita. One department loses while another gains. There are signs of the times; the President carcfuily connotes them. Classics-tottering to the polite museum; modems-no longer a direct rival to mathemnatics. Natuzai science invaded by theI physics building, the mining and engineering depart- ments, the practik il men with the tripod or the assay- ing outfft, the bridge builder and the architect. Yes, the tities change. Gone is the mediamval port that went with the cloistered precinct and thle high-barred gate. We have the keen-eyed youth who sketches bis career the very day he registers, and becomes a double entry in the University ledger and a factor of cost and over- head charges. The modem President must cognise these economic factors. But the Falconer type of President is not, therefore, a machine, something between a dynamometer and a board bil. He is a discursive, investigating man, whose habituai bent of mind maust be scientific in order to get the best net mean average of resuits from bis University. No longer is it a time for big moments and inspirational 64",
         "President Falconer episodes. It is an age of balance, check, and adminis- tration. Methods must be compared. One college may run to this, another to, tliat; but ail mnust. conforrn as- far as posbible to, the spirit of the age. The bailiwick of President Falconer maust not be permitted to, go to, excess in any one direction. The Oxford idea, party politics, athîetics, militarism, the ferninist movement, piactical science-even formai religion-niay be over- emphasised to the detriment of the ail-round citizen of culture, On these Falconer bas bis careful eye. Besides the common every-day world is much to be considered. The man who was once a preacher neyer forgets that. Down town and out ini the smail country village there aie problems; men working and think- ing\"-thousands of themn the product of universities such as his. So the President is seen aàs much as possible down. town. Manufacturers, art-workers, music-lovers, news- paper mnen, the Board of Trade, the Canadian clubs, the social settiement workers, the peace movement or the war party movement-any or ail of these may require an address frorn the President. He is usually ready, at a given tiine of notice. And he seidoin speak-s without saying somnetbing careftuy worth while. Neither does he return to the University office with- out having Iearned something; it xnay be a very comamon, practicai tbing, but it is useful. To Faiconer ai life is useful that cornes to bis miii; and the miii is a big one. Hie is yet a young man. Some day he may break through some of bis customary checks and balances and im- petuously seize some one big thing, forgetting both hixuseif and the University. What might it be? The Oxford Movement or the valueof the coilege-trained arcbitect; the Round Table or the function of the university in business; the possi- bulities of paciflcism or the importance of foresta±ion; the inteilectual, man's independenoe, of knighthoods, or the need for developing our water-powers; the menace of bi-lingualisrn or the power of the laboratory man in the modemn factory?",
         ".President Falconer Not even President Falconer know.,. And flot even Falconer's closest fiiend on the faculty-if there be sucli a nan.-wil[ ever know that lie is disturbed by the difficulty of finding out. We have flot, many such poiseful men li publi*c places. And we have no eniinent academic who.seenis to be so nearly devoid of any one consurnlng passion except for keeping a perfect equilibrium li the grand rnarch of men and events.",
         "SIR WILLIAM MACKENZIE BUT for the comparative accident of a thousand years we migbt have called this man William the Conqueror. No Canadian of oui times has succeeded in conquering so comýpletely not only a tmra nova, but corporations, :financiers, municipalities, governiments, and politicians. We shall neyer be nearly the same people again since Sir William Mackenzie invaded us with bis transcon- tinental and exploitatious programme-lie and bis herculean partner, Sir Donald Mann, whose burly shadow must always be imagined somewhere in any life picture of Mackenzie. But a year or so ago this mani with the eagle visage and the rnthless manner was giving Canada a great deal more concern than William of Germany. In fact, no small degree of our apparent indifference to the German Kaiser mnay be attributed to the fact that we had a Kaiser of oui own, whose naine also was William. On a ivinter evening in 1915 Sir William Mackenzie went to an art club inoToronto to behold a set of moving pictures. It was the flrst film draina lie had ever seen. The hinnfgures on the screen enacted thie struggle for existence in the most primitive forni remaining on the continent of North America. They drove frantic; dogs drawing walrus-laden sleds; sat by the hour over loue botes in the ice waiting for seals to corne up to the spear; bult cunningly bouses of snow; rolled, theinselves to sleep ini deerskin bags, and wheua they got up gnawed raw meat and went on long journeys. AU these things the head of the greatest railway-buil'ding organisation in the world watclied with uncominonly sympatlietic: interest and an occasional enormous yawn. Many of the art-workers present supposed that Sir William Mackenzie was getting a glimpse of something absolutely new. Certainly no railway of bis was yet 67",
         "Sir William Mackenzie 'within hundreds of miles of those igloos. There neyer could be a water-tank i any of those Eskimo villages. No Eskimo freiglit ever could corne over a Mackenzie road. What was he doing there? Having corne, wliy did lie somnetimes yawn as though he had seen it ail before ? The simple reason was-Sir William Mackenzie owned the Eskimos in those pictures. The film was bis. The machine that took it was bis also. The boat that carried the film and the, cameras and a whole nortbland ex- peditionary outflt for a crew lasting nearly two years was- bis likewise. In bis office he had a large book of blueprints, maps, pliotograplis, geological surveys, and hydrographic reports containing information about Eskimo-land that no Eskimo had ever dreamed to exist even in its most legendary form. As a result of the expedition a group of new islancis liad been reclaimed from the oblivion of centurie-, and added to the map of Canada. And while the explorer carried the gospel of Mackenzie axnong the Eskimos, the man who owned the outflt *went on with bis programme of conquering the rest of Canada as thougi lie knew flot the difference between an Eskimo and a king of the cannibal islands. That film was a very good illustration of what Sir William Mackenzie bas been doing in Canada for the past two decades. Witliout intending to, be at all im- polite or unpatriotic, lie lias been regarding the in- habitants of this country as more or less cultivated Eskimos. in our struggle for existence we needed him and bis railways-now 10,000 miles in operation-the C.N.R., the C.N.R.Q., the T.S.R., the W.S.R., the E.D.C., the T. and Y.R.R., tlie C.N.R.S., the S.,h. and F.Co., the C.N.R.L., and the hlf-dozen other utilities in Canada of which lie is either liead or director. These abbreviated syinbols do not include the liglit, lieat, water, power, and traction comipanies in Mexico, Sao Paulo, and Rio de Janeiro in wicli lie liolds fabulous amounts of stock. They have nothing to do witli the ring of similar enterprises lieaded and conducted by bis inveterate partner Sir Do'rald Mann. 68",
         ",.~.r'",
         "Sir William Mackenzie So mucli self-made power, ail the visible work of twerity years, lias neyer, so far as we know, been in the hands of any other Canadian. Up tilt 1895 William Mackenzie was a contractor. When he was a young school teacher down around Kirkfield ini eastern Ontario, where he was born, the Grand Trunk was the only rail- way in Canada. The Grand Trunk was operated from London. lie was a youth of eighteen at Confederation, when lie had no idea that in less than forty years lie would have great need of ail those provincial govern- ments and the federal governient created by the British North Arnerica Act. le was a contractor building branch lines of railway when the Pacifie Scandai ousted the Macdonald governient in 1873. is politics were Conservative. Let us ail be thankful that lie neyer took bis politics too seriously. Sir William Mackenzie as Premier of Canada would, have meant-at Ieast the abolition of the cabinet systemr, if flot of Parliaxnent. He was a man-driving boss of labouring gangs wlien the C.P.R. again got into Canadian politics; and before the main line of that price of Confederation was finished, Mackenzie had. individual contracts to, bis credit and a partnership with D. D. Mann wbich began i 1884, one year before the last spike of the main line was driven by Sir Donald Smith at Craigeilacbie, B.C. When that epic was over the new firm M. \u0026 M. took contracts for building several of thie branch lines nortli and soutli that tentacled away froni the grand short cut across the prairie into regions of fabulons and as yet undiscovered wealth. The first great corporation that made early Canada a land of fur-traders had given place to the second great corporation that was to inake it a land of great railways. Rivers and York boats and trail-carts were being superseded by freight trains and passenger coaches. Donald A. Smith, head of the H-udson's Bay Company, had become financial head of the C.P.R., and was being elbowed off the stage by the titanic figure of Van Homne. When Van Home, head of the C.P.R., awarded con- tracts to Willam Mackenzie and bis partner Donald",
         "Sir William Mackenzie D. Mann for sidelines ramifying into the furpost settie- rnents north and south, even he with ail bis prescience did flot foresee that before he lost interest in the C.P.R. there would be a railway builder in Canada who, would do things neyer dreamed of in bis philosophy. Neither for that matter did William Mackenzie, who was neyer a visionary or a very reakbeprophet. It is very pleasant romantic literature to read that Mackenzie and Mann dreamed an eaxly dxeam about the vast country north of the C.P.R., the great Sas- katchewan vailey. No doubt both of these shrewd slingers of railway ties and miles of steel realised that between Winnipeg and Edmnonton for nearly a thousand miles in one direction there - \"s a land which the C.P.R. might wait many years before developing. But it was long after the C.P.R. had quit building in that part of the world, and just as Canada was beginning to open up a new era ini immigration and land settie- ment, when -Mackenzie and Mann took over a ramn- shackle bit of railway running from the C.P.R. into the Dauphin country, and with running rights over part of the C.P.R. sat down to find themselves, in actual coiitrol of a diminutive railway that began and ended nowhere. Less than Lwenty years after that date, a special traïai -which, before the end of the journey became sixteen coaches-steamed out of Quebec City on its way west- ward. After more than a week of travelling the pàrty of railwaymen, parlianientarians, and newspapermen found themselves in Port Mann on the Pacifiei and steaxning down to Vancouver. The head of that party was Sir William Mackenzie. The train in which those 200 men travelled had covered more than 3000 miles, ev'ery mile of it Canadian Northern transcontinental main line that grew out of the littie spur line which in 1896 two contractors had made the .nucleus of a great system. without knowing it. To any but an average Canadian cynic this brief contrast makes the outlines of an epical romance. The average British money-lender whose millions have been 70",
         "Sir William Mackenzie invested in this strange conquest of a new land is quite willing to believe that the men who, achieved it are the greatest railway builders the world ever knew; and that the hundreds of millions spent on this man-made system are safeguarded by productive territory contiguous to the road and by bonds bearing the guarantee of both provincial and federal governments. The ordinary push- and-go American, accustomed to the creat ion of colossal systems within one man's lifetime, recognises that even under these conditions the task of linking up the scattered sections of such a railway from Quebec to Vancouver is a programme of impersonal ambition which neyer could have been carried out if the creators of it had flot some- timts treated most Canadians as though they were plain Eskimos. In 1892 William Mackenzie became the head oz' bis fist corporation, the Torontc Street Railway. That was enough to tie hixu for post-office purposes to Toronto, and to make hixn acquainted with bankers in that city. Otherwise the head offices of the greatest man-made railway system, iii the world mighit have been in either Montreal or Winnipeg. In 1895 he first became an operator of a small steam railway; the year before Wilfrid Laurier became Premier of Canada. There was a Colossus in Toronto and a Parsifai at Ottawa. Both stood on the verge of an Etizabethan era in Canada. In William Shakespeare's day the new world was the whole of North America with a million or so of Indians and Eskimos waiting for the white man who, would cross the ocean in a tub and begin to exploit them. In the renascent period headed by William Mackenzie and Laurier the new world, was a very large part of haif the sanie continent, much of it inhabited by redskins, half-breeds, and furposts white folk, ail waiting for railways and more people. By i901 Mackenzie had begun to give signs of be- coming one of the greatest borrowers in the world. That spur hine to Dauphin was growing like Jonah's gourd.' It was becoming a small octopus everlastingly hungry. Bankers wrote Canadian Northern in their ledgers; 7:1",
         "Sir William Mackenzie C.N.R. ovexfdrafts- Mackenzie-wants more money; secuity-C.N.R.; whatever that miglit be or become, heaven only knew, except that Mackenzie was the fixst mnan, who ever bludgeoned bis way into a head banker's office and without a ilote of apology proceeded to make the banker believe that to refuse hlm, money was to miss \"the tide in the affairs of men that taken at the flood leads on to, fortune.\" It is stili told with much. emphatic merriment by a ban.ker who years ago was a clerk at the head office of bis bank in Toronto, how that Mackenzie was informed once upon a tinr7 that bis affairs at the bank were in a state of undue congestion, and that-pf! alinost before the telephone receiver was cold the head of this nebulous enigma known ast the C.N.R. was in the bauker's office demanding to have access to the books, with a body- guard of clerks, pens over their ears, to find out what on earth lie wanted. Every year added a few hundred miles to the swagger- ing audacity of the curious corporation that was now a conibination of C.N.R., Mackenzie \u0026 Mann, Ltd., and plain Mackenzie. Bank overdrafts were gobbled Up. The terrible infant was hungrier than ever. What wonder if somne banker, seeing the monogram MM for Mackenzie and Mann, said intuitively, \" Oh yes-More Money.\" What security? Here came in the Mackeýnzie genius -plus that of Manin. Obviously the more money this ramrpageous new railway got the more it would need. So long as there was room for tamarac ties and steel. rails to, reacli out behind the steam, shovels and the navvy gangs into the comparatively unknown, there was no stopping it. Hudson and Columubus neyer quit while seas remained. Here was a sea of land-up the Saskatchewan valley. }{ere were settiers needing rail- ways. The pace became frantic. A few years after it began, the average of building for that period was coin- puted at a mnile a day. At the climax it becarne miles a day. A mile of railway costs anywhere froin $io,ooo to $35,ooo. A year's building of the C.N.R. ran. into 72",
         "Sir William Mackenzie illions-not to, be earned for long enough, even though the road ran through higbly productive areas. More and yet more mouey mwust be got. When banks gave out the money lord3î of Europe must be persuaded to disgorge. So began Mackenzie's crusades to, England. But the plain proposition of the insatiable railway- builder was the last step in a series. The MM genius had made it so. Getting London millions for a Canadian railway into a terra Ïncognita must flnot be merely a magnifled overdraft at a banlc. Mackenzie must have soniething tangible to, seil. So he hLad. Bonds; bonds of the C.N.R.; geod, healthy, optirnistic bonds, as fine as ever were made. Otherwise how could so impatient, so, arrogant a man as Mackenzie spend bis time wheedling ducats out of an opulent money-lender? No, the money- bags man mnust grab at these bonds as thougli they were endorsed by the Bank of iEngland. And he did. For they were guaranteed every one of thein by either the federal governinent of Canada or a provincial governinent. Government-guaranteed bondsý; simple, easy--tre- mendous! But getting those guarantees was not so simple. This suggests a cycle of activities which it would need the pen of a Hugo to ravel out; how by making bis lines serve productive areas the wizard wanting to seil C.N.R. bonds could prove to any govemment, any Cabinet minister, any politician, any senator or group, of such, that the road, was becoxning a national or provincial asset, to what extent higher matbematics could flot compute. This was not always done by writing nice letters to a Premier, or by long-distance telephone conversations. It .required-knowledge of parliarnents. William Mackenzie bas made use of ail gr,-%enents, oppositions, and municipalities. The art of government he bas neyer studied. He bas governed. Politics he may neyer have understood. Re bas by turn., swept political, figures out of bis path and. kept parliaments and cabinets dancing to bis tune. This and thus of the greatest railway story in the world bas been told in newspaper columns for years.",
         "Suir William Mackenzie The local editor told bis 465 subseribers wvhat the con- struction gang did yesterday in the coulée just outside the tbwn. The mayor of Outpost welcomes the C.N.R. delegation. The Board of Trade ini Wayback oiganises a banquet-speeches tiil midnight and officiai train out next momning. Large delegation of prominent citizens in a new western city takes a gratis entourage down to, Winnipeg, occasion of the terminal inauguration; free buffet, sleeping cars de luxe in a prairie wilderness- flamboyant speeches tiil long past midnight belauding Mackenzie and Mann, till they discover that the President has ordered bis private car switched at Tanktown and is there srïoozing while the delegation goes riproaring on its way. Down along the Atlantic the directors of an old road are suddenly flung into a furore of silk bats and top- coats. President Mackenzie of the C.N.R. lias arrived in bis private car over the Intercolonial; wants to take a trial run over the road to see if it is good enougli to buy and make over, symptoms of the doomsday or the raillennium. In Toronto the Board of Trade engineer a banquet at the chief hotel, tribute to Mackenzie and Mann the marvellous Siamese twins of railroading, who have been benevolent enougli to establish head offices in their town financially dominated by the Bank of Commerce; speeches grandiloquent - when Mackenzie muxnbles something or nothiiig and sits down. In Montreal five years ago a grand turnout of officiais and leading citizens to, a dinner at the Windsor; occasion, first docking of the Royal Edward in from Bristol-since gone to the bottorn at the Dardanelles. In the saine ci:ty a year or so later excitedi conclaves of Board of Control and Councit, orating in Frenchi over the intention of the C.N.R. to shift its station from down the river behind the city to the wbariage front-by tunnelling two miles through the solid rock on whose lordly summait Jacques Cartier stood three centuries earlier and ca]led the scene Mount 'loyal. C.P.R. shares are held ail over the civilised world.",
         "Sir WlimMackenzie Grand Trunk Pacific was a creation of a government allied to a corporation. The C.N.R. is the creatior. of two men-at the head of a corps of experts, including cabinets, premiers, members of Parliaments. Now and then soine cormmunist rises in the House to ask about the common stock; or some syndicalising member clamours for government ownership, of the system. Sir William Mackenzie postpones the one and smiles over the other. Hie has not driven the last of bis last spikes as yet. By what sounding seaboard wiIi that be? The Bouse of Commons echoes-when and where? The opposition of to-day crusading in caucus against the C.N.R. corporationists, may be the. government of to-mourow-pledged, by governinent action to support the system. There is ro escape--.except by governnient ownersbip. Sir William Mackenzie is the psyèhic Iink between al governments, municipalities, and plain peoples. He is the new thouglit applied to public utilities, a cross between the muan with a club and the hypnotist whose weapon is auto-suggestion. He is incalculable, baffling, uncorralable. If znuckraking lit crature were i vogue in Canada lie would be deifled as the Éreat optimistic octopus. But the niuckraker neyer coiild prove that such an octopus was not so!nehow more benevolent than predatory. Mackenzie nayer plunders a treasury; neyer loots a public domain. When lie grabs inost lie is most intent on national development. Hie is no sentimentalist to whom the flag is the eternal symbol of an opportunity. He-never makes speeches--except to state that lie neyer was a speaker; neyer signs articles written by a secre- tary pointing out what is the need of the people and the duty of the hour; seldom says anything to, an inter- viewer that is not alinost as conimonplace as Joffre mumbling to thie press about \u003c'saving the country.\" There is no danger that Sir William wil ever blab bis secrets. le knows tliat people and editors and parlia- mentaries wil ta]k about him; and lie lets tliem ta]k. Obviously E£r William Mackenzie is not a coromon, financier. In Wall Street lie would be a mediocrity-",
         "Sir William Mackenzie perhaps. Wall Street is too mucli mere algebra for him. Mere vulgar wealth bas neyer been bis ambition. He is enormotisly wealthy, and is normaily in the position of the impecunious PIutocrat, so bard up that lie must have more millions riglit away or cease doing something that the country needs. \" The best way to conserve national resoutces,\" he said a few years ago wben the Conservation Commission wvas fonned, \"is to develop them.\" He bas neyer denied that lie is a prince of developers. Gossip every now and then fabricates some yarn about an offer made to Mackenzie to buy the CN .ifany body of experts could be found to appralse it. W1Lýn Sir Wlflianm agrees with Sir Donald Mann and bis associates to, seil the C.N.R., let us ail look for the illennial dawn. Mackenzie and Mann witbout the C.N.R. would be just plain orphans. What is mere money to thls, man whose money is always moving faster than any of bis express trains? Wbat use would he ever be to hiinseif as a retired gentle- man? Imagine hlm sitting in a library, dressing-gow.n- and slippers, while other men build the railways; bis favourite volume, say, Sir John Lubbock's Pleasures ôf Life. Impossible. H1e lives in a castie on a biff not bult by himself. He lias music ln the home wbich lie seldom understands. He sometimes goes to concerts-to yawn or use bis opera-glasses; to plays, when lie yawns again and sometimes goes to sleep. Now and then a book agent nabs hlm at breakfast and rides down town in bis motor-I car to seil hlm a set of editiors de luxe v'bich hae neyer bas time even to open. Every littie while some solicitous person struggles into Mackenzie's office to get a few thousands for some cbarity or public work. Once upon ai time lie was made an honora-y colonel, but of what regiment even some of bis friends do not feel sure. H1e lias become acquainted with aristocracy ln England andp one of his daugliters is mariled to a Frenchi Count. H1e sometimes entertains the Duke of Connauglit. In i9î5, for the first time ini bis life he was snapshottci 76",
         "Sir William Mackenzie in golfing clothes carrying bis sticks on the field-and tbey seemed like deadly weapons. No one ever heard of him going away for bis health. IHe has n time to be luywell. None of these mild amer±ities of li1e have ever charmed Sir William. No man bas ever been able successfulfly to, flatter him-with impunity. There are days when he beams wiith the mellow glow of October sunlight. In the afternoon of the same day lie may be developing a cycone ini bis office, or snarling to, an interviewer bis opinons about the institution known as the public. Mackenzie's domination of other men whom he employs or takes as bis associates is almost feudally personal. His whim or bis nod may be like the ad -nutem of Coesar. What lie wants may seem to be alinost suicidalty absurd. No mattei; Sir William wants it and it must be grt-imnedtately. Soine day lie will explain --or somebody else on bis behaif. For the present- get it. If it is a few extra miles an hour on atrial run with the president's car, the engine may burst and the stokers drop dead, but the extra must be got. If it is a fly that bothers the president in bis private car the fly must be cauglit. Wlien he goes away fcr a season there is a con- glomerate sigh of relief in the offices. When he cornes back there is a gingering up and a tbrill. To-day the sky may be cloudy in the psycbic selieme of Sir William Mackenzie. To-morrow sornetbing may be in the news- papers that explains why the b;-g chief had such a bad quarter of an hour. And wbile the critics are propliesying that some day soon lie wili corne to the end of bis rope- lie liooks up a fresli link in bis transcontinental system and lias a conlab with another premier.",
         ". 1",
         "SIR CLIFFORD SIFTON A PR.A=CTAL politician and an abstract thinker do not, as a rule, wear the saine pair of boots.. Perhaps it may be forgotten now and then that Sir Clifford Sifton was ever a politician. Every land is entitled to a public conundrum. Sifton is somewhat the Sphinx of Canada. He is a man whose value will neyer be quite adjudicated in bis own tixne. Yet he lias years enougli left-he is stild only fifty-five -to construct out of bis own knowledge and bis ex- peuience something monumental; sometbing that no other Canadian is qualified to create. For the past five or six years he lias been Chairman of the Royal Canadian Conservation Commission. So far as it is known the duties of th-at Commission are to see that our timber, minerais, water-powers, fisheries, agricultural areas, industrial possibilities, and ail those other tangible resources that make a country potential, do flot go to waste either by squandering or by neglect to develop and to utilise. The mran who heads such a commission has a place in the country second only to, the Premier. Govern- ments rnay corne and go, administrations change their programmes, and parties their tactics; this commission and the railway commission are axnong the permanencies -umpolitical and, therefore, national. We know very littie of this, commission\u003es work. Now and then some water-power is saved; Chicago is stopped from draiinrr Lake Superior into the Mississippi; forestation is rnapped ont; arid areas are irrigated;- fish hatcheuies are estab- lished, and fishless lakes made populous; forest fires are fended off; floods are abated; waste lands are re- claimed; goverrment lands are roaded, railroaded, and humesteaded; and the imagination naturally rus riot over the vast potentialities of a new country to, observe",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton the sweeping scope of a commission which never can do haif it conceives, because provincial goveruments, municipalities, corporations, and big individuals often mortgage the future for the sake of the present, paying very littie heed to the lessons of the past. Yet the average Canadian-as well as the writer of biographical sketches-if asked casually who is the chairinan of that thrift-inculcatingbody would hesitate to answer. We are becoming experts in Canada at creating commissions. As a raie, after we get over the excitement of creating them, everybody but politicians and editors forgets what an average commission is for and who are its personnel. Newspaper history, which, makes most of nmen's reputations even after they are dead, will not rec'ord that Sir Clifford Siftou was Chair- mani of the Conservation Commission. Sifton will be remexnbered as the frrst Minister of the Interior we ever had whosýe naine anybody but the archivist could remember. lIn fact, we were much like the over-healthy person, unconsclous that we had an interior, until Clifford Sifton took that portfolio. The portfolio lasted nine years under his name, from 1r896 till :1905. It was afterwards taken ový.er by a Westerner,. who though a more picturesque character than Mr. Sifton, did nothing to perpetuate any spec- tacular memories of the period, except to carry out the romantic propaganda first mapped out by his pre- decessor. Since the change of goverment two, or tbree men have had the portfolio; precisely who seems to, be of very littie national significance. No one can ever have that vitalising department in oui affairs who will ever be able to, do what Sifton did to, make it famous in bistory. He was the privileged pathfmnder, discoverer, and adventurer. Ul the others before and since aie, in a sense, bis understudies, imnitators, or counterfoils. This mani seerned to corne forth out of the West, without any of the essential character of the Westerner. He was a native of Middlesex, Ontario, a product of colleges, and Osgoode Hall, a brilliant scholai, a master of law, a mani wlth alinost certain prospects of a judge-",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton slip if lie had remained li the East. He went to Manitoba to practise law. He did it successfully. He became City Solicitor of :Brandon, which li itself was no very brain-taing responsibility. In those days, Brandon was as far off the eastern map as Edmnonton was twenty years later. There was room li that elevator town for a maxi to, breathe; roomn on the prairies that swept li about the outlying shacks and the corner hotel for a man of out- door temperainent to exijoy 111e at first hand without considerlng the document knowxi as Who's Who. Nobody was who i those early days of the West. Social affairs were li a very embryonic state. But if any visitor to, Brandon left the place wittiout knowing that Sifton lived there\u003e lie must have been a poor student of towxis. He was the man who, ail but gave the wheat town a local habitation anid a naine. The elevators of Brandon were like slips on the sea. The personality of the chief citizen of Brandon was a beacon liglit. What Nicholas Flood Davin was to early Regina, Frank Oliver to Edmonton, and Donald A. Smxith to Winniipeg, Clifford Sifton was to Brandon. Any other Manitoba town miglit have suited hlm. as weil. Brandon was as good a place as any to begin a career which depended somewhat upon law, mucli upon pâlitics, and very remarkably upon character, which li the West had a habit of sticking out as proniinently as an elevator on the skyline. Politics rather than law was the chief intellectual piirsuit of Brandon li the early days of Sifton. Oîxtside of Manitoba in those days th-2re were no politics in the 'West. Mr. Sifton sat for Brandon in the Manitoba Legislature li the fine oid truculent days of Thomas Greenway and «:fzghting \" Joe Martini whom lie succeeded as Attorney- General under Greexiway. Most of the politics of Manitoba li those days grew out of the school question; and it was the school question that found its most distlnguished belilgerent i Clifford Sifton--even agalnst the policy of the Liberal Government. Clifford Siftonwas always rather bigger thaxi lis party, and even -when lie flxst carne ixito national promiinence as",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton a member of the Laurier Cabinet of first-rankers; inii 896, he was secretly regarded by those who knew hlm best as potentially the ablest man ini the Ministry. He was Minister of the Interior for the most spectacular decade of our history. He had the portfolio that meant most to the progress of the country. He had prepared for it Ly ability, experience, and hard work. In :r896 Mr. Sifton knew the Wesf better than most of the men who had lived there twice as long. He could co-ordinate the conditions and needs of the West. He foresaw the swift moving-picture draina that was to enact itself on those vast unoccupied prairies. He was wifling to beconie, for a while, the chief actor ini it. He knew that aboVe ail things the West needed people. Wealth was there to be produced. Producers must be got. Railways mnust foilow, or if need be go ahead of the producers. Governinent land must be homesteaded. Europe and parts of the United States had a glut of under -producing people. Canada had a population hunger. To get the landless men on to the manless land becarne, in simple outline, the great agenda of Clifford Sifton. Ail other departinents of administration necessarily deferred to this - the business of peopling Western Canada. Anybody who happened to live ini the far West, as the writer was privileged to do during the yeaxs of the Sifton régime, wiil recail what a picture that made anywhere froin Winnipeg to the feet of the nor'-western foot-his near the headwaters of the Saskatchewan. At Edmonton the spectacle reached one of its cliniaxes. I{ere among the picturesque and lazy half-breeds on their cayuses and the indolent, marvelling red men ini their Iodges, camne hôrdes of frowsy, skin-.clad folk gabbllng a strange language, fragrant of dirty Europe; frugal i buying oxen, horses, and waggons- carving black bologna and rye bread with huge clasp-nive, trailing away over the blils where they stuck up sod-roofed log shacks and began to rip up the unravished prairie for crop. '\u003cSifton's sheepsIdns » the Conservative critics called theni. They with the Doukhobors, the Mennonites, the",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton Icelanders, the Germans, and the celebrated \"Barr Colony,\" l were the Western problem, of the turn of two centuries in Canada. There seemed no end to the pro- cession of these Galicians; sprngýy by spring and on into the summer and the fail came the squidgy--eyed caravans of these fecundating folk, who wore \"skin side out and woolly sîde in,\" who were to leamn the English language and buy red niachinery, to buckle on manhood suffrage and to entertain the whisky-dispensing prairie politician, to go to the poils and to prove themselves citizens along with the riversîde half-breeds. The -mask-faced man in the Minister of Interior's office at Ottawa knew the value of these people. He was the first Minister to dragnet Soùth Europe for immigrants and deliberately to alter the character of our Western civilisation. It was in his adiitration that the great gates of the West creaked open to let in the outside world, that two new transcon- tinental railways were conceived to, carry in the people and let out the products. On this twin policy rested the welfare of the Laurier régime. Without a courageous innovator as Mirilter of Intefior, no such op5us could have been carried out. And Cliflord Sifton neyer lacked courage. In fact he had need of it for more than the work of bis department. Such a wholesale injection of languages, costumes, and customs into, our jealously guarded preserve sacred to, the Maple Leaf was an easy matter to criticise. Con- servatives lu the East '\u003cviewed with alarm» the Europeanising of the prairies and the growth of ghettoes, and bananeries lu our big cities. Vie should put up the bars. British Columibia viewed with much more than alarm the orienta]ising of luxnber camps$ mining camps, and fisheries. Eastern manufacturersa sud wholesale un- porters wauted the West's business without having new prairie towns clapped upon the map over-Pight. Sitton kept on landing bis unwashed armies at Halifax, St. John, and Quebec, trailing bis colonist cars cross-continent to the land of golden grain, swinging the homesteaders out to the free lands, padding the voters' lists with unspeak- able naines, cynically disregarding ail the historic isola- 83",
         "Sir ClifFord Sifton tion of a great colourful country for the sake of the wealth it might produce and the politics it iniglit creaLte. In this hectic propaganda the brainiest man in the LaurierCabinet proved that he was bold enouglito change the character of our civilisation without guaranteeing safeguards to the Anglo-Saxon part of it. He let down the bars. Inch by inch as the problems of assimilation grew, he put them, up again. The American invasion began some while before he quit office. He encouraged it. He knew that one good Minnesotan was worth hall a dozen Ruthenians. He muade sorne effort to get a greater percentage of immigrants from Great Britain. As the Laurier Government, in 1897 enacted the prefer- ence tariff for British goods, so, Sifton admitted a preference for British people. But he neyer regretted that lie had started the waves of polyglot Europe over the prairie. With true Western dispatch he determined to do first what lie wanted and talk about it, afterwards. Wlienever bis immigration policy was attacked in the House, he was, spaxed the discomfort because lie was gradually growing deaf. And if at any tiine lie chose to listen tbrough bis ear trunipet, lie was well able to take care, of hiruseif in a -4ebate. Sifton rarely rose to speak in the House when the House Was not conscious of a master mind. He was a man witli a different sort of intellectual make-r-p froma t-he workhle was doing. He-was capable of living ini more than one world. at once. He sometimes seemed bigger than tlie Government from wvhici lie occasionally differed on certain questions of Western interest. And there wei2 times when Clifford Sifton was the target for more plain abuse than any of bis, colleagues except those fromn time to, time identified witli the Department of Railways. Yellow editors created screeds of copy out of Sifton. One argus-eyed penny-dreadfuller in Calgary muade it part of bis regular diversion to tell scandalou.s stories, about the Minister of Interior. By more tlian one editor lie was accused of becoming disproportionately ricli since lie had taken office. Hie was criticised for taking' dancing lessons. He was said to be intoxicated with the",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton glamour of his new position. It became the fashion to scurrilise Silton, who being a maxi of great ability, remarkable force of character, apparently powerful ambition, and never-failing courage, grew to expect a continuous outpouring of abuse from the Opposition both li Parliainent and press. Nobody denied that the Minister of the Interior was an expert at winning elections. That gaine *i Canada lias created many an expert-none of the intellectual. char- acter of the mani from Brandon who had for a grand hobby the breeding of high-ju.m ping horses. There were critical occasions when the remarkable ability .d experienc:e of this maxi were of service to, the country li a greater than party sense. There were turnes when lie was the critic of bis own party; other tinies when lie was tlie creature of it. But neyer was a time when tlie severest critie of Clifford Sifton dîd not admit that if Canada were ever i a great international predicament lie was the one maxi whose political acumen, shrewd practical experience, and great knowledge n-iglt be most useful to the country. As an organiser of forces lie had few equals li Ottawa at any lime of our history. As an exponent of modem tbinking coupled with practical politics lie was the xnost distinguished Janus this couxitry ever had abroad. There nàeyer was a time li the thick of an election scrim- mage that seemed to the critics to be underiing civilisation itself when Hon. Clifford Sifton, the power behixid, could not, if lie would, sit in bis study and write a powerful treatise on a]most any phase of governinent, law, politics, religion, or civilisation. Thus lie becaxe the enigma of our politics; the perennial Sphinx who, gradually growing more deaf and more aloof from the crowd, became ail tlie more mysterions aùd pregnaut in bis scrutixiy of the world at large. In any university gathering lie could speak with the power of a big modem thinker, to, whom facts were always in process of co- ordination. Anxong any group of parliamentarians or publicists, whether li London or Washington, lie had thé gift of translating bimsei1f ixito the vernacular of the",
         "Sir Clifford Sifton occasion and of traversing planes of thought unfanIiiar to, the crowd. He became the irresistible, incomprehiensible Sifton, the man who retired, fiîst fromn his portfolio in the midst of a treniendous programme, afterwards from the House where hie bad becorne a somnewhat isolated spectator; but who neyer receded froni bis ?osition as one of the foremost thinkers of our tîme ini this country. As the controlllng genius of the Manitoba Free Press (Liberal) be swung it into a liue of opposition to, bis own Govern- ment on the Manitoba School question. H'ý afterwards took some of his own miedicine when bis owu paper flatly refused to, follow bis lead on the question of reciprocity with the United States. As Chairman of the Conserva- tion Commission he had a field in which hie could, when- ever lie chose, exert a powerful influence upon any Government. As an independent thinker hie gave hiniseif the indescribable joy every now and then of coucocting a hune of syuthetic argument that mnade some people pause to say, - Well, 1 take off rny bat to Sifton when it cornes to real tbinIng expressed iu clear language. That man is- the biggest intellectual force iu Canada.\" So it goes on; the enigma of a practical politician, a superb administrator, and a target for the \" yellows,\" clairnug attention as a master intellect who, if hie chose, might have been an eminent pbilosopbic historian. We have neyer seen fit to discard tbis man as Chairman of Conservation. We can only continue to, hope that bis first duty next to bis concern for the country will be to conserve the best iu Clifford Sifton. For the best ini that man is good enough for any couutry, and bis worst is far too badifor any country ciaimiug to preserve any respect for political houesty. 86",
         "PROFESSOR JAMES MAVOR ONiE o'dlock by the Big Ben bell in tlie-tower of the City Hall. Haif the joily company of art workers have gone home. Half the others are struggling into overcoats and getting ready for night cars. 0f the remaining few that care not when tl'.y get to bed, Professor James Mavor is one of the last. Wlien Auld Lang Syne takes the floor he. may be owling in some far room at a new set of etcbings. Since he came early in the evening lie has discussed paint with one man, sculpture with another, literature and drania with haif a dozen more, and answered a score of questions about Russia put to, him by newspapermen wlio want to know hoW shortly the Russians may begin to corne back,. and witli wliat sized armies. If at that belated hour some one lias a niind to strike up a darkey song to, a guitar or give a ventriloquial performance, the prqfessor of political, economy turns as quickly as a bird on a bough, liglits a fr\"slà cigarette\u003e and proceeds to, get a new lease of energetic bonliomie. And to look at him any tixne lie may be compelled- to keep silence, the wonder is that such a -négligé sort of man ever could divert him- self froma the plodding profundities of a wearisome sub- jeet long enougli to, appear as thougli he belongs to the sa.me-genus and age as our own. James Mavor is the most spontaneous, bundie of surprise elements in the college life of Canada. You do flot regard himn as a mere scholar. There are in fact those who cynically doubt that lie lias ever achieved ultiniate scliolarship. In a world of multitudinous objects of researchi Mavor has kept biniseif dynamically on the go, sometiines witli the swift energy of tlie wiiid Indian on trail of a fox. But tliere neyer was a time, so, far as lie is known to bis hosts of casual acquaintances, when lie was 87",
         "Professor James Mavor unable to tiurn from the main trail and foilow a side path whenever it struck bis fancy. Moving along the crowded street-the day may be as hot as -:ý. L!-nna and the crowd sweltering and dawd- ling-Maiur, with a linen coat, a Bermudan helmet, and a flamboyant stick, goes hotfoot by the mile, shoulders bent as thougli the problem whose main dlue he wanted were likely to pop like a hunted weasel out of any door- way. With the reputation for having written the longest book of aii'y author in Canada on one of the dryest sub- jects ini the cosmos, he keeps bis mind as; ingenuously fresli and as inimediately interested as a child's. Look- ing like an archSologist lie- is ini reality an ingenue. The world is fair in front of bis nose. The tbing hie wants is eye to eye. But if necessary when lie rises at a meeting to, spak- the compartment of bis mind that happens to be, in working order, lie can go spindrifting back into the past ages for a precedent, into unheard-of lands fc$r a parailel, and into that particular point in space where ail the art lines converge to provide himself with an angle. Among some of the less erudite and more envious university men Mavor is considered an enigma of unrelated knowledges. Thougli he professes political, economy lie does not practise it. He is in rnany respects mÈost prodigal. To have written a book so enormously extensive as bis recent politico-economic encyclopSfdia of Russia, he must have been compeiled now and then to concentrate. But the complète work took hlm witbin three years of the time it took Gibbon to, do the Decline and EaU of the Roman Empire. To get the mere informa- tion contained in this work he spent many months in Russia, engaged a permanent Russian- secretary, studied the R.ussian language, and we may be sure every other accessory that hie could flnd among so interesting and obscure a people. One cannot imagine Mavor doing such a work on a country like Montenegro. He must have space. -The vast nnknowabilities of* Russia ln Europe and Asia attracted powerfully bis roving, peripatetic brain. The 88",
         "Professor James Mavor slow glacial movements of Russian civilisation suited weil bis indeterÀ~inate processes of thinking. Micro- scepic exactitude was flot the main thing. Cosinic iin extenso was the field in which, working year by year with the rnarvellous precautionary patience of the Scot and the charmed ingenuousness of the schoolboy, Mavor in bis researches into Russian political. economy seemed like the cosmic painters who, as descilbed by Kipling, wii \" splash on a ten-league canvas with brushes of comet's hair.\" If any Canadian academic: of our times might be afraid to live too long lest he should exhaust the sources of knowledge, that- man is Mavor. Yet if Mavor should outive Methuselah he would stiil be searching after something as near like the truth as pos--sible. H-Ye does not wait for the slow processes of induction. He gene- ralises i broad big sweeps. The fabric of bis particular thinIng may contain threads fromn seven more or less unrelated worlds. It is all plain as a pyrainid on the desert to, hlm. 'You wonder you had not thought of it long ago. Wbile you were groping along a lane he has been careering out in a landscape of interesting and paradoxical fields. You may inquire scepticafly how the fungus on a snalce rail fence relates to the cubic contents of the silo behind the faxmer's barn, and both to the oesthetic, quality of the figurations in the housew-ife's ho. :.e-made rag rug. Mavor shows you. And while the knowledge may neyer be of any direct practical use, it interests the inquirer, stimniates, the brain, and gives Mavor another chance to spin one of bis glorified webs of philosopbic information. When any pert critic asks why this man did flot choose archoeology as bis métier instead of p9olitica1 economy, the explanation is obvious. The past alone neyer would satisfy Mavor. The present alone would merely irritate hlm. The future would be inexplicable and monstrous without the liglit of both past and present. And political economy is the oxily sphere of knowledge-which enables a man to correlate the activities of nianind, in ail âges into one: scheme of thought. It involves the study of ail",
         "Professor James Mavor human works-indu-atry, science, agriculture, painting, music, draina, applied art, literature, governuent, laws, ruanners, and customs, eyen religion. In Mavor's scope of the subject it is flot more fundanientally concernied with Adamn Smith and I-cardo than with Beethoven and Michelangelo. The science by wbich mxan correlates himseif to the world of xnaking a living is neyer old, neyer measurably nearer completion. It is the perennial, recreating subject. Men may corne and men may go. Political economy remains. So for that matter does geology; but the story of that is pretty well ail tabloided and ticketed by the geologists. So aiso does astronomy; but it is some while now since the astronomers sur- rendered the stage Ôf celestial, inquiry to the psychicist and the spiritist. But ihe epic of mani working upon his environinent from the first axe of the cave-maxi until the co-ordination of the explosives in a modern sheil is forever iii process of renewal. Mavor neyer seems to have time to ask questions. If lie wants to know somne one thing lie may stop li lis walk to interrogate the navvy worixig with his shovel. Before thxe séance is over lie may have told the navvy seven things ini exchange for bis one. Mavor began to be an eclectic when lie was a youth at the University of Glasgow, in which ci*y he was stili a young mani whei lie becamne professor of political economy and statistics at St. Mungo's College. Wbile lie was still at St. Mtingo's lie wrote articles for technical journals, becamne a director of the Glasgow Working- men's Dwelling Company, engaged in the. university extension movement, and edited the Art Reiee. He also found turne to grow vast varieties of shrubs anid trees and flowers, which lie stili dabbles with a bit on bis extensive grounids at No. 8, University Crescent, Toronto. While stili under middle age lie was engaged by the Associated Charities of Glasgow to study labour colonies in Germaxiy. The British Board of Trade asked hlm, to extend bis investigations to Belginni, Holland, and lIraxice. I 1r892 Professor Mavor succeeded Professor Ashley",
         "Professor James Mavor in the chair of political science at the University of Toronto. Ai .ley, ftrst incumbent of the chair, had lured a large nunber of young men into the dazzling pursuit of a novelty. But Ashley was a brilliant crusader. When Mavor came, a niiddle-aged man with the look of old age and of erudition, careiless, of-clothes and disdaln- fui of average incompetence, he overwhehned the students with correlations of facts. H1e delivered him- self after the manner of a man who had no time to wait for mere mental preparation. He was, neyer anxious to limit the subjeet to the appetite of -bis audience. Any student of political, economy must be omnivorous. In fact Mavor was neyer particular te apply bis know- ledge openly to conditions with which students miglit be more or less familiar in a new country. At that time he knew very littie about Canada and the varying local conditions from which young men had emerged to attend college. The mere newspaper xnethod of proceeding from the known to the unknmown was too obvions. The tbing that was remote must be the beginning; that which was near at hand explained by the remote. It was Mavor's historical method. Yet he was neyer an unpractical mnan. On two occa- sions atter lie was appointed to Toronto lie undertook large investigative contracts for the British and Canadian Governments. One carne to hlm from the Hon. Clifiord Sifton, then Minister of the Interior, who engaged hlm to inquire into the problem of ixnporting Doukliobors to Canada. Mavor investigated the spirit-w.restlers and other forms of coxumunities of similar character in Russia and advised that these people be irmnigrated into the nortli-west prairies. They came, they took up land' They colonised and built villages. And for -years afterwards mountedpolice had trouble to keep them from, going with- out clothes. It is years now since the fanatical Dou- khobors gave any trouble to the authorities. Mavor's experiment bas succeeded. But for some tine, part of it was regarded as the worst jc.ke in the history of Canadian immigration. The Cther préblein which Mavor was asked to investi-",
         "Professor James Mavor gate was a corollary of the first. If immigration, then being carried out on a large scale, was to be kept up, it was importdnt toknmow what was the capacity ofCanadian Crown lands for growing wheat. Malthus, the economi* clergyman, had once proclaixned the pessimistic doctrine Of \"'population pressing upon subsistence,\u003e whereby he predicted that some day the earth would be too populous for its resources. The British Board of Tirade wanted to know if such a doctrine niight be true of the Canadian North-West, then being rapidly populated and railrkoaded under a progressive Liberal goverment. Profesor Mavor undertook the task as cheerfuily as he had once investigatedlabourcolonjes in Europe. ie came back with the Malthusian prediction that unrestricted immgration to the West for purposes of wheat-growing was inadvisable. The Western people, the railway pro- nioters, the immigration department, and several news- paper editors were indignant. It had been fondly hoped that Canadian wheat-growing was practically illimitable on a profit basis bet.ween the -American border and the north edge of the Peace River vailey. For sorne time the Mavor estimate was scathingly unpopular. Not long after the agitation died away, farmers in the West began to- discover that it cost on an average as much to raise an acre of wheat as it produced ini revenue at the average price per bushel; that owýing to cliniatic variations the yield fluctuated from year to year; and that more inten- sive farming #as more econornic. Even in 1915 With 14o,ooo,ooo, bushels, more of a wheat crop than was ever before known in that country owing to the caxnpaign for increased production, there is much sagacions tàlk as to the wisdoma of the Western farmer going mnore extensively into mixed farniing. But it always took a Mavor doctrine consîderable time to percolate through the average brain. If the people who a few yeaxs ago were victimised by real estate experts and subdivisionists into investing in unseen and intangible town lots could have asked, bis advice, they n-iglt now have been better in pocket. But after all what has such a corporeai subject to do",
         "iProfessor James Mavor with the collection of japanese prints, the study of Oriental art, and the gathering of natural wood walking sticks? Down in the Isle of Orleans a couple of years ago Mavor was on a visit to Horatio Walker, artist, to, whom he had written at one o'clock in the xnorning at an art club smoker to, accept the presidency of the club.. The habitant natives of the island saw the somewhat long- haired and ubiquitous Professor day by day cutting a new species of stick from, the prodigal, trees and lugging them home. They said lie was crazy. And if they could have seen Mavor ini Toronto laughing like a child at a Punch and Judy show, they zuiglit have had- no doubt of it. Sucl i s the iuresolvable character of the man who occupies the chair of political, economy in the University ,of Toronto--but occupies biniseif with alinost everything ,else.",
         "HENRI BOURASSA FAIR amidsbips of Le Devoir is the large, gloomy office of the chief editor; Iighted 1 forget how, except by the eyes and the wit of the editor who sat at a long Iitterish table\u003e as it seemed to me -amid battlements of books and pamphlets. To the restless ruinhie of busy presses he had just finished an article which in a day or two would be causing some Ontario editor to publish an Englih translation with a maledictory comment. No doubt an attack on some part of the BÉitish Empire; some furtb.er proof that England was a spider i the midst of a very shaky web. But that neyer disturbs Mr. Bourassa's amiability. He was tempestuously glad, to see the visitor. The instant: impression was that anybody who got into, bis sanctum. hati a welcome to, ail the editor knew about anything. At once the visitor intimated that many people con- sidered 14r. Bourassa a strange man. He laughed- somewhat savagely -and accused a certain French- Canadian paper of being the Quebec mouthpiece of a Montreal newspaper rnagnate whose chief business it seemed was to head the wolf-pack of other Anglo-editors in ccoriating Mr. Bourassa. That was text enough for a draina; which the editor of Le Devoir enacted in less than an hour of most excitable conversation mainly conducted by himself. Feverish to convince another Anglophile that the whole world outside Le Devoir was upside down, he leaned over the table and glared into thue visitor's eyes. His right index finger pointed at the visitor's, nose. He half rose in bis chair amid fervent gesticulaticns. His voice became a screarn. He laughed for exuphasis. Had the conversa- tion begun about the sociology of Timbuctoo or the theory of the nebular hypothesis, it wouid have gravi-",
         "Henri Bourassa tated back to the one theme that keeps Mr. Bourassa at full orchestra every waking moment. That theme was the French-Canadian race in Quebec. In evolving his oration to the audience of one, Mr. Bourassa becaine a brilliant exposition of lucid think- ..ng, a master of Engllsh, and an exaniple of incandescent conviction. Ail the visitor was able *to say clearly was that the night before he had been stranded in Nicolet. P.Q., where he found scarcely anybody who could speak English. .\"Why,\"- said Mr. Bourassa, 1I can find you scores of people in Nicolet who speak English.\" To him Quebec wvas dotted with Nicolets. It was not true that the French Canadians were isolated from English ideas. And in amy case where was there a village the size of Nicolet in Ontario where three men wvere able to, spealc French? Had the visitor asked the logical question, why the Ontario villager shovtd speak French in an Anglo-Saxon country, the argument would have lasted ail day. But Mr. Bourassa had an appointment up-town and would be glad to, continue the conversation on the open street. .±mid the swirllng crowds along St. James, aniong the banks and the office buildings, he went on with bis oration. In the jungle noises of the city his was the wild cat's voice audible above ail else. Perfectly unconscious that lie was a curiosity, lie seemed oblivious to every other consideration. In a common man that niight be intensity. In Bourassa it becaie a mania. The man who edits the organ of the Nationalist move- ment in Canada has been in the wrong world ever since h.e was old enougli to vote. He extracts a pessimistic ecstasy from the efforts he. has made to reforma the British Empire. He has spent a feverishly active 111e chasing up. an ideal. What it is liehlas neyer succeeded ln convimcing amybody--even.the readers of Le Devoir. lu 1908 on the lieights of Quebec there was one of the greatest bistorical pageants ever seen in the world. It was the Champlain Tercentenary, celebrating 300 yeais of mew Canada since Champlain discovered",
         "Henri Bourassa Quebec. Grand tableaux historiques, marvellously beautiful processions, old French chansons blending with the poetic ding-dong of vesper beils from fnine parishes at once\u003e made English-speaking spectators thrill with nameless emotions. Frenchi Canadians were the actors, on a stage that had the surlit, St. Lawrence for footlights and the bine domes of the great Lauretian his for a background curtain. The preseunt King of England was the most notable spectator. His warships lay black and grim in the harbour below. When it was ail over and the I-ndomitable steatned down to, the guif and away, even blasé visitors from Boston and New York realised that there had been another spectacle of Empire. It was the draina of a self-govemning dual people on the very spot where a century and a haif earlier brave Frenchinen and gallant Englishmen fouglit for the mastery of that part of the New World. Was Henri Bourassa there? If s0 it was to make copy for Le Devoir. When he thought of that pageant did he smile? No, Bourassa neyer srniles. He probably laughed and jabbed do'wn another vitriolic paragraph. Henri Bourassa is an idealist who has become a fanatic; a reactionary who lias developed into a radical. He lias a vision; one of the few men in Canada who ever had one long enougli to, Jet it make hum miserable. The vision of Bourassa is symbolised by a certain kind of coîinunity. It is the Frencli-Canadian village or small town of anythmng from 500 to 5000 unhabitants; dormer- windowed.littie houses and fat\u003e fertile gardens, beehives and tobacco plots, cob horses that scamaper up the lis as thougli the devil hixnself were after them., simple villagers that go to the field, the factory, or the office with no yearning for either wealth or. new ideas, and twinling priests that lose themselves in the big churcli with a tin spire and a poetic: bell on the roof that sings vespers down the vailey in tones of perfect and pe'r- petual peace. To keep sucli a community one of hundreds of sucli littie commnonwealths from. Montreal to Gaspé, Henri Bourassa is willling to be a man of war. He is the head 97 G",
         "Henri Bourassa of the Nationalist movement i the Province of Quebec; and the Nationalist movement sei~ns to have been born ini order to give Bourassa a field for bis peculiar and passionate gemius. Bor n Montreal, educated there by private tuition, lie afterwards studied law and learned English. As a student-at-law lie necessarily interpreted both the common law of the Dominion of Canada, English in its origin and boru of a bi-lingual Parliament, and the statutes of the Province of Quebec, which in spirit if not, in form went, back to the feudal days of old France. Here 'was a paradox. The veiy city in which Mr. Bourassa studied law was governed mainly by the Frenchi and doniinated by Anglo-Saxons. At the age of twenty he Ieft Montreal and opened an office in a littie town called Montebello, of which, he afterwards becanie the mayor, and where lie married the lady wlio lias done mucli to, keep Mr. Bourassa from being more violent than lie is. The Nationalist leader's devotion to, bis wffe is both an idyll and an ideal. At a 'huge Nationalist meeting in Montreal some years ago lie turned on the platform and publicly issed Madame Bourassa. Long before he xnarried, Henlri Bourassa liad become an intense student of history, as may be observed from reading bis pamphlets -and editoriais. Bis understand- ing of history was, laxgely political. Be entered politics as a Liberal and a follower of Laurier. In 18g6, wheu Laurier became Premier, Bourassa entered the Bouse of Couinons as member for Labelle. Most of the Freucli-Canadian members were Laurier- ites out-and-out. Bourassa followed Launier with limi- tations. Be was a critic. Had lie obeyed lus irnmediate impulses lie miglit have become an Independent; but that gaine had been tried, by English-speaking, members without mucli success. Third parties have always corne croppers at Ottawa. -Mr. Bourassa was keen enougli to see a bigger issue than merely being a personal, dissenter under a powerful leader. 1It will be remembered. tliat in thie argument over the",
         "Henri Bourassa Kaiser titie in Germnany it was decided by Bisnmarck against the will of old William I. that the King of Prussia was not to be known as the Emperor of Germany but as the German, Emperor;, the old monarchies were to stand. Bourassa made a shrewd note of the fact that Laurier was the French-Canadian leader of the Liberal party, but nQt a leader of French Canada. There was no such leader. French Canada outside of the old line of political parties had neyer been organised. The race unity of the habitant people had neyer been asserted since the days of Wolfe and Montcalmn. An English-speakzing majority in Parliament treated the French mlnority as either Liberals or Conservatives. Laurier hiruseif spoke mainly in English, when Hansard was and is as much French as English. French reporters took- down the debates which were prlnted in both languages. French correspondents in the press gailery sent French despatches to the offices of French news- papers in Montreal and Quebec. French editors of littie weekly newspapers, under the thuinb of the priest- hood, pu.rveyed the news of Parliarnent in simple French language to the habitant who read as littie as he could and went out to hear political speeches every time ?.n orator came into the parish. This bi-lingual paradox becoruie the besetting theme of Bourassa. By the British North America Act Quebec, the land of the large family in population, was muade the pivot of representation in the Cornons. The nuinher of members from Quebec could neyer fali below sixty- five. Yet the Premiers in this bi-lingual, Quebec- pivoted Parliament had since Confederation been Anglo-Saxons, and the new Premier, a Frenchi Canadian, was the avowed, protagonlst of British institution-, and democracy, and himself spoke to'Parliament more in Englih titan in French. As an independent Liberal Bourassa aspired to leader- ship. -Hle was hirnself an orator; a master of French in ail its idiorus, and of Englisin l its forensic forru. As a thoughtful foreigner often acquires only the classie out- lines of the English tongue by reading it in translation 99",
         "HIenri Bourassa ,of masterpieces, so Bourassa learned to speak Englisli for the sake of argument and paid no heed to, the friendly idioms that express the plain huxnanity of any people. In becoming a master of controversial English Bourassa had more method than madness. His obsess- ing vision of a united French Canada under the titie of Na#~onalists witli himself as Nationalist leader made it necessary that lie sliould speak and write not only to French but to Anglo-Saxon people. Writing and speaking lie was perpetually a forensic. 0f the two lie prefers speech. 0f the two languages lie prefers the Frenchi; and when Bourassa gets up of a Sunday afternoon before a suminer congress of habitants and villagers with long lines of horses tied on the out- skirts of the campus lie always becomes the fiame of the Frencli-Canadian fires. Long before lie broke with the Liberal party he had learned to gauge bis remarkable power in delivering great harangues to sucli assemblies. Johnnie Courteau loves a great speech, especially wlien lie may not know wliat haif of it means. He adores magniloquent gesticulations. Bourassa is not a mere rlietorician on the stage. He is a sort of Gabriel d\u003eAnnunzio as he yearns witli blazing eyes and spiked- up, unpoetic liair over the great crowd to, stir tliem. to their deptbs, to play witli theni as the wind frolics with the forest trees, knowing that wlien lie speaks to tliem lie puts Frencli Canada first in the imaginations of bis hearers, vwitliout attempting to make plain to the people just what that Frenchi Canada may hope to become in a confederate, modem Canada. In 1899 Bourassa directly opposed bis leader Laurier on the question of sending Canadian troops to the Southi African War. That was a w*ar of Empire. Wliat liad the habitant or the Anglo-Saxon Canadian to, do witli sucli a war at the bottom end of the world? Wliat did if matter that Englisli settlers ini Southi Africa claimed the sanie riglits ini goverument and citizenship as Frenchi -Canadians were freely granted ini Canada? To Mr. Bourassa the Boer was the squatter who liad the riglit ef possession and of dictation. The Englishman was the",
         "Henri Bourassa interloper as he had been on the St. Lawrence. There- fore, Canadians, and especially French Canadians, should take no hand in such a struggle. Bourassa made his position clear to the Parliament and the people of Canada by resigning his seat ini the House. The stage was sumptuously set for the occasion. Bourassa had dramatic genius enough--to know it. His defection fromn the Liberals and from Laurier was flot now a merely personal matter. Lt was not simply a French-Canadian move. Lt was an Imiperial issue. By that stroke of near-genlus Bourassa became the accredited leader of the so-called Nationalist party in Quebec and in the House of Commons. The race unit that he had worked so feverishly to define in the popular imagination was welded into a more or less organic fusion. Laurier and the Liberals, Tupper and the Con- servatives, still had their followings for political purposes. Bourassa only claimed the supreme right to speak as the leader of the French-Canadian race. He was re-elected by acclamation for Labelle inii 190, and continued to sit as member in the Commons for seven years. In elections he no w found himself able to swing bis Nationalist party in support of either one side or the other. HIe was the dictator of the party. He saw its practical use in embarrassing governnients and in winning elections. In 1907 he left the Commnons and entered the Quebec Legisiature. The political atmosphere of Ottawa was flot ind to him. The Nationalist party in the House gathered strength too slowly. He found a more con- genial atuiosphere in Quebec. Ln irii bis Nationalist organisation helped f0 defeat the Liberals by sitting on the side of the Conservatives in fhe House. The party of Bourassa aimed t0 hold the balance of power and to inicrease it. As the member for St. H{yacinthe ini the Quebec Legisiature Mr. Bourassa continued to humn tilt he burned himself out in i912 and retired from practical, polit ics. Le~ Devoir and the- public platform, are now bis arena, and he has roomn and licence enougli in both to be loi",
         "Henri Bourassa the greatest mischief-maker ini the Empire. The differ- ence between a good egg and a rotten one is no greater than the contrast betiveen what Bourassa's brilliant abilities miglit have done to work out the destiny of the French Canadians under the British flag and what he is doing now to hinder that programame. Now that the Empire is into its second great struggle sinoe Bourassa became an irrational politician, he goes out with bis- torical fire ini bis eyes and dares to say that British navalism is as bad as German Imperialism, and that true French Canadians should flot recruit into the Canadian army. .Mr. Bourassa xnight be asked to, consider: if the British Empire were flot the most tolerant democracy under the sun-iow would the editor of Le Devoir beI perxnitted to attack it on the platform and inI the press, not once, but again and again? The fact that -lenr* Bourassa is a free citizen, and that Le Devoir continues to circulate, is proof that the Frenchi Canadian lias more riglits under the British flag than lie ever could have had under any flag of France. Mr. Bourassa uses history to support bis arguments. Does lie remnember that one Will'am I. once went froin Nornnandy and both conquered and Normanised England? The very language wbich Mr. Bourassa took so, mucli trouble to leara is hlf Norman Frenchi. \"Yet in Quebec aTId in the Canadian Parliament the Britishi conqueror of New France has establislied the dual language system whereby Frenchi is as mucli the vehicle of Parliaxnentary debate as -English, and is tauglit in the schools of Quebec to the exclusion of English. Mr. Bourassa asserts the riglit of the Frenchi Canadian to a national existence under the Crown of Britain; separate in language, religion, education, race ideals, and political unity. For what? Does modemn France bear England any grudge for the capture of Quebec? If so, it is being expressed on the battlefields of France and Flanders where the bonies of English and 17rencli onte more lie*siCe by side, this time in a common cause. 102 t",
         "Henri Bourassa Mr. Bourassa cannot get from President Poincare or Premier Briand any endorsation of bis dreamn. Then from, whom? Sir Wilfrid Laurier, the greatest living Frencli Canadian, does flot support him. 0f the sixty- more or less-French-Canadian niembers of Parliament, a very small percentage care a cob horse for the Nationalist idea. Among the clergy-ah! that may be different. Archhishop Brtichesi of Montreal is a Nationalist, and there may be scores of bishops and priests who, for the sake of an undisturbed Catholic régime and plenary Churcli dues, would stand up for the French-Canadian preserve. What of the Pope? No doubt lie is in favour of the idea. Quebec is now the one part of the New World wliere Rome lias a solidarity in a ricli country. But even the Pope lias no fear that the Churcli of Rome ini Canada is being undermined by British rule or by Protestant missionaries in Quebec. On the whole, we may conclude that it is Henri Bourassa, the creator of the separatist party, who really wants the Nationalist idea to prevail. Bourassa is weak enougli to crave for power which lie neyer could get as the Frencli-Canadian leader lu either of the old parties. Witli infinitely more brain-power and a hlgher per- sonality, lie somewhat reminds us of tlie pompous and fretful Louis Riel wlio in 1[885 aimed to set up some sort of kingdom of the Metis backed up by the red me n on the Saskatchewan. Riel was hanged as a traitor. Mr. Bourassa will neyer be lianged. He wiIl be remembered as a man wlio was so, mucli of a parochial patriot, to, bis own conception of Frenchi Canada that lie becanie disloyal to, the Canada and the Empire of whicli it is a part; as a student of history who in the twentietli century miade a strenuous but feeble effort to undo tlie work of bistory; as a brilliant foreign investigator wlio becanie bigoted by a fixed idea sucli as in lesser intellects makes people mad; as a man wlio, ln order to justify an absurd and untenable attitude, cried out that lie was always misunderstood. It is the privilege of every ordinary man to be under- stood. If tlie majority of Canadians have failed to under- 10O3",
         "Henri Bourassa stand Henri Bourassa-perhaps it is well to remember that the asylinns of any country are full of people who imagine the world at large misunderstands tbem. Mr. Bourassa will probably ýay that the writer of this articlej misunderstands him. So alsc, does the average habitant of Quebec. Why, with such unmistakable power as an advo- cate, such scholarship, eloquence, and passionate self- immolation for an idea, has Bourassa failed to capture Quebec ? He has recently said that under certain con- ditions he mighit be hanged for bis utterances. He seems to, overlook the fact that French Canadians are not interested in hangings or particularly ln martyrdoms; the habitant is psychologically many removes from a Sinn Feiner. The habitant is a practical, thrifty person who refuses to taike bis politics, too seriously, loves Quebec because it is his fertile and picturesque mother, France only because three centuries ago it was his ancestral land, England as such very little, the Empire as sucb flot at ail. The habitant prefers to be let alone. In the defence of Quebec he would %lht like a wild cat. But as Quebec has neyer been menaced since bis great-grandfather was bomn he has no conception of what soldiering means in a world wvar Practically, the habitant does flot belong to the world. He lives, moves, and bas bis being in Quebec. And he would love Quebec perbaps a littie more if men like Bourassa and bis lieutenant Lavergne would leave him alone; in which case he miZht even be stimulated to become a recruit. Bourassa understands no Nationalism. except that of Quebec, wbich he bas himself created. To hlm. there is no possibility of a modemi nation called Canada unless the important part of it is symbolised by Quehec and the Frenchi language; no0 sucb national possibillty as a fusion of many races into one people. Therefore Mr. Bourassa goes on record as a radical who, can neyer be anytbing but a superb reactionary, and who will have to bis credit only the iact that he tried to, perpetuate in French Canada a dream of old France, in a part of the world where modern progress must -go on or the New 1104",
         "Henri Bourassa World fails in the world's work-as Henri IBourassa has done. \"At least we have ideas to interest the people-the old parties have none,\u003e is the buoyant assertion of the Nationalist leaders. The dlaim is worth a definition. Ob,stacles to Nationalistie evolution in other provinces than Quebec do not arise from a lack of vitalising and iructifying ideas. The real difficulty is in their flamu- boyant tragic presentation. Some of the best principles in Mr. Bourassa's programme, if given the broad appli- cation which he dlaims for thema but seldom gets, thanks to his own hysterical expression of them, will yet be accepted by Canadians whob neyer see Quebec. Canada for Canadians shold be obvious enough for even a citizen of Tory and, in Bourassa's phrase, \" Yankee \" Toronto. That is not ultimately Canada for the Empire, nor for the United States, but a country owned by its people who give to it their lives, their allegiance, and their cbildren from generation to generation. But Canada is flot a nation such as France, Russia, or England. Canada is not a one-language but a multi-language people. The polyglottism of the present and the future is built upon a two-language basis historically English and French. To the Bourassa party every language and literature as an expression of race is a sacred thing. Canada must speak many languages. The melting-pot can neyer obliterate them. The strength of a congress nation like Canada and the United States depends upon the preservation of race-languages everywhere, with as many racial customs and characteristics; as are consistent with practical citizenship in any part of the country. Therefore the Frenchi language and Frernýhlfcustoms must be preserved to the French in Canada. The religion goes with the language, though in the Nationalist view less essential. «\"Our people are flot priest-ridden,\" say the Nationalists. Racial customs; industries, and traditions must be perpetuated. The Natic\u003enalist programme takes much account of native folk-industiies in Québec, of fo]k-lore and folk- songs and fireside customs. The longer these are pre- los",
         "Henri Bourassa served in Canada the more essentially they become part of the national life. French traditions are three centuries old in Canada. Therefore they are historically Canadian even more than they are French. So with English tradi- tions. Lýogically so with the race-idioms of any of the people ini Canada;- The melting-pot is flot a nationalising institution. People do flot fuse. .They merelv live together ini harxnony, obeying the lawvs of the cozutry made by a Parliament that represents ai the peoples. By the B.N.A., French was given equal parliamentary statns with English. Therefore as a race-expression, the French language bas a priority over any other non- English tongues in the country. The kaw bas made it so. The genius of a, loyal people is to obey tht: \"aw anid to, defend the country. Canadian law says, that in case of necessity for defence, ail male inhabitants of mnih*tary age shall bear arros. The Nationalist says- SEnforce the law that exists and we will become soldiers ini this war, but if you leave it to, voluntary enlistinent we wili flot enlist becatise, as a people and a free nation, Canada was flot consulted about the declara- tion of war. Do flot expect us -*%o -fight, unless we have a voice in declaring war, neither out of respect for Great Britain as the centre of an Empire in which we do flot believe, nor for the sake of France to, whom we owe just the same degree of allegiance that thie United States owes to E-ngland-no more. Expect us to, fight in the defence of Canada as a free people and Quebec will stand second to no other Province, because when we fight for Canada we fight for a country that to, us means al that Patria can Inean, nor ini Quebec only, but from the Atlantic to tue Pacific.\"- Such is the substance of the Nationalist creed as Mr. Bourassa aims to express it. That he fails to maire himself understood outside of Quebec is the fauit of bis own irreconcilable and disturbing genius. :1o6",
         "ARCHBISHOP BRUCHESI STAND on Mount Royal, looking down towards the heart of the city where the C.P.R. tower and the dome of St. James' corne alm-ost into the saine focus of the camnera --and if you could fancy the blue St. Lawrence were the tawny Tiber, and St. Helen's Island one of seven bis, you might be pardoned for imagining the picture to, be Rome. Look farther eastward at the two great towers of Notre D)ame ainong threescore and more cross-tipped spires, and1 it might seern to resemble Paris. Bv'-, of course, Montreal resembles Rome about as closely as it does Athens or Port Said. Yet the dome and nave of St. James', even the transepts, are the exact replica of St. Peter's in Rome seen through the wrong end of a field-ý;lass. Built in Archbishop Fabre's turne, not so, very long ago, St. Jamaes' was calculated to be a 33r- per cent, miniature of St. Peter's; as though it were foreseen that the very next Archbishop would have an Italian name-Bruchesi. There the intentional, ilusion vanishes. To Orange- men in Canada, of course, St. James' is as good as St. Peter's. Otherwise the picture is more like Paris. Piiests--barefoot, tonsured, gaberdined; nuns and sisters-black, grey, and dun; Palm. Sunday and the Easter market; paxish bells jargoning out ceremonious ideals over a ponderously pretentious city of noise, of great railway terminais and many .sbips; siege-built stone walls as thick as forts, monastic retreats, and college cadets froin Lava-it is as near a huge pateli of Paris, yet as mucli unlike Paris as may be, as could be found. in America. It is the arclhbishopric of ]3rachesi. Down in the old market, where the gilded angels of 107",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi old Bonsecours Church -ean out over the docks to welcome the sailors, homespun habitants jabber among their red beeves, honey-pots, and twists of Frenchi- Canadian tabac. To thèm thids Montreal of the seventy parishes and the hundreds of priests is ail of the Eternal City they wiil ever see. If they drive their rickety carts so far west as the towers of Notre Dame and the dome of the Bank of Montreal across the Place d'Armes, Square\u003e they nxay hip along until presently they corne into view of St. James' with the twelve tawdry aposties over the façade and the ugly red-brick palace of the Archbishop abutting on the south wal1. Nowhere else in the world is there an archbishopric nie this. And Archbishop.Bruchesi knows every cranny of it, whether the symbol be shanirock, spaghetti, or the fleur-de-lis. French, Irish, Italian, ail are here in the rnidst of an Anglo-Saxon scheme of economyï a threefold community in a littie world of big pro- bleuis. lears ago this Archbishop with an Italian naine was visiting the Archbishop of Dublin. While there he paid a visit to the tômb of Daniel O'Conneil. From the grave or near it he plucked a bunch of shainrock which he sent to the palace of St. James', with instructions that a sprig of it should be sent with bis greetings to every Irish priest in Montreal the Sunday before St. Patrick's Day. A simple thing; but it showed a fine complexity of tact in this Archbishop, with three nationalities cohering in one spiritual comxnunity. This voltaic little man, Paul Bruchesi, might be diplomatic enough to wink the other eye and, like good Friar Tuck, have a fine time with the Sherif of Notting- bain. But he is the wrong man to escape troubles. A few years ago there was a capricious opera in Montreal with a Canadian prima donna iu the titie râle- that gave Canadian opera-goers a taste of \"' Paree'\" But there went out an edict from the dome of St. James' to censor this capering French opera of Charpentier with its spicy dialogues between Louise aud the shop- girls. The capricious opera was withdrawn and the 1oS",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi management substituted another more pleasing to, the Archbishop. Shortly afterwards one Godfroy Langlois, genial editor, in bis own paper Le Pays, came bard at the Church ini Quebec because of the backward state of education. It ivas proclaimed from the pulpits of Montreal that unless Le Pays should cease its diatribes the paper should be placed under the ban. Quebec was no -place for \" com- pulsory free education \" according to the ideas of Langlois. Ipse dixit Bruchesi. Some timae ago there was talk of a Cardinal's red bat for Bruchesi. Just a littie while before there had been the enormous IEucharistic Congress ini Montreal. Delegates and dignitaries from ail over -America represented the papal nations. And there was no man of them afl. better entitled to, cosmopolitan regard than the Archbishop whose father was an Italian, mother a French Canadian, and whose secretary is an Irisb. priest. But the red bat went to Archbisbop, Begin of the Basilica i Quebec. Anti-Bruchesians may explain that by calling Ris Eniinence of Montreal a reactionary. But it may be asked-wbat bisbop on the St. Lawrence is so well suited by birth, temperanient, and experience for tbe many-headed business of presiding at St. James'? Bruchesi with ail bis limitations bas mapped out a big restless programme in Montreal. Part of the programme is a dreani. Bruchesi bas a vision. Since he came to St. James' in 1897 he has seen Montreal feverishly rebnilding itself with commercial swank ail about the medioeval reliques of the old Franco-Indian campgronnd and the seventy cburches mnder that central dome. Montreal politicians are divided among Liberals, Conservatives, and Nationalists, just as Montreal Catholicism is divided by the Masonic element. Education, is attacked by Langlois and bis friends. Temperance bas to figbt against Sunday bars. French people delight in spicy operas. Charities. must be kept * Muicpal corruption.must be kept down. TeJ nube 0, and are a big factor behind, Langlois. The Irisb have their own churches, their own religious paper, their turn at the log",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi mayoralty, and their St. Patrick's parades. And even French editors disagree like so many Kilkenny cats upon the status of the. Frenchi Canadian i the British Empire. That krind of archbishopric is notgovemned by pageants, paternosters, and pipe-organs. To be bath comfortable and aggressive~ the Archbishop must have at least one deep-rooted, passionate idea with the dimensions of a dream. .Bruchesi lias that dominating idea. What is it? We shall see. Meanwhile remember that Bruchesi was born in this city of change. He was educated in Montreal, in France, and iri Roine; in 1897 he becaine Archbishop and began ta be a practical politician. When the 1ongshoremen i Montreal struck for better conditions and biglier wages the Archbishop, was made Chairrnan of the Board of Conciliation. It was an odd post for ah Archbishop; ta Bruchesi quite obvious. In the province of Quebec there is one industrial doctrine which mnust neyer so far as possible be abrogated. If that doctrine can be maintained i Montreal it is safe anywhere in Frenchi Canada. It is the practical theory that as far as possible Frenchi Canadians should flot go on strike. A strike ties up industry and interferes with wages. The Churcli needs the wages. A prominent, Montreal manufacturer somewhat cynicaily remarked to the writer, \" The Roman Catholic bishop is the best stuike-preventer in Canada.\"' But strikes are as much a part of advancing civilisation as bar-rooms and operas and contending editors. The Archbishop of Montreal knows, it. Therefore he hates the AniericanFederation of Labour. Bruchesi wouldnational- ise ail labour problems. But the leaders of thought down at the Labour Temple behind the littie Jacques Cartier Market are very scornful of the national movement i labour. They are a brandi of the A.F. of L. They are friends of Langlois, the agitator who, would have free education made compùflsory, and Québec, 'with all its needful chaos of labour grievances, strikes, and struggle",
         "* f Y",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi with.capital\u003e take its place in competition with ail other provinces of the Dominion. I must confess to a slight- disillusionment the morning I had the pleasure of an interview with the Arthbishop. Froni seeing pictures of hlm wearing such stately gold- braided stuif at the Eucharist Congress lie seerned to be quite teriibly ceremonjous. He would probably corne downstairs heralded by a pair of acolytes. The Irish priest-secretary fussed about Ris Grace and that raised my awesome expectations; until almOst suddenly the Archbishop, hirnseif was ini the long red reception room, bis purple-broidered robe cuhninating in a swish and a smile as he cordially greeted the stranger, flot knowing what upon earth lie had corne to talk about. He drew up a chair very close to mine, and if lie had been anybody but an archbishop lie iniglt have cailed bis man to, fetch cigars or a glass of Frenchi wine. In two moments we were on tenns of affabi]ity. '\u003c No wonder lie is popular,» was the silent comment. He talked witli headlong cordiality and soon plunged into a subject that always makes Bruchesi palpitate with enthusiasm. It was the Churcli; the parish, the priest, the corn- munity of souls under one steepie-and lie drew a picture of it that would, have done credit to the Abbé Samison depicted in Cariyle's Past and.Present. No magtter liow smafl this spiritual comxnuiiity, so long as there was a priest, there was the genius, of the wliole vast system, of the Churcli; no matter how huge, there was the family idea incorporate. So tlie idea of-father. The priest was not merely an incumbent or a parish overseer. He was the head of a family. The Arclibisliop drew a picture of spiritual Montreal; vividly describing the scores upon scores of churcli communities, that stiIl marked the ascendency of two, to one Frenchi Catliolics ini the greatest city of Canada. Now and again the Archbishop's linge carbuncle ring camne very close to, the visitor's knee as lie talked of politics and strikes, education. and temperance\u003e progress",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi and poverty, faith and Churcliunity. His tiue was brief; but he was forgetting that. How did lie know that I was flot a mere Protestant spy? Those 40,000 Jews iii the heart of Montreal-with their synagogues and sweatshops, their political meetings- and their clamour for racial schools-I must rememiber *thiem. Langlois was using those Semitioe against the true Church; against Frenchi Canadians. Those Jews were learning English faster than even the Frenchi in Montreal, ninety per cent. of whom speak some English. Perhaps some rabbi had quarrelled withthe Archbishop who spoke alxnost with animosity against these pushful, modem people, to him far more of a menace than the Chinamen whose chop suey cafés were dotted red by niglit ail over the part of Montreal threaded by St. Lawrence Main. \"But ail they want is national existence,\" suggested the visitor. \" Would you grant that to French Canadians and-'.' Rie interrupted with a peremptory but quite genial gesture. \"'There is a fundarnental difference,\" he said. \" The Frenchi were the forerunners here. The Jews are in-~ novations.\" Somewhat less hostile was IS criticism of the American Federation of Labour. Years ago lie had begun to oppose that, when a delegation from tlie Americali Federation of Labour waited on the then Bishop to, ask why ini bis pulpits there had been preached a sermon against the international brotherliood. Bruchesi told them plainly that labour and wages in Montreal had ndthing to do with New York or Chicago. Labour to him was a national matter. Hie still believed that. I had a great desire to ask him-why Samnuel Gompers had flot as mnucli human riglit to be the elected pope of labour in Amnerica as Leo had to be Pope of Rome. But I rememnbered that lie was the Archbishop. Also, if the Jews li their sweatshops wvent against the labour unions, why was lie so hostile to the Jews? But here 112",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi again lie was the head of the Churcli and should not be accused of inconsistency. No doubt an Archbishop with a passionate motif has a way of looking at public questions not granted to secular optics. But it seemed a trille illogical that lie should have gone out against municipal inefficiency and corruption amnong the French aldermen of Montreal, while lie opposed the free secular educa.tion that would have coxnpelled Frenchmen to compete on even ternis with Anglo-Saxons. The Frenchi Canadians in Quebec are to Archbishop, Bruchesi a separate people. Cities and railways, schools and politics, great industries and wicked operas, strikes and labour unions, may, if they miust, seduce these people into modemn ways. But it is- the business of the clergy to, keep thern intact. The real parish of St. James' is the Nationa]ist party in Quebec. 0f course, somewhat awkwardly, heaven planted a large number of Irish and several thousand'-Italians in Montreal, and these have nothing to do with the Promised Land. The Archbishop is flot sucli a visionaxy as to lose bis hold upon these. One inigit: imagine that lie would be a supporter of John Redxnond as well as of-Henri Bourassa. Ase\u003c him what Frencli-Canadian Nationalisma means and lie knows as clearly as anybcdy. But neyer expect hlmi to utter a %word of disloyalty to the British Empire. He is too adroit, too benevolent. Bruchesi does not believe ini violence. He would, persuade, entice, allure the secular mind; neyer argue it into hostility. [n fact, lie is a Nationalist who miglit appear on any Imperialis- ing platform and a papist who could almost preacli ini a Salvation Arrny temple. Bruchesi is neyer carried away by bis doctrine. He is the master of it, flot the slave. Casuist and apparent reactionary lie may be, an infatuated, bigot.-never. Yet lie is the nationalising fxiend of that brillia.nt derelict Henri Bourassa. How lie manages it nobody knows. It is so fantastic tliat one may be excused for letting tlie imagination mun flot a bit and conceive a dialogue between Brucliesi and Bourassa. Time, even- 113 H9",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi ing of January 8, 1916. Place, the red receptioli room at the palace. Enter Mr. Bourassa; greets the Arch. bishop-in F rench. \" Ah, delighted. Pray be seated. What news?' \"\u003cA recruiting assembly has been broken up. I have just spoken to the ringleaders at my office.\" \"Sh You should not have received them. You are too bold. You wiIl harm the cause. Laurier bas been speaking'against you.\"' \"\"Psh! Lavergne speaks louder than Laurier. My lieutenant bas refused to head a Nationalist regiment to help France and England. In the Quebec Legisiature he bas dared the authorities to arrest him for treason in denouncing Canada's part inx the war.\" \"'He also-is flot a true Nationalist. You are neither of you the French Canadian that you should be.\" Bourassa shifts behind a table which for the moment he uses as a rostruin. He is the bolder because to, hlmn Nationalism is a political dreamn, while to the Arch- bishop it is but a phase of the holy programme of the Church. With bis index linger pointing at Bruchesi he says: \" You are too adroit. You waste time with mnethods.' \"But inx the Church methods are necessary. In the sanctum \"ý-the Archbishop cornes close to the table and leans over it --2 you are much too personal. You do flot wait for occasions; you try to create them.\" Bourassa rises; one atm aloft. \" Listen! There was once an- occasion -which you did flot create-but on which you becamne so enthusiastic that you did the cause of Nationaiism more harm than any of my boldness.\" The Archbisbop steps back. \" Your Grace--that mandement iniio1.\" «'I do not remember-wbich? \" Bourassa repeats from memory the words of that mandement given out by the Archbisbop at the death of Ring Edward the Seventh: \"We recognise inx England the generous and power- 114",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi fui nation under whose flag Providence lias placed us to protect our religion and our sacred liberties; we oppose a formai denial to the foreigner wlio boldly asserts that England oppresses us; we joyfully pro- dlaimn ourselves lier subjects and pray that she may keep lier glorious place amorig the nations of the world, because we believe that God has great designs upon lier, and that we, the Frencli-Canadi:an race, have- ail to suifer if lier prestige is lessened.\"' \u003c' Ah! And wliat of that? \" asks tlie Archbisliop. \"Do you accuse me of inconsistency? »' \"0 f nothingi1\" screams Bourassa. \"But I would ask you-what if the Recruiting League sliould liave that piece of Anglo-Saxon amenity placarded ail over Montreal in flluminated signs witli the signature 'Paul Bruchesi '? The Arclibisliop smiles and rings a bell. \"'Bring 'me the evening paper,\" lie says to the secretary. Thie paper brouglit to His Grace is an issue of Januaxy 8, 1916. Witli a shrewd glinuner in bis eyes lie reads as follows: \" An explanation of tlie attitude of tlie Roman Catliolic Churcl in Quebec i regard to the war was made by Arclibisliop Brucliesi at Laval UJniversity last evening at a meeting in aid of the rnilitary hospital of that institution. '\u003cThe Archbisliop said: 'Canada being a part of tlie British Empire, it is tlie sacred duty of the Canadian people to assist Great Britain in lier lieroic defence of liberty. This was the position taken by the Episcopacy of Frenchi Canada at tlie outbreak of the war, and this is the attitude bisliops still maintain and will continue to maintain to tlie very end. Tlie obligations we owe the British Crown are sacred obligations. \"\"'It is the solemn duty of every Canadian citizen, to the utxnost limit of bis force, to stand side by side witli the motherland in lier lieroic effort to, crusli tlie tyrant who wishes to trample smail nations and States beneath bis ion heel. Wliat fate would be ours if the Germans 115s",
         "Archbishop Bruchesi obtained a foothold here? Were we defeated, Gerrnany Nvould secure -domination on the St. Lawrence!' \"«RaLising himself to bis Mui heîght, Mgr. Bruchesi said: French-Canadian countrymen, 1 for one do not want, to be a German citizen.' *\u003e By the time hie has finished reading, the place where, bis visitor had stood -is vacant. Mr. Bourassa has gone; a wiser editor than when he came. rE6",
         "SIR WILLIAM PETERSON PRINCIP.AL SIR WiLLuA PETEiRSON, C.M.G., reniinds a casual visitor of some rare old tribal ornamnent from a -museum which when rubbed. diligently on the coat- sleeve sparkles into, the memories of other years. The Principal of McGill, though considerable of a prophet and much of a shrewdly, practical man, specialises a good deal on the past tense. He is perpetually moving on the edge of some pbilosophy, or some reemo-yabilia ini the shape of suitable stories and personal reminiscences. One suspects that much of the Principal's interest in life is his genial hobnobbings with these distinguished men. An aggressive managing editor of a Canadian news- paper once sald of a brother editoa- \" If I had that man on my staff I would send him to interview all the crowned heads of Europe.\" Such an assignment would congenially suit Dr. Peter- son, who is a rcpository of personalia gleaned frorn eminent people. One of bis customary hunian hobbies was the late Goldwin Smith, concerning whom. he could tell many a story. Once upon a tume Dr. Peterson travelled with Goldwin Smith to a Princeton reunion where for the fixst tire the Oxford Professor met Grover Cleveland. \"'That was a very amusi-ng episode,\" said the Prin:zal. \"Cleveland shook hands with Goldwin Smith and said, 'T-ave wanted to see you for a long time, six, out of curiosity. \"'1 saw Goldwin Smith wince. He turned to me and said, 'Tell me, did he say curiosity?'. \" Aftexwards Goldwin Smith wrote sometbing about Cleveland in the Farmers Sun; alluding to bun as a genial but quite vulgar sort of person-though he hugely admired Cleveland, who, of course, did flot understand Goldwin Snmith as I did.\" 117",
         "Sir William Peterson Principal Peterson is a beniga crank on the huinanities. It is a wise Professor ini McGifl who does flot depreciate poetry and the classics, of both which Dr. Peterson, C.M.G., is a protagonist. .For a man from Dundee this is hopeful. Very few of enir imported Scotchinen inconvenience theniselves over Milton, Horace, and Homer. When they do we must suspect the Elizabethan influence of Edinburgh. If there is one maxi in Canada capable of inipressing upon a suitable youth the ethical reasons for comamitting to memory Paradise Lost or the Odes of Horace, that mani is Sir William Peterson. It is the ascent of mani to the top spheres that absorbs the Principal of McGilU. Now and then he may get bis mathematical, professors to com- pute the compound interest for the test of McGill's life- time on the eleven millions already invested by Sir William MacDonald i McGill University; but for -information only. No university president in the British or any other empire ever fouxid himself the via media of such colossal benefactions from one maxi to mankind. That subject seizes the visitor the moment he enters the sylvaxi precincts of McGill under the mountain of Montreal. It is impressed upon him, by pile after pile of great grey buildings, put up by modem engineers of architecture axid crammed with the latest equipments of science to match with a mechanical and dynamic age. Axid it is only when at length one reaches the chastely archaic: range of low roofs constituting old McGill of the Dawson era in geology that the fixiancial, fact resolves, itse]f into a mere temporising illusion. Here behind a classic anid modest obstruction of collegiate doors, vestibules, and axite-roorns one ids bimself at last into a stratum of academic atmosphere in which the moving spirit is Principal Sir William Peterson. McGill is the only Canadian nniversity wvith a knight on its facuity. This one--after a leisurely interval of waiting-emerges fromi bis sacrosaxict vestry at the rear and with the informality of a brown tweed suit, grizzled grey haïr, anid a pleasaxitly cynical drawl 118",
         "Sir William Peterson invites you to en-l.ertain yourself by asIing him questions. No man in Canada lias better mastered the art of atmospheric conversation with a genia]ly oracular turn. We understand at once that there are mnany questions which an average wayfaring man, thougli fool, niight ask the Principal and be sure of getting a higli percentage of hu-manised wisdom ini the answers. But you do flot begin by discussing the eleven millions. That is a mere episodic epilogue. McGill is the real play, and the play's the thing. McGill of to-day is Principal Peterson's Opus I., the work of twenty-one years of bis 111e since 1895 when, as the choice of Lord Strathcona, Chancellor of McGiII, hie came fromn Dundcz to, succeed the lainented Sir William Dawson wlio correlated religion and rocks. In that rear room I suppose Dawson delved mucli into the Laurentian system. that bulges up over the college roof. The day I was admitted to the ante-room for con- versation with Dr. Peterson, a railway inining corps were blasting a twc-milé tunnel through the sacred mountain of Montreal. That cloisterish littie rear room unites the old Dawsonian McGill with the modemn university. In- cidentally that involves the Empire, whicli without Dr. Peterson would lie minus one of its most ardent vindicators. Culture, engineering, autonomy all become a sort of academic triangle with the Principal as tbe intersecting point of three straiglit limes drawn from each bisected side to another. There is no embargo on culturising speech. Dr. Peterson prefers not to become colloquial. He turas sidling to the visitor, props bis head upon one band, gazes abstractedly at some invisible point, and proceeds to expound. He intends to lie formai and academic. He becomes talkative. The decadence of linguistics was the burden of a genial lament. «'Language study is basic,\" lie insisted. \" Things first, signs second, may lie very well in elementary scliools. But the languages are the great conservatories. America -1 know it-poohpoohs linguistics. Well, we needn't liq",
         "Sir William Peterson restrict it to, Latin-thougli to be sure without that it's bard to define a student's progress. But let us have men about us able to use their own tongue efficiently and as far as possible elegantly. Too many college graduates are-no, I won't say illiterate-but unlettered. They don't study language enough.\" \"What-of English poetry?\" \" rAh! \" He was touched. This is almost a fighting point with the Principal. \u003c'I have beÉn trying to foster the study of English poetry in the schools of Canada. It is a treasure-house of culture.\" There was a bit of an over-brow about this. But it was by no means cynical. It was Edinbuxgh that was spealdng. «\"Oh, we have something yet in academics to learn froin the oldland,\" fié went on. \" For instance, Scotland began to abolish the college freshman, the first-year mian, twenty years ago. 1 see Ontario is trying to, do it now. 1 suppose that in some departments, of college work America has set us the pace. But flot in the hunianities. No! The age is too materia]istic. Young men leave college imbued with mergerism, desire for consolidations, sudden wealth-aIl partial development.\" With ainazing ease the Principal cognated biniseif and the University to the rest of the English-speaking world. As he talked a fructifying idea was born. It was the psychology of imnperiumn et collegi-um. What is a modern university but the concretion of science, thought, culture, languages--cvilisation? And what else lu the naine of analogy is the British Empire? McGill, under a powerful psychic magnifier, would have been the Empire-as Oxford, Cambridge-did one hear hum suggest a]so Toronto? Perhaps not. There is, one gathers, some rather rabi.inical tolerance at McGill for the status and function of the University lu Queen's Park. We dismiss the registrar's ]ists or the bursar's ledger as being mere accessories. Students gravitate to both by thousands per annuin somewhat magniflcently regardless of geography. lu both there is the saie problem. of juvenile philistinism contrary to traditional 120",
         "Sir William Peterson culture; .in each the hopeful mustering of \" hoi polloi \" into -ultiniate intellectual democracy. None but a cynical materialist could make odjous comparisons yet more odious between these two great colleges- particularly in the matter of either revenues or rugby. Only a superficial thinker could trace any variation in degrees of culture. Learning has equitably adorned and illuminated botb, and eacl- lias accumulated its com- forting store of digni:fied traditions-with bats off pro- foundly to Oxford and a bit of a tilt of the monocle to Chicago. The spirit and active intention of each of these colleges, as of Queen's or even the new colleges in the far West, is ail the most ardent Harold Begbie would have wished with respect to spending a college to carry on the war. In neither is there traceable the feeblest symptoni of schism or seditioïi towards the Crown and Imperium of England. No, if ail of Canada were as full of empire-enthusiasma as its great colleges-not alto- gether excepting Laval-we should bave fewer mis- givings about the problenis that await this country ini the settiement atter tbe war. The intellect-comniunities headed by Principals Peterson anid Falconer are a unit ini the business of Empire. The story of each could be enthusiastically toid by the partisans of the other. What one gathers froni a ta]k in the ante-rooni of MeGil is rather a matter of humour and temperaniental expression. Sir Williamn Peterson enunciates. the rela- tion between collegium et imperium. Years before the war lie was agitated about the German menace witbout respect to German culture. He could, in imagination, see German warslups up the St. Lawrence, unless- In fact he spoke of this. He said nothing about \"kultur.\" That had not yet been defined. The pro- fessors of Germany had flot yet spoken. 1 doubt if the Principal bad any disquieting apprebensions about this. He was flot poained over the intellectual diagnosis of Germany as he is now. He was politically interested. Ife was on the platform. At any given znoment-unless the 'wizened ixnperative figure of Sir Wiliam Macdonald had been coming up the walk-be could have lawnched 112]C",
         "Sir Willfiam Peterson into an oration on the Empire. The faculty and the students might: go on a picnic if they wished while the Principal cogitated in continents. There was an abandon about the Principal. Hie was cunnilatively roused. Odi Profanum vulgus et arceo. was no longer a motto over the door. Hie wekbomed the crowd. Hie feit bigger than the cloister. Hie translated his enthusiasm into words. Which one fancies would. seldom, or neyer be noted at the head offices of the University of Toronto, or Queen's. McGills relation -to the Empire was capable of formai expression. In Toronto--a shrug might have done as well. Yet Principal Peterson somewhat chuckled, that he implicity understood the late Goldwin Smith, with whom. he had junketed considerably, not least among university gatherings '1h the United States. Any Uni- versity Principal who can make room inbis cognisance for the British Empire and the Sage of the Grange who used to be the enigma of Toronto, is broad. enough in bis outlook te correlate anything. 222",
         "----w--- WALTER ALLWARD CAPE, DiAMOND is a mountain of national sarcasm. In ail America there is no such a site for a great poetic symbolism in sculpture. That bold promrontory tbrust- ing out in front of the old citadel and the historie Plan of Abraham is the one place in Canada designed by nature ini collusion with history for a national monument greater than the Statue of Liberty. But the field where Wolfe and Montcalm fought for the mastery of a new world is flot in oui day, at lat to become a rnemorial of struggle and conquest. The National Battlefields Commission may pass resolutions and ask Parliainents for money-wbich they wMl not, easily get, for there is an impediment; and it is -the suspicion that Frencli-Canadian Nationalists would object on behaif of the French-Canadian people to see any Iasting reminder of 1759, when the fiag of the three crosses triumphed over the fleur-de-is. And what has that to do with Walter Allward, R.C.A.? No more perhaps than it might have to do with Philippe Hlebert, R.C.A. But suppose the Battlefields Commis- sion had decided to erýcct a bi-racial, national memaorial on Cape Diaminnd, wliat a delicate -diplomatie taskj they must have had to award -che contract for its erection. To whom would it naturally be given; to the repre- sentative of the British Conqueror or to the embodiment Olt the Frencli-Canadian delegate in art? To Waiter Allward of Toronto or to Philippe Hebert of Montreal? Would there have been a compromise and a collabora- tion-Allward doing the shaft and the vwi-mged figure on the apex, and Hebert woring out the figures at the base? Or would the Commission have dodged the issue by asking for sketch models from, the United States? .T23",
         "Walter Allward Sculpture is the only form of art in Canada that radically represents the cleavage between the two root races of the country. The two languages are equally officiai, in Parliament. It was an Irish-Canadian who made fainous Johnnie Courteau and Leetie Bateese. French-Canadian musiciang fraternise to some extent with the music-makers of British Ontario and they both work together for some degree of conimon welfare in Montreai. Ontario artists paint ireely i Quebec- though it must be adniitted that the compliment is not so habitually returned. But nobody ever heard of Walter Allward getting a commission to do a French- Canadian monument; and Hebert would need to sub- due his somewhat hyperdramatic style if lie were asked to do such a monument as that to John Sandfield Macdonald in Queen's Park, Toronto. LateIy, however, both these originating scuiptors have been engaged i doing niemorials to, King Edward VIL. One wi stand in Ottawa, the other in Montreal. And they will )robably be as different, even on tis peace- making subject, as Allward's South African memorial i Toronto differs from Hebert's draniatic monument to the saine event in Windsor Square, Montreal. Walter Allward began to leam bis art in a Toronto brickyard. Later, when a student i an architect's office, he was first perniitted to realise what it meant to get architectural proportions into a monument. There was a time when he might, have gone into painting, for which he has stili a lingering passion-yet neyer paints. He will neyer paint. Habit has made this undenionstra- tive man prefer the modelled figure and the wax, the plaster-cast and the bronze figure on a pedestal. Though he is stili a young man lie has to bis credit a large number of British-Canadian subjects i various parts of Canada, mainly in Toronto. XV.o else would have laboured to, execute sucli a frock-coated conventionality as the Sandfield Macdonald monument i Queen's Park, or the Queen Victoria even more prosaice? Who else i a contrary style could so splendidly have compressed the warlike and iinperial conceptions of Canadian life ito",
         "Walter Allward so fine a piece of work as the South African Memorial? Up in a littie old graveyard on a bill north of Toronto there is a shaft, Grecian in contour, subtie in lime, a simple, serene piece of modesty that might neyer be noticed by the average browser *arnong rustic tomb- stones. It is the shaft desîgned by Allward to com- memorate, in a quiet personal way, the life of bis friend Boultbee; and he did it with consummate subtlety that has no need of a crowd. Whether in the simple shaft\u003e the fussy, frock-coated Victorian politician, or the superb, sweeping lineainents of the great South African Memorial, Allward is inexor- ably bimself; the patient, intellectually imaginative workmnan, evolving bis subject with alnost unscrupulous regard for historic accuracy. He catches the spirit of the age.-not of bis own but of whatever age he sets out to depict. He would do a statue of a king cave-man brandishing a stone axe with as much punctillous care ffor the atmosphere of that period as he is now doing the mammoth Bell Memorial intended to commemorate the evolution of the telephonie age. Was he ever tempted by the passion of youth to trans- fix some blazing emotion ini a figure or a face? If so he has powerfully resisted. There is to hlm no winged Pegasus. AlIçvard has a sculptural conscience. The ethical sîde of bis art is a perpetual restraint. lie will n-ot over- express lilmself by exaggerating amy quality in bis sub- ject. Flamboyancy he abhors. If he were asked to do a thing suitable for an Arc de Triomphe bis design might pass the committee but would probably not be accepted by a Paris crowd. Yet it would cont ain every essential of a fine historic memorial--except the flamboyancy. The idea of the fiag neyer attracts hlm. H1e revels in details-that he may leave most of them out. He had rather suggest than express, or express by suggestion. Day by day, week by week, month by month, working with wax in that top-lighted lofty studio of bis, Allward asks himself what is the mission of a sculptor in a com- mercial age, and hiniseif furnishes the answer. From 125",
         "Walter Allward sketch to sketch model, from that to haif size with something of detail; on again to life size and the use of living models, and then to the huge skeieton of wood and chicken-netting for monument size, he creates bis critical, inspiring verity which after several more moons wiil be a plaster-cast ready for the bronze founders. Patience. There are many things to consider as the assistant works away with the pointing machine in- vented by Ailward for indicating on the skeleton the details of the life-size figure. This life size is the sculptor's approximate last word. The rest is replication on a larger scale\u003e investing that cadaver of crude wood and chicken netting with wax lineaments. And to a scuiptor with a great craf t and easy conscience that would be ail. This mani with the comprehensive name-Ail-ward- realises a tout ensemble, of a various ind. There is the committee of award--oh, the committee! usually coin- posed of politicians, town councillors, and howling patriots. There is the general conception supposed to please that committee and must therefore be a com- promise. There is the price which takes no account of love's labour lost li endless details produced and after- wards suppressed for the sake of suggestive simplicity. There is the difficulty of models in a Young commercial country. There is the architectural design-and Ailward spent part of bis apprenticeship to an architect. There is the site and the environment, involving the îoutlook of the landscape artist. There is the general setting of wa]ks, fiower plots, lawns, and driveways-usually botched by the civic gardener. There is the unveiling and the speecbmaking nightmare and the crowd. After- wards the crowd may pass along and neyer notice the monument except when a regiment marches past or the base is occupied variously by a squad of signallers, stacks of khaki overcoats or a gailery of spectators to watch the procession. Ailward is flot always patient. But he is always creatively constructive. Ris finest optimism, is not in biniseif but in bis work. Stiil a young man, he has a big and rnaybe an inspiring programme ahead of hum 126",
         "Walter Allward ini this country. Some of the things he bas done are as good as any he can ever do. He bas done them ini the fine flush of ecstasy, rigidly harnessed to a purpose; ecstasy that neyer breaks loose ini one figure or one pose or any casual exaggeration, but works itself caimly and serenely into the general conception of the piece. Con- sidering Allward and his best because most comprehen- âive work, one is reminded of a stanza in Keats' Ode to a Gyrecian Urn : \"Who are these coming to the sacrificq? To what green altar, O mysterious priest, Lead'st thon that heifer, Iowing at the skies, And ail lier silken flanks 'with garlands drest? What littie town by river or seashore, Or inountain built with peaceful citadel Is emptied of its folk this pions morn? And, littie town, thy streets for evermore Will sulent be; and flot a sont to tell Why thon art desolate will e'er retnrn.\" Those lines are somehow the invisible motto on the walls of Allward's workshop. They are the sweetly sad sentiment that pervades the work of him whose busi- ness is to perpetuate the past thing, or the event, or the man that is regretfully gone to point it hopefully to the future. In a country of tremendous geography, sparse population, and foot-frontage crazes, this is sometixnes a much more pensive business than even its own character creates. Allward's greatest completed work up to the present was finished and unveiled. in the national hubbub of expansion when the average man was more screamingly enthusiastic over a new skyscraper-so-called-and. had no eyes for a monument a hundred feet higli dominating the foot of a fine avenue on the edge of a populous and somewhat dingy retail shop street. The South African Memorial was unveiled to a large crowd among whom the scuiptor sat head-bent as nearly out of sight as possible wishing the fanfare were over. One Canadian city, whose eminent characteristics are Orange walks",
         "Walter Allward and village enthusiasm, had that day a new landmark; a work of art that for architectural design, impressîve proportions, inspirintg figures, masterly balance of detail and of mass, and a national significance based upon Canada's part in what was then a great Empire war, was to, stand as an inspiration to, posterity. After a long while the civic gardener got a lawn and flower-pots and walks laid out in front of it. The pass- ing crowd might sit for a moment at the base and gaze at the modeiled figures of fine Canadlian manhood. The sidewallc cynic might get a glimpse of the winged peace figure at the apex, superbly modelled ini woman's limes that the fiowing draperies did mot conceal, and balancing the splendid national Madonna at the base flanked by the young soldiers-on to, victory. Then carne the GreatWar; when the great monument was the rendezvous of drilhig and marching troops, day by day\u003e month by month, and year by year, the shouts of drill sergeants and the shuffie of boots. No spot in al Canada was the centre of so much warlike and natioLlal activity as this Allward monument. Presently the re- cruiting league comceived the happy idea of erecting a sign-paimter's hoarding fair in front of the monument, blocking out most of the base figures and substituting a bad big hand on a huge ugly -sword. The memorial was now complete. The scuiptor had missed the point. Those Nvho formerly had passed the monument by and might neyer have motîced that it was mot there-if sucli a thing miglit be-were nom'., -m- pelled to observe it because of the recruiting sign. The crowds sat on the steps of the monument to watch the soldiers, and the Duke. The soldiers stacked their great- coats on the base. The signalling officer stood on the top step to flick out the Morse code to his squad up the avenue. The memorial had found a practical use.. In becoming a conimomplace utility it had become also a recognised fact. The author of that memnorial need neyer repent its misuse. It can neyer be overlooked. Its mission cari neyer be perverted. There are great pictures blinking 128",
         "Walter Allward away in the monastic gloom of art galleries that would be glad of any such public cotnmon gallery as the place of this, monument. And the mnan who created it may be sure that a country which is, coming through the crucible of the Great War will have greater need of him when the war is done than it ever had ini its heyday cf commercial expansion 'whose monuments were sky- scrapers and railway offices. 3129",
         "SIR JOHN EATON EvEN in Canada it is sometimes necessary for a man to, be recognised as the son of bis father. After that fact is duly acknowledged, he rnay be allowed to, speak for bimself. Sir John Raton bas neyer permitted the public to forget that lie is the son of Tixnothy Raton, an Irishman and a Methodist who about tbirty years ago began to keep a general store in Toronto. Ris own son will flot be Iikely to inake liglit of bis grandfather. The organising Methodist baud of that Irish commercial genius will be feit iu the Raton business until department stores corne under governinent ownersbip. Nobody will ever be able to say how mucli of the Eaton success is due to, the Methodist Church of wbich the Raton f amily have always been conspicuous pillars. John Raton was brought up under the wing of Trinity Methodist Churcli on Bloor Street, the pastor of wbich always had a careful eye to the Eaton pew. Afterwards the family sbifted its allegiauce to, St. Paul's on Avenue Road. It is now impeccably domiciled lu a churcli bufit iu memory of Tixnothy Raton, as sucli deeded to the Methodist Church lu Canada, with a pulpit flot entirely subject to the wbinis of stationing committees. To the youtbful imagination there is enough of the fabulous about the business headed by.Sfr John Raton to make a fascinating volume about equally compounded of a Henty book for boys, a fantasy of jules Verne, and Alice in Wonderland. For instance, lu this greatest of ail Canadian department stores and perhaps the third greatest ini the world, in order to get two buildings under the saine roof part oi two Toronto streets was used for the pmrpose. To get from, the main store to the fur- niture building, you maice a detour from the basement '31",
         "Sir John Eaton out past the boiler-room into a long and illuniinated tunnel. If the same tunnel system. were extended another direction, it would Iead up into the mail order building north of the store; in a mean average of the two direc- tions one block furtlier into thie great factory that looks down upon the tower of Holy Trinity Churcli with as mucli nonchalance as the sky-scrapers of Wall Street regard the old spire-of old Trixiity ini New «York. Owing to the. fact that municipal governinent is one of the few tbings that cannot be bought at Eaton's, it lias not yet been found necessary to tunnel under the City H{all which occupies the adjacent block. And if the tunnel idea were to be carried out tc, completion in order to get the Eaton system ail under one roof, we should need a sap eastwaxd 333 miles long tu connect with the factory ini Montreal, and the heail factory in the town of Oshawa west of Toronto. Another would have to be excavated westward a tlousand miles to join up witli the great store in Winnipeg, which a few yzars ago changed the current of retail traffic from Main Street to Portage Avenue. It is some years now since the first wireless station in Toronto was- placed on top of the Eaton store; and so, far as can be learned, the chief purpose of that was to, lceep Sir John Eaton, wherever lie niiglt liappen to be on 123 yacht Floreiux, in communication with bis busi- ness, as James Gordon Bennett, wlierever lie may happen to be in the world, keeps in toucli witli tlie New York Herald. At any moment of any common day, Sir John Eaton may step from bis office into, the midst of more people than are carried daily by ail the passenger trains on ail the railways of Canada. These people are constantly travelling up the elevators, the siaircases, and the escalades of the Eaton store, from that into the street cars, of which seven lines stop at the doors of Eaton's along two main streets. Tliey are more or less in the grip of a systema of distribution that by means of hundreds of liorses and scores of znotor-rigs every day weaves a web of traffic with that ugly great store as a centre. Ail Canadian railways and ocean steamsbip limes converge at that store, bringing in argosies of goods",
         "Sir Johin Faton from ail quarters of the earth, sending them. out again in mail packets. In one day of Christmas week more people go through the Eaton building, of which the nerve centre is the office of Sir John Raton, than the popula- tion of any city in Canada outside of Montreal, Toronto, and Winnipeg. Every sout of that restless consuming population knows that so, long as he is inside the Raton store and has the sufficiency of cash, he can get ahnost anything he needs for earthly use fromn the Eaton coin- pany--except tobacco, automobiles, and tqmbstones. Most of the people wlio go there know that ail the year round in normal times the Raton systemi employs fromn 20,000 to 25,000 people. Any lad with a mathe- maticj1 head may figure out how mucli money is paid by fair wages every year to this armay of employees; the yearly cost of operating the Raton business by adding the upkeep of so many hoises, boilers, and elevators, trucks and delivery rigs; the price of stationery and office supplies and wear and tear on store furniture; the amount paid for interest or the value of rent charges; the total cost of all raw niaterials used in Raton manu- factuxing; the price of railway z'nd steamnship tickets for Raton buyers; the amount spent on advertising in a large num-ber of newspapers--and as znany more things as his youthful imagination miglit suggest. Having done this, lie niight add the amount that Sir Jôhn Raton gives away to philanthropies in an average year, wliat he spends on kis house and his various ineans of living, what it cost originally to build and annua]ly to maintain the palace-like Raton Memorial Cliurch, and other public enterprises bearing the naine of Eaton. If by this time the said boy does not begin to feel like Aice ln Wonderland wlth a headache, lie înay exercise kis mathematical, genius in deducing from ail this jules Verne mass of aggregates and averages, by a fair percentage of profits, what must be the nuznber of million dollars represented by the annual turnover of the Eaton business. And when lie lias plunged hiniseif into a bewildering mass of millions, he will probably wake up and discover that it is aIl a dreazu. The capitalisation '133",
         "Sir John Eaton and the annual turnover of the greatest inerchandise system lrL Canada have neyer been made known. The public do not care to know, more than they hanker for the details of the life of Shakespeare or the family conversations in the Garden of Eden. Ail that the people care to know is that they can buy most of the neces- saries and luxuries of life-from a package of nasturtium. seeds to, the complete outfitting and fumishing of a modem house-at Eaton\u003es, and that the mean average cost of such things is not exhibiting as much tempera- ment as the stock market or the grocery store around the corner. They desire to maintain the c!d. belief, whose foundations were laid years ago, that thre Ea±on buying machine is one of the most perfect in the world, that the selling and distributing mechanism is as con- siummate as human invention cati malce it, and tbat the personal emoluinents of members of the firm are flot a subject for royal commissions or the courts. ]Eeing eternally satisfied on these cardinal points, the pu.blic asks no idle questions regarding millions in stock or ini turnover; because in the growth of the Eaton businefs\u003e the weiare and the psychology of the people who brny have always been the first considerations. In the days of Timothy Eaton, the founder, there used to be much talk about the head of the business. The life of ihat mat. has neyer been written. As the story of a great merchant gifted with a genius for organisation, the study of men, and -che knack of a great politician in finding ont the whinis and the caprices of people i general, it should be worth telling. And it wiIl probably neyer be printed, because it is being told day by day i the development of the business of which Sir John Eaton is the head. The Eaton firin is the book of Timothy Eaton-and of those he left to corne after him. Axnong these, publicly, the most important is Sir John, who knows better than any one else the value of the men who are not in the public eye but who, sit with hlm at board meetings; the value of men who are at the heads of departments and neyer see the board room; the value of ernployees who 'with a proverbial",
         "Sir John Eaton loyalty to the wliole interest of the Eaton Company are constantly evolving new ways and mieans of better- ing the great service machine that lias become alinost as mucli cormmon property as the C.P.R. Concerning the popular, well-set-up figure wliom people are accustomed to seeing either ini khaki or mufti, often ini compazy with a cigar, in the cabin of bis yacht Florence, now at the service of the Adnïiralty, in bis private car wbizzing out to Winnipeg, at the wheel of one of bis many automobiles, there is a deal of animated democratic interest. Since he became head of the systemn, Sir John Eaton's name bas been much in the newspapers. Most of the publicity has to do with donations of nxoney by hundreds of tliousands to hospitals, colleges, the «Y.M.C.A., machine-gun batteries, and other concerns of both peace and war. Detached from bis business, Sir John is as genially pleasing to people in churcli, in society, in music, in moral move- ments, in sport, as bis father was mysteriously aloof. Few people ever cauglit sight of Timothy Eaton except at churcli. Most people in Toronto know the face of Sir John. When at the age of tbirty-tbree J. C. Eaton found himself squirming into a large pair of boots as successor to his father, he feit hiniseif saddled with -a curious psychological responsibility. He lias neyer escaped it; and he neyer will The paradox of it is, that the father, wlio liad so many profoundly interesting peculiarities, concealed most of them, from. the public that lie miglit fuse tliem. in the business. Sir John, who, inherited mucli irom. both bis father and a temperamental mother, lias found it necessary to make bis own personality more of a public property. in bis day there is a senti- mental sie to the business such as the people at large did not observe ini the days of bis father. Wlien lie bec-ame president lie knew that the people .were speculat- ing on how lie would measure up to the responsibihLy. He undertook to let them know. In that nine years, rnarked by a tremendous evolution of the system, flot least of which is the Winnipeg establishment and the 135",
         "Sir John Eaton increase of business to gigantic proportions, perhaps un- dreamed of in so short a period even by bis father, the social and sentimental side of the Eaton corporation has become one of its most obvious assets. This development must be credited li large measure to Sir John, wlao does not credit biniseif with the genius necessary to organise sucli a business, and bas mucli of bis father's astute faitli i the brains of other men. There are those who look on Sir John as the gMiing star of the system; others wlio wiIl prophetically allege that lie is a palpable mediocrity wliose chief value to, the business and the comxnnnity of which it lias become s0 tremendous a factor is tbat lie is the son of bis father and to ail intents and piuposes a fine sociable type of democratic bonhomie. The trutli lies somewliere between these extremes. If Sir John were to the genius of the Baton system wbat bis father was, lie would probably have become a failure. The pelsonality of bis father is invested in the business. Sir John was wise enougli to let it work. If lie were a mere amiable mediocrity, tbe personal forces left li the business by bis autocratic father would bave made hlm more troubles by this time than f ail to the lot of xnost political leaders. It mnust be granted tbat Sir John lias the qualities of a leader as bis father bad those of a great organiser. lI the modemn way of business, leadership is sometimes more important than the organisation of an autocrat. Sir John knows bow important it is. H, lias al -the savoir faire of a man wlio makes it a busmness to under- stand other people. Hie bas the popular, if somewbat obvions, interest li cliarities, liospitals, music, art, soldiering, and sport that makes it easy for most of the people te understand hlm. And Sir John Eaton is botb wifling and anxious to be understood. If lie spends mucli of bis time and energy in things outside of the business, it must be remembered tbat lie flrst of al knew the business li which lie grew up practically as an operator. iEaving learned that, witliout the advantages or disadvantages of a university education, lie was 136",
         "Sir John Eaton shrewd enough to know that there were other men who knew parts of it better than he ever could. He had too much respect for the system to meddle with it for the purpose of showing his authority. He has too apt an appreciation of the value of sentiment to neglect the obviously public side. As the personal link between public interest and business system Sir John is invaluable. He has de- veloped public interest itself into a system. Under his leadership the business, more of a system even than it was in the days of his father, has become a vast public concern whose whims and caprices are as popularly interesting as those of a President or a Premier. When- ever gossip mysteriously surmises that the Eaton store will one day move half a mile north and leave the mid- city block with its tunnels and machinery of business for a great public square, the people do not believe it, but they say, \" Oh, well, if Eaton's move, the whole retail traffic must move with them.\" At present Eaton's are in no danger of moving. Once a year Santa Claus, a month before Christmas, makes his advent to Canada by way of Eaton's. He is officially received by Sir John, and until Christmas Eve is sup- posed to take up his quarters in the store. This is one of the fictions that have done so much to make the Eaton business what it is. The whole story of the business is a series of fictions based upon rigid, uncompromising facts. So it must remain. And of all men in Canada there is no man who believes more profoundly in a fiction based upon unalterable facts than Sir John Eaton, Irish- Canadian, Methodist, student of public affairs, master of practical bonhomie-and the possessor of enough secrets to make a book of business romance as interesting to the lad thumbing an Eaton text-book at school as to the grandmother sitting in an Eaton chair on an Eaton carpet by a fireside piobably built by Eaton's.",
         "DR. A. S. VOGT 'MOST American cities of 500,000 population work out their ideas of civilisation without reference to Beethoven's Choral Symphony, the Deutsche Requiem of Brahms, or Bach's Mass in B Minor. So long as the tax rate fails conveniently near twenty mills on the dollar, most cities of this class take no0 interest in any such work as the Verdi Requiem, the Children's Crusade, by Gabriel Pierne, or the rmusic of the Church Russian by Tchaikowsky, Rachmaninoff, and Gretchaninoif. Prosperous cities can be built up without such musical luxuries. And when any city of 200,000 or more evolves any permanent musical organisation that gives the rate- payers the music of the great masters, the accepted mediumn of expression is the symphony orchestra. Very few communities under the half-million population ev'er dreara of building up a great choral organism that undertakes to be to choral mnusic of ail nationalities what a great sympho-ny orchestra is to music for many instruments. Toronto, the uncosmopolitan capital of the Pro- testant Province of Ontario, has the distinction of being the only city ini the world under a million inhabitants that has developed a great choral society instead of a symphony orchestra. The people of that city, who, until twenty years ago, were brought Up 0on sacred music and pipe organs with now and then a stray opera or a visiting orchestra, have established a clientele who take a keen personal interest in the choral works of the great mnasters outside of Handel, Haydn, and.Mendelssohn. Visitors regularly corne to, that city from New York, Boston, Chicago, and other American centres to hear these works performed by what is conceded by many American critics to be the fwiest choral body ini the world. The man who evolved this musical fact is a Canadian 1139",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt by birth, British-Canadian in sentiment, and of Germnan descent. Rie is a quiet, persistent, inexorable chorus- master\u003e who developed a remarkable instrument of dramatie and emotional expression out of a church choir. For years a church organist, he made a vitalis- ing hobby of choral miusic. After a dozen years of un- compromisig artistry ini various forms of that kind oi work,. he took his choir to New York,. Chicago, and Boston. The critics of these culturising centres unani- mously joined in a chorus of enthusiasm. In 1912 Vogt took bis family on a pilgrixnage over ail Europe. On that remarkable tour he pried into, the musical secrets of every country and capital from the Thaines to the Neya, the Dlanube, and the Tîber. Hie came. back knowing more about Europeah orchestras, choruses, bands, organs, and mnastergesang-veretnen than any other inusician in America-even to, the fringes of Finland, the country of Sibelius. A year before the outbreak of war Canadian financiers had7agreed to send Vogt's choir to Europe-Bngland, France, Germany-for a choral pilgrimage. This was to have been in June 1915 ; at which tizue choral societies were flot travelling to Paris and Berlin, and London was more concemned over Zeppelins than over visiting choirs. Two of the works arranged for these itinerant pro- grammes were Beethoven's Choral Symnphony and the Brahms Deutsche Requiem. Berlin would have got a sensation. The Kaiser himself miglit have been present. He had previously quarrelled with an opera conductor, who, for several semsons conducted the Pittsburgh Orchestra with the Mendelssohn Choir. There was talk of giving a concert in Essen. Herr Krupp von Buelow maight have escorted the choristers-blindfold-through the Krupp works. The Kaiser might have written a letter to, Sieg.fried Ochs, the chief chorus-master of Gerrnany, to ask, \u003c'Why can't we get that Canadian Vogt to organise a choral societv i Berlin? \" And the chroniclers would have remembered that when Augustus Stephen Vogt was a young student in Germany just after Wilhehn II. became German Emperor, he got the 140",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt root id-ea of his choral art from listening to the Dom Choir of Berlin and the choir of the St. Thomas Kirche in Leipsic. It is worth while to discover how Vogt built up this famous choir in a country that on an average is less musical than any of the great countries of Europe. Canada spends more money on m'usic Per capita than most countries. Foreign artists are taken in exchange for Canadian artists sent abroad. The country has just got over its parochial measies in music and ig ready for the cosmopolitan mmps. At the current rate of ex- penditure on teacbing, solo artists, choral music, orchestra and chamber music, church choirs, pipe organs, pianos, musical literature, and the rest, the country wiIl some day emerge from the commercial stage, when music is judged by what it costs, into the art stage, when no matter if it costs nothing people must have it because it is as natural as breatbing. Vogt was born in a place too obscure to be marked on any but a township map; Washington, near Elmira, county of Oxford, right on the far end of the German settiement of Waterloo county, Ontario. Ris father was a builder of under-sized, pipe organs. As a boy he played in a Lutheran church; as a youth of seventeen he found himself in Boston studying music. At that tiine there were no musical conservatories i Canada. Wihile he was about voting age he came back to, bis native pro- vince, a trifle Americanised in point of view. Ris first post was the organ and choir of a Methodist church in St. Thomas,.Ontario, a railway town without a decent choir. His salaxy was about $300 a year and he took pupils; as a side lime teaching any sort of music called for. i a ladies' college. With what money he thriftily eked out i St. Thomas he went to Germany. There he was ainong the first Canadian colony in Leipsic, then the musical hub of Germany. Vogt was an open-eyed. traveller with a news- paperman's faculty for co-ordinating bis impressions. Saturday afternoons, in the cold air of the St. Thomas Kirche, found, him a regular listener to, the beautiful 141 CP",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt unaccompanied singing of the choir. His critical faculty' made hlm conscious of the subtie colourings of this style of music. When lie lef t Leipsic to return to Canz da he had formed one clear ambition-to reproduce some such music with a Canadian church choir. It was while he was on board ship that the music comxnittee -of the leading Baptist church in Canada engaged hlm as organist and choir master. A few Sundays after hie began his duties hie gave, the congrega- tion a foretaste of the. choral discipline that would be the vogue in that church by startling them out of a slipshod habit of ornitting the last beat on the end bar of each Une of the hymn \" Abide with Me.\" The innova- tion was simple. But it was radical. That congregation and choir must flot be permitted, to sing according to, habit or humour. Vogt soon introduced a new form of music, the un- accompanied hyinns and anthemis by the choir such as he had heard in the St. Thomas Kiche in Leipsic. This form of devotional art reached a high pitch of expres- sional beauty in that church. It becarne a ind of interpretation, and it was the cause of many a fascinat- ing, gruelling rehearsal, for the sake of satisfying the acute tone-sensibility of the disciplinarian on the organ bench. Many a young worshipper endured the stately but tedious sermions of that church in order to hear the exquisite unaccompanied anthem that followed them. Many a chorister tried to get into the choir who was forced to wait for a vacarncy. It was this famous a capp5ella music that became the basis and inspiration of the Mendelssohn Choir which Vogt, cautiously and niodestly, organised i the autun Of 1894, the year of the Massey Hall inauguration. The chorus thus assembled contained but 75 voices, in sharp contrast to the Philharmonic Society of that period, which numbered always at Ieast. .30. In this chorus were ail the niembers of bis church choir, ex-members of the Hasiain Vocal Society, and a few others. The naine Mendelssohn was adopted with- out foresight, because it was the intention to produce 1142",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt every year one 'work of that composer whose psalm settings were particularly obvious for unaccompanied singing. The first programmlfe contained a Mendelssohn psahin and a number of madrigals,-glees, and other con- ventional things. There was an assisting artist at the piano. The critics decided that here was sometbing ne*, flot only in the choral effects, but in the style of Vogt's conducting, wbich in those days was somewhat of the Swedish gymnastic variety. For three seasons, two concerts a year, always with some solo artist, with programmes on ail sorts of coloured paper, with growing crowds and cheap seats, and a somewhat enlarged chorus that performed as rigidly as a regiment drills, the Mendelssohn Choir, organised as a democracy, grew ini public favour. Then suddenly it stopped. The public heaved a sigh. The Mendelssohn Choir was apparently defunct. And the reason was that Vogt discovered the limitations of a choral democracy. In i899 the choir was reorganised on a personal Vogt basis, and entered a second stage of novelty. As yet no choral society iu Canada had imported a foreign orchestra. Torrington had frequently engaged Gilmore's Band to assist bis Philharmonic, for which he had a regular local orchestra. Vogt decided to engage the Pittsburgh Orchestra, then under the baton of Victor Herbert. Unaccompanied singing was no longer the whole choral programme. Vogt knew that lie had a chorus capable of bigger things; aud the musical literature of Europe was full of master works which he desired to produce. CQ:.er choral societies had kept to the old lines of oratorio, English glees, madrigals, motets, and Rart songs. Vogt had a hunger to rausack the music Jterature of continental Europe; and the assisting symphony orchesqtra was one way to do it..- Prom studying shrewclly the worksý: sud the ways of other men, Vogt came to, the point where lie studied his own choir. In that chorus, drilled. to regimental. precision of technique, he discovered things new and strange. Some day lie miglit get that technicised organ- 143",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt ism to do soxnething really dramatic in expression. Hie had been criticised for too much mere technique. Dili' gently he kept bis ears open for opinions-some of which lie used. Mlore vigilantly he observed the dynarnics of bis choir. There were tinmes when he found fault with the chorus and had them repeat a passage for the sheer pleasure it gave hlm to hive it repeated. Hie polished the pianissimos tilt they became mere 'ghosts of tone that shuddered up from nowhere. lie buttressed up bis élimaxes til they became like the blows of the han'uer of Thor. Hie began to take liberties with dim., and cresc., and decresc. Hée peyceived the colour of tone, varyinig in the eight sections of bis choir. He learned to apply the vagabond device of temnPo rubato, to play with the rhytbms, and to get the rigid lines of bis choral work loosened up into sometbing lilce free temperamental expression. Thus the tonal quality cf the Mendelssohin Choir evolved itself as a dream of colour and a dynamo of realism in snusîcal sound. Those who have hecome nxost f.P'niIar with its, great characteristics recob\u003enise ini that tone the art-quality of soxnething different from any Cther choir in the world. Just what that quality is might be hard to describe; but it is a characteristic of trexnendous, beauty, virility, and power, and -it relates constantly to the singular art-sense of a maxn who, neyer carried away by a superficial temperament, is always under the patient sway cf an almost limitless love of choral tone and colour. With such an expressional instrument Vogt was able to undertake any choral work ever written, and te do the most difficult modemn work without any of the customary elisions, of the most hazardous, passages practised by some of fixe choral societies abroad. The choir was capable of big uplifting episodes. These ixsed te occur most habitually in the unaccompanied workts; for some yeaxs most especially with two pieces, \"Scots Wha Hae \" and Gounods \" By Babylon's Wave.\" These two classics tbrilled many an audience who neyer paused to reflect that it was not the wild abandon of the 144",
         "jr 'n /1",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt choir, flot obviously temperamental qualities, nothing in the least operatic, but simply the overwhelming emotional effect of tone-niasses in contrast, built up iu the colossal fortissimnos to ««the last ounce \" as he called it iu rehearsal, polished down as rigidly in the pianis- simos, and abouuding iu the colour of a tremendous choral technique. Vogt now recognlsed iu bis choir the expressional potentialities, of a great symphouy orchestra. And that came to hlm only as the resuit of slavish, unremitting hard work--twice, thrice a week iu rehearsals, sparlng nobody, excusing noue, every singer ticketed and numbered and kept on tab. When Exuil Paur took the baton of the Pittsburgb Symphony, Vogt saw lu Paur a revelation of conductorsbip. Hie studied Paur, who, after the death of Theodore Thomas was the greatest expressional conductor lu America. But in connoting the emotional effects produced by other conductors Vogt was always too astute to be led away into mere superficial tricks of expression. He had spent too, many hard years perfecing the technical side of a great choral instrument to, be, seduced into, the obvious glainour of mere emotionalism. Hie pinned bis musical faith to, the dramatic value of a tremendously perfected complexity of tonal effects. In the remarkable clarity of every one of the eight sections of bis, choir he seemed to build upon the sure foundation of one Sebastian Bach who to Vogt has always been a great modern. Did any choir ever sing the sublime chorales of the B Miuor Mass with greater power of brilliant definition in every one of the parts? Here and in ail great, poly- phonic works, even. those of ultra-modemn complexity, Vogt has demonstrated that ione and rhythm can be built up in thexuselves iuto a marvellous vebicle of draxnatic expression wbich makes inere eniotionalism a cheap thing hy comparison. Great tone and perfect rhythm are -thernselves dramatic. Vog-t has alw.ays believed it. In the practice of that belief he bas produced ,choral results that surprlsedl both biruseif and bis, choir and at times litera]ly dazzled the public. 145K",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt With Paur and his band Vogt put on several great works, including the Choral Symaphony of Beethoven, the Deutsche Requiem of Brahms, the larger works of Elgar, the Olaf Trygvason'of Grieg, and one thing of Humperdinck; besides unaccompanied works froma al the countries of Europe in ail epochs, from, Russia, Germany, England, France, back to, the.middle ages of old Lotti and Palestrina ini Italy. The choir becaine almost fainous in its own city and, accompanied by Paur and bis orchestra, went-on a choral trip te Buffalo and New York. The critics and the cliques of Gotham broke into poeans of praise. The choir from Canada seemed to them like the fresh vigour of the Goths breakiÉg into the jaded preciucts of Rome. From that time on Vogt and bis choir became more popular iu the United States than in Canada. The con- nection with Paur and bis orchestra was chauged to, that of the Chicago Symphony, with whom the choir undertook such works as Elgar's Caractacus, the Verdi Requiem, the Cbildrea\u003es Crusade by modern French Pierne, and the Vita Nuova by the modern Italian Wolf- Ferrari. Such works as thes-. had neyer been contemplated in the scheme of the small choir that gave glees, psalms, and madrigals without an orchestra in :r894. Vogt had grown along with bis choir. After the trip to Chicago in igo8, ail the great orchestras of Ainerica clamoured te, co-operate with hlm. le stuck to the Chicago Symphony conducted by Frederick Stock, who, is stiil waiting for the end of the war that he may again bring bis band of many Teutons to play God Save the Ring, Caractacus, and Rule, Bnitannia te Canadians. If it is true that from. the student days in the St. Thomas Rirche of Leipsic until the second decade of the twentieth century Vogt had bettered the instruc- tions of bis masters, it is aise, true that he learued much of the greatest he has ever done from the choir itself. If he bas been, on one baud, a growing exp.-ssional artist playing upoon bis choir as an organist upon an t 146",
         "Dr. A. S. Vogt organ, lie has been, on the other hand, a diligent and sbrewd organiser of business management methods and the astute manipulator of other men. Vogt learned the necessity of being a choral diplomat. When enthusiasts binted that perhaps lie now had the greatest choir in the world, lie only admitted that lie would like the opportunity of showing Europe what bis, Canadian Choir could do. Hie is still waiting for the opportuxuty.",
         "REV. ALBERT CARMAN HiE is the last of the old prophets. The word of the Lord is as plain to hlm now as it was in the day of the camp- meeting and the circuit-preacher's saddle-bags. The sermon he first preached as Bishop of the Methodist Episcopal Church in i874-he was then forty-one years of age-would corne as naturally word for word from the General Superintendent, Emeritus, of the Methodist Church in Canada in igi6. This Nestor of Methodism is eighty-two, years of age. Up tili the forty-first year of bis life he was an educator. For the past forty-one years he bas been a good deal of the time wrestling with modem tendencies in education. Rev. Albert Carman, D.D., the constitutional autocrat of the Methodist Church in Canada, until a year ago visiting, as far as he might, every Conference in Canada, and presiding every quadrermium at the General Confer- ence, was set aside as rigidlly as any Levite for the clear business of keeping heterodoxies down to a minimum. In bis itinerancy the bottom of the sermon barrel is as good as the top. He bas thundered out thousands of great sermons from hundxeds of texts. To the unprac- tised modemn ear ln the opera-chair pews of the million- aire Methodist churcli they may sound like much the saine sermon. It takes a logging-bee sense to get the piping Homeric rhythms of those covenanting dis- courses. No man cam hear one of them aud whlzz sereuely home in a. Itr\u003cousine to a palace in the park. 'Yonder coming along bahind is the whack of the old Bishop's stick on the pavement-and you se- blm swluging along there\u003e litde Anglican round bat and crlzzled-up face, arching siedfastly along as tbough ini bis boots he feit the stemu Iilt of the revival bymu: «Ari5e, my soul, arise. Shake off thy guilty fears.\" 149",
         "Rev. Albert Carman The sal hats glisten il the sun, the niorning gpowns shimmer into the bouquetted Limousines, and the $30,o00 organ pipes out the music drama match; but the once Bishop, always a bishop-Rýev. Albert Carman-would, as lief tramp home to the measure of Antioch or the solemn sonority of a psalm. In ail Canada there is no such clerical figure left as Carman. Since Canadian life grew away fromn th-. bush road and the prairie trail, there bas neyer been a mani who could so have clung to the inviolable creeds that kept bushmen from going to the devil. One by one the preacher brethren of bis age have gone either to the great majority or have become quavering veterans just abIc to mumble fireside memories of marvellous old Methodism. Carman still goes the road. Until he was the age of eighty-two he held the gavel at the quadrennial assemblies. Said a prominent Methodist layman a year or so ago to the writer: \"The hand of Dr. Carnian has been a deadly, wither- ing infiuenc on the vitality of Canadian Methodism( fàr twenty-five years. *Until it is removed, we shall n1ot expeot to teke our place axnong modemn church mnovemeënts.\u003e' The statement seemed like sacrilegious audacity; as though the sezular mind were daring to denounce the prophet who might cail down upon hlm the wrath of God. The dead hand of Dr. Carman at that time had not lost its grip. The puckery eyes of the old mentor had not faded from their inspirational gleam. And the harsh wintry voice of the preacher, sounding like tne century-old cail of the crow from the pine-tree, has neyer learned to remit the stern truxnpet teachings of the day when a literai heUl waited to bm-n inconsumably ail thtse who resisted God at camp-meetings. Carman was born in a clearing down in eastein Ontario. The sombre bush with its loud loggers and clanking teami was close to the door. His father was township reeve and afterwards warden of the country. The son seemed to have a shrewd head for figures. He might 150",
         "Rev. Albert Carman have become a great enginee'. First educated at Dundas Co. granunar school, then at Victoria University in Cobourg, Ontario, he graduated in 1855 aend became headniaster of the saine grammar school. ln 1856 he was appointed professor of mathematies in Belleville Seminary-afterwards nanied ini honour of hlm Albert College. Within a year lie was Principal, with mathe- niatics and physics as bis unemotional subjects. Here was no scope for heterodoxies. x\u002b y need flot equal z; but grant that it did, then must x until the end of the world equal z -y. The rnomentum of the terrestrial bail must always equal the mass multiplied, by the velocity no matter to, what conunon, centre of the -uni- verse it was tending. Absolute, ultimate finalities these, about which to speak with unqualified degnia was the only way to state the truth. Deacon he was in bis twenties, in that good old M.E. Church with its rancs, tities, and prefernients different from the exhorting, dernocratic Wesleyans. Yet Albert Carman was ever as rnucli Wesleyan as Episcopali n temperameit. He became eider at the age of thirty. Eleven years more lie spent bringing Albert College into the rank of the fuil-fledged university, until in 1868 he becamne its first Chanceilor and took tank arnong the scholars of that pioiîeer age as a man to whom exact literai truth was botter than. truth compounded with error or hearsay. During bis six years of chancellorship he becarne by force of character and habit niuch of a preacher. is learning,, and his doginatic piety mnade him at that tinie the greatest expounder of truth in Canadian Methodism. His attachment to the formn of the M.E. Churcb made him ahnost a ritualist. His astounding ferveur made hixn a flamning evangel. lu 1874 the brethren made Carznan Bishop cf the M.E. Church. And Bishop Carman. at the age of foity-one was the lean,uncomproniisingdivine,withascientist'sappetite for exact, unwavering truth. 2uoyant as an athiete, lie went about arnong the pulpits preaching uncon- ditional righteousness. If there was the shadow of the suspicion of a heresy he trailed it te its lait. He kept",
         "Rev. Albert Carman the pulpits up to full concert pitch of orthodoxy as a sbrewd inspector regulates his schools. Then came the Methodist confederation and the birth of Canadian Methodism as sucli. In place of two bishops and two camps, Carman becarne the General Super- intendent of the Methodist Church in Canada. So far as a Methodist coui-d be, Carman was the Primate of ail Canada in that particular creed. Hie was still the Bishop ini temperament. Be believed ini the autocracy of truth and the delegation of authority. He was a power in the pulpit; in a high moral oration the equal of any church dignitary i America. Bis per- petual message whatever bis text seemed to be, \" Corne ye out from arnong theni and be ye clean.\" Science was advancing. The rnid-Victorian age was coniing to a close. The old tenets of chemnical and geological truth were being revised i the light of Huxley, Tyndall, an'd Spencer. Divinity was challenged by Darwin. But with triumphal alinost vindictive joy the Primnate of ail Methodism i a country 4000 miles long rkicled the theory of protoplasm and the soul. The once professor of physics was the swift uprooter of ail materialistic doctrines, ail destructive criticisms, ail merely rational, arguments. There was srnail place ini bis anthology for the agnostic, less for the infidel, and none for the atheist or the deist. Here and there some freethinkfing pastor i the great field traveiled and aclxinistered by Dr. Carman enjoyed a quiet sr.noke-but neyer in the presence of the General Superintendent. No preacher in any of the conferences or district meetings of which lie was the head was ever supposed to have a bottle of wine lu bis ceilar, even for bis stomnach's sa1ze. A parson that swapped horses too cften, or bought stocks, or put bis money into houses and lands, cculd never have been pleasing to, Dr. Ca rman. Smail salaries were no bindrance to big righteousness. To go forth without scrip in bis purse was the privilege of every preacher. 'fhere was no parsonage so scant i its appointments that the head of the cburch could not feel at borne there. He never.overawed the brethren",
         "Rev. Albert Carman by any show of wealth--of which he had littie-or of aught but dignity and austere living, of which he had more than his share. Urbanity-had he ever any? He could enjoy a joke or a good discerning story, such as were often told hlm by certain wags of pastors, somo of whom neyer could keep such things out of their sermons. In the General Conferenco he could turnl an occasion by a homely, drastic; piece of withering wit-but there was always a tinge of scorn in it, nover any overplus of geniality. Carinan was no figure for a social function. Lingerie -and flutter neyer fascinated him. Ho was neyer im- pressed by the sizo of a mxan's bouse, the number of his servants, his horse and carrnage, his political, preferments, or his pedigree. But he had a wholesome respect for bigý-minded men, and on one occasion at least quite astounded the orthodoxy by welcoming to the platform of the great Methodist Conference the Right Hon. Sir Wilfrid Laurier, Premier and Romanist. Ail honest, old-fasbioned virtues were pleasing to Dr. Carman. Frivolity, extravagance, and extreme fashion made him weaxy. The church of John Wesley must romnain simple. The Methodist Discipline contained the interprotation of how to live in harrnony with the tenots of Methodism. 'Where they were less explicit than seemed advisable, thoy must be edited. Hence the celebrated foot-note prohibiting cards and dancing. Individual latitude must not be tolerated. Modem brethren midght have wealthy and fashionable parishioners-and in the Methodist Churcli of Canada there wero nover wanting plenty such-who believed that cards and dancing at home wero botter than bail-roonis and gaznbling parties elsewhere. But Dr. Carman nover believed in Methodist euchre or faniily dances. The value of these things was in their avoidance. Neither in exegesis was thore any latitude for the brethren. The Word was thus and se. It must be taken as iead. If geology and zoology and ethnology were ail hopelessly nebulised in the book of Genesis, se let it romain. The six days of creation were literai 153",
         "Rev. Albert Carman days. Geologists miglit romance about aeons, each thousands of years ini eyolution. The Word said succinctly-days. The centrifugal doctrine that worlds were flung from the Sun inl molten masses, and that the earth took ages to cool before plants and animais and man camne upon it, was ail very weil so long as the obvious hand of God was recogriised in the process. The theory that the Garden of Eden miglit have been at the North Pole; that Adam miglit have been a prô- duct of mixed evolution, a soul infused into a highlI--y organised ape; that the Flood was a figure of speech and Noah's Ark a niere symbol-ail these were mis- chievous exaznples of the Biblical saying, '\u003cGod made man upriglit but lie sought out many inventions.\u003e How rigorously Dr. Carman clung to liter-alisin and plenary inspiration in bis reading of Scripture was forcibly iilustrated by M~s treatment of Rev. Mr. Jack- son, pastor of a fashionable Methodist congregation ini Toronto, a few years ago. The Jacks-on-Carman contro- versy, illurninated by letters to the press from laymen tinged with higher criticism, made one of the un- happiest episodes in the history of Canadian Methodismn. When it was over Carman remained; Jackson went out of the pulpit, afterwards out of Victoria College, the old aima mater of Carman, who years before had gone out against Dr. Workman, exegetist in Victoria College, because lie tauglit that the book of Isa.iah contained no specfc references to the Messiali. Civilisation miglit discard child slavery, ignorance, and sinins. Social reforin and econonio revolution miglit trausform the fabric of the State. A i-ew Canada miglit be in the making 'with the march of events and the shuffling of migrant peoples. AUl these were the hand of God working upon humanity. The form of triith and the authority of the spiritual autocrat must remain. The General Superintendent had bis hand on the grand quadrennial Conference and upon ail the lesser conferences. The Parliament of Methodism. under the gavel of Carman was sometimes what the English Parliament was to the Stuarts. Critics of Carmanismn 1154",
         "- Rev. Albert Carman in belief pointed with pride .o the marvellous old ad- ministrator who followed th.ý debates as keenly as a great judge the arguments oi counsel. They watched the storms rise and break about his head, and admired hlm, because he was not nerei1y unmoved but was mighty in decision, swift to eliminate truth from, error, almost infallible in his judgrnents. Editors admitted that Carrnan would have made a powerful leader of men in civil life. Politicians confessed that in Parlia- nment he might, have been the equal of most. Big men came and went in the life of Carman. Rev. Dr. Douglas of Montreal strode Macready-Jike across the stage and vanished in a cloud of oratory. Rev. Dr. Potts, the Irish organiser, Ezra Stafford, the Dickens- like wizard of the pulpit, Dr. Burwash, the placid Dean of thoughtful Methodism-all came and went while Carman was still in his prime. H-enry Ward Beecher, Talinage, Spurgeon, Moody, ail did their greatest workt in the heyday of Carman's career. In the exposition and embodiment of a single unrelenting idea that led up to the horns of the altar of God, none of them was greater than Carman\u003e who still remains a battered little giant of old Methodism in Canada. And as we behold hlm maarching prophet-like down the city street he seems to travel in a mist; some strange, stemn old man who neyer knew the world wouid outgrow bis doctrines even while it continued to venerate the mani. And behind him somewhere stands the little old country church of the circuit preacher and the cordwood pile, the horses in the shed and the quarterly meeting, the brethien of the cal -fskin leg boots under their trousers testifying to wtiat the Lord had done for them--since last they heard the voice of this mnan. 1155",
         "SIR SAM HUGHES MAjoR-GENE-RAL SIR SAM HUGHES, K.C.B., always seems to suggest liobnailed boots. Wlietber he stands on a platformn to, speak, whicl lie does as.'a ruile quite badly, or trudges about a xniltary camp, wbich he does very well, or bestrides a horse of which he is very fond, or goes to bed with bis boots on if lie lias to-tie boots of the Minister of Militia are always respectfuily to be considered. Be sure no one else in Canada at tinie of writing is able to occupy those boots, of which the General is very glad. So with more than 350\u003e000 Canadians under arms and over ioo,ooo more to corne, Sir Sam boots bis, blustering way over Parliament Hill, quite entitled to regard himself as tlie Kitchener of Canada. General Huglies is no man to be merely elected to an lionourable position, liead of a committee, with soft speeches and tlie illuminated addresses of appreciation. He is no figure to sit upon a tlirone of democracy with ail manner of formai personages in the foreground and on tlie wings, presiding and giving judgment. No, he must be setting bis liobnailed boots down bard upon the floor or wvrestling tlie joints of a cliair till tliey creak, knowing that ail the while the pressure is going up and Up ini the national gauge, tliat more armies are muster- ing, more milions being lieaped up for him to, spend, more ships gliding out of Montreal, Quebec, and St. John loaded witli troops, and more wounded soldiers coming back to tell their civilian coinrades they aldso should be off on the King's business. No doubt enthusiastic London writers, unaccustomed to Sam Hughes and bis faults, have said things about hlm. in print that were somewliat fiattering. He seerned to some people over there like a new species of borean 157",
         "Sir Sam Hughes virility. At that time the Canadian army in France and. England was only five times the number of British troops under Wellington at. Waterloo, and the total nuniber of Canadian soldiers under arins at home and abroad was only a third larger than the British troops ini the Crimean War. But Langemarck and St. julien were still the talk of the Empire\u003e as Paardeberg was fifteen years earlier when Colonel Hughes was enacting useful military melodrama rôles in South Africa. On bis third visit to England since the war began Sir Samn was alluded to by more than one responsible newspaper as Commander-in-Chief of the Canadian Forces. Which he is-precisely as much as Lloyd George is Commander- in-Chief of the British Army. We understand ini Canada that the Governor-Gene.- ' alone has that rank. But to Samn Hughes even Governors are sometimes superfiuous. Sir Sain Hughes-' whole life has been a protest against common authority. Few men's actions more canclidly bespeak their characters. In some men actions speak lo.uder than words. In Samn Hughes-they _are a grand opera duet. What hi- is, he wants as many people as possible to know, on the principle of the greatest good to the greatest number. Since ever he was a fourteen-year- old lad\u003e volunteering in the Fenian Raid of 1866, he has been in the business of obstreperous, self-advertisem;nt. Parental belief ini the young man who was to becz)me the organiser of the greatest army that ever went over- seas to any war under à.ny flag, rnay be judged from, the fact that he was not cbristened Samnuel, but Sain. A boy with the na.me Sarrn Hughes neyer could become a conventional gentility, especially when born, baptised, and bred in the logging-bee, bul.1-driving county of Durham\u003e, Ontario. The father was a fariner. Samn might have spent most of bis youth on the father's famin but for bis eider brother James, who becanie a pedagogue in bis teens and persuaded Samn to do likeveise. In Toronto Sain attended Model and Normal School, got a first-class certificate\u003e and went teacbing in rural schools nea.r bis old homestead. He played lacrosse\u003e worked at soldier- 158",
         "Sir Sam Hughes ing, taught Englisli literature i a Toronto Collegiate Institute, and cramrned up an honour course at the Uiiiversity without lectures. But Samn had no deep-rooted passion for book know- ledge. He was much more practically interested i soldiering. He became a junior officer in the old 45th Regiment in Durham county when bis eider brother John was a senior. When John took the colonelcy of the 46th, Sain took comnmand of the 45th. These were rural regiments whose only prospect of reai war seemed to be some recurrence of Fenian Raids. The idea of such regiments going abroad to serve i Europe or anywhere i the world under the British flag outside of Canada neyer dawned on the average officer, and very probably did not mucli concern Colonel Sam Hughes. Somne tirne afterwards Hughes becanie owner and editor of a smaLl weekly newspaper, the Lindsay Warder. The newspaper gave hlm an opportunity to show what he thought about Liberals and anti-Ora-ngemen. Lt was by no means a gentle publication. And froin episodes said to have happened i that sancturn, quite obviously Hughes was neyer itended to be a vexy urbane editor. .What he liked about the newspaper was its self- assertion. The Lindsay Warder expressed Hughes. Lt also did a good deal to get the editor into Parliainent and to keep hlm there, when he had but one political ambition; first to keep the Liberals out, next to get thein out-which proved so long a task that the Colonel turned eagerly to the Boer War which in 1899 gave hlm a stage for ambition of an earlier sort. Lt was. the Boer War that made Samn Hughes first feel like a world figure. Up to that tiie he had been out of patience with mere politics, and quite disgusted with rnilitary matters in Canada. There neyer had been soldiers enough in Canada to please hlm. The country was too peaceable. Where now were théî blessed old rebellions Of 1837 and of 1885; and the Fenian Raid of :r866? Done. Smokestacks were taking the place of drill-sheds. -There neyer had been a real soldier in the Militia Department; so it seemed. Parliament seemed '159",
         "Sir Sam Hughies to have no expectation of wars to corne. *But there must be war. Man is born to figlit. Nations had always fought. How could Canada becorne a nation nierely by elections and trade returas, and garrison parades of busbies, pipeclayed helmets, and glittering bands? However, the parades were encouraging. But they were not-war. A picturesque militia was not an army. Drill-sheds might do something; but they somnetimes seezned to have as niuch to do with the social column in the newspapers as with the Military Gazette. Men were not dxilling enough. Two weeks a year at suamer camp was mere child's play.with tin soldiers. There should be universal training. Every Canadian youth should learn to drii and handie a gun. Seif-defence was a first principle. Against whorn? Hughes, neyer paused to answer. Thé'\\vorld was bound to have wars. Canada itself had been established by long wars. But these were only the overture to, wars which somte day inight inake Ottawa forget that a hostile tariff was small use without a beiigerent arrny to, back it Up. So the war in South Africa really seexned like a nation-xnaldng godsend to Colonel Hughes. The melo- cirama which he enacted down there was one which only he could have carried out. The story of it is a mixture of fact and apocrypha. Hughes bimself was responsible for both. For the first time since he became a man he was engaged lu real war. Lord Milner sent huxu as assistant to -Colonel Wynter on transports to the Modder River. Hughes revoliutionised the transports, because they needed it. He afterwards went -as right- band mani to Sir Henry Settie on lines of communication; ,one resuit of which -was that years afterwards Sir Henry kept a portrait of Colonel Hughes on the xnost con- spicuous part of bis drawlug-room wafls ini England. No doubt many things were going awry in South Africa. At any rate Colonel Hughes said so in private letters to some Canadian friends who, indiscreetly published thern and gave the Colonel a reputation as a niilitary egoist that he scarcely expected to deserve. But the legends-what of theni? Legends are but x6o",
         "«~K Y -71",
         "Sir Sam Hughes the true stories of impossible people. Colonel Hughes was always more or less impossible. How else, for instance, could he have galloped up with a corporal's guard to a-band of Boers, making them. beileve that he was the advance guard to 2000 Britishers li the rear, forcing the natives to disarm, and holding the position? There is no other soldier in Canada of whom such a story could have been characteristically ~Ild. That it does flot appear li any of the correspondence of L. C. Amery to the London Times concerning -the Hughes programme li South Africa, or i the many allusions to Colonel Hughes in the seve-n-volurne history of that war, is because there were so, many facts to, narrate about Hughes that it was needless ta exploit a possible legend. That war took ail the theory out of Colonel Hughes' soldiering. Henceforth he looked forward to, war, w, WAR 1Inh Parliament and out of it, li season and out of season, he ta]ked war. When Lord Duiidonald, the reliever of Ladysrnith, took comxmand of the Canadian forces, it looked to Colonel Hughes as thougli war would become part of the national programme of Canada. But Dundonald tan foui of the M,4itia Department and was forced to resign. General Htjtton had no better luck. Canada was a bard country to militarise. There were too many.;:ailways to build, new areas of settlement to conquer, immigrants to bring li, towns to, fling on the map, trade returns, to bulge the blue-books, and election baties to, fight. If those trade-booming Libera]s ever could be got out of office-sometbing miglit be done with the Militia Department to make it resemble a war office. Colonel Hughes was biding his tirne. Some of bis friends pre- dicted that he would become the next: Minister of Militia. Hie probably believed them. lI October ipou, flot far from the aiiversary of General Bxiock's great death at Queenston Heiglits, Colonel Hughes found himself on the government aide of Parliaxnenè. By November he was Minister of Militia. By CMrstma.- lie had begun to, make the country under- 1161 L",
         "Sir Sam Hughes stand that there was to be something like a war office on Parliament Hill. And the new Cabinet had scarcely begun to decide which of'its members would, be re- sponsible for spending most of the people's money before it became quite clear that over the door of the Militia Departinent there was always the invisible sign, \"Soldiers- Wanted.\" There was indeed a feverish, pompous insistence about -the Militia works that made many of the Colonel's critics smile as they used to sinile when they read bis letters from South Africa. Whenever lie went into any part of Canada--even in peace-loving, parochial Quebec -it was always expected that the visit would be mernorialised by a new armouries\u003e a fresh squad of school cadets, or a new reginient. Colonel Hüghes was determined to get nibney for war purposes ini peace time and to spend it. Hie neyer got haif as mucli as he wanted, Perennially he talked war. He clotted the Dominion with redcoats. Hie remembered the South African days and preached up the value of khaki. Hie turned the sunimer camps into imitations of real war. He'established the dry canteen and kept ladies out of the camp. Hughes was always bothering somebody; always more or less of an irritation. Hie blustered and booted about as though there was to be a battle to- morrow. Hie shouted for universal, training and held up the sbining examples; of Australia and New Zealand, and even Switzerland, much to the disgust of the pacifists. Hie was derided by Lîberal editors as a martial maniac who, always an egotist, had become insufferable with the swank of the sviord. Wh2n the famnous deadk(ck camne over the Naval Aid Bull, and the Conservative Govermnent was said to have knowledge of the German menace incommunicable to, Parliaxuent, Colonel Hughes looked even more prescient than bis colleagues and warned the critics to watch, out. lu their brie visits to Canada both Sir John French and Sir Ian Hiamilton agreed that we could send abroad, perhaps half an army corps in case of an Empire war. Colonel Hughes may have known better. x62",
         "Sir Sam Hughes But ail that he knew mualtiplied by itself was a circuinstance compared to what Colonel Hughes and the country found themselves suddenly forced to do after the war actuaily broke out. Almost overnight, the Colonel came to hixnself in a rea.t war office on Parliament Hill. Before ail the ambassadors had been re- cailed, our Minister of Militia with the bellicose forefront of Mars became the hoenan focus, of a disorganisation that for a tiine looked as though it would disrupt the Department. Chaos was the law. Out of it must corne order; mustering regiment,.,, concentration camps, so- cailed mobilisation, fresh battalions recruited, Colonel Hughes suddenly made a Brigadier-Gernera-the mov- ing, untamable genius of Valcartier with -ts 33,000 iT't'\u003e. and the autocrat who clapped, at least, one editor U. jail for daring to, criticise hixn. How General Hughe:2 dominated Valcartier and for a turne did his best to be despot to haif the regiments, ini the country is now a matter of ahnost obscure history. Indiscretion was always the better part of Hughes' valour. Inefficiency was neyer a Hughes' fault. Nobody but Generpl Hughes ever would have dared to browbeat Canadian officers as he is said to have done at Valcartier. Nobody but Sir Sain ever could have been the original of s0 many humanly apocryphal stories'\u003e He is said to have played Napoleon on the mo-and with a white charger; to have sent strange cable messages to Sir John IFrench telling bum how to dlig hiniseif in on the Frenchi front or words to that effect; to have made hirnself the Kitchener off Parliament Hill, issaing in- structions to officers of regiments and igr'oring the C.O.\u003es; and in the frrst few months of organisation to have done and said enough unconventional, things to have made anybody else but Samn Hughes ridiculous. Chuckling critics predicted that when the full story of the absurd despotism of General Hughes came out in Parliament there would be a vacancy -in the head offices of the Minister of Militia. General Hughes quite expected thern to say that. But he had'so many things to do that he gave hirnseli no tinie either to be worried z63",
         "Sir Sam Hughes about it or to, stop taIking. Somebody mu st talk while. -ie worked. No-body was, workiiig so, haxd as General Hughes. Nobody, therefore, had such a right to talk. The critics said that \"Sham Shoes \" as a slogan would be the undoing of Samn Hughes. But the- bad boots of the first Canadian contingent were only- a fleabite. The General was headlong into the organisation of the shel industry ini Canada befre the bad boots were ventilated in coxnmittee. Before the sheil industry was well under way the Ross rifle-endored by General Hughes--came on the stage. Then it was the lack of uniforms and general equipinent. Always there was something wrong. And at every turn the General was able to say- \"0 f course there is. Didn't 1 always tell you this country was unprepared for war? \" Then he roiled up bis sleeves a tuck higher and got deeper into the labours of Hercules. The war machine creaked under its load. Mustering battalions came up everywhere from. ocean to ocean bebind the original 33,000 mnen sent to Valcartier, who, as they swung out to the Gulf with General Hughes on board one of the ships had bis parting message to \"«My soldiers\" fresh in every man's memory. They said that if he could be made commander of those troops in France he would, have given Up bis office on Parliarnent 11111 But the country at home needed the man who could snap bis fingers at ail miles, regulations, and precedents. Generat Hughes went back to bis war office to raise the grcatest axmy that ever went overseas froin any shore; to, stand up in mass meetings and make triumphal speeches, pointing with pride to the work done at the front by seasoned officers who, a few montbs Mefre, were men of business at their desks. When the Ring made bim-a K.C.B. did the General refuse it because he believed in sbirtsleeves, democracy? No, lie took it as a sample of the King's discriminating kindness and went to, work ail the harder, to get as many more distinctions as the King saw fit to, bestow. A wit, comning a phrase to explain why the King had so, hononred Samn Hughes, said adroitly, \" Le roi s'amuz-e.» i64",
         "Sir Sam Hughes When the General saw tl]is epigrama le may have said to bimself: \"' Weil, if the King must be amused, Sara Hughes doesn't mind being the original of one more joke.\" And lie went on rolling up bis sleeves along with bis army. When certain irregularities in munitions contracts were cited in the Kyte charges in Parliament, Sir Samn was again in England-where he liked to be. lie was cabled to corne home and answer the charges. Before sailing lie decided to have an audience itih the King and applied to the War Office for an arrangement. Red- tape officialdom. blandly assured hlm, that such an audience would take six days to eventuate. «\"Six days, nothingi \" blurted Sir Samn. -\"I've got to see the King riglit away before I go back to Canada.\" He ordered bis chauffeur to drive direct to Bucking- hain Palace, where lie sent in bis card, and i hall an hour-so runs the Iegend-he was granted an audience with the King. Was it Iikely that a man of whom sucli a story could be told as truth would be nonplussed by any Royal Commission investigating fuse contracts? Sir Samn was neyer for a moment taken aback. He treated cross- examining counsel as though they were ultra vires, if not downright impertinent. In spite of evidence that miglit have disconcerted an ordinary man the Minister of Militia was practica]ly exonerated by the verdict of the Commission, charged only with flot knowing certain things which were somewhat irregular-under circuin- stances which were theniselves umprecedented in this country. Shortly after the verdict was reached Sir Sain ordered a triumphal review of 33,000 troops newly arrived at Camp Borden under conditions that created a smafl mutiny. The naine of Camp Serveil in Manitoba was changed to Camp Hughes. The General went back to England and reviewed the Canadian troops at Brain- shott. The hobnailed boots were hammering again. The Ross rifle, the pet of Sir Sain Hughes, proved to be a différent kind of weapon froin that xised in the 165",
         "Sir Sam Hughes trenches. Pending~ the day when the worId', arrmes would be using the Ross rie, the factory of that naine at Quebec went into the making of Lee-IEnfields. Water on a duck's back is creosote coinpared to the effect of criticisin on Sir Sain Hughes. We have nieyer befre produced the like of bis psychology in Canada. He knows it. By ordinary canons he wiII not be con- denined. While politicians study occasions, Sanm Hughes crates thein. And if one kind of occasion will flot suit he proxnptly evolves another. He plays poker with a loaded pistol on the table. And he is aiways efficient, which ini a turne of war means - uch. When the war is over what of Sir Samn Hughes? Turne will tell. But of course Samn Hughes may have sornetbing to say about TUrne.",
         "COLONEL GEORGE DENISON FoRTY years now the most eminent authority in Anierica on cavalry tactics lias gone afoot two and a hall miles almost every rnorning down to-the Toronto City Hall. Sharp at 9.15 lie sets out, legs wide like a cavalryinan, chin up, eyes as clear as icicles, stick on the grAnd swing. Scrunching along on the bard snow one morning of i916, Derby hat, frock overcoat, and the fresh pink of the morning on bis face, lie was way- laid by a recruiting sergeant. \" You're a fine straight-up chap, my man,\" said the sergeant. \"'Why don't you enlist? Corne with us.\"' The Colonel laughed like a bird. As lie walked with the recruiting officer down to, the City Hall lie told the maxi the simple soldiering outline of bis career, up to the age of seventy-seven. Ris great-grandfather, Captain John Denison Of H-.M. 2nd York Regiment, bearing anus in Canada, began the Denison Unxe li this counitry in 1792. R-is graudfather, Colonel Penison, was a volunteer in the border war of 1E8i2 and the Rebellion Of-1837. Ris father, Colonel Denison, orlginated the garrison of Toronto. And the present Colonel George Denison is the youngest maxn of seventy-seven li the British Empire. Five minutes of ten by the dock i the tower, the Colonel*strides through a lie of bluecoats, chucks down bat, stick, anid overcoat ln his ante-room, brushes back a wisp of hair, anid bursts like a fine .winter dawxi into a -hlgb, somewbat gloorny chamber. Some time before he arrives the police court is crowded. Clerçs, policemen, lawyers, prisoners.-n the dock, eight or ten reporters on the side sharpening pendis, anid outside the dock a rest- less crowd on the gallery ail waiting for Toronto's reguar morning opera to begin. \"Take off your- bat,-\" snaps, a burly policeman door- 1r67",
         "Colonel George Denison keeper to an unoffending citizen who lias it haif off already. \"'Silence!\u003e'\" bawls the big grandiose Chief Inspector who has been as long on the police as Denison has been on the bench. The Colonel is on stage, seated high on his throne of surnmary justice adxninistered by common sense, look- ing over a huge book at actors and audience. The news- papermen are ready for the first word. Derison lias always been good copy. Any moment lie may shout an epigrain that starts hunian nature as a fresh breeze stirs the leaves of a jungle. \"'John Jones, stand up!\" It is the voice of a Colonel comnianding. If Jones were a reginient he could not corne to attention sooner. Whatever hd nay be-wife-beater, coimnon drunk and disorderly, burgiar, footpad, or bank ab- sconder-you infer froni the tone of the Colonel that lie will be either haiùged or sent to penitentiary for life. \" John Jones, you are charged that you did on the blank day of blank at the City of Toronto assault and beat-etc., etc., contrary to the statute in that case made and provided. What do you say-guilty- or not \"uUNoýt guilty, your honour.\"2 Counsel for the defence, at once b7egins to jockey. The Colonel knows what is coniing. John Jones night: be strung out for haif an hour. Denison gets rid of hlma in less than two minutes. The late B. B. Osler, the niost eminent jury lawyer every known. in Canada, used to twit Denison with dlsposing of sixty cases in sixty minutes. The Colonel cornes as near to, that sehedule as lie may. Before rnost of those lawyers were bomn Denison was handing out dmliead decisions on crime in Toronto. Human nature lias changed very littie in that time. There is only more of it. The man that got drunk on good whisky and beat his hoop-skirted wife in 1877 is not mudli different from the man who gets crazy on \"doped \" whisky and abuses the woman. who wauts a ic68",
         "Colonel George Denison vote and a divorce in 191i6. Statutes have been priûked up and elaborated since 1877; but the essential prin- ciffles of law as it relates to human nature are the same yesterday, to-day, and forever. Lawyers have multiplied and subdivided into ail manner of expert sub-species in modem times; but the pettifogger and the master of chicanery are always 'with us. \"I will allow no lawyer to influence my decisions ini law,\" says the Colonel over and over, in as many ways as a juggler ties a knot. He practised law himself between the frrst year of the American Civil War and 1877. But in the flrst five years of bis legal career lie rose from captain to lieutenant-colonel ini the Governor-General's bodyguard. A publisher once sent Denison a treatise on criminal law suggesting, somewhat sarcastically perhaps, that it miglit be a good book for the Colonel to, read. \"I neyer read law,\" replied the Colonel. Mis police court, one of the most remarkable in the world, is a proof of it. Denison knows bis police court law. 0f ail laws lie best interprets those of human nature wbich usually have very littie to do with statutes. Me dispenses common-sense justice to as many people as possible i two hours. The legal hair-splitter, the casuist, the Lerring-trailer, the bulldozer, and above ail the lawyer who sxnirks to himself that lie wiIl get Denison to discliarge bis client ini spite of evidence--all these have short shrlft with the Colonel. In giving decisions lie seems to act on the advice of Lord Mansfield ta a colonial governor: \" Judge according ta common sense and give no reasons. Your judgments wiil probably be right; but your reasons if you give them are almost sure to be wrcn.g.\"ý \" Language or fighting? \" is t7ie key question to many a case that lets the Colonel brush away tecimicalities like cobwebs. Me reads the face of a stranger in the dock as thougi lie had known hlm half a lifetime. The old offender lie knows by bis first name-knew hlm. years ago; the same old story-a drop too mucli. \" Well, go home and stop drinking. B~ut remember I've got my eye on you. Cail thenetae. z69",
         "*Colonel George Denison The Colonel might have made a bad judge. He is the best of magistrates. Next case the policeman may have been at fault. He must be corrected. The military morals of the police must be kept Up. Almost before the Colonel has made this point clear the next case is called. By the time the reporters have the-names down, \"\"Dollar and costs or thirty days,\" shouts the Colonel. \"Call the next case.\" It is the formula of a man who was neyer knlown to, be mnoved by connivance or collusion, neyer bent or prejudiced from. bis splendid path of wholesome bigotry based upon common sense, neyer learned in the la* and neyer ignorant of human nature, neyer too cl6se to a tragedy not to lighten it witb plain good-humour and sympathy. Forty years he bas been operating this surmnary rnfll of hulnan justice. He has seen the number of cases in bis court multiply itself by ten; the one original court become four courts-o--ne in the morn- ing to try out common drunks, one lu* the aiternoon, presided over by bis chief assistant, the children's court instituted by himself, and bis own memorable court between the bouts of ten aund twelve noon every legal day. But there is no court like Denison's; and news- papermen know it. Had he ever tâken Coke and Black- stone to bed with him he might have been an eminent judge. But the police court would have lost a great magistrate and the newspapers years of good copy. Forty or fifty cases between ten and twelve leave the Colonel as- fresh as when be came down in the momning. On the curb he is met by a citizen wbo cails hlmn George. WVith bis sword-]ike stick he executes an ixnaginary sketch map on the pavement to show what the Allies should have done or left undone at the Dardanelles. Waf'ching him, you xnay flot realise that he has a son at Suvla Bay. In ten minutes he may be li an editor's office. The police-court reporter struggling with bis crime copy to maire it read as human as it sounded ini the Colonel's court heais that trombone voice down the corridor. Teni minutes with the editor'on what is the future of the Empire, or the matter with the army,",
         "Colonel George Denison and lie drops into the associate e\u003citor's office te boit out a sermon in a pair of epigrams. Off lie goes to the National Club for lunch, every day at the same table, identical set of cronies-but a fresh batch of stories. In the seventy-seventh ý ear of this man's cavalry clank in Canada the glory and the song of Empire rise to a.grand heiglit. To hlm the never-setting Imperial sun is more than a symbol; the red line on the map as significant as the thin red line of many a hard-won battie. The bugle is his instrumnent of culture; the cavalry horse bis symbol of Empire. The outWard trail over the prairie peterlng off into the foot-hifls and the Rockies is to hlm not a inere waggon road to mil and to market, but a road leading ultlmately to the heart of the Empire-which for the tinie being ma-%, be the boot-tracks of Colonel Denison. The Colonel abominates subterfuge. He glories i the open road. In cavalry mnatters a strategist, lu most other things lie cornes at you with the headlong sincerity of a sporran and a bayonet. In the teeth of sucli a healthy gale of opinion you neyer dream of spinnlng cobwebs. There are few ifs and flot many buts. The thing is plain as a pikestafi. You wonder you had not seen it long ago. We understand that Colonel Denlson was present at the blrth of most societies in this country that have anythlng to do with the Empire. He has nmade stlmulat- ing speeches alniost anywhere in Canada, and hes always left people with a bigger practical desire for citizenship. There is neyer any gloom on bis face; neyer auy im- pendlng dlsaster lu his voice. H1e speaks better than any other soldier in Canada-and much better than the average member of Parliaxnent. H1e exudes common sense, and does it with a fine ecstatic noise. At any moment in any speech you mights faucy a hot-foot despatch rider rusblng on to the platform and tb.e Colonel in the midst of a fervent patriotic perortion- \"Boots, saddle, to horse, and away! \" The war literature he wrote. in the 'sixties and 'seventies occupied more space in priter's ink than al 17,",
         "Colonel George Denison the cases he ever won and lost in bis sixteen yeais, at !aw. In 1861 hewrote an article asking, \"Canada, is she prepared for war? \"-and, of course, answered it. What war-what did. it mâater? Rere was a vast new country for which both regulars and volunteers had fouglit since the days of Champlain, iniagining, so far as the governxnents and politicians, were concerned, that there n-ight some day be a nation instead of a crown colony north of parallel 49 v'ithout even the simulation of a standing army, without coast defences, without the beginnings, of a navy. These wvere questions only indirectly connected with the Colonel's tactical treatises on the art of war and bis two works, Modern Cavalry and the History of Cavalry. The first of these was published in London in :r868. By 11881 it had been, translated into German, Russian, and Hungaxian. For aught we know, soine of the Kaiser's Uffians have studied that book. \u003eThe Hisffomy of Cavalry was a prize work done for a competition started by the Czar of Russia, who gave first prize to Colonel Denison and invited hirm to spend two months in -St. Petersburg, where the Colonel was presented at Court. Altogether an audacious episode. How did lie know that some day the Cossacks would flot be thunder-, ing into British India with copies of bis cavafry works in their saddle-bags? Yet if the Colonel had taken the trouble to write a book of Russian iznpressions-which lie miglit easily have done-he would no doubt have pointed out that he could see very well where the real menace to the British Empire was arising; not on the Neya-.but along the Rbine. What an ironic calamity it would have been if the German Kaiser had offered the prize won by Colonel Penison and the Colonel had spent two months at Berlin, presented io the Emperor at Potsdamn and niaking a friend of Bernhardi 1 Another briglit little book of the Colonel's is Sc'Idiering in Canaa. A newspaperman who read it some years ago remarked to a teacher in Upper Canada College, of which the Colonel is one of the governors, that it con- tained an alarming percentage of first personal pronouns. 172",
         "Colonel George Denison \"Yes, but it isn't offensive,\" said the teacher. \" It's too Denisonian for that. Why, I remember hearing hlmn say that he was the very first to point out to Josephi Chamnberlain the principle of the Imperial zollverei which becanie the Chamberlain slogan.\"' That was as near as the Colonel ever perniitted him- self to, be corralled by any political party. An undoubted Tory by nature, a democrat in speech and action, no party bas ever claimed the undivided allegiance of this believer in hiniseif. He remains a critic of ail parties- even a Third party; and what he thinks. of the Frenchi- Canadian Nationalists is quite irreducible to, comnion English. Once upon a time lie headed the Canada First party. If any of bis critics, fancied lie would shriek for an independent Canada they were sadly niistaken. Canada First to the Colonel means Canada first in the Empire. Presented to two British nionarclis and to the Czar of Russia, the Colonel lias neyer been knighted. He midglt have been Sir George long ago. Hie preferred to, remain Colonel Denison. Nothing proves the man's aristocracy better. We have niany kuiglits in Canada. If the King's condescension ke-os up nlo citizen, no matter how unoffending or democratic by nature, will escape the danger of knighthood. Colonel Denison declines, the honour. Hie knows that the moment we begin to, call hlm Sir George bis real distinction is gone. We may yet have a reginient of Sir Georges. We can have but one Colonel Denison. lt73",
         "SIR EDMUND WALKER CLEVER people are neyer so interesting as when they are uncomfortable. We must make Sir Edmund Walker uncomfortable. So please imagine the President of the Canadian Bank of Commerce-and officiai, head of as many other polite conventionalities as possible-denuded of ail t-hat makes hlm so comfortable a citizen of an established common- wealth. Transplant this master of amenities to, the midst of a vast terra incognita, 'where as yet even the Bank of Commerce has flot acquired corner lots, and wliere the oxily street is a casual trail that begins nowhere and ends everywhere, with nobody on the trail except a vagrant band of redskins who cross thatpart,' of the prairie once every full moon. Suddenly as modemn war Sir Edmund finds himself the sole g**enie of this vast terrain remote from even a furpost. His only accessories are a deerskin robe, sin sandals, an axe, a gun, and a box of matches. He has not even a shack. Civilisation does not exist. HRe must reconstruct it for.himself. He is abruptly reminded that he is funda- mentaiy a primai being. There is no money; flot even beaversIn currency or military tokens; therefore no bank. And if there were currency there is no one to circulate it. As there are no people, there are conse- quently no institutions; therefore no interchanging ideas; flot even a telephone or a telegrapli wire, a steel rail or a Watertank. .Now this is highly uncomfortable, and it wiil take a very cleve r man to make it anything else. But a man wlio bas spent forty-seven years in the Bank of Commerce and as miauy years as Moses led the Israélites in. the search for Canaan, working up to the Presidency of that federalised. institution, is not likely to, find hiniseif baffied by such a dilemm'a. With bis axe he cuts enough 175",
         "poplars to :: rudmundaki e ro- with sods. He shoots an unwary buck deer and proceeds to make, himself a meal. He has at once begun a new comnrunity based upon the need for shelter and food. He is himseif a demand. Suppiy mrust follow. .By the full of the moon lie has accumnulated a heap of dry deersIns. The Indians corne trailing aIon.g. They are startled by the shack and the deerskin mani, who at once offers to exchange ai bis deerskins for a pony. By the end of three full moons this Crusoe of the prairie is recognlsed as a tradig-post. More Indiaris go that way. This mani creates wealth. He erects a littie store. Camp-smokes rise every day now within a mile of hlm. fis store is a rendezvous. He devises leather tokens which lie cafls money and teaches the red men their use li f2ade. P4çýentIy he has sucli a heap of these that he keeps thern li a chest. The chest is housed in a smail shack. The shack becomes a bank. Traders and white folk are by this timne settling on the hIils about. They regard the max i ith the bank as the centre of a new commonwealth. fiHe lends money, taking li security skins anid other commodities. The -place is cailed Edmundston after its founder. People who come, to trade want to boom its corner lots anid subdivide its environs. The banIng custos opposes them. He picks the best corner li the towxi for a xiew batik with fuiture Corithiaxi pfflars, anù does bis best to discoumage other traders from. iflating.rexits and lard values. People who corne to Edxnundston must be zid of the bogey- wealth. Cîtizens must learn that a dollar is but a symbol of man's labour on raw material, creatixig wealth. They- doxiot uxiderstand this. Sir Edmxuxid teaches them. Like Socrates of old he takes a street corner in bis modern Athens and expouxids bis practical theory of citizenshlp. lI the stniggle to develop Edmuxidstoxi the banker is xiaturaily elected head of ail committees of improvement.- By belng the general servant of the comxiuity which he stuidies li every detail, lie becomes its master. To banlc and store lie adds a school; a readig circle which, develops into a library with a -smali wig for pictures 176",
         "Sir EG'mund Walker painted by other clever folk. Some well-to-do citizen miust put up a mnusic hall; others must organise musical talent. The reading circle becomes a society of authors and an historical society both headed by burgomaster Edrnund. But whenever the citizenry attempt to raid the bank i ar public improvement funds-the Latin sign goes up-Nihilo faciente. The public must learn to provide its own funds: moreover, the cost of utilities must be kept down. Once a year the banker issues a pronunciament in the town newspaper, showing people how they jave done business for twelve naoons; how somte are becomin g dangerously ricli by speculation and some lamentably poor by laziness; how if bank balances are to be kept up there must be greater economy, consistent with progress. Nobody reads the whole document which is liled away for reference purposes allong with the family Bible. E\u0026nnndston has already become a model for other conimunities in which far and wide there are branches of the Edmundston bank and copies of its institutions, chie! of which now is its college to which youtbs, corne from far and near. And the man who dominates the college is, of course, the financial, overlord, because colleges are allways in need of money. If there are a few anachronisms i this picturesque -legend they are excusable in the nature of the subject. Sir Edmniid Walker is the clearing-house of civilisation i Canada. The mere catalogue of what he officially and unoffcia]ly is and lias been is almcst poetically significant: PIDENT Canadianî Bank of Commerce. Canadian Bankers' Association. Champlain Society (and Founder). Mendelssohin Choir of Toronto (honorary). VICE-PRESIDIENT American Bankers' Association. 1177",
         "Sir Edmund Walker CHAIMAN Board of Governôrs, University of Toronto. Guild of Civic Art, Toronto. Commission to, buy pictures for the National Gallery. Com.mittee to build the Art Museum of Toronto. BSankers' Section, Torontô Board of Trade. HOLDIER 0F TiTLE, ETC. Feilow, Royal £Ijociety of Canada. Fellow, Geographical Society. Companion, Victorian Order. Member of In~ternational1 Congress Arts and Crafts. Doctor of Civil Law. Knight Bachelor. MISCELLANIA Trustee, Toronto Gênerai Hospital. Director, Toronto Gênerai Trust Corporation. Mernber, National Battlefields Commission. Author of Works on Commerce and Banking. Author of Annual Message from the Canadian Bank of Commerce. At the sarne time Sir Edinund Walker is the economic advocate of the relatively simple life who neyer even got so higli in school books as a respectable coilege. We con over this category of titular achievements based upon lbard work and an active brain, tbinking always of one series of books by Samnuel Smiles-Succes, Thrifl. and Self-tHelp. Sir Edrnund does flot believe in financial slieep and academnic; goats. He drives thern ail in one fine flock. While the average financier in Canada is busy gatlhering bis wealth that presently he inay buy pictures, books, music, and places of honour on comn- mittees, Sir Edxnund is far busier weaving into one many-sided personality ail the forms of culture lie can get. V/ie most successu business men ini a new country make it their ambition to have a string of financial and business directorsbips, as long as the Ten Comnmand- ments, Sir Edmund sticks to bis bank and bis com- mittees of culture. When the average self-made mani 178",
         "Sir Edmund Walker sets his heart upon a Sioo,ooo castie in a fashionable annex to cram it with art ftuiture, paintings, and rugs, Sir Edinund gradually gathers unto himself here a picture, there a collection, now a new piece of furniture, and lives arnong tbem year by year ini the samne old- fasbioned elegant home which for niany years has been the social apex of St. George Street, Toronto. And though a great part of bis active salaried 111e bas been spent in wrestling with impecunious miflionaires anxious to in- crease their overdrafts at the bank, the most habitui aund lifelong banker in Canada bas permitted hiniseif the luxury of failing to, become a muilionaire even of the first degree. The flrst time 1 met Sir Edniund Walker he had just corne back from, what was to him i i904 a tera nova for new Canadian Bank of Commerce brancb banks. Indians, furposters, and railwaymen had gone over the great Canadian West. The Bank of Commerce bad bciped to finance at lest one railway into that country. Mr. Walker bad now seen it. On tbe way back be lad gathered sainpies of wbeat, whicb in littie sacks arnong bis bank letters be durnped out on bis general manager's desk, and with the cons-ummate tenacity of a miser over bis gold proceeded to, unfold wbat these wheats, meant to the economic, future of the great West. The interest- ing feature- of the newspaper interview was flot the wbeat, but the man wbo witb visional empbasis seemed to bave rummaged, in a Pyramid and found this fecund cereal locked i some dead Pbaraoh's flst and was now about to reveal the story of it to the world. When I- came to, write the story of the wheat the image of the perexnptoxy prophet who told it crowded the wbeat: into the background. In the world of economny Sir Edrnund. is flot so much the financier as the professor of bankring who expounds the moral law of stocks, change, and trade. Years ago this curious hornilietic quality came out in the aiw.ual, statement of the Bank of Commerce whicb, over the signature of Byron Wa]ker, took: on the character of a Presidential message to Congress. When that encyclo- 'E79",
         "Sir Edmund Walker poedic document appeared ini the newspapers, it was assumed that no other bank message would cover the ground with sucli a complete balance of the ethical qualities in trade, industry; agriculture, and finance. Those who, had the moral endurance to read it through were carried back in imagination to the simple econonics of the time when Cain killed Abel. Almost any day at noon the originàl author of this message to mankin - may be seen stepping into the bank Limousine that whisks the President and the general manager, and sometimes the assistant general manager, up to lunch at the York Club. Ini the depths of that closed car the figure of the President setties down until the long wbiskers lose themselves in the lap robe. Arrived at the York, the bank trio may be a good haif the company at luncl4. That neyer matters. Sir Edmund Walker is the patron ssint of the York. He was one of the secessionists fromn the Toronto Club. who banded together finance and culture-milionaires, magnates, and university professors-to form the new Athenoeum. And it was Sir Edmund who, in one of bis customarily neat speeches at an inaugural dinner, named the Club by quoting the limes from Shakespeare-whatever they are-that suited the occasion. Conversation there is 'usually discursive, from. the latest gossip just over the 'wire about war stocks to, the most up-to-the-minute information concerning the paloeolithic age. But with the Bank of Commerce party at the York the topic is usuallyý--banking; for that is ahl the time these busy mnen have to confer on matters which to the average depositor seem, to have ahnost the significance of eternity. Not long ago, among bis plethoric and homely recipes for abiding good rimes in a new country, Sir Edmund said: \"We should discuss less such issues as Imperial federation or better trade relations with the United States and give dloser attention to the humbler but more important detai]s of our business affairs, at home.»\" One might al-7aost call tbis a platform of Canada First. When the LiL\u003eeral party went mad over the Taft-Fielding ][80",
         "Sir Edmund Walker reciprocity agreement in 1911, Sir Edxnund, ini conipany with the present Minister of Finance and several other prominent Liberals, organised a party insurrection against this old faiiar bogey and pitfail of parties. Sir Edxnund's objections to reciprocity are not merely personal. There are times wlien lie speaks cdllectively, as the voice of the Canadian Bankers' Association, so, often reviled by the democracy. The socialist wing of the uttra-demnocrats cail the Canadian Bankers' Association a money trust, which from a few head offices in Toronto and Montreal control- the supply of money without reference to the actual demand. The average democrat says it is the hierarchy of the centralised banking system, which is sometirnes a bad thing for the progress of Canada, and should be replaced by provincial and local banks-3 ail over the country in touch 'with supply and demand-anywbere between Charlottetown and Dawson City. The hierarch and bis associates clain that the Canadian Bankers' Association is the backbone of Cana- dian finance wbich keeps tbe country econoxnically a unit and prevents boom conditions froni degenerating into financial panics. The genial cynic, with a very sincere achïiira\u002bion for the Bank of Commerce IPresident, says that Sir lttlSrmd Walker is the arcli-ego of the bierarchy; the mnan who by a covenanting tenacity to one bank, now the second in Canada, bas so personalised the bank- ing system. that he bas become the archbishop of bis own bank and the pope of the banking system. Why, lie asks periodically, does this autocrat object to restricied reciprocity in goods when ho lias no objection to a measure of reciprocity i money? Wlihen that question is asked, Sir Bdmnund xnay be absorbed in some problemn of art. How Sir Edrnund Walker began to be a more or less recognised authority on art, literature, archoeology, history, and universities one must answer by refusing to imitate him and confess that: one does not know. Ignorance to, Sir Edxnund Walker is néver bliss. He lias nover been satisfied to, get knowledge: lie maust always make knowledge tiseful. Artests, literary people, and 181",
         "Sir Edmund Walker academic folk are poor business men. It is the business of the financial, man, who, correlates business also to cor-~ relate art and learning. This Sir Edmund does with perfect naturalness. He neyer forced himself to take interest in art and its Indred subjects. He was bora with a genealogical interest in these things. His 'grand- father ini London was a goldsmith. Art technique camne as naturally to the Walker faniily, if ini a lesser degree, as it did to Benvenuto Cellini. The art-craft of his grand- father and bis ancestors became an intellectual quality in Edmund Wa]ker the Canadian. And in the crader environuient of Canada he bias worked it out naturally into a valuable asset, both for liimself and for other people. Artists disagree about Sir Edmund. Some say he is the sure friend of the struggling painter; others that lie is niisled by a bijdted enthusiasm, into, bulling the stock of one artist-probably a dead one; -some that lie is a real connoisseur; others that hie is not. \"\"My friend, Sir Edmund Walker, is a connoisseur,\" said Sir Wilfid Laurier, talking to a group of art workers when Sir Edmund was present. \"'He can tell you the fine points ini a 1,Âcture. I can only tell you wlien 1 like a picture without knowing why..\" No picture exhibition in Canada is qute complete witliout the appreciation of Si din.lsoiins are soinetimes irritating; neyer ignorable. Art under- stands that the chief banker of Canîada, as chief buyer for the National Gallery, is able to, spend several thousands a year on new cauvases-a siail percentage of whicli in actual value may be Canadian. No one lias ever heard of bis bolting into the studio of somne strug- gling artist to point huxn to the peak of Parnassus. Neither can any artist deny that lie is wifling to, see merit-by wliatever means he does it-in the work of some obscure painter at an exhibition. Sir Edmund is aiso a patron.of music. He believes ini good as opposed to poor mnusic, and in some cases may form bis-own independent opinions as to wliich is whicli. For several years lie lias been lionorary president of the",
         "Sir Edmund Walker fmnest choral body in America, and on two or three occa- sions weut with the singers from Toronto to, New York, Boston, and Chicago. He rnakes himself fainiliar with the works on the programmes i mucli the same way as he informs himself about literature, of wbich he has a considerable knowledge. In the Canadian Society of Authors lie is quite as proniinent as he is in music. Hé is leading member of peace associations, though not avowedly a pacifist. In historical studies again lie is an expert amateur, and lie lias made himself familiar with archoeology and geology to a degree that would give niany a professor of those subjectspointers ini co-ordinating enthusiasm. Ambition ini Sir Edmund lias neyer bolted into a plate-glass window. He lias neyer beén led away by sheer brilliancy. No great consuming idea ever robbed hin of sleep. His function is to hold tlie balance. And lie has temperament. Hie lias a quick brain that sees and estimates and co-ordinates while most men are xnerely getting impressions. While an average man is lamenting bis ignorance, Sir Edmund is shrewdly ac- quiring Just the degree of ready knowledge which makcer it possible to hold the ground lie lias got and presently enable hilm to get more. Those wlio, too intellectually indolent to think for tliemselves, outside their \u003c-,wn crafts, permit Sir'Edinund to think for tliem, will some day discover that lie lias made himbelf an almost invaluable factor in the broad. social development of a new country. If lie lias been made into an autocrat, let those be bla.med wlio have been either too lazy or too diffident to think out loud for themselves i bis company. And if any H. G. Wells ini sea.rch of a sociological novelty desires a new subject-let him examine what Sir Edmund Wý1-1l.er would do 'with bis knowledge of art, finance, and political economny if cast away upon a desert island with notbing but an axe and a box of matches.",
         "SIR ADAM BECK His political progenitors were Sir James Whitney and Niagara Falls. Had there been no cataract at Niagara, not even the political dominie of Ontario could have produced Adam Beck. The product of Niagara, according to Beck, is Hydro-Electric-farnil*arly abbreviated to Hydro, tabloided to, H.E., which is a somewhat exten- sive way of suggesting that there is a reair -masculine person at the back of the Hydro movement in Ontario. And there is: besides wbich Sir Adami Beck, having been somàewhat the creature and considerably the conun- druim of one premier, lias now become the perennial problem of another. Hie is the rninister of power. What else could hie do but exercise it? At New Year i916, wlien the whole country was off its normal guard over the war, Sir Adam Beck pranced into the civic electoral arena with bis scheme to build a network of hydro-radials and inter- urban unes ramifying over pretty much ail of south- western Ontario and costing ultimately $i4,ooo,ooo. A large majority of the municipalities included in the scheme voted to, have it. Suddenly the power mnister, who liad no legitimnate portfolio, who, had always 1\u0026een too adventurous and too iconoclastic to be cribbed cir- cumspectly in a cabinet, bec.ýme the real P remier of Ontario. ,This man is the son of a Pennsyivanian, who, in 1r855, settled in the part of the county of Waterloo whicli lie bimself baptised inito the village of Baden, afterwards making the burg famnous for bis englues and boilers, as early as the year 1878; at wbich tiine the son Adam had just corne to the age of voting. Jacob Beck's smoke- stacks and wbistles marked the town where young Adam was born and got bis early passion for the pro- blerns of power. Beck's boilers burned cordwood cut from tlie bush liard by, and young Adam watched the 185",
         "Sir Adam Beck ,engineers .ratnxing ini the logs that came out in steamn, smoke, and power. As a youth. he. attended the historie Rockwood. Academy, fainous as the college rnf James J. Hill. After- wards he went to, the granimar school at Gait, another power town on the Grand River, and when he had finished schooling, transplanted himseif to the smail city of London, ini the county of Middlesex, where he became a manufacturer i woodware. Beck was cradled i a littie diligent world of manu- factures. At every train-stop there wvas a miii or a factory or some place run by steam fromn cordwood, by the rushing mil-race and the dam. The cordwood era passed with the clearing of the bush. The coal era came in. Factc ries were now too big for w'ater-wheels. Steam po3wer was costly. The coal camne crealking across the frontier up froni Pennsylvania by the sanie route that in the early decades 'of the nineteenth century the Mennonite founders of Waterloo county came i their waggons to the country of no coal. Progressive men had burned down the forests. Nature, who used to, store up vast reservoirs of water in deadwood, mosses, and humus, to send it steadily trickling down ail sununer long on the well-fed river, now sluiced down the nielting snow and the sprig rains in great hurling floods that i id- sunimer becanie a dreary trickle over the pebbles like a tide gone out to sea. With nature's cheap power cnt off ini both cordwood and rnning water, it was a puzzle how to go on running the nuls and factories of diligent western Ontario with- out increasing the cost of production beyond an economic mrh.Pennsylvania coal was cheap-in Pennsylvania. W nitcrossed the bridge over the tumbling Niagara. to become Canadian coal by consumption it was an expensive conimodity to be cramming into furnaces where cordwood had once been so glut-cheap. Coal strikes and the recui:rent xnanoeuvring of the coal barons down in Beck's ancestral state mnade it obvions that cheap coal neyer would happen again. And not al the Government's -experts could locate coal i Ontario. 186",
         "Sir Adam Beck The world was then into the electric age. In the early and middle 'eighties London and ail the other bnsy littie towns in Ontario began to sputter with arc lights. The incandescent bulb came along. But this Iight was made by the use of Penusylvania, coal and therefore could not be much, cheaper than the old gas it was driving out; and as yet it was far too expensive to use ini operating factories. It was cheaper ini most cases to, burn the coal direct under steam boilers connected up with stearn englues than to bnrn it for generating electricity for dynamos that cost money to instal. It was jnst at the turn of the old century into the new when that part of Canada began to take into account the dynaniics goig to waste at Ni agara Falls. Here, where the Mennonite Jacob Beck had crossed the border ini .1855, was the site for a water-wheel which if set up might have made the fanions Ferris Wheel of a decade earlier seem. like a Christmas toy. The problem of harnessing Niagara, as it has been ,called; would alone have marked the change of nineteen to twenty in the centuries. Brifliant word-scapists began to, picture the fabulons cities of energy that must arise ,within the soiund of that cataract. In Canada the fiction neyer came to pass. Adam Beck had no vision of estab- Iished factories, along old Unes of railway with ail the population they had developed making a trek to Niagara. Scores upon scores of littie and middling-sized factory towns dotted ail over that part of Ontario miust stay where nature and the town-founders put thern. Their idustries must be kept Up. The man whose father had fonnded the village of Baden by bis iron foundries knew considerable about both power and municipal rights. There was that curions ýGerrnanîc strain i the Becks which made of the munici- pality or the bnrg a sepa.rate thing. Comninnities could .not: go to Niagara. The power of Niagara mnust corne to, the conimunities. In i9o3, when Niagara power first became a romxance in the newspapers, Adami Beck\u003e the M.P.P. for London, *was- asked by the Liberal Cabinet to be a commissioner 187",
         "Sir Adam Beck to mnvestigate this new problem. He investigated. In 1904 there was a psychological Union of Municipalities of which Adam Beck becarne the chairman. This also, like Niagara Power, was somewhat nebulous; but it gave promise. It was a practical public hobby which Adam Beck niight yet be able to ride as well as he and bis English wife rode t,-heir prize horses at tournaments under two flags. In i905 the Liberal Government of Ontario was itself swept over Niagara, and Adam Beck was taken into the new Cabinet of Premier Whitney as a memfber without portfolio. This man with the hobby of transmitted power and municipalities might be useful. Beck became a sort of auxiliary engine to be connected Up to the Cabinet ini. case of need. In bis own unencumbered imagination Hon. Adam Beck was a sort of one-man cabinet ail to himself. He seemed to have no direct personal ambition and not a symptomn of ordinary political craft. He knew litie or notbing about organising men or the psychology of an electorate. But he was getting to know Niagara power and the need of municipalities. .One year after his appointment without portfolio Hon. Adam Beck introduced the first power bill inito the Legislature. The iinmediate upshot of this bil was to- create the Hydro-Electric Powver Commission. The first business of the commission was to make the creator of it chairman. The inevitable duty of the chairman was from that time forward to become as far possible the Power Boss of-Ontario. That was inii 196. It was the beginning of a new decade which in January i916 was to see the Hydro- Radial policy of Sir Adam- Beck, the Power Boss, triumph i a majority of Ontario municipalities, involving the ultimate expenditure of at least $14,000,000 on inter- urban raiWays from Niagara. In that decade Hon. Adam Beck -made biniseif the psychic problem of Ontario. That Piccadillian :figure,. dress.ed so often ini a black cutaway, whiskting circum- stantially about the legisiative buildings, bec(--.ie farnilar to many people who as plain cabinet minister M8",
         "Sir Adanm Beck would not have known him. At horse shows, in public gatherings, on train platforms, he was pointed out by people who knew him froin his photographs in the newspapers. \" There goes Adam Beck \" became a conwion saying. He knew it. The people who said it neyer would have known any of the old Cabinet except Sir James Whitney. Sir Adamn has the kind of egotism that is content with Sir Adam's own good opinion of himself as the apostie of a popular econornic movement, and is largely indiffer- ent to the feelings of other people towards him, unless they liappen to hold authority which miglit interfere with bis plans. In the early days of Hydro-Electric lie courted public approval. Now that lie is established in the econon'ic affections of the people he lias become a; czar. Since the death of Sir James Whitney no one mn the Ontario Cabinet dares to oppose\" Beck. His heavy jaw, aggressively pointed chin, discontented, rather sinister, mouth, querulous aquiline nose. and impatient dark eyes are the features, of a near - Prussian who, tbrough the undisputed success of a public benefit systein, may be ini some danger of becoming more of an autocrat in one field tlian any private capitalist. No portfolioed zuember of the Whitney Cabinet could tell the day or the hour when Beck would tlirust this power problem n der the Cabinet's nose. The autocratic Premier neyer could say when Queen's Park would be staxnpeded with municipal delegations in the naine of Adam Beck wanting Niagara Power. Hvw to, make a great waterfall serve a province became under the Whitney régime a graver problem than how to substitute water for whisky had been to the Liberal Governients. Niagara Power was no longer a mere dreain or even an experiment. Towns adjacent to Niagara were taking a negligible fraction of Niagara Power. Toronto, 100 miles distant, was taking another fraction by means of the Electrical Development Company's Une. As yet these were but cobwebs tugging at the power of Niagara. Hon. Adamn Beck was advertising manager for the great cataract. The first hall of the decade i906.ài6 189",
         "Sir Adam Beck was devoted to getting one hydro - electric transmis- sion Uine to certain points within. a commercial radius from. Niagara. Adam Beck knew now that he had a bigger individual programme than any other Ontario minister. In bis formula of kilowatts lie had a specific which was capable of infecting industrial Ontario froni Toronto to, Windsor, and thý best part of more than a million people. By 1910 the fist hydro-electric transmission Uine was complete. [n October of that year the first transmitted hydro-electric energy was turned on at the town of Berlin, Ontario, when the Power Boss touched the button and in a triumphal speech uttered the following words to bis German-Canadian compatriots, some of whose smokestacks would soon be superseded by trans- foriners: \"It is fitting that power should be first turned on in the town of Berilin, the 'first to receive the finished pro- duct, the home of men of vision, men who peered into the future with confidence and called the first meeting of representative men together to consider ineans and ways of securing a supply of electrie power for manufacturing and other purposes. I amn proud to tbink that this is my native country. I amn looking to-day into the faces of men and women who are of the sanie ancestry as 1 amn, and grateful as we are of our ancestry and proud of our Fatherland, thankful we are, too, for this Canada of ours ini ail its greatness.\u003e' This rather clumsy speech was not the lauguage of a mian cnt out for the public platforxn. It was the speech of a paterna]ist to, whom these pioneers in hydro- electric energy were cbildren. The few years following were spent in working out the hydro-electric system. in detail by extensions of Uines and macbinery, not only in western Ontario as far as the Detroit River, but aiso in the city of Toronto where the Power Boss undertook to cnt into the field of bis private corporation rival, the Electrical Development Company. A second transmission Une was put through, to the capital of Ontario. Toronto street lighting was 190",
         "Sir Adam Beck taken out of private corporation hands and placed in the hand of the bydro-electric whose thousands of low littie liglits were strung into ait the dark crannies of the city in place of the sputtering arcs of the old systern. The Beck public utility machine, however, was flot allowed to supply power to the street raitway, neither to more than a growing fraction of homes and factories. But public competition, whether good or bad, had entered the Toronto field, and the people of Toronto were enabled to play games with the two systems. Now a storm near Niagara put the street railway out of business and left no lights burning. Again a similar Stormn put out the street liglits whlen ail the cars were running. It was Beck versus Corporation. And so it is stiil. The one-man public utility cor- poration is the competitor of ail private lighting and power systems over the most of Ontafio. It is the Beck propaganda that the consuiners should get the profits in a reduced cost for liglit, heat, and power. Newspaper advertisements, neyer agree as te, whether this is true or false. Beck goes on with bis scbeme of power produc- tion, because hie believes in it, and because lie believes also in Adarn Beck. When hie foisted the hydro-radial scheine on the municipalities in January 191i6\u003e he had corne to the point where lie would make hydro-electric: compete with ail systems of radial and inter-urban, limes in I' hat part of Ontario. Ris powver from Niagara should flot only light people's homes and mun factories, farmers' feed-choppers, and threshingr machines, it should also, carry the people and their produce from country te market and from town to town. Beck bas been accused by bis critics of being a Socialist. 0f sucli a visionary idea lie probably does not accuse himself. He is a public utility apostie who works against corporations for the sake of znunicipalities. To bim the Province of Ontario is a greater municipality. In that enlarged rnunicipality lie probably considers Sir Adam Beck as the burgomaster who, as the Power Boss, wiil neyer need to be Premier. He shouid cail it the Pro- vince of Niagara, Capital Kilowatt, in thae County of Beck. '9'",
         "I I t..",
         "VA'-. a",
         "SIR WILLIAM VAN HORNE WB shail cail him plain Van Home. No tatie ever became him. He was too prodigions. Ne stood for the illimitable. Having flung one railway across Canada and a line of steainships half round the world, lie put a highway of steel across the pineapple groves of Cuba; and lie was just peering like a cosmnic giant into, the worksirif a new world that no railway ever could traverse-when lie slipped off into it and is now wondering how to live witli- out that Gargantuan great body that was everlastingly singing magnificats upon earth. . In plain words Van Home died in Montreal, Septemnber i9'5. An eight-]ine poem camne out in the November University Magazineý-pub]ished in Montreal--ent-£tled «\"Sir Williamn Van Homne.\" Paradise Lôst in a nutsheil. Van Horne's whole 'tremendous 111e since lie wças a quan-y l1ad down in Ilinois was a barbarie poem. Hie began to live in Illinois and did a 111e work there before lie wasý forty. I-e camne to Canada and in his forties began to build up the greatest transportation system in the world. Having seen that from \"'two streaks of rust» to something like a $2oî0,ooo,ooo corporation, lie swnng down to the South Seas when bis blood had cooled a few degrees and began to modernise Cuba. But the life Van Homne had worked out in steel rails. freiglit-cars, and steamships was to hlm only the overture to the real opera. The fragment was the C.P.R. Van Horne\u003es magnum opus was bis philosophy of life, which at the time of bis death lie had somewhat reduced to a mass of notes iu 1the; drawers of a big desk in Montreal, intending, as lie told the writer, to makze a book of it wlienever lie found tixue after bis conquest of Cuba. Van Home was the magnified emblem of physical man working out a spiritual life. He huxuseif gloried iu all the 193 N",
         "Sir William Van Home physical facts of living. He was a human locomotive eating up coal, belching forth smoke, chucking con- tinents over bis shoulders, and eternafly trying to get to the end of something that he miglit begin it all c\u003ever again. There was nothing gross about Van Homne. But if lie had lived in the age of Rabelais, that feculent genius would have made of hlm, ainother Gargantuan epic. \"The trouble with us liere in Canada,\" he said to the writer, \" is that we don't sweat enougli. Down in Cuba 1 sweat my boots full.\" Van Home took a pagan deliglit in unusual sayings. He had a horror of the conventional. Witli less practical humour lie would have been a first-rate liumorist. There are many stories about Van Home, some in print, others Homeric. One wbici lias neyer been printed narrates liow on a long journey from Vancouver to, Montreal lie could find no one on the train with whom to have a gaine of poker; so lie commandeered tlie con- ductor and played with hlm most of the way from Winnipeg to Fort William. There was a rule on the C.?.R., whici lie had himself made, that no conductor was to, engage in cards wbule running on a train, under penalty of dismissal. At Fort William the conductor was promptly dism-issed and another taken aboard. Wlien lie got back to MÔntreal, Van Home gave the cliscliarged conductor, whom lie had beaten at poker, a position in tlie liead offices at a better salary. If that was flot liumour-what was it? Van Home was a- veteran pokerist. josephi H. Gilder tells in the Minneapolis Beliman liow the railway genius sat at poker with a number of proininent directors, al of wliom lie beat to the gross extent of a thousand dollars. Afterwards, following bis custom 'to donate ail bIis poker- eamings to public cliarities, lie made out cheques for varmous amounts whici lie forwarded to, a certain hospital in the narnes of the other gamesters, sent a Eist of the donors to the local newspapers, and rnarked copies of the printed list to eacli of the victins, noue of wliom liad ever given to a liospital in bis iffe and ail of whom were very indignant, etc. 194",
         "Sir Williamn Van Home What is that but the pagan rollicking of a .twentieth- century satyr? Again, taling to Moberly Bell, publisher of the London Times, Van Homne, a connoisseur ini mushroomns. observed solemnly that most victimas of toadstools died on Wednesday-because they invariably picked the spurious mushrooms on Sunday walks, had themn for supper, and died just ini tixne to be decently interred by mid-week. Balzac could scarcely have invented a grinimer fiction. This mani, be it remembered, was one of those dynamos of achievement; and an average dyn;ain,. whether hunian or electrie, is ulsually flot very huinorous. In bis sixties this practical jalle never deserted Van Horne. Mr. C. Lintern Sibley relates 'in Maclean's Magazine how Van Home managed to build bis railway across Cuba. As the island wýs at that ti m*e still under rnilitary occupation neither the Cubans nor the American govemnors could grant a permit; and by the Foraker amexidment ini Congress no public franchise could be granted under military occupation. Van Home quietly went ahead buying up. private domains for a right of way, built the separate sections of the railway, and waited for a chance to link them up across the comnxunity roads. The governor refused the links. Van Homne went to the governor's confidential adviser, a personal friend of bis own, and confessed bis predicamnent. \"Advise him,» said he with a Spbinxian gleam, ini bis alrnost occultic eyes, \"to grant me a revocable Penrmilt. Thus the counsel advised the governor. \"I1 amn pleased to grant you a revocable permit,'- said the govemor to Van Home. \"'impossible[ \" replied Van Horne, 'Quite pre- posterons 1 I The governor insisted. Van Homne expostulated. The governor reinsisted. Van Homne gave in., The links were built over the roads. When the railway was done public enthusiasm for the project made it a permanency. 195",
         "Sir William Van Horne It was three years before bis death that I first met Van Horne in his huge Montreal home on Sherbrooke Street. Hie was then mnidway on bis Cuban epic, but for which that day of pouring rain he might have been slopping about in rubber boots painting sketches at Minister's Island, St. Andrew's Bay, N.B., bis suxnmer home. House-cleaners were busy about him. is art gallery, that loomed up in great vistas of colour the moment you entered the hallway, was al sheeted over like the counters. of a department store at closing tiine. is custornary home office was topsy-turvy. He was dictating to bis secretary in a big room, upstairs crammed with japanese carven woods and ail manner of Oriental curios. He rose from behind bis flat -desk and somnewhat clanimily shook hands. Now that hie was up I noticed how he was dressed; ail in black-miorning coat, black- striped trousers, prodigio-tis waistcoat, and a nonchalant black bow. lie defied tailors. From some remarks that be made during a four-hour conversation, I imagined be might even consider dispensing with clothes. He bad a head that on an average man would have looked toppling. But bis body seemed ahnost too huge for bis head. Not a fat man; just big, bard as a hammer, driving himnself about with the exuberant energy of a young Indian. Hie seemed the personification of anti- inertia. Mierely being a gentleman would have failed even to amuse such a man. Hie was an overpowering physique and a restless brain among works of art that frém cellar to garret cost hlm a couple of million dollars, and every item of whiàch hie knew better than the stations on the C.P.R. Those black Carven woocls froin the Orient seerned to grin at hlm reverently as though be were sorne blustering genial god. Noisily he yanked at a drawver in bis desk and drew out a box of dusky Cuban cigars. \" I hope you smoke,\" hie said. \"I usually do.\"y lie scratched a tiny match and held it out as thougli it were a blazing pin. And it seemned at once as though here was a being who, but for the accident of civilisa- 196",
         "Sir William Van Horne tion, might have togged hMrself in a goatskin, and with a pipe of Pan lu his fingers proceed to discourse upon any subject under the heavens. 1 began with an obvious, almost insuiting common- place. \"«At your age, Sir Wiliam-\"-2 lie almost grunted in disdain. \" You don't seem to rest much,\" I ventured. Hie prostrated bimself plethorically upon the vast surface of a sofa. \"I always rest,\" he said--staccato. \"1 neyer worked lu My life.\", \" Then whatever would you cail it? 'What interests a man can't be cailed work,\u003e' he went on. \"I have always been interested. 1 have rail- roaded most of my life-because 1 liked railroading. I don't cail it work.\" He puffed wvith colossal energy at the Cuban cigar wbich had the audacity to go out. It pointed upwards like a tiny toy funnel. The talk which followed was the behemnothian note upon the perfectibiity of man; compounded of Darwin, Hierbert Spencer, and Van Horne. It deait with the seven-or whatever nlumber it may be-ages of man. \"Ail men are bomn lazy,\" he said, lighting his cigar again. lie demonstrated this point lu philosophy by show- ing lu successive stages how by the spur of necessity a man works away from inertia to, energy, from that to habits of exertion, on to strength and power, finally to the subconscious stage where his mechanical acts are alinost instinctive, which according to hlm is the age when a man becomes the really effective head of any great system requiring vast co-ordination. A few years before he told a visitor, who, had gone to see him about some of bis pictixres for a boan exhibition, a few facts about bis boyhood. One of the facts that iliustrated Van Horne's gospel of inertia overcome by energy was bis borrowing of a book descriptive of the geological and archoeological history of Illinois. lie had '197",
         "Sir William Van Horne but a week or two to keep the book. An omnivorous lad of fourteen, with a few coppers he had managed to, scrape up he went to the littie store and bought sheets of foolscap, on which tili the paper was done he copied the book, drawings and ail, and afterwards finished thc copy on brown wrapping paper. That was an example of how Van Horne neyer worked. That boy might have becore-anything but a railwayman. But in choosing railways lie got hold of a grand trunk programmre in energy. The story of how lie worked up through ail the grades of railroading in bis native State tiil he becarne the head of a great Arnerican system does not belong to this fragmentary appreciation. It was a mere prelude to bis vast work in Canada after the age of forty, when he turned the broad of bis back upon the land of bis birth and sniffed like a giant at the cold continental stretches of a new nor'l-western world.- , Neither does the building and the equipping and the rnanning of the C.P.R. and the rnaldng of the -C.P.R. into a world-farnous corporation belong inherently to any casual glixnpse of this mnan's personality. In Van Homne's own pbilosophy that was ail sumrned up in a brief phrase. ««I arn a Canadian,\" he said explosively. The idea siniply had to have room. IFrom lying alrnost prone across the broad flat of the sofa lie struggled v-p and peered like a tremendous gargoyle out of bis own amplitude. He blew a huge puif of smoke and batted it aside because he could not see tbrough. \"I arn a Chinese-wall protectionist,\" he said. \u003c' I don't mean merely in trade. I mean--everything. 1'd keep the Arnerican idea out of this country.\" You could almost fancy tbis self-exiled American saying to hirnself- \" Now 1 wonder if this chap won't consider me a paradox? \" Suddenly an impulse seized hirm. \"Roach\" li'' e shouted tbrough the great house. \"Roachi » 198",
         "Sir William Van Horne The voice was flot a roar. It was a pantheistic scream. Quickly bis secretary came ini. \"'Will you excuse me a moment? \" he asked the visitor. \"I1 want to dictate a few letters. Don't go. I want to talk to you after I have finished.\" For the next haif hour Van Home wrote wilkh a poor littie pen on one sheet of paper while he dictated staccato sermonettes to his secretary about how a certain hotel interior at one of the railway termini in Cuba should be built, how to get the material, what to pay for it. And he left nme silently to revie.w the strange case of this muan who, having got his main life impressions in the United States, had become such a thorough-paced Canadian. Quite clearly the C.P.R. had done it. To have built that road would have made a Canadian out of the Germian Emperor. The foremost Liberal statesman of those days predicted that the road would \"'neyer pay for its axie-grease.\" No such railway had ever been built. No such man had ever risen up to build it. The C.P.R. picked Van Home more wisely than anybody knew. Even the nman himself had to fail back on a theory to do the work. He believed in achieving the practically impossible. Tinies were bard, money scarce, immigration nil, trade and manufactures in their child- hood. The main obvious business of the C.P.R. was to keep British Columbia from seceding to the United States by flinging 2000 miles of steel highway across a prairie regarded as a second Siberia and mountains considered irnpassable. The whole of British Columbia could have been bought for less money than it took to build the C.P.R. Van Horne knew it. The situation interested hlm. In i882 what the east knew about the west was less than it cared-and that was next to nothing. The geography of the C.P.R. was almnost sardonic. Hundreds of miles of the road must i-un through the rocky jack- pine desert norili of Lake Superior. A thousand miles was surveyed- through a prairie, much of whose fertility was somewhat a matter of conjecture. Hundreds of 199",
         "Sir William Van Horne miles lay over mountains thousands of feet above the sea. There was the choice between the Kicking Horse Pass and the Yellowhead, which lay beyond at the head of a land whose -farming capabilities were known only to a few white settiers and n.umerous half-breeds. By the lling of the dice the southerly pass was chosen; a shorter long cut through a better-known country. By a similar fling, much of thé C.P.R. lands were chosen along the Saskatchewan valley-in hope. Other men understood the difficulties of the C.P.R.: Strathcona, Mountstephen, Sir Sandford Fleming, and John A. Macdonald. None of them, knew the titanic task of building it as Van Home did. The great road was built by the grace of God, the pluck of a few people, the persistence of a politician Premier-and Van Homne. The man bimself had told incidents of the huge opera bouffe ini which lie was the chief actor-when faith, hope, and sheer bluff, Were sometimes bis chief assets. The day when Sir Donald Smith drove the last spike ini the Rockies there was a photograph. taken by some one with a novelty known, as a portable camera. The second most significant figure in that photograpli is a trim-bearded, burly-shouldered, top-hatted personage in the background with somewhat the smIùg satirical smile that afterwards appeared on cigar boxes labelled- Van Horne. What happened to the C.P.R. after 1885 was mainly how Van Homne switched from being a genius of con- struction to an a]mnost greater genius in operation; when C.P.R. crawled up year by year onl the stock market; when its stocks were bought al'over the world; and when C.P.R. posters becaine better known in the com- mercial centres of Europe than the literature of the Bank of England. Van Home finished bis dictation about staircases and grilles in Havana and disniissed bis secretary. He took up a fresh little pen and lie began to drive fuxiously over fresh paper as he left me to smoke another cigar and gaze at the curios. Presently he pulled out a drawer and heaved up a bundie of notes. 200",
         "Sir William Van H-orne \"'No,\" lie said as he chucked them in again. \"I won't talk about that to-day. Some day 1 shail write it in a book.\" That was his philosophy, which had bothered hlma more of late than his Cuban railway-for fear lie miglit finish the .railway and perhaps flot do the book. Rie sprawled opulently on the sofa again and lighted another cigar that went out again and again as he talked; this time of men and events, particularly remnembering bis old adversary Goldwin Smith, whom. he regarded as mucli too lean a man at the waist to be capable of great hunian concepts. The professor believed in railwayri running north and south for commercial union'purposes; regarding Van Home as a somewhat Bamnum-like figure ln the world of international politics. And it aniused Van Horne to remember how Goldwin Smith's conti- nientai theory had gone to its grave when the C.P.R. was the chief palibearer. Another eminent personage about whom lie talked in a far different strain was the Gêrman Emperor, whom he regarded as the greatest emperor of ail tinie. Hie spent best of an hour eulogising the commerciJal and strategic qualities of the Kaiser, whom lie hoped soma day to meet; quite atnused at how once the Kaiser had stolen a mardi on hlm by getting information about a pulp and paper company of which Van Home was President-of wbidh flot even a copy was sent to Van Homne. One hesitates to imagine what Rabelaisian epithets Van Home must have applied to that kind of knowledge after the outbreak of the war. !«'Mm,\" lie said, trying to ligît bis Havana again. \"'No, t1-here will be no war with Germany. The great wars of the future will be lu trade and commerce.\" Looking back at this cocksure prediction by a man of ahnost uncanny prescience ln niost mundane affairs, one can only conjecture that Van Home was forecasting what would be the fate of civilisation if lie himself lad been in place of the Kaiser. No wise man lu any country was worse disiilusioned by the war than Van Home. 201",
         "Sir William Van Horne whose almpst sudden death came just a year afterwards, and who, but for the war, rnigh± have been writing bis philosophy now. The Oriental emtlems ln the big room. blurred into, lumps of shadows as Van Horne's cigar glowed and pal- pitated to the swish of the rain on the wvindow. Regard- less of tixue he swung into discussions of art, about which he knew as much as le knew about railroading. Under that roof there were art treasures worth by bis own estiniate at least two million dollars. One room contained scores of paintings done by himself. He had learned painting from Nature, who had taught hlm, bis weird humanistic philosophy. Above ail things in a pic- ture he admired-passion. Intellect lu art he disdained, saying that a great artist should be more or less of a fool. In similar strain he spoke about music; of the sym- phonies of Beethoven and of Tchaikowsky-as though in a vagrant mood he -might: have strolled below stairs and played one on the piano. Language did not escape hlm. He had read Spencer's Philos\u003ephy of Style and quoted from. it to prove some point which I have forgotten. Spencer tauf-ht: Van Horne a good deal-perhaps empirically, as an acadexnic might say. Van Horne would have made a grand study for Spencer, as an example of co-ordination. \"The world is ruled largely by humbug,\u003e' he yawned prodigiously as be got up to, take a turn about the daxk room. \" We need a better word than ' bumbug' to express what it means. I shail have to luvent one lu my bookp The visitor intimated that it was time to go. \"Time!» he repeated hugely. \"What'stirne?» He led the way downstairs, switching on the lights as he went. Down lu bis art gallery two rampant Scotch collies leaped upon hlm. like wolves. He wrestled them like children. The man should have had young lions ti play with. He talked to bis dogs as thougli they were huinan. And as7 he stood at the door peering out into the wet darkness the rain came down with a sudden fury. Even the ralu seemed to kçnow-Van Horne. 202",
         "E. WYLY GRIER, R.C.A. Ax early 1916 issue of the Christian Science Monitor of Boston contained a character sketch written in almost impeccable style and adorned by a line drawing portrait of the late Goldwin Smith. The legend under the draw- ing ran: '\u003cFrorn an oil portrait by E. Wyly Grier, R .C.A., in the possession of John Ross Robertson.\" The article had no signature; but one naively surmises that the description of Goldwiu Smith and bis manor was the work of the mnan who made the portrait. For E. Wyly Grier is a suave compend of art qualities ex- pressible in portraiture, occasionaUlandscapes, criticisms, and public speeches. He does ail these tbings about equally well, and with a positive finality of finish that leaves littie to the imagination. For twenty-five yeaxs Grier bas been doing oil portraits of Canadians. Ini that time he has accumnulated enough photo-prints of portraits to decorate a good-sized ga]lery and has casually gathered knowledge of men sufficient to write a good book of studio recollections. Grier is by no means the oniy good portrait painter in Canada. He L-suot always even the best. But there is no other mnan who, gifted -%vith an early de-;ire for landscapes, turned bis brush into a far lessi imaginative but more profitable field and kept at it year by year until he had become recognised as a standard producer cf public and private portraits. Grier seeras to have been bomn with a necessity of formai expression. If he ever had an uncouth episode he seerns to have forgotten it. Born lu Melbourne, he was educated at Bristol, studied painting at old St. Ives, went to Paris and to Rome, diligently acquired a facile technique along 'with a good general knowledge, and at 203",
         "E. Wyly Grier, R.C.A. the age of thirty or thereabouts came back to Canada, which he had first seen as a youth. Had Grier ever inscribed a motto on bis studio wafls it should have been \"Quite So.\" He is a master at the' art of gentlemanly agreement and of precise expression. No one seems to recollect the time when Grier ever lost bis temper. To lose tempey is to forfeit one's balance, and Grier bas a rather exquisite balance to maintain. He is an artillery major, a master of amateur gardening, which he prosecntes with tbrifty circumspection, a suffragist, an art critic, a dabbler in singing, and a culti- vated Christian Scientist who used to be a flot too orthodox Anglican. Such a punctilious admixture of unapposite ini- gredients in some mien woulid have acted like the fizz of a Seidlitz powder. In Grier it is a sort of unstable equili- brium, wbich becomes a habit. He bas neyer been a terrible protestant. 'A'measure of amiable conformity bas characterised most of bis work. One suspects that bis numerous expert dilettantisms have been a sort of safety valve that kept hixn frori art violence. A man is after all a walkzing portrait of bL-,belf. Grier has even done bis own portrait in crayb)n, by the aid of a lookmng- glass, and a good one. That kind of seif-composure is only possible to one who has a vein of serious jocosity. Grier appeared at a restaurant luncheon axnong some friends one day a few years ago when there was a trifle of tight money in the studios and elsewhere. He was garbed for a wedding. To some of bis friends' comments he naively asked, \"' Yeý;, and where do you think I got these tronsers? At Thompson's for a dollar-frfty.\" Nobody but a master of temperaniental. equipoise could have joked about a dollar-fifty pair of trousers at a fashionable wvedding. With bis neat sense of humour he miglit have developed into facile and decorous caricature. He bas neyer done so. He bas stuck to bis agreeable transcriptions of other people, eminent and otherwise; to, the frockcoat, the si]k bat, and the gloves, the uniforms of the worsbipful grand master, the banker's tweeds, and the gubematorial regalia. Hie has become a sartorial :204",
         "E. Wyly Grier, R.C.A. expert on the value of clothes which he depicts with a legree of comfortable and very ingenious ecstasy. One imagines that he sometimes treats a man's features as a sort of naturai clothes whicb. it is bis business to make fit the man where nature seems to have been careless. Grier is flot an intense realist. He bas too mucli native politeness and senis- of the decorative. Ris habituai effort is to inake a sitter pleased with himself, bis clothes, -the painter, and the world at large. Witli great deftness lie bas beguiled sucli men out of themselves into a more pleasing ensemble of expression. Ris own obvious enthu- siasm-as though you were the flrst subject lie had undertaken to portray for a nionth past-gives you a sense of pleased importance. You do not rea]ir'ý the effort of the artist. That is part of bis art. Grier neyer permits hirnself to appear fagged or blasé. He often holds up the bird that the child may smile at the camera. Any random, selection of Grier portraits shows a higli average of strength, fldelity, character, ease of expression, and as mucli native force of temperarnent in the picture as may be consistent with the Ind of hyper-conventional portrait that seems to please the average man. But as a mile he is proscribed by the practical and polite ruies of bhis craft from depicting any startling psychic realitiLes. Rlis portraits are fine gentlexnanly conformities; seldom or neyer great realisms. They are first-rate likenesses; rarely revelations. Technically well handled they are not always sub]imely simple in detail. Exaggeratioiis, eccentricities, cal'zat3re, over-intensity, and profound egotism, are interesting humai defects that seldom, creep into bis work. Ris greatest defect is bis lack of little imperfections. Ferhaps this is a real virtue in a portraiteur whose prime business it is to please individuals and mun a risk of flot satisfying the critics or the crowd. The wonder is that Grier keeps ail these elements balanced so nicely. Now a.nd then lie seizes some fresh character that boots in from the north and ini a fine fit of ecstasy transcribes that, man with ail bis out-of-doors tang and virility. Thereafter lie relapses into the effectively prosaie with 205",
         "E. Wyly Grier, R.C.A. as much poetry as circuinstances permit, touching up characters that have always puzzled the camera into, as much as possible of a rediscovery. And bis char.acterisations are always good. He lias few ups and downs. flluminative accuracy is a virtue with Grier. What Morris did historically for the western Indians Grier has done and is dloing for the average mani li the e ist in the portrayal, of both individuals and types. In so doing hé betrays his fine practicai sense; he admits that art is flot a matter of fine frenzy so much as diligent and. as far as practicable inspired rendering of every- day subjects; le suggests that it is flot the business of the man of the world to gape at the adorabilities of art as for art to put itself at the service of other men whose interests are of the practical sort that make art possible. 'When Grier wearies of paint he betakes hiniseif to one of the nurnerous hobbies with which he las garnished the xnonotony of a portraiteur's, life. He will give you a recipe for pickling caulifiower or making the best use of a summer camp; sing you a well-toned song or make you a circumspectly admirable and witty speech; take part li a play or discuss votes for women; talk about artillery i which he some time ago got bis majority or write a critique for a newspaper. AUl these are necessary to Grier and for the most part easy. For many years he has been one of the pillars of the Ontario Society of Artists of which for several. successive years he was a most effective President. But if E. Wyly Grier ever perniits bimself the luxury of a great primitive sensation in art, he does it in camera- or by accident you may corne across hmn i bis studio when he is at the height of it. And at such times he is very Iikely to say to, bimself--\" Oh confouxid the average portrait!» ' 2o6",
         ". SIR WILLIAM MULOCK SiR WiLLIAxM PiuLocK once paid a thougand dollars for a street-car ticket, which, he still keeps as a souvenir of a highly sentimental occasion. That was in the winter of x91i5. Sir William was, as he stiil is, chair.inan of the ?atriotic Fund for Toronto and the County York. When the returns were coming in this car ticket was one of the donations. Who sent it nobody knew. Sir William proposed an auction for the ticket and himself led off. His bid was briskly raised hundred by hundred until at the thousand mark bis wealthier -competitors observed by the gleam, in the High Chief Justice's eye that lie intended to have the ticket if lie had to seil the f anuy plate to get it. Sir William is a middling old*man ini years, and lie has behind hlm, a big story of achievement ini political business, in law, ini learning, in the judiciary, and in common old-fashioned citizenship. But he has always found time and inclination for the straightforward, impulsive things of life that in some respects have made hlm a radical in temperament, while lie lias rernained a straight Liberai in politics. One evening trudging up a dark snowy court ini Toronto behind the gloomy police station to an arts club of whicli lie is a member, lie observed a horseshoe li the snow. He picked it up and carried it to, the club where it stili reposes without a legend, the token of good luck picked up and cast off by an ambulance horse and picked up by the Higli Chief justice. You imagine that lie stlll looks over bis riglit shoulder at the new moon for good luck; still believes tliat if the new moon lies on its back so that the Indian cculd bang his powder hom on the tip it will be a wet moon; and that if sait is spilled at the table, mother mnust throw a pinch 207",
         "Sir William Mulock of it over ,her left shoulder to ward off iii luck in the house. Frequently the eX-Postmaster-General and the author o! Penny Postage for Canada in the Empire pays a visit' to the Arts and Letters Club of whicb, he became a member in 1910. If there is a head table he takes some pains to avoid it. H1e seizes. some friend and compels hlm to sit down before a plate of cold meat. In a very little while bis own plate of meat is empty. Being an autocrat -in practice, Sir William wouldaslecom d the president of the club, to get hlm a fresh helping, but he takes bis plate and biniseif goes boldly to the kItchen. Some would cail this mere democratic bluntness. [t is much deeper. Bluntness and brusquerie may be i- vented as a pose. Mulock's direct methods are tbe out- growth of a primitive characteristic. The root idea li bis character is getting' at the farts; what is the matter and 'how can it be remedied, if need be reorganised. Wben be discovers from experience that one belping of meat is insufficient, he remedies the matter by going straight, flot only to the root of the matter, but to the source of supp]y. Public affairs may be disorgaffised or unorganised; the commuunity may be bungry: well then let some one lend a baud to adjust the matter. But waste no time; go direct to, the point, get the remedy. There are hundreds of people in Canada who can bear testimony to baving been forcedto contribute to Mulock's inteliectual welfare. H1e is a plain highwayman; a bold Turpin on the beaths of experience. H1e is coming along the road. You stop to apologise for being bit. \" Not at aIl,'\u003e be says cheerfully as a bush-axe. \"What mnade you corne this way? Where are you going? Wbat do you understand by flot being aware? Is that a state of mind or a trait of your character? You say it is a depressing day. Just what do you understand by that? \" On several occasions 1 bave noticed Sir William work 208",
         "7~S4",
         "Sir William Mulock his bland pistol gaine of getting knowledge. One of his chance victixns was a clerk of the weather to whom he propounded a lingo of questions that nmade the weather man for the turne being a witness on the stand. Al bis life Sir William had been reading weather reports; sometimes quite mystified by the erudite lingo of the newspaper scientist. As Vice-Chancellor of the Uni- versity of Toronto for twenty years he had a perfect right time and again to match over to the observatory on the edge of the college campus and cross-examine the entire staff. But he had neyer found it convenient, so, he had stored up a grist of questions against the time when by chance he niight encounter some weather man -and here was the occasion. Introduced to a young explorer from Eskimoland he at once heckled hlm for positive, reliable, and strictly ethnological information concernlng the Eskimos; details of how igloos are built, what form of religion is inherent in an IEkm, and what were the women like? And this is no habit of mind superlnduced by the BenchP which claimed Sir William only a decade ago and got hlm too old to change hlm. He brought with hlm to the High Chief Justiceship ail the inquisitorial qualities he has; and m'any a witness and counsel know it. Once he adjoumned a case peremptorlly; some railway case, information of witness somewhat vague-hales hum and counsel doWn to. the railway to demonstrate by ociilar proof how such and so took place. Having got which he reassembled the Court and proceeded with the case., Impatient with counsel, lmpetuous and severe with witnesses, and heavy with adrmenishment to the depraved prisoner, it is doubtful, if a more humane judge has ever occupied -the Bench in Canada, one who would be less swayable by social position or made more lenient by wealth in the dock. Mulock is far too old-fashioned a morality to be warped in bis intentions regarding justice, -however impulsively on the Bench *he may occasionally go wide of the mark ini mere sentiment. Brusque as a 209 O",
         "Sir William Mulock MarSi wind, he is apt to tread upon the corns of money- bags conventionalists, academic bigwigs, judicial digni- taries, and even consequential statesmen. He asserts himself with the trenchant: emDhasis of a bushwhacker splitting rails. And to get to the keynote of bis character we must go back to the pine stump fe*nces and the plougli-handies among which he was bon; son of a widow mother, hired out to tlie neighbours in York County, up at daybreak choring aznong the cattie, loading hay, grading turn- pikes with a wheelbarrow and.shovel-the roads he now drives over with his automobile. A raw youth he went to Toronto University, with cked-out savings; back to the farm after lie had graduated with honour-s in modem languages; down to Toronto again to study law--cooking his own meals over a lonesome fire in bachelor's rooms on Melinda Street; tutoring by niglit, afterwards made a niglit master in Upper Canada College; finally graduating in law -*th a fi.rst-hand knowledge of what it feit like to carry the brain-hunger of the farm into the world of books. He founded a law firm which stili bears the name Mulock-that of lis eldest son. By and by lie realised one youthful ambition when lie bought a farm for the sake of the quiet life. Many of bis clients had the in- grained muck of York County on their boots when they came to the office. That was all in their favour. Where Mgulock's pile-driving energy and brusque exarnination awed a client bis simple geniality won hlm. Besides lie was a farmer ainong farniers; planting orchards and raising cattie, offering prizes to farmers-a yeoman of the yeomanry to whom, the city was one thing and the land a better. Senator of Toronto University, he becanie Vice- Chancellor, regularly taking bis $400 a year fees for cal\u003e- bure and tlie like; but because lie liad a carniage of bis own or could walk if lie chose, remitting the money to charity. He was always peremptory about tliose fees. 210",
         "Sir William Mulock In :1882 he becanie an M.P. elected by the bootleg farmers whose first names he knew as well as those of their fathers. One of his first remedial bils was an act to protect farniers frorn being swindled by patent-holders. That 'was the time when the faier was a simple person; alasi ne longer. Another of his pro-agrarian measures was an act to prevent trains belonging to ridli corpora- tions froni blocking the public roads, holding farm waggons from, mnarket by the hour. Always an autocratic bootleg democrat, inl 1894 he radically moved ini the House to prohibit members of Parliament from travelling on railway passes. In that lie was defeated. The year r896 saw hi a Cabinet Ministér; one of Laurier's college of Premiers and experts. The recon- structive task that was handed to this vigorous, reform- img energiser was to reorganise the postal department. Here began his labours of Hercules; mountains of abuse and of privilege, of waste and inefficiency, of over- nianning and underworking- and lie moved thern because he had faith ini himself, in the Laurier Gàvern- mient, and the country. He set eut to convert a million- dollar deficit into a surplus. Hie did it. He became the despot of a system, reaching out gradually by dog-train to Dawson City just beginning te, go on the znap. How lie administered this chaotic system is a matter of economic history. But lie was as thorougli as a farmer's flail. Privilege, nepotism, needless machinery, and absurd expenses were brushed off the table. The farmner was in the Postmaster-General's departinent. Hie was there to create a surplus and te reduce the cost of both pro- duction and cousumption. Wlien lie took office a letter te any part of Canada or the United States cost three cents, and a letter to England five cents. lie said it was toq inucl. lie 'would create a surplus with less cost te, the consumer. Witli hlf a continent to cover, the idea seemed worthy of Don Quixote. But on Christmas Day 1898, two years and some months atter Mulock liad worýced on the postal deficit, the cost of a letter any- where in Canada and the United States becarne two cents, 211",
         "Sir William Mulock and a week.later Imperial penny postage becanie a fact. It is admitted that the Imperial penny rate was due as mucli to, Mulock as.to, any other member of the postal conference. With the penny postage the revenue first -dropped, then rose; the surplus increased; the country was rnarching ahead and the stars in their courses fought for Mulock with bis penny rates. The Pacific Cable was another pet of bis. Then caine the Labour question. One thing that struck Mulock soon after lie began to operate the postal departinent caused him, to invent strong language. The post office unlforms in use ail over Canada were the products of sweatshop labour that turned over fat profits to contractors. H1e abollshed the government sweatshop as it applied to the post office- though it is flot on record that with increasing seamstress wages lie raised postal salaries. H1e becaine ipso facto the first Minister that ever made labour an active issue in bis departinent. Out of this personal pertinent investigation came the Labour Department conducted by Mulock blimseif as the first Labour Minister. Labor Omnia Vincit-he bas always believed it. Soon after lie becaine Postinaster-General, when at least one big-brained member of the Cabinet was taking dance lessons ini Ottawa, Mulock hired a professor of Frenchi conversation to corne to bis horne at 6.30 every mornlng. H1e furbished up bis old knowledge of book French into an instrument of expression, able to talk in Frenchi to Frenchi postinasters and deputations and to, Frenchi presidents whenever lie went abroad. For nine years he czared the post-office department. In 1905 lie retired from the Cabinet and frorn the House and was made a Judge. Hie had travelled. mucli ini Australia and considerably in Europe. Hie had made a postal deficit into a surplus and created penny postage, taken a big hand at the Pacific Cable, organised a new portfoliô, retired from the vice-chancellorsblp of Toronto University, and had mnade bis 200-acre fiaim in the town- ship of Ring produce great apples, remarkable prize short-liorns, and: beautiful poules. 212",
         "Sir William Mulock Since that time Sir William has been a judge, a student of real estate, and a manager of public benevolences. As a plain citizen lie has, become more conspicuous than ever. In politics lie is reminiscent. The defeat of re- stricted reciprocity in i911 jolted hlm only less than it did Sir Wilfrid Laurier, bis eminent friend, whom he. élaims as his guest whenever Sir Wilfrid goes to Toronto. His plain practical citizenship, however, is a bigger fact than his political principles. His personality is of greater interest than his decisions on the bencli. When lie goes on the patriotic platform there is nobody who can make a better-even if more eloquent-patrotic speech. For when he speaks there is behind the speech a big, warmn-hearted, brainy mani, who has been and stili is a doer of things. At bis country home in North York Sir William is at the height: of fine, simple hospitality. His farrn thirty years ago wvas a plain, poor but picturesque tract of land in the his. He has madý,- part of it a great park of groves and gardens. The trees were planted by himself. H1e lias a large grove of walnut trees descended by the third generation from, wa]nuts planted by hlmself. H1e bas apple-trees that years ago, through the amiable offices of' a Ger.-nan trade agent, came direct fromi the Kaiser's garden. He has vegetable gardens where he sonietimes goes abroad to muncli raw peas ont of the pod. %i house is the rendezvous for scores of people who have nothing to do wvith what was once bis constituency of North York. There he dispenses the best of hospitality in a simple style that iniglit have been ini vogue centuries ago, with a cordial dignity that permits no artificial. restraint. H1e glories in recafing the old days of the farmer when lie picked small gourds from the garden to mould the heels of socks bis mother was knitting for the family. He delights to stand under the trees and explain scientifically how a tree keeps the air under it cool. He is just as fond of good-huxnoured stories that thrûw liglit on the parliamentary foibles of his day in politics. 213",
         "Sir William Mulocik More than ail, -he expresses an unending interest ini plain people, public practical problems, and the ethics of simple -unaffected living.. With ail bis génial faults we shail find it a matter of great national regret to dispense with Sir Williamn Mulock. .And we hope that the next lime he engineers a patriotic auction sale, lie will invest bis tho'usand dollars in a two- cent stamp instead of a street-car ticket. -214",
         "~-zEEz~ C. A. MAGRATH A SASKATCHEWAN half-breed--call him John Thunder -once discovered that lie could buru wood in the mud fireplace of bis shack without chopping the wood. How lie did it makes the burden of a story told by C. A. Magrath who lias met a large number of half-breeds in his day. And as Magrath sat before one of the biggest fireplaces in America a year or two ago aiid told the writer about John Thunder, he spun the story out with slow circurnspect emphasis, flot missing an item of luxurious detail, yet telling it with the simplicity of a man to whom primitive western life is as f amiliar as a square meal. \"*How do you suppose that half-breed got over the difficulty of chopping wood for bis fireplace? \" lie said in a cloud of smoke over the teacups. Give it up,\"- said the company. \"Well, being a philosopher,\" went on Magrath with a cavernous but genial drone of a voice, \"lie knew the logs were too long to go luto the fireplace and atlow for sliutting the shack door. He was like most other hlf- breeds I ever knew. He would have walked two miles to catch a cayuse in order to ride the pony haif a mile and save himself the trouble of wallg. So he heaved up a long pole; liauled it up the roof, and raxnmed it down the flue. The fire burned off as inucli fron -the bottoma as it wanted to; and as the fire burned, the pole kept coming on down till by and by it was al burned. And tliat's the way the half-breed solved the problem of vis inerlia.\" The once member for Medicine Hat could tell stories like this enough to maire more than a book. He lias spent most of bis life lu the land of the half-breeds. In his business of land surveyor lie lias travelled xnost of 215",
         "C. A. Magrath that vast ,country. He knows ail its moods and its mediSvaflsms. That lie knows most about the dry beit is a mere accident. He spent -a number of years irrigating the c.rid lands east of Calgary; the land that creeps down close to, Medicine Hat, away from, the foot-his of the Bow. He liad the educated brain of an engineer and the hand of a man who desired to, see civilisation grow by increasing production. For just about forty years this giant of the prairies witli the slow voice and thie odd good-liumour in bis point of view lias been solving problems for the West. In so, doing lie lias become as true a westerner as tlie lialf-breed wlio rammed the flrewood down tlieflue. Magrath is a genuine westerner of thie later Victoia period before bell-boys and cow-boys bùecame million- aires. Ile chain-ganged a million acres of the praire before lie dabbled in thie price of a corner lot. Me roanied thie prairie trails wlien buffaloes were on tliem. He was in the land of tlie bunchgrass alrnost as soon as thie mounted police went in. Ile saw the moving caravans of red men and studied tliem up dlose; costume, colour, and language, Fiegans, Sarcees, Bloods, Stoneys, Black- foots, and Crees, knowing tliem ail apart and obscrving them, witli the shrewd, indly eyes of the mani wlio miglit have been an ethnologlst. But Magratli was neyer anything that could be ended witli an\"« ist-.» R-is fatherwas, an eminent matliematician in Ireland. Magratli neyer a]lowed that to be reckoned against him. He knew that whatever bis fatlier liad known of the integral calculus, neyer would keep hlm, from. uecoming a poor citizen if lie kept the mediSval piflosophy of rarnring firewood clown tlie fue. Civilisation was a in l tlie making. There was no\u003e railway. He could wait. While waiting lie worked. He liad no particular pet ambition. Tlie country was large. He wanted to know it ail, or as mucli of it as possible. What lie miglit manage to Possess in fee simple was of far less importance. The day had not come for the land-grabber. Magrath trailed al over the prairie with- 216",
         "C. A. Magrath ont being able to discover more than the log-shack nuclei for towns and chties yet to be. MedicinLe Hat was not even named when he went there. Lethbridge was yet to be born. The foot-his billowed up out of the dun levels of the dean prairie, up the smaoky ribbons of the rivers into the far blue haze that thickened into, the marveiouols colour of the RocikIas, whose peaks from the birthplace of Lethbridge or old Fort MacLeod lie could count by the dozen. It was a wonderful land. Magrath loved it with the passion of a crude, practical poet. The buffaloes vanished and the C.P.R. camje-in the firt decade cf Magrath. He deplored, the passing of the \" moostoos,\" but so far as we know neyer tried to, hold up the \"'Oogarnous \" Donald A. Smith and Van *3orne 'with their conquering transcontinental that cut clean tbrough the dry beit where Magrath had intended to build great dams and reservoirs whenever it waz worth while so to do. The railway clanked on up iiito, the bills and the hoary inountains on down. to the blue sea beyond. Chief Magrath, irrigater of dry beits, mnan of proble-ns to solve with the tripod and the scale of inches, less confounded than the red men over the spectacle, as good as p-aised God for the good time com2ng. Magrath always had a long-seeing eye for the future, because lie had a sympathetic outlook upon the past. Thre great land lie had trailed so hopefully ahead of the railway and in uine with the redcoat mounted police was to him then as it stili, is the greatest land in the wvorld. He could see in it more than Cecil Rhodes saw in Africa, or G\"irouard, the Frencli-Canadian engineer and builder of dams, saw in Egypt. Thre uriith-west was a greater land than either. It was an empire of Indians, half-breeds, cowboys, furposters, mounted policemnen, cart-ireighters, dog-drivers, whisky-smugglers, and nis- sionaries. But the other side was cozning. When law and governrnent were established after the flare-up of the-tribes in the Saskatchewan valley Magrath 2:17",
         "C. A. Magrath was in politics. He was much needed. In those days many of the .old-timers had Noah's Ark ideas about the West. They conceived themselves to be Israelites to. whom the Lord had given a new land. In many a growing town on or near a new railway these Rip Van Winkles croaked over the menace of immigrants and colonist cars and down-easters, hanging out business signs on the streets of the furpost and cowboy towns. Magrath was neyer one of tzhern. -As inveterate an old- timer as most, knowing the whole country better than most-, he believed in making the most out of the inevitable and working to bring it about. If the half-breed burning bis poles down the chimney must go, the men of machinery and ploughs and stoves and electric lights must occupy their room. The old epic was done. A new one must begin. So Magrath sat in the old non-party Parliaxnent of the Territories at Regina, hobnobbing with Frank Oliver anà Flood Davin and Haultain, help- ing to govern an empire much the same as five villagers rule a township in the East. Lt was an old way, but there was as yet no other. Problems such as the old north- west councillors had only dreamed in vague outiue were to, come blustering in; new railways, more parliaments, fresh towns, old trails turned into turnpike roads with ditches alongside, littie sehool-houses and rude churches axnong the shacks of the half-breeds, keen-eyed business men beating up new trade instead of the old furposter and the fre.e -ht-cart trader, real estate experts such as had once nearly demoralised Winnipeg: ail the bewilder- ing complexity of a rampait juggernauting civilisation seizing the buffalo lands with the tentacles of colonist trains. Magrath was part of it ail. But he saw it al with the placid eye of experience. He was ini ail the great movements, of men and tnoney and machinery that transformed the prairie from what it had been in 1878 when he first w7ent there to what it became ini the twentieth century when lie took rank among the oid- timers. How tbings did movel No country had ever been 2,18",
         "C. A. Magrath transformed at such a pace. More things happened in the first seven years of the new century in the land of Magrath than he had seen in the twenty-two years before 1900o. But even the evolution of rt y politics and the real estate craze failed to, carry this big-footed giant of the old days off bis feet. He was no man to be de- liriumised by the grand illusion of wealth for ail men without labour. He knew the West better than the twentieth-centuryj experts of Wallingford calibre. He believed in its future more sanely than the tralisters who caxnped on the survey limes of new railways, along trails he had buckboarded and cayused ini the,3eighties. No doubt Magrath, like many other idealis-*ig characters, bas been mistaken more than once ini bis co-ordination of events ini the West. No douabt the move- xnents of whiàch he dreamed and for which in bis own patient way he worked were taken hold of with greater energy by railroading and colonising geniuses who had not even seen the West when he was one of its pioneer citizens. But there was no0 man of mark on the prairies ini the grand decade of development between 1901 and i911 who had a clearer vision of what the West reaily was, what it used to be, and what it niight or-should become as a part of Canada and the Empire. So we foilow Mag-rath on down to i908 when he was first elected to the House of Commnons, mnember for Medicine Hat in Ottawa; which was just about the timre that Kipling scudded through these engineering dam- lands of Magrath and said of Medicine Hat with its gas- weils that it had \"ait heUl for a basement.\" Three years only he sat for Medicine Hat. He carried to Ottawa the colour and swing of the free West as singularly as did Flood. Davin or Frank Oliver; but he was neyer bypnotised by the experts on Parliament Hill. Chair- man of Coriservative caucus though he was, he was no blind-eyed partisan, and neyer permitted himself to become converted to the blasé macbinery of Parliament. Ottawa was fuit of devices which he only haif under- stood. Parliament and administration were a jumnble of 219",
         "C. A. Magrathi ingenious 'rnechanisms that to hlm seemed clumiy, ini- effective, and inept. Re turned over ini bis brain many a scheme to reorganise governinent in actual adminis-,. tration. He dreamed while other men worked the machinery. In 1911i he found himself bereft of Medicine Hat a3 ak constituency. Then he began to work on bis adminis- trative epic of reform. So, one day he sat by the fire- side, fled bis pipe, and scherned out the new business cleaxing-house way to, run a country without bedevilment by too xnuch politics and red iape. When he got weary trying to convince bis com-pany what it aul amounted to, he changed the subject and taiked with slow poetry about the old furposts, the vanishing forts, the precious historic landmarks ail over the West that in heaven's naine people should, labour to preserve for the sake of what, the country had been, and to keep it what it miglit be in the new time cd'mhg. And he told the yamn about the half-breed raxmning the pole down the fireplace flue, tucked bis manuscripts about administrative reform into a huge pocket, and got Up to go. Somewhere in bis luggage he had the type- written MSS. of a book on Canada; probably also a lecture or two. He was going to Ottawa. He would see somebody; do sometbing; go back to, the West-and one of these days time might show that he was no mean prophet of the older days. 220",
         "SIR GEORGE FOSTER FoR nearly forty years now Sir George Foster has been holding the lanteru while Mr. Average Canadian chops down the elm tree with the fat coon in the top. He knows the exact height and angle to hold the lantern, so, that the chopper can see; but bis own face is quite ini the dark. This is flot to, accuse our Minister of Trade-aLnd Com- merce of obliquity. Sir George Foster is a big citizen of Canada. Ho has been a cabinet minister under five premiers, Finance Minister under four, member of Parlia- ment since 1882, a higher critic since 1879, and a chronic objector since lie was old enougli to, teacli Latin and Greek ini the Baptist Seminary at Fredericton Junction, N.B., not far from where lie was born. He lias scolded in public more than any other living Canadian. Ho lias pointed out with thie actunen of an expert diagnostician just what was, lias been, and now is the matter with the body politic ini Canada. And he lias neyer ceased to romain the most unniagnetic big-brained man in Canadian public life. He lias tuxned the lantern of higlier criticism on Canadian public affairs ever since he began to be oui chief national lecturer on prohibition of the liquor traffic. And he lias himself had more critics among both bis political friends and foes than any other man wlio has a sanely constructive view o! our affairs. The persistent pedagogue is not usually popular, unless ho is occasionally blind in one oye to, the human irmities -of bis flock. Sir George Foster has always been a dominie. What a tremendous Baptist preaclier he. would have made I The pulpit lost in him, a great expounder. Parliaznent gained a superb critic. Some- times one fancies hlm. a cynic who. long ago despaired of enlightening Canadian people-including other paria-",
         "Sir George Poster mentarians. Again he seems to be an inteilectual enthusiast who, having -mastered sonie doctrine, is determined to propagate it in the teeth of ail opposi-, tion. Now and' then he has loomed up as a plainly' disgrantled expert, who, in - order to spite the rest of mankind would withdraw into bis political laboratory and let the world do without hlm. But because he some- how has a hankering for the business of pedagogy, Foster stays in the public eye and brilliantly continues to tell us with cold physiognomy and impassioned logic what is the matter with our citizenship. Did any one ever see George E. Foster smile when he is talkng in public? Did any camera ever quite catch bis fine ferocious frenzy when he is roused to the climax of some moral argument by analysis? No, Foster is always inexorably and fervently serious; and when he is aeronauting to the height of a grand synoptical argument he neyer cates what cameras, reporters, or common critics may choose to say about him. Rie is the only man in Canada who with a searcblight knowledge of eve-nts bas neyer closely studied other men; the only political moraliser we ever had who hirnself habitually became the object of moral compassion; and the only eniinent if flot great -political speaker who remained without the slightest capacity for political, leadership- except Hon. Edward Blake. Five years ago a Liberal politician from one of the mining districts of Nova Scotia sat in the palmn-room of the Toronto Club and comxnented upon a forlorn picture he had seen during the parliamentary session just closed. There had been a public investigation into, the status and statistics, of certain trust companies in Canada. Hon. George E. Foster was president of a company whose affairs seemed to be in some sort of predicament peculiaxly interesting to.those of the Liberal faith. \"When the investigation was over,\" said the Liberal politician with inipressive pathos, '\u003c1 watched George E. Foster leave the House. It was a dark, drizzling night. The melancholy figure glided down the steps into, 222",
         "Sir George Poster the fog. Ris head was alrnost buried in his shoulders. Ris hat seemed to droop over bis ears as lie hoisted bis umbrella. The fog and the blur of the lights swallowed bim. And I said to myseif, ' That's the exit of Foster from the public life of this country. He will neyer be. heard of again iii Parliament.\u003e \" For a man so dramatically dead and buried the Hon. Minister of Trade and Commerce is an exceedingly buoyant personage. This Cassius of the Cabinet seems to be possessed of a sort of unphysical vitality. As a mnere corporeal fact lie somnewhat resembles a con- certina. He may sit for an hour on a platform, com- pressed into the lackadaisical folds of his clothes, thin spidery legs crossed, lean spindly armis folded, a scant- bearded tableau of despondent inertia. But wait. It is Foster's- turu to speak. The looso clothes corne out of their crumples and hang ini sad limes about the cadaverous, stoop-shouldered figure. He begins-just talking ini a thin pallid voice, thumbs, hooked into his vest pockets, looking dejectedly at the crowd as thougi lie wished they had ail remained at home. .Looks-like many other things-are very deceiving in iGeorge E. Foster. If you should corne back to the hall i five minutes, the yawners would be ail alert, watching a.nd listeriing to the spare figure on the stage who xnay be pulling invisible beil-ropes of oratory or whacIng one liand with the other in process of driving home spike nails of passionate logic and didactic appeal.. There is neyer a floral offering ini any of Foster's elo.. quences; scarcely even a figure of speech; no cere- monious gesturing. He is a mian without form-but flot void. N~o, Foster is a very ft mati; full, to overbrimxrnng with whatever subject lie chooses to expound after the manner of a Roman trurnpeter. Every syllable, winged, tailed, or finned with argument, goes on its way into the intelligence of the crowd mucli like one of those curions hemi-sexual protozoa, seen through the scientist's micro- scope. And lie is neyer lost in mere bardic language. 223",
         "Sir George Poster \"Speak, to, the audience! 1 shouted an impatient admirer who was losing some of Foster's argument in a public hall. Foster was expounding gospel truth about the war' to the people on the platform and those beblnd hlm, ini the choir gallery, turning bis back on the audience. He had forgotten where he was; fancying bimself back -*n the flouse of Comnors with bis own party at bis back ýthe party lie bas always tried to enlighten. 1.Poster was the first mian whose voice I ever heard li Parliament. That was some years ago, when he was still the maxi who led ail great debates on the Conservative side, snapped bis fingers at the young orators Whom. he bossed like page boys, rather ignored the Opposition leader, and held the party at bis back in a mass of thumdering applause. He was taIdng about Liberal patronage-mongers, corrupt politics, and the low ebb of national life-ail the' vonmonplace alments, that mere diagnosis f ails to cure. No mani ever took a hand li our politics who, with a po'werful brain and a copious tongue was quite so well able to, twang the dismal lyre. Foster got the reputa- tion.years ago of being a confirmed pessiniist; largely because of bis manner of speaking, which is entirely without plausible graces, studio poses, or genial struts. Foster must have an antagonlst. He must convince, beat down opposition, scarlfy, repudiate, .po,-,nt the finger of mockery with a sort of cold creepy laugliter. Then lie is happy. Tblrty years ago and more this maxi was admitted to, have exceptional, ability. There was no Grit i the House who had flot a casual wholesome dfead of hlm. Sometimes the Tories criticised hlm. Some of my earliest impressions of public men were visions of tbis -lean didactic prophet ripping up some fipancial illusion of the Liberal party. Hie always seemed to be mixed up with budgets, fisheries disputes, squabbles over reciprocity, and the more or less economic: affairs of a country which durlng bis early career li politics was spoonfed on treaties. Whenever Richard Cartwright 224",
         "Sir George Poster brouglit down a Liberal budget, Foster was ready witli a pack of poisoned arrows. And in.the days after John A. Macdonald,tlie chief interest in Parliament was theannual buil-figlit between these two masters of- political. irony. Pertinaciously moral people used to predict that with ail bis great ability Foster neyer- would rise to real emnence. Hie seemed to pay no lieed. Hie believed in lihuseif. He took a lugubrious joy i cliastising other sinners. When John A. Macdonald passed out Foster miglit have been expected to Iead the Conservatives. But lie lias neyer led them--except in tlie flouse. Nobody e'ver wanted to follow Foster. Hie liad no obvious ability as a leader. For one thing lie -had no comfortable tricks, illusions, or pleasant vices. Hie seldom, cared to be genial. fis company was chflhig. He liad no atmosphere. Tlie party was useful to hlm mainly as a background. During two Premierships after the death of Macdonald lie stayed at bis post as Finance Minister. In the third lie lieaded a rebellion. During the golden age of commercial expansion after the in- auguration of tlie Laurier régime, this master of sad- eyed invective rose to tlie lieight of bis genius. There was littie ini the mere prosperity of Canada under a Liberal régime to deliglit Mr. Foster who would have preferred to see tlie National Policy get the credit. Sometimes it seemed to him as if even Conservatives were stupid. Mr. Borden lie welcomed as leader of the party without embrace. And for years Mr. Borden let Mr. Foster lead tlie.party ini the flouse while lie led it in tlie country. Tlie.arrangenment suited Mr. Foster who took a gloomny joy in succeeding without popularity. Not for liim, the liandslialring, baby-kissing éclat of tlie country scliool- bouse. «Poster kissing a baby on tlie platform would be a caricature. Low-browe\u0026- politicians niight lme up tlieir friends at the bar. Foster preferred a cold jug of water or a cup of weak tea. fie lias often seemed to be a sort of pinnacular morality built upon complaint. If there were no politîcaisàins- to -scarify wliat was tlie use 225 P",
         "Sir George Foster of being in politics? Somebody must be the perennial Jereniiah. Nobody in party or Parliainent was so con- genially disposed to such a cornfortless rôle as George E. Foster. \" My honourable friend opposite\u003e' wasý always in need of a corrective. When even bis friends grew weary of the tireless didactic vivisections Foster sometimes surprised them by hatching up a treniendous interest in some cause that gave him a chance for action on a bigger stage. Ris pro-Chamiberlain itinerary i Great Britain in 10 was an outburst of a new synthetising Foster. For Weeks he went about spreading the doctrines of Chamberlain among the English, when nobody identified with that cause was bette? able to inspire enthusiasm. When he camne back to Canada he expo'unded bis views on that subject. He delivered a rnasterly exposition at. a noon- day luncheon in Toronto, at the close of which an admirer said- \"Well, George, if 1 had a head big .enough to make a speech like that I'd need a different sized bat from. yours.y Foster snuiled. coldly. He would as lief bis friend had jbected to something so that he might convince bini of error. Be bas the faculty of universalising bis interests ini a particular way. Foster would as soon speak -about the evolution of the baking-powder era in China and japan as about the manifold sins of Liberals or the short- comings of littie Canada-ites. Be can, if lie chooses, talk as easily to niiners up ini the crags of the Rocies as to the conifortable citizenxy of bis own foggy St. John down on the level, of the Atlantic. Hie can stand up in New York or Washington and build up a cumulative discourse on the importance of Canada among civilised, nations, quite as well as lie can ta]k to the people of Great Britain about the undeniable future of Canada lin the Emapire. It is not on. record that Sir C-eorge Foster ever made a poor speech anywhere on auy subjiect. In fact lie 226",
         "Sir George Poster speaks rather too well. He can make a blue-book by exposition as fascinating as a poem or a play. Hie takes a consuming delight: ini humanising our statistics. Even Cartwright, the master of commercial irony, was neyer so, able to illumine dry facts and figures into visualised realities. He bas elevated the secondary department of Trade and Commerce into a position of importance challengeable by none except those of Militia and Finance. Had he bee-n a really disgruntled expert he might have resented the appointment of a political novice like Sir Thomas.White to the portfolio of Finance because he was a financial business man. Foster took the second-rate department of Trade and Commerce with the intention of maling it into a great cleaxing- house of national expansion and energy-which he is now engaged in doing. And the war has taken hold of Foster. He goes to, bed with the war and gets up with it. No Canadian bas uttered more sensible and rousing tbings about ihe war than the Minister of Trade anad Commerce who is far too much obsessed with the cost of the conftict to get a clear vision of what it %vill, mean to Canada when it is over an(: the second expansion of Canada begins. George E. Foster has lived tbrough two distinct periods of Canadian development and bas taken an active part in both. The tbird will probably outive bis public career. When he retires there will, be a gap in the 1Iarty ranks that can neyer be filled by a mere party maxi. Foster bas always been an individualist; aloof, re- peilent, iinassimilable. There is no mani in the party or in the House witli bis intellectual grip on public affairs and the ability to express it--except those older mren who were trained li the saine periods of Canadian development. And he is in some respects much the strongest man i the present Cabinet. 227",
         "AUREOLE SUZOR COTE WHuoEVERi glibly ta]ks about a Canadian school of paint- ing may as wvell expound the typical music school of Europe-which contains nine-tenths of ail the good music in the world. There neyer lias been a Canadian school of paiters, and there neyer eau be. What, after ail, is a Canadian painter? That question has, neyer been successfu]ly answered. It works out to the following grades of compleity:- CuAss 1 Cî.Ass Il Born in Canada. Born anywhere. -Living in Canada. Living i Canada. Interpreting Canada. llnterpreting Canada. CILASS III Ct.\u0026ss IV Born in Canada. Born in Canada Living anywhere. Ulving in Canada. Interpreting Canada. Interpretlng anytblng. You naay repermutate these as you like. But the determination of what is a Canadian paiter must take ito, account, at least, these four groups. And when you have specified the group, you nmust subdivide again it-- Anglo-Canadian; Frencli-Canadian. To the casuai connoisseur who gets a glimpse of some Canadian canvas abroad tbls latter division mnay seem superfluaus. Canadian painters and people find it quite fundainental. There is a race-expression hi paint even more remarkable than i literature, music, or politics- except i so far as literature implies language. There :329",
         "Aureole Suzor Cote are painting idionis as subtie as the difference between 'charmant \" and \"charniing,\u003e ' \"très bie. and \" very well,\" a shrug and a sentence. Aureole Suzor Cote cornes into Class 1 of the Frenchi- Canadian variant. He was bon in Artha1ýgka; lives in Quebec province; interprets the country of the St. Lawrence-and is both lineally, natively, and temperamentally a French Canadian. What he is as a creative artist involves a consideration of his own individual personality and bis work. Broadly lie belongs to, that temperamental group whi. seize eagerly upon what is next, nearest, or in- digenous and convert it into as mucli as possible of the universal. But, of course, one rnay find painters of that type in Ontario. With a difference. The painters of Quebec live for the most part either in Montreal or in sorne smailer place further north. They are always, next door to, the northland., The painters of Ontario-more than ha.lf of tliem in Toronto-when they go further afield than the county of York for landscape effects, usuafly trek two hundred miles north into the rock lands of north Ontario, or up to Ste Agathe, P.Q., north of Montreal, clown the St. Lawrence, or out te the prairies and the Rocky Mountains. The Quebec painter steps out of bis studio on to, the bank of the St. Lawrence, which contaips haif the art of Quebec, takes a train a couple of hours into the north country, or if lie chooses lie goes no further than somne littie village chockful of archaic simplicity, quaint dorniered houses, and pictur- esque people with a maple sugar bus-h on the outskirts. More Quebec pictures of surpassing merit are caugit: just across the way or down the river, and are, there- fore, a more obvious mixture of familiar images anid big subjects than the work of the saine class of painters equipped with as good temperament and technique in Ontario. No doubt here and there oue finds iu Ontario painters who. get similar intirnate effects iu their big- subject canvases to the best painters, of the St. Lawrence. But these again are the exception. Ontario artists 230",
         "Aureole Suzor Cote approxiniate more to the English, Dutch, and Belgian schools whose influence they frequently have to ob- literate before they strike their true métier of expression. The modem Frencli-Canadian painter who goes abroad, goes, as a rule, to Paris, and there lie flnds the saine racial atinosphere in a higlier degree into which hie was boni and i which lie got the inspiration and- the material for bis earlier instinctive work. So it is that Ontario painters produce a greater variety of modes, nioods, and atmospheres, and ini general a more com- plicated set of motifs: Qnebec painters approximate more each to the work of the others and inject more intimacy into the saine epically bold and big subjects. Since hie was a bounding genial lad in the village of Arthabaska, Suzor Cote has exhibited the average Frencli-Canadian character in a high key. Cote is a fine ecstati. physique wvho spiritualises bis enviroument with great ease. He began to express himseif by decorating littie Catholic churches. Here again is a fleld closed to the Ontario painter who leaves it to the professional decorator to fresco and panel the bouse of worship. Any littie tin-spired churcli in a Quebec village is a miniature simulation of a cathedral, on whose wafls a fancy-free young artist may find a canvas for lis crude but ardent symbolisms. Angels and saints, martyrs and cherubs aie always indigenous to, these little sanctuaries. Suzor Cote knew enough about these beings to render them in paint long before lie took the trouble to study Michel- angelo. But be was not preordained to become a churci frescoist. No, there was a bountiful out-of-doors riglit under the eyes of young Cote in bis own beloved Quebec. Still a young, man lie went abroad-to Paris. And that is the half of another story. While a very young person Suzor Cote had been a choir lad. When lie grew up lie could sing masses and troll chansons and bang out big resonant songs in bravura style. H-e had a basso-baritone voice that led bim, to hanker for the glamour of grand opera or the equally seductive post of 231",
         "Aureole Suzor Cote cantor in aicathedral. He coiXld sing Les Rameaux with fine dramatising fervour. Hie swept himself off bis own feet with the heroieC.strairis of \"O0 Canada.\u003e He knew thue mass solos of :Gounod and some of the operatic. arias of Bizet. And when he went to, Paris he had as lief as flot study the art of singing to bring up that voice of bis into an organ of art. But the voice by over-exertion and too littie pre- liminary art cracked and baffled hlm. Hie -gave up the singing idea and plunged into, paint. Hie attended the Ecole, National des Beaux Arts under Bonnat and the famous Julian Academy under Lefebre. It was ail French. Hie wanted no0 other. There was to, him no great allure- ment ini the dykes of Hoiland or the interiors of Laren. Hie wanted no low tones, no0 foggy subtieties, no dreary vapourings and melancholy moods. To Paris he added travel--covering a great part of Europe. To paint wel\\vithout knowing what to avoid by travel one must be a great geniu-s-, to which Suzor Cote makes ne0 pretence. But he kept bis brain-pores open. Hie toured without any greater prejudice than that of the Latin temperamnent, wbi(;h is happily les addicted to, bigotry than some others. Back in Quebec he could see those almost braggingly beautiful landscapes down the St. Lawrence resolve them- selves into forms of composition with a melody in the lines and a subtie harmony in the colouxs and a big bold sweep in the drawing. Hie had no end of inspiring snb- jects. River and forest and headland, marketer and sugar-maker, priest and weaver, miner and woodsman, fisherman and hunter-they were just waiting for a man with a.kodak in bis palette. Suzor Cote went at them with the fine frenzy of a boy at football. Always im- petuows, sw*ift, anid seizing he seldom. waits- to let a thing get \" sicklied o'er 'w~ith the pale cast of thought.\"- is painting speils action, the ardour of the morning, the keen-eyed breathless haste of the moose bounding tbrough the brush. What faults, he bas ave so subtly wound up with these 232",
         "Aureole. Suzor Cote obvious temperarnental virtues that they m'ust be dis- covered by analysis. A painting of Cote's neyer fails to arrest the attention. His colours alone compel admira- tion; the brilliance and the dazzling, if sometimes exaggerated, use of the prinia-ies in a land where colour contrasts are often too startling for the lover of greys and neutral tints. One may flot always admire bis composition, nor be always convinced by bis mastery of Uine drawing. But it is neverpossible to miss in one of bis pictures the pardonable joy of living and the ecstasy of paint. He makes a poor list of sad subjects. He is hiniseif too exuberant for sadness. He seldom reverts to low tones: there is too -much of the blaze of noon and the aboriginal mingling of bright colours in nature. He is not profound. But he is amazingly virile and. interesting. He is young. Pro- fundity may corne later; but if neyer, one has no regret concerning this master of \" embarrassment du riches \"in paint. When bis ]andscapes become a bit over-intoxicant one may get a satisfying delight from bis hunian figures. Here Cote is a big delineator. He knows the value of modelling; for he bas done a considerable deal of strong but srnaIl sculpturings tbat show how intensely he bas realised the value'of bones, miuscles, and ligaments, the crinkie of queer clothes, the wrinklings of time on the face, the subtie warp and woof of wear and tear on the lufe of man. Suzor Cote is flot the only sensuous depicter of Quebec life in paint. He is surely one of the ablest, most virile, and compelling; and bis work even up to the age of forty entities bim to a place aniong the interpreters of a part of modem Canada. But he belongs to no0 school, of Canadian painters; except in so far as the French- Canadian group may in themselves be cailed a schiool- wbicb is a matter for painting experts to decide. 233",
         "SIR MAX AITKEN ONE of our denatured Canadians loudly proclaimed, in a Canadian newspaper office a few years ago, that he would marry an cair's daughter in Westminster Abbey. In saying so he was probably conscious of imitating Warren Hastings and Lord Rosebery. But lie camne precious near carrying out lis threat and has been-cso far as can be obse-ved this side of the Atlantic-in seini- aristocratic obscurity ever since. Most of these adventurous souls, of whom the riews- papers keep any account, go into politics. A zuiajority of thern bécome Unionists, speak often on platforms-- sometimes quite badly, sometimes wel-write books, engage ini social reform, get taken up by the aristocracy, perhaps themselves acquire tities along the way. They establish thernselves, ini big country houses or begin to spend their declining years in club-land, cantering down Piccadilly, dodging about Westminster, taking swift runs across to Canmada, dined and wined and sent back again after they have told us in this country how exceed- ingly -weil we are doing considering our limitations of opportunity. Véry littie of this platitudinous programme is char- acteristic of Sir Max Aitken, who at present may be reckoned, as the most interesting and influential of ail ex-Canaians i England. In fact, it seenis doubtful whether Sir Max has ceased to be a Canadian, but if he should corne back to Montreal he migit: find the setting somfewhat amateur and a bit too experimental to one who has worked himself into a facile and con- genial rôle among the lords of Empire. One speculates-if the more or less, d-ibious prospects 235",
         "Sir Max Aitken of Six Max do not include a seat ini the Lords. A baron- age would neyer overwhlh him. Ten years hence he wiil be weil along towards -fifty years, of age. 0f al younger Canadians he bas been the chief of those wbo accomplish the totally unexpected. When lie solicited insurance and did secretarial work in Halifax, this son of a diligent New Brunswick parson surely neyer ex- pected to become the chief niergerist of Montreal before lie was tbirty. Shortly after lie becarne a Canadian nillionaire, lie abandoned, Montreal, where lie played the wizard of quick dividends, to dweil among the four -per - centers of London. He left this country without even running for Parliamnent and entered the British Conunons as member for Ashton-under-Lyne. He got a titie almost before he had learned the topography of West- minster. He caried coals to, Newcastle by making nioney in the sheep-nibbied financial pastures of London. After the outbreak of war, wbich upset a few of bis apple- carts in continental Europe, lie got hirnself sent to France as the officiai, eye-witness for Canadian troops. Witbin sixteen months of the war, whicli made bis own career in Canada seeni like the trail of a spent meteor, lie becaine the author of'tle first book dealing with Canadians at the front. This book may not be literature. Yet it lias consider- able litei-ary foi-m. It may not be admirable history; but it wiil go down as a contribution to a great and glowing phase of how Canadians have helped to make bistory for the Empire. It is said to be Sir Max\u003es own writing. It was written at first hand. Sir Max was- at the front. He always lias been. Imagination fails to, conceive of bis going even to the war as a back-bencher. TI the first-line trenches lie saw a new Canada la the malcing. In those few inentlis near the firing lime lie was a trained observer doing bis best to get impressions ini a totally new world and to work them. out in a fresh mediumn. Plenty of proiessional, journa]ists were han- kering to get to the front. These experts could be leit l26",
         "Sir Max Aitken to nibble theirpencils at home or \" somewheà:in rirance.\" A man whose life had been spent in making news for other naen to record would syndicate bis copy anywhere in the Empire. AU this was very paradoxical and somewhat spec- tacular, but not in the least out of character with the main part of Aitken's career. Son of a diligent parson in Newcastle, N.B., he knew what it was as a youth to, begrudge bixnself book learning. An insurance clerk in Halifax, he became private secretary to the manager of the Nova Scotia Iron and Steel Company. \"Stung with the spiendour of a sudden thought,\" he saw two parochial littie banks eating their heads off with com- petition and overhead, expenses, and he naively per- suaded the bankers to, ainalgamate. With the tang of haut finance on bis tongue, he breezed up to Montreal and began to trail bis swift spare figure in aznong the shadows of the Bank of Montreal and the Stock Exchange. At that time and i.mtil the end of bis career in Montreal Aitken was quoted by other financiers and by news- papermen as a sort of wizard. He was the David among Goliaths. There were men in Montreal whose solenn brows had held the financiai secrets of Canada ever since C.P.R. and the Bank of Montreal becaine the progenitors of great speculative movements. To men schooled in the methods of a more patient, plodding generation, this slim young innovator with the fair hait, the large head, and the blue eyes, this full-lipped, sniiling- faced, resilient youth who seemed to be able to read finance before he had learned its spelling-book, seemed at flrst like a cheery young upstart, wvho would presently settle down to know that bis place just now was flot in the seats of the mighty and bis time flot yet. Aitken smootbly udeceived them. He seemed to have arrived in the nick of time. Had he begun to carve out bis cateer in the days of the National Policy, bis might flot have divided itself into tbree distinct periods before he reached the age ôf forty. That bushwhacking era -in 237",
         "Sir Max Aitken finance had been pretty well trail-blazed by a nuinber of shrewd Scotch-brained men like Donald A. Smnith, George Stephen, R. B. Angus, William Macdonald, and James Ross. This young mnan began where they' began to leave off. As Mr. Edward Bok, editor of the Ladies' Home journal, believes in the poverty of other people, so Max Aitken belreved in the value of other men's experiences. He had flot time to creep before hie ran. He had just escaped Halifax where a business sign is the gilded reflex of a family tree. Montreal was just comrnencing to take stock in the nouveau riche. The old Scotch-caution junta of money barons was fmnding its preserves invaded by a umber of new- thoughters, of *whomn Max -Aitken soon becaine the young high priest. Had Aitken ever attended college he woutld have wanted an M.A. without bothering with second and third year lectures. In filiùce--or was it finance, this curious compounding of comînodities, of iron and steel, mines, lands, wvater-powers, electric powers, timber, and what not ?-he spent a *bectic decade creating ait sorts of new companies that seemed capable of paying dividends, wages, and cost of production within a very short while of their birth. How hie did it he could himself scarcely tell. Wbile some of the old-]ine generals of finance were leading their several armies up varions climbing routes to the Parnassian peaks of prosperity based upon universal optimism, Aitken was commissioning lines of airships that got there ahead of any land schedule. No doubt he was brilliant. Hie was modern. He thought in continents. Quite uncannilyt he had the knack of seeing into, and through, the things that other mnen walked about to investigate. Hie thouglit quickly and acted wbile he though-.. lie had no time for financial etiquette. From, the offices of the Royal Securities Corporation-his parent cbifld-he could see the dome of the Bank of Montreal, which had no sacrosanctity to hiLm There was no0 cranny in the C.P.R. building to wihich hie could not penetrate. Most of bis financial 238",
         "Sir Max Aitke n friencis on the Stock Exchange were good arithineticians, figuring concretel-j in the,-weights, rneasures, and values. Aitken was thé, higlier algebraist who deait mainly with symbols. There was no way of computing what he miglit be worth at any gi-ven turne. Fle neyer seemed to care. He was flot godizing mere wealth. Hie was playlng the grand game; quite -ý. well az it bas ever been played by many of the most brilliant exponents of \"'legitimate \" higlier finance. The. gaine fascinated him. Hie was flot a gainbler; but lie had the daring of any Prince of Monte Carlo. He had a fine constructive imagination. He was rather a poet of the stock market. He could write Wagnerian operas from the Stock Exchange ticker. And before he had one draina more than sketched in, with breathless haste lie traced out another. fis own associates, and even bis critics, very much admired hma for bis darlng qualities. They built factories, railways, electric uines, water-power works, mills, and minlng industries. fie co-ordinated them and found the square of their value. Always gifted with the faculty 'of clear thinking, lie had equal ability for expressing blimseif in logical language and klndling enthusiasm both iu hirnse]f and lu others. In short, Max Aitken was the embodiment of that younger Canada wbich duxing the first decade of Canada's century set the country going at a pace neyer before known, even iu the United States. Endowed with remarkable economic sense, lie seldom paused to con- sider where this headstrong expressionism would carry the Canadian people. To hlm there was no need for editors and preachers to moralise opi the dangers of over-expansion. The country was Inarchlng ahead. Its gait was part of a world-movement. No one pretends that Aitken rea]ly created anything new even in finance. It was ail an old story. Most of it had been tried ont lu the United States. Aitken was by instinct an American, flot in politics, nor lu sentiment -but ln this amazlng capacity for gettlng ahead. The .t.epping stones of bis dead self neyer helped hlm. Hie 239",
         "Sir -Max Aitken neyer gave' birnself time to die. Once when lie .pai3sed 'for a moment lu bis financial career, he started a weekly paper which guzzleg4 a fortune from hlm. and died before. it grew up. 1-e.inighit have knowu better. But he. was '- wifling to enjoy some of the.fruits of inexperience. This was a new medium. And he neyer learned it. lI the midst of bis brilliant career, just on the eve of a rallentando in the Opera of Expanision, Max Aitken. left the country. Havlng put a number, of naines on the fmnanciai map he was supposed to be over-worked and went to England. To come back-when? Nobody knew. The things he had started migit: get along-with- out him. Other men could operate thue -machines. -1Re could see other p\u003cssibilities. It was a curious, ahnost prescient, manoeuvre. Nobody quite understood what it meant. Aitken biniseif couild scarcely say what bis career would be. Re was. too young- to retire. H\u0026h',ad succeeded too weIl -to quit succeeding. Mere place, preferment or pedgree .would flot satisfy hlm. 0f politics he had no great knowledge. Most of our owu politics were too hopelessly intricate for a young financier to unravel. In England- Wha-.t? Well, a new environment. He was already knolvui to the money Ings. H1e could talk to, the lords of Threadneedle Street witli habituai ease. But there were other people--to hlm more- interesting. England was full of human interest.. Aitken had a.fine -hunger for mucli of it. H1e had met Kipling once by accident ou the Miramichi, N.B. 'To hlm Kipling was a huruan England. They became friends. Each found in-the other what lie was not himself. Aud each before lie was forty had sketched out a life work.- Indeed, Aitken found in England mauy things of which formerly lie had only dreained. It was a new world. Its politics were new to, him. H1e went into -politics. He made good. speeches. He bad a clear vision of England\u0026s problems. For a yonng pan lie had remaïkable aptitude for-dealing 'with theru. Ashton-under-Lyue was as good to hlm as.Newcastle-on-Tyne. Either was a symibol of 240-",
         "1 *6,4 IA",
         "Sir Max Aitken opportunity. By contributing money to, the Unionist cause, by making good speeches, by convincing thé electorate that he knew England quite as weil as the average native-born blasé politician, he got a seat in Parliament, and a knighthood. Sir Max Aitken had arrived at his second stage of evolution. 11e was stiil undér forty. Most of this programme had been absurdly easy. We hear of no struggles, disappointments, hopes deferred. The Zeppelin-like ascent of this young Canadian among the heavier-than-air craft about him rather disillu- sioned some of us in Canada. We had supposed that on an average for a Canadian to, reach the S-eats of the mighty ini Englaud was a good deal like the camel and the eye of a needie. No doubt King Edward and Queen Alexandra rather let the bars down to, the successful money-spending Axnerican. Court was not, so exclusive as it had been. Aristocracy was less rigid. Lloyd George's assaults on the Lords had put some dints in the ancestral armour. A cat might look at a ing. Democracy was grinning over the parapets into the gardens of the great. Perhaps after ail it was not such a fent for a wealthy, keen-brained Canadian like Aitken to get on in such a world. We suspect that he, too, would have found the road thorny enough but for bis wealth and the sort of organising brain that he has. Sir Max knew how to use bis money to advantage without squaudering it. H1e had a pleasant, en gaging personality. H1e feil into the ways of England with a deinocratie smile. H1e linked hinaself up with a political, party none too well equipped with organising brains. H1e mnade Bonar Law his political mentor-when he is hinaself a vastly cleverer man. H1e diffused about him, the exbilarating brusqueries- of Canadian optixnism. There was a subdued chuckle ini bis eye. H1e was in a measure irresistible, and at that time was inexperienced enough to be' a bit nervous about bis prestige, at times almost. to, a point of being quite charniingly ingenuous. H1e neyer presunied. 241Q",
         "Sir MxAitken \"Capital 1\" soliloquised manor -born John Bull. 'Aitken) doesn't corne at us with a broncho. By Jove f- er '\u003e-another screvw-up of the monocle-\" he's deucedly *modest. Clever as tey make 'em and fresh as a daisy. Splendid!1'\u003e They admitted that even in gold-glutted, bond- dyspeptic old London he had the wits to, make money. And he seemed to have a fiind of vita]ising ideas. For a money-wizard he had a great gif t of speech without spint- ter. He kept a big country house and a staff of servants, moior-cars and carrnages galore-and yet he could smoke a cigar after breakfast at bis own house with a young Canadian who had drifted to England on a pass in search of copy, even though he had gone on a cattle-ship and had trousers baggy at the knee. At the High Com- missioner's Offices on Downing Street he was recognised as a mani with a future, even though, he already had a past. To old Lord~ Strathcona, into whose Bank of Montreal préserves this young man had rollicked so serenely in bis twenties, Aitken must have seemed like a rather inspining conundrum. To the present incuxnbent, Sir George Perley, heis probably more. In fact we suspect that among ail the Canadians in Eugland, Sir Max isnow easily thechief. He is the symabol of young Canada. Ris portfolio of eye-witness from the War Office gave hlm, an odd prestige such as Sir Gilbert Parker, who had already wnitten a very able book on the war, xnight: have envied. He may have had trouble in getting the appointinent, but he knew how to, cut out the resistance. When he got over to France as lord of Canadian despatches, he was iuvested with some of the mysterlous power of the Fourth Estate when most of the estate envied bim. Perhaps he chuckled at bis own success; but at the saine tixue he made the most of bis opportunity. In so doing lie became a changed Sir Max. With a definite business as part of the war machine, he had no need to deplore bis comparative isolation fromn the frnancial currents of the Empire. lie stiil had bis offices, 242",
         "Sir Max Aitken bis investments, bis knowledge of the game, his seat in Parliament, bis title-and bis hopes. What lie niay become, does any one know? Has lie a determinable future; or is lie a bumning-out fuse? He is yet too young to, say. At the age of thirty-seven, lie has a distinctly traceable past ini three epoclbs. What a retrospective outlooki 24?3",
         "COLONEL SIR HENRY PELLATT AN appropriate fiction is often maore illuminating than the truth. Sonie years ago a newspapermian in al sincerity, as though giving an aidavit, alleged that during the South African War Colonel Henry Pellatt found bimselfe minus ail b;-, ciothes and conapelled, to walk some miles in purisnawiralibus across tke veldt to a farmhouse. No moie apocryphal romance was ever invented, except by Balzac. It is the hypothecation of the absoiutely impossible. The fact that Pellatt was neyer in South Africa is of covrse a mere episodic incident. That he 'y-as credited with having been there must have arisen froni the fact that part of bis regiment was in the Boer War, and that where the Queen's OwnÙ is ther. of necessity will Colonel Pellatt be also. No regimnent was ever continuously the personal appanage of any one mnan Ps the Q.O.R. for years has been of Sir Henry Pellatt. [t was in the Queen's Own that he became a soldier, beginning in i88o as a private; in 1906 commander of the regunent. Hie was major of the Canadian Contingent at the Diamond Jubilee; commander cf the saine at the coronation of King Edward wher. he took over the Queen's Own Bugle Band at bis own personal, expense. In 1910, when army manoeuvtes were held at Aldershot, the Queen's Own, 620 strong, were present under cormnand, of Sir Henry. They were wir.ed and dined in casties and other places, starved on the route marches, praised by the people, and poohpoohed by the crities. There neyer was a parade of the Queen's Own in recent years when the plethoric and pompous figure of the O.C. was flot present either on bis white horse or- marcbing grandly at the head, stoically perspiring and palpitating with the uniform and the heat, and wisbing that the 245",
         "Colonel Sir IHenry Pellt march might last tw-,ice as long that twice as many people might behold it. If Sir Henry could by zny miracle be permitted to ride at the head of ail the battalions evolved frorn the Queen's Own with ail the Queen's Own officers drafted into other battalions since the war began, somne- where between 6ooo and 7000 men would corne trailing behind him. In such a khaki-clad procession the original regiment in their unmartial green-black uniformns would be a blotch of ink on a buff-coloured blotter. At present the old mother regiment is struggling to keep its corporeal identity, when at tures the 0.C. seemas to be the xnost substantial, part of it. But it lives, like other Canadian regiments, a part of the deathless army. And what the Queen's Own has beè*ome in the war story of modemn Canada is a debt owing in great part to the Colonel commanding, who always seems as though he owned the reginient body and bones. To dominate a regirnent in peace times is possible only by spending rnoney pn it to niake il a show. Pellatt long ago leazned what a show a peace regiment can become, aithougli he had the most lnspectacular body of men in Canada. And he always seemed to have whatever money he needed for the purpose of providing a; show. Hie is now the greatest unprofessîonal show-mani in Canada *; a living exaxnple of the inotto, \"It pays to advertise.\" Sir I{enry's interpretation of the legend is-\" 'What I advertise is worth other people's while to look at.\" Commerciaily Pellatt has always been a broker. Dealing prixnarily with the symbolic value of money, it is not remarkable, however interesting it may be, that he lias developed a colossal fancy for the tangibilities that represent the reality of wealth. Hie is a typical corpora- tion mani; bon to be a director, to sit on boards, preside at meetings where ni;lions are represented, and to have a finger in publicutility pies. His directorates have included electric light companies, tractions, coal, iron and steel, navigation, mining, telegraphs, and insurance. He has neyer been a banker. -Whether he is worth littie or much, 246",
         "Colonel Sir Henry Pellatt he is always necessary. Men who concern thé-mselves with iron and railways, miils and mines, flnd Pellatt the somehow indispensable other party to whom one sort of connnodity is about as interesting as another. In cor- poratior. circles he is the personal equation. No man ever offended Sir Henry by caliing him a millionaire. When the Montreal Star and the Standard got out a Burke\u003es Peerag.- of Canadian financiers a few years ago, Pellatt was flot rated as a xniltionaire and not classifled as one of the twenty-three men at the basis of Canadian finance. That was a superficial estimate and a quite supercilious omission. Whatever his comi.ion com- mercial rating may be in the language of the dollar, Sir Henry Pellatt is always temperamentally a inillionaire. The number of letters in bis sumâàme is exactly equal to, the number of digits in i,ooo,ooo. Something in that. Pellatt is a believer in financial magie. le treats the world of finance as a great garden of r -'are, where some things grow huge at the expense of OtLhers. The over- grown finance plants are Pehatt's--or ouglit to be. lie has no patience with the littie border things that lose themnselves in the grass. He prefers the banyan tree, or the green bay tree, or any sort (if arboraceous thing that demonstrates magie expressible in money. It is a fact that we scarcely heard of Colonel Pellatt tiil Canada began to be prosperous with great r-ailways, fabulous mines, eldoradoes of arable land, the rise of marvellous power plants on the brink of Niagara with transmission lines stretching over half a province, and the bumptious, parabolic curves of real estate that would persist in going up and up regardless of what the Iand was worth in rent. Ail through that prodigal boom time in Canadian affairs, Sir Henry bloomed like a magnolia tree in the national garden. lie was visible everywhere; into everything; his personal equation necessary to everybody engaged in the genial game of grand opera prosperity. In 1907, when the money markets of America were dislocated by a near-panic in the vicinity of Wall Street, 247.",
         "Colonel Sir Henry Pellatt an adventurous newspaper published alarmist state- ments about the condition of Pellatt securities. That was i a. Sunday edition. That day there was a line of automobiles and carniages in front of the Pellatt residence on Sherbourne Street, Toronto, and a conclave of financiers iu the bouse. Sunday though it was, and Sir Henry, like niost of bis financial confreres, a good church- man,\u003e there was a most searching scrutiny into, the afiairs of the bouse of Pellatt. So many banks were involved that the caucus very much resembled a clear- ing-bouse convention. When the examination was over every banker in the room drew a long breath. There was no system, of bank balances that seexned able to disturb the Pellatt equl- librium. Hie was so intricately interwoven with tbe affairs of ail the banks that to have declared hlm insolvent would bave been equivalent to bankruptlng a bank-wuich was frima facie absurd. Tbe jovian edifice of securities built up by the personal equation of Sir Henry was found to have its vertical line froni the peak fail within the area of the base. Therefore, it must be sound. The newspapers wbo bad rusbed into headiues over the mlsfortune of Peilatt mumbled as they ate their words next morning. Presently the stonu was over. Prosperity sniiled again. And the unfinancial average person somehow had an idea that Sir Henry had done it ail. Almnost ten years ago Sir Henry becaine the subject of many benevolent regards on account of the baronial edifices lie began to, rear on the brow of the bull over- looking Toronto. The flxst structure to emerge on the stummit of that bill not fat from. a lovely denui-iorest of wildwood trees was a mammoth castle with a Norman tower, red-tiled roofs and a great courtyard round about. when ail it seemed to, lack was a drawbridge and a moat to make it a fat illustration for one of Walter Scott's novels. Sir Henry did not move into that castle. The baronial, structure tbat gleamed on a briglit day for miles over 248",
         "Colonel Sir Henry Pellatt the city was inhabited oudy by horses and chickens, gardeners and stablemen. Lt was only the stable. Then the jokesiniths began a merry round of quips at the expense of that unconventional stable big enough to house a hundred -horses-when, according to rumour, Sir Henry had only a few. Sir Henry hugely enjoyed the joke. He had built that stable for people to talc about it. Hie had put it on the brow of a hill for people to see. Those who said it was a shameful prodigality of good rnoney were shallow critics who neyer appreciated the Pellatt maxim, \"L t pays (the public) (for me) to advertise.\" Many were the speculations as to the kind of house necessary to offset so mamnioth a stable. Yeaàr by year, whenever the state of Pellatt finances per.mitted, the castie Casa Loma built itself up. Lt now stands out a great gre'ystone baronial pile of' overwhelining grandeur as conspicuous as one of the Pyraniids. Lt is big enough for a New York hotel. It has chimneys enough for a srnall town, windows enough for a Luge modern factory, rooms enough to house the Queen's Own, grounds big and beautiful enough to, give a lawn party to, the entire garrison of Toronto. When the I)uke and Duchess of Aberdeen were in Canada in the autumn of i915 there was a grand Red Cross reception or something of the sort at Casa Loma. Such a social outburst had neyer been known in Canada, even at Rideau Hall. V/heu the programme went on in the music-room-as large as a medium.-sized theatre -amost a thousand people listened as they talked. A few weeks later Sir Henry gave bimself the pleasure of entertaining the entire National Chorus of which he is President. Two hundred singers under the baton of Dr. Albert Ham, the National Chorus conductor, sang to Sir Henry anid bis friends. On these and ail such occasions Sir Henry went about among bis impromptu guests like a great god Pan ainong bis nymphs and satyrs. lis practical ideas of society, soldiery, and art are of the kzind that can be staged only ivith the 249",
         "Colonel Sir Henry Pellatt dixnensioÈ9 of a nigiidWagner grand opera. CasaI Loma must have beeended for a Canadian imitation of Vaihalla. At the foot of the bill domint, 'ed by the Pellatt castie are noisy factories, dirty railway yards, end grimy coal chese intyu ul tehuefrhrb on heve i o th t you. on'ise the inarsti fthings?\"k Sor thenryl s tasle yo ao' frend.seiatitcth '\u003cý Her wsi\u003e waskdb th filygnilrel, i. had de shat,- peophe ouldnye enal ep to see my haoue t advantage woutd clmbn te abl. Io didn't build it wrerely as -a dwelling. I intended it for ar spectacle.\" Up near Lake Simcoe also Sir Henry has a great fan which is a perpetual economic spectacle to the plain horses. In the prospermng years he engaged so znany P men on this greatmodel farm that other farners grumbled at the scarcity of help. It seems aixnost a pity that the farm could flot be moved from its obscurity of Lake Simcoe to the plateau forefronted by the Pellatt castle in Toronto.t Any good standard recipe for building a new nationf might safdy include one Pellatt. More would be danger- ous. Hait a dozen Pellatts would be a slogan for red- rag socialism. Sir Henry's personai, function in Canadian economies must be, charged up to national advertising. There are tinies when such advertising suggests patent rnedicine literature indicating the social and economic lls of the country from which no Pellatt specific; for prosperity can ever deMiver it. A well-known pond- stirring publication has declared that Sir Henry is a profieer. It must be suspected, however, that no such character as ?e]Iatt: could evolve in any country unless the general tendency in boom tinies had been for thousands of men to become as fat as possible minia- - ture Pellatts and tbousands of others to copy the miniatures. The man who works by any underground 250",
         "Colonel Sir Hcrnry Pellat method to become a Waflingford is no man to criticise Pellatt for advertising either bis real or bis hypothetical' wealth as a spectacle. Sir Henry Pellatt has been a promoter of benevolences, a swaggering dash of colour ini our national life, and the patron saint of a fine historic and frnperialisig regiment. To such a man we may address sotto voce the memnorable salutation of a poet to England-\" With all thy faults I love thee still.\" 251",
         "LORD STRATHOONA AT least two biographies of Lord Strathcona have been written. His life is yet to write. The only man qualified for such a task would have been some Scotch clerk, who znight have acted Boswell to this pemmican-eating overlord from the lime he was Hudson's Bay cadet in Labrador unitil he settled in Winnipeg after the sale of Rupert's Land by the Hudson's Bay Coxnpany to the Government of Canada. The life that Donald A. Smith lived after that was a tbing for diligent biographers. Politics, railroading, and culture got hold of Donald A. Smnith affter he had passed is first epoch of the man primeval. Together they made of this borean land-son of a Viking a bewildering number of LL.D.'s, as niany millionaires, a chancellor of great universities, a member of ?arliament, a high conunissioner, a knight, a baron, an entertainer of royalty, and a philanthropist. Smith he origina]ly was; a universal plebeian fact, tyrant of the furposts, a dog-dxiving, man-lording, benevolent despot that heaped up fortunes for the fur company in London and kept the red men from going to the white man's devil as best he xnight. His parents should have christened hlm. Olaf or Thor. This Smith from Morayshre in- the north of Scotland was afraid of no mnan; neither of solitude, nor cold, nor hunger, nor the devil. He had eyebrows that gathered the hoar and hands that cracked, the long raw-hide whip over the .eaxs of the head dog ini a blizzard. Hie slept in deerskcin bags and four-point blankets and talked Cree with a Scotch burr. Hie knew the long reaches of the crooked trait froui post, to post, the bite of fifty below zero, and the mystic fleer of the midnight sun. Silver and gold had he none, neither banknotes nor any land of currency sometimes but beaverskins and tokens 253",
         "Lord Strathcona But he knew how to heap up profits on*the goocis that came drifting along the coast of Labrador, across H-udson's Bay into the factor's furpost; how to know by the pinch of the peit and the glini of the fur what' was the value of the packs of skins that came swagger- ing down in great canoes from the highlands of the interior. From clerk to chief factor and resident governor, rul1ing a savage domain two-thirds the size of Europe, this \" Oogamou \" of the dogý-whip and the goose-quili pen worked out the gospel of success and self-help as no man ever did in that part of North America. He had but one fealty-the \"Company. of Gentlemen Adven- turers trading into Rupert's Land,\" with outposts from the easterxuost tip of Labrador to the nor'-westemn peak of the Mackenzie vailey. Canoes on the rivers, dogý-sleds creaking on the trails, and grey-win'ged ships gliding into the f8ft harbours were to hlm what transcontinental railways, great elevators, and bustling terminais are to modem magnates. The pile of beaver- skins or the heap of tokens were to Donald A. -Smith of the bushy eyebrows and the canny Scotch thrift as authentic as the gold reserves in the vaults of the Bank of Montre-.l. Books he had none except faded mnaga- zines and newspapers that struggled in a year after date by dog-sled to the furpost. Pictures hie neyer saw except the marvels of northern landscapes by the light of magic suris or the flickering aurora and the ci-nde symbolings of red men on their skin tepees. For music he had the howling of hungry huskie dogs and the drone of the furpost accordion. But the whole audacions draina of a rude world work- ing itself out to civilisation paraded itself before this man, who in tbirty-one years neyer knew the serene finality of a swaloewtail or an opera hat. More than xnost men of bis time in any country he was to, demon- strate the humbug of mere enviroriment. This bush-lubbering epic in aIl its barbaric splendour must be kept in mind vividly in any attempt to get an 254",
         "Lord Strathcona impression of Donald A. Smith who became Lord Strath- cona. Ail the law there was of it-he was. Ail lie was the great company endorsed. Donald A. Smith witliout the great fur company would stili have been the over- powering chief of the Clan Smith; for lie had in hlm the ipetuous virllity that waits for nothing and the slow, dour -tenacity of the Scot from the north coast country who can wait if need be a thousand years. Maybe the north made hlm so. [t would have either kiiled hlm or made hlm. It was a struggle between two, strengths: the man and the country-when the man conquered, and in so doing was conscious of no great virtue as a stoic. When lie left the resident-governor's log castie to, become a citizen of a common country ail hedged about with pariaments and laws, Rupert's Land began to cease existlng. The great feudalism came to its last days with the selling of the vast fur-domahi. to the newly cîreated Dominion of Canada. The feudal chieftain, born in the saine year as Queen Victoria, found himself at the age of forty-nlne at the end of an epoch in hls life. Had lie been a plain Viking lie miglit have clied on some terrific journey and been cremated on a ing's pyre. He had wrought out one man's lfe which, looked at from snug farnily firesides, seemed as fabulously roe'iantic as the story of Ulysses. But lie was yet a young man. Wheu Donald A. Smith quit lis chieftainship under the Hudson's Bay Company the Franco-Prussian War was just beginning; Queen Victoria was i lier thirty- second yearof reign; the United States was just beginming to recover from the Civil War; coal-oil civilisation was at its heiglit in America; Canada had less than a thousand miles 'of ralway and scarcely a thousand white men west of Lake Supenior. Out from the wild places for good now, the mid-aged chieftain found hlmself confronted with a curions hai.f- awake civilisation that seeined to be just nicely getting over the snuff-box, ininuet period of development, when hoop-skirts, and baggy trousers were. as fashionable as 255",
         "Lord Strathcona 8oo-page novels. So far as lie miglit have cared to size it up, it was the-beginning of the iron-and steel age. There was no Canada except in the British North-America Ac.;. so far as is knoWn, flot a niilionaire ini the country; no known gold-mine of any consequence; copper deposits and nickel areas unexplored; electricity stiil in the experi- mental stage; not a telephone anywhere; no conception of wireless; flot a clew to- .the X-ray; no case- of appendicitis on record; no typewriting machines muse; automobiles flot yet invented; nobody with the influ- eiiza-and no trace of thehigher critîc: the world was still reading new poems by Tennyson; Gladstone was fanious as an orator; George BernardýShaw was a downy youth; Goldwin Smith. had flot yet - corne to the Grange to Oxiordise Toronto; and penny postage was in the saine arc of discovery as the ?acific Cable. In order to, vindicate the popular conception of bis character, Donald A!, Smith i :1870 must have been somewhat bewildered by such an inchoate,,evolutionary, andrestless world. So many great things were just about to begin at the tine when he ceased te be feudal lord i Rupert's Land to become a more or less. democratic citizen of Canada. To a man with such virility, such an untarned, somewhat barbaric mid, and such a genlus for organisation and despotic government, it must have been a probleni to decide just what place lie would fli ini sucli a world. Like a former Alexander, having fixished the song I arn ronaxch of afi I survey, My iight there is none to dispute,\" he miglit have dedided that no other worlds remained to conquer, at least by bis -methods. What lie had gone most 'without in the north-land he niight have determined te have. As reckless as the wildcat miner suddenly becoine a millionaire, hke could -easily at bis age have deterznined te satisfy some craving -for culture, bookrs, music, science, philosophy, art, languages. Following the later example of some of our successful Canadians lie 256",
         "17 f",
         "Lo rd Strathcona might have taken his fortune to Rotten Row or Surrey and in a crush hat and opera cloak got himself pointed out at the opera as the once pemniican-eating Poohbah who, had governed and operated an empire of furposts and was now-ripe for the lorgnettes of London. But Donald A. Smith was. both too much of an un- spent virility and a Scotchman to let himself become the dwind]ing victixu of inanity. He had been long enough on the borderland of the political, more or less civilised part of this country to perceive that certain large pro- grammes were sure to happen in the near future. Con- federation was one of them. He understood that, perhaps better than some of its active political promoters. Hie realised the value, the cost, and the future of a great transcontinental railway even more than did the political statesmen who, were trying to, fight it through as a sequel to Confederation. And for ail we know he may even have had dreanis about the future of Canada ini the Empire. At ai events here was an a boriginal master of trade, transportation,:.-ind despotism who\u003e having conquered Rupert's Land, was ready to help organise modem Canada. Politics was one way to do it. Donald A. Smith went into politics. Old-timers on the prairie and f ar up to the headwaters of the Saskatchewan remember -some of the election scrimmages undertaken by tbis grixu- bearded Thor from Rupert's Land who sat first i the Legisiature of Manitoba, again in the old North-West Coundil, and afterwards for both Winnipeg and Montreal in the Gommons where he soon demonstratedthat he had no pet use for either Conservatives or Liberals except in so far as they were willing to be as obedient as good huskie dogs under the whip. So he was not merely a politician. Politics to hixu was an instrument. There was a bigger work than winning elections. That was the Canadian Pacific Railway. How the parent of Canadian transcontinentals came to be bult is the story of no one man-more than it may be of Donald A. Smith. Sir Charles Tupper once said that 257 R",
         "Lord Strathcona there neyer would have been a C.P.R. without the power anÂd daring of this mnan, who seemed to defy al known rnethods of raising money, neyer knew wlun h_ý was tired, baffled, or beaten, and was such a man-driving, parliament-harrying Norseman that he neyer would takze no for an answer. That was one way of exalting Donald A. Smiith who hed the faculty of suggesting the supernatural But the C.P.R, was merely the tbing that the Norseman chose for the expenditure of bis barbaric and creative energy. The rnoney could be got somehow, even theugh the road threatened to bankrupt every man that touched it and te wreck the fortunes of any band of politicians who put it on their programme. It was the most prodigal gamble in North Ainerica. It was bigger in dime.nsions than even Rupert's Land. It was a dreara of daring, con- structive arrogance that made it possible tc durap water from the Paciflc iute, ,the Atlantic by hauliug it thou- sands of feet up the Rocies, via the Kicing Herse Pass and 4000 miles from sea te sea. And its comÉpletikn under the management of the resourceful Van Horne was a triumph for at least a few Homeric individuals, some of whom are already embahned in the Pacific Scandai. Chief of ail the C.P.R. creatoré was Donald A. Snmith, who finally rode the great speculation into an enormeus fortune and a place of eminence in the Bank of Montreal. When the last spike of the great railway was driven at Craigellachie, B.C., by Donald A. Smith iu Nevember 1885, the ex-overlord of Rupert's Land was just sixty-five years of age. He had reached the end of the second movement in the Lage trilogy of bis career. The year following he was made a K.C.M.G. by Queen Victoria. From that time on tities and degrees, honours and fortunes, heaped theinselves up about the craggy per- sonality of this uncanuy, couquering Scot. The world was as mucli bis -zow as he caxed- to make it. He was i the third and Iast act of bis curions, almost universal drama when political prestige, public prefermeut, and academic degrees came to hlm as iron fi]ings te a magnet. 258",
         "Lord Stratheona For the rest of bis 111e, down to the days of bis baron- age, bis countless, philanthropies, bis collections of great paintings, bis benevolences in music, his casties of wealth, and bis regiment of horse in the Boer War, Lord Strath- cona and Mount Royal became the most super-eminent conventionality in the British Empire. He turned to, a splendid customary gentleman and a peer in the flouse of Lords. He becan-e a public speaker, when bis audiences scarcely cared what lie said so long as they could gaze long enougli at the weird uncouquerable figure of the muan. fie visited Canada over and over again, when each time lie came it seemed the more remarkable that a man of bis great age could be prank- ing about so on the Atlantic. Presently it seemed as thougli this octogenarlan had the kind of vitality that neyer gives out. Hligli Comniissioner, lie was present ai the funeral of Queeu Victoria in i1901. King Edward camne and went -the monarch who was boru while Donald A. Smith was a Scotch clerk in Labrador. Lord Strathcoua stayed. Now and then lie put up at bis great baronial home ln Moutreal; solitary ini the rnidst of magnificence that sometimes seemned more lonesome than any furpost. fie returued to iàs queer, flustery office of Higli Coinimissioner in London; a shrunkeni, deafening, sight-dimming old Norsemnan who neyer kuew when lie was either old or weary. The white rime of the sub-Arctic camne out to stay on bis shaggy eyebrows. Withering giaut of old age, lie was stiil somehow as mystic, and dour, and conipelling-with ail bis quavering geniality and bis squeak of a voice- as lie had been lu the thundering, creaking days when lie rode bebind the huskie dogs lu the wbistling snow and rolled to sleep lu bis deersIu bag after a dinner of trailside pemmnican. 259",
         "TWO PERES DE MUSIQUE Music is old enough in Canada to have had a fine of ancestors, chief aznong whom are two men, F. H. Torrington and Guillaume Couture. When Torrington began to -champion the cause of the treble clef ini a crude land back in the 'fifties and the 'sixties, we had no foreign naines from most of the countrieý of Europe on our roll of musicians. That in 1916 there are in this country many professional musicians representing by nationalities and schools of music the niost that music has done for the world in all forms is due by lineage, at Ieast, to the patkfinding propensities of Torrington and Couture; one representlng the British Uine culminat- iug in sucli men as Bantock, Elgar, Hubert Parry, and Mackenzie; the other the Frenchi development traceable in Debussy, Massenet, St. Saens, and Bizet. Torrington came to Montreal in 1856, then a young Englishman of nineteen. He showed bis adaptability by not expecting a large pipe-organship as soon as lie arrived, and began by tuning pianos; afterwards tramnp- ing over Montreai teacbing music at fifty cents a lesson. Organs were small and wheezy in Moutreal in those days; there were no such cathedral instruments as that at Notre Dame, St. James', and the Churcli of the Gesu. Music was ail very primitive. There was a British regimeut stationed at Montreal. Torrington took lessons from. H.M. bandinaster on band instruments and tauglit thc bandsman theory in exchange. When the couductor was away Torriugton led the band. Hé played violin in the orchestra, which it seens -was a very good one, for one evening when lie was to play a solo at frrst desk lie was asked by the couductor if he would kindly give place to a new and celebrated virtuoso, 261 t",
         "Two Peres deMusique who had corne to town from, Beliun. jehixi-Pruxue was the new arrivai, a mani who lef t a big mark on Montreal mnusic and upon Torrixigton, who, as organist of a large Methodist church, violinist, piano teacher, and band conductor, soon demonstrated bis Anglo-Saxon per- tixiacity by becoming the most useful musiciai i Montreal. Six or seven years aftei bis arrivai the assassination of D'Arcy McGee convulsed Montreal. It was Torrington who played the funeral service li St. Patrick's. fI-e was already a trail-fixider, and before he had fixiished bis twelve years li Moxitreal lie made the acquaixitance of axiother musical pioneer, Patrick Sarsfield Gilmore, a theatrical promoter of music festivals who, when lie was a salesman for baxid instruments, met Torrington li Montreal, and after the Civil War was over, invited the British organist to taike down a music corps to assist i the great Peace jubilee i Boston. This was Tor- ringtoxi's introduction to0 the festival idea i Amierica i which lie was to become a Canadiaxi Iiaugurator. A year or so, later, havixig read in a newspaper about a great new organ li the Boston Music Hall, lie wrote askixig for permission to, give a recital on this king of instru- ments. The resuit of that Boston performance was a post i the famous Ing's Chapel i Boston, to which Torrington went li 1868,*remainiing five years as organist, violinist, choral conductor, and general promoter of good works. lI 1873 he went up f0, Hailton to give an organ recital. xI those days Torrington was much of an orgaxiist. He had a passion for the big instrument, the bigger the better. Anid li those days the pipe organ was the only orchestra to be found i most towns and cities. While i Hamilton lie was asked by a visitlig Toronto music dealer if lie would go to Toronto axid take the large organ and choir i what was then the biggest Methodist churci li the world, the Metropolitaxi, bult as a resuit of the evangelising visit of Morley Puxishon, D.D. 262",
         "Two Peres de Musique Torrington left Boston. He went to Toronto, as far as possible with the pioneering promotion of good mnusic,, to start another Boston on Lake Ontario. That was in :187.3. He found bimseif in a much more single-minded and British community than Montreal. His organ and choir were not long becoming locally fainous. Torrington was neyer cut out for one console. He had organising enthusiasm. Bireaking away from traditions in his own church by giving big music for ail church -seasons as they have it ini unevangelical churches, he began to promote choral concerts. His first chorus\u003e performance was in the old music hall above the old Public Library, in aid of a lacrosse club. It was the beginning of a remarkable series of undenomiànational events in music; the nebulous organisation of chorus and orchestra that afterwards becaine the Philharmonie Society. The yeax 1886 was the musical annus mirabilis of Toronto. In that year the College of Music was started by Torrington on Pembroke Street, where it stili is; later in the saine year the Conservatory of Music under Edward Fisher; and in the early surnier of the saine year all the choruses and aIl the orchestral players that Torrington had ever mnstered in Toronto, with a good many more besides, congregated from. Toronto, Hamilton, and Buffalo nearly 8oo strong to give the first music festival ever held in that part of the world. There had been Cther near-festival performances even before Tor- rington's time; none on the scale of this Inemorable event that packed the old Mutual Street rink, the only place available for such a series of concerts, and gav.e te the citizens Qf Toronto three bistory-znaking per- formances of Handel's Israel in Egypt, Judas Maccaboeus, and Gouncd's Mors et Vita. The newspapers spent coitunns of description, praise, and criticism over this festival, which was the real begin- ning of a musical Toronto iu a big way and the first sure proof that F. H. Torrington was both willing and able to do ten times more than he was ever paid to do for the sake of proinoting good standard mnusic. 263",
         "Two Peres de Musique Oratorio had been dabbled in before his tirne. Tor- rington mamde oratorio a hobby. The Festival Chorus became the Philharmonie chorus and orchestn which for a good many% years made a sort of tabernacle of the Horticultural Pavilion in the Allan Gardens. Here Torrington was musical dictator, often in leagua- with bis old friend Gilrnore whose famous baud co-operated once a year 'with the Philharnionic Society. Oratorio and orchestral works were niow the regular pabulum, of Toronto. And it was only eight yeaxs after the great !estival of 1886 that an enterprising millionaire enthu- siast, -Hart A. Massey, built Massey Music Hall, which was opened under the direction of Torrington with a three days' festival iu June 1894. The opening of Massey Hall came at the time when Torrington's great work as a musical organiser was at its height. lu twenty-one years he had accomplished more ln a big way ,týxan had ever been done in ail the previotis years of Toronto's musical blstory. He popu- larised organ music, choir music, choital works, and orchestral works, brought many gr.eat artists from the. United States and England, pioueered the College of Music, established a musical cult in the University of Toronto, conducted a society in Hamilton, fou2nded an orchestral school for young players, carrying the torch of hopeful illurnlnating art into many a corner which without hlm would have gone groping without good music. He was neyer weary of good works; neyer daunted by critlcism; neyer too proud to make bis art simple, edifying, and inspIriig to any earnest soul desiring to, get an insight into musical art. Torrington has always been a real evangel. I-e was bon and bred with ail the qualities, that make evangelism worth while, and at the sanie time by their very aggres- sive persistence arouse opposition. He seemed to thrive on troubles. He neyer chose the ezsiest way. No chorus was ever too crude and unlettered for hlm, to rehea.rse with bis violin at the desk to zip out the exact pitc4 and to play the crotchety part that somebody neyer 264",
         "Two Peres de Musique could learu by looking at the notes. When lie glared at any section of the chorus and pounded the desk with bis baton, wlien lie staxnped out the tempo with bis foot, when lie rapped everybody to a hait and began to, deliver the musical decalogue-nobody in any of bis choruses found it easy to be disregardful. There was a great work to be done. Ail men and women with wbat- ever talent of miusic God had given them iniglit help to do it. There neyer was a time when Torrington failed li this clear, energising message. He was neyer concerned with the money lie nxiglt make. Consequently lie seldoru lad mucli. XVhat lie rmade withhÂard work slipped away without stint. Yet lie was always organis- ing, building up, extcnding bis parish, increasing the public interest li good and sometimes great mnusic. And wlien lie retired a few years ago from the desk and baton of bis choral society, then li its third or fourth phase of permutation, lie got froru the citizens of Toronto a formal and illuminated expression of what Toronto seemed to think it owed to a man who had madle it possible for other men to beid bigger things after hiru. Professor Guillanne *Couture lias neyer been out of the French atruosphere to wbich lie was born li tlie city of Montreal, wliere lie is now the oldest musician .except one, bis confrère Octave Pelletier, the organist, as Couture is the tnaftrc de chappdLe, of St. James' Cathedral. Singing and the organ have always been bis chsen spliere, along with composition. When the .Archbisliop of Montreal banned the opera Louise, it was at no suggestion of bis mnaftre de chappelle. 0f all musicians li that metropolis Couture seerus to have been one of the most liopeful over the future of li- digenousý grand opera. Sitting in bis big square studio at the Fraser Institute li 1912 the Professor benignlyü and somnewhat querulously blessed the operatiques. Hie was biruseif an habitué. In Paris, where lie spent years of bis formative career, he liad been congenially stung 26,5",
         "Two- Peres de Musique by the opera. Naturafly--since his examiners were Massenet,*Bizet, and St. Saens. Paris to Couture was an atmosphere. Montreal was always a mere suggestion. It is a matter of history that nearly ail the French-, Canadian musical elect went to 'aris and to Brussels to graduate. That part of Canafda has been remarkably fecund of musical follk. There has been always a pro- nounced lyric strain in the French Canadians; probably racial, and certainly flot made obsolete by centuries of exile from Gala. Organ, violin, piano, 'cello, voice- Montreal has evolved scores of able artists: but neyer a peixnanent great musical organisation. Music in that city is peculiarly ecclesiastic ini association and individual ini development. There are more native artists than in Toronto: fewer organisations. Most of the wealth is Anglo-Saxon. Most of the churches are French. Choral societies have been largely promoted by the French who were always in the musical majority. The inspiration of Gounod, St. Saens, Bizet, Massenet, Widor, has always directly inspired the Gailic element in Montreal, fed more upon mass than upon opera, which when it camne as a native product was backed first by a Scotch-Canadian millionaire, afterward by a New York flebrew-,, and in both cases talented as to, chorus and somewhat as to orchestra by native French Canadians. Paris was aiways the goal. Those who, like Couture, went abroad fetched back Paris with thein. So in the mattei of atmnosphere, quite apart froin the inteilectual and organising side of music, Montreal has always been tempperamentally the leader among Canadian cities. There are comparatively few \" foreign \" music folk in Montreal, because the Frenchi Canadian,-- have always had a habit of coming back to the big Parisising city on the St. Lawrence. Teutonic influences have always been timid in Montreal The Latin temperament held the stage. 0f this Gallic school of music Professor Couture has for a long while been an apostie. R1e was an organist of a small church at the age of sixteen. At nineteen he 266",
         "Two Peres de Musique played organ in the old St. James' Cathedral, when the org=. was not the fine French-Canadian instrument it is now-and it is a inatter of great and glowing pride to the Frencli-Canadian musicians that the organs wbich have become most fanious in America, able to compete with any in the world, are made in the small town of St. Hyacinthe on the Yaznaska. While a very young man Couture went to Paris. He was most of ail interested in voice, second in the organ- as weil in whatever made musical Paris gay and solemn and oesthetic. Ris studies threw him, into personal contact with many great French composers, including Massenet, Bizet, the composer of Carmen, St. Saens, the Verdi of France, and old Cesar Franck fromù Belginni,, known to the talent as \"« 'e bon père Franck,\" for whom Couture was organist tbree years at the Church of Ste. Clothilde. Perhaps no other musician bornin Canada has such a fund of inspiring and colourful recoilections built about these notable :figures ini a world centre of music. And as lie sat and talked of thern one day to the writer iu bis studio, the Professor rather pensively recalled those days. Regarding German music he had littie to, say. There seems to be no pro-Wagner strain lu Couture. The greatest music to hlm was and stài is lu Paris- thougl he bas devoted mucli of bis lite to, giving standard oratorios, as weIl as the ma-,ses and requiems, operas and organ music, lie knows so extensively and intimately. In Montreal theire could neyer be a Wagner cult of any extent. Frencli-Canadian influence in the band of sucli men as Couture, much guided by the needs of the Church, temperainentally inclined to French and Church music, lias always kept the dominant note of Montreal as near the Latin pitch as possible. They say that Couture in bis years of bard labour with choral and orchestral organisation becanie mucli of a czar ln mnusic. But lie gave no sign to the writer of any, au-t.ocratic temper. lie seemed rather to be a mild, benign sort of man wlio would do anytblng to :267",
         "Two Peres de Musique promote the gentie side of music, and rather than have discord would bimself retire to the background. .No longer conductor of oratorio and choral societies, lie is stili maigre de chappelle at St. James', and free to com- pose when bis, teachîng duties permit. His compositions are extensive and scholarly. His Requiem, composed and by hlm performed at the funeral of the late Hon. Raymoidd Prefontaine, once Minister of Marine at Ottawa, is regarded as a solid contribution to the litera- ture of Church,music. It is to be hoped that before lie quaits creative work altogether he will do sometbing to co-ordinate the music that is native to Frenchi Canada, beginning with the old Frenchi chansons and ending with sucli things as lie and a few others have been able to produce. Montreal, as a centre of music production, lias a briglit future. Professor Guillaume Couture is one of the strong steady liglits by which tliat future may bé :surveyed. 268",
         "TWO PAINTERS 0F ONTARIO LDANE MACFALL a few years ago wrote a glowing eulogiuni in the Academy on two Canadian paint.ers whiose joint exhibition he had seen i the Goupil Galleries, London. Homer Watson and J. Archibald Browne are the which. and tother of Anglo-Canadian- art. Ail that Watson is, Browne is not. Both depict Canadian land- scapes, and as. a ruie nothing else; both go afield in Quebec and Nova Scotia now and then fçx- subjects; but for the znost part they translate Ontario. landscapes. .And if a caxivas of one finds itself at an exhibition along- side a -Picture of the other, there is an inu-nediate quarrel of the canvases, which, if personified, rnight resemble a dispute between a gruff, good-natured countrynian and a dainty lady gloved, ruffed, and Iaced from the town or somewhere near it. Homer Watson paints bis pictures ini Doon, the saine littie Ontario village where he was born; and of this heavy - set, pastoral conununity sandwiched between Scotch and Gennan settiements he is chief citizen, Justice of the Peace, one of the oldest inhabitants, and the sole lamp of art. Hie paints in the Doon vernacular; and he always paints trees. The trees are usually trunky Watsonesque pioneers that seem to belong to the niid- Victorian age of development in Canada. If he shoul.1 paint an inter-urban trolley he wc.uld rnake it feel lilce a stage coaeh even though it -should, look like an electric car. One passes over the epic sonata of canvases which he did on commission in 915 for the Canadian Governuent ixnpersonated by Sir Sain Hughes They mnay have been good pictures of Valcartier, but they were neither good typical Watsons nor first-rate pictures of a war camp. Ris normal productions are far different. luis landscapes 2,-9",
         "Two Painters of Ontario have that solid-built character as thougli no tornado, ever could uproot those oakish trees. One feels as thougli he might walk into a Watson neck of woods and hew out a double-tree for a teain. There is the suggestion of the axe and the crosscutsaw, the ox-team, and the log-bee, the spinning-wheel and the old rag mat. In Watson these suggestions are as sincere as the dusky light that peers over his low-toned, Puritanising canvases; and they are inherent in the man Homer Watson, who is wel! named. The peremiial character of his work is Homeric simplicity coupled with Sabbath- going restraint. He is the human side of the old oaken bucket. Diligent respectability sits decently over most of bis work. A picture of Watson's must neyer merely suggest-always as far as possible express and define something. The expression is not always poetic and the definition is neyer an epigramn. Doon is evidently an obvious Ontario settiement with ail the rugged virtues rigidly set down in the day's work. 'You feel that evei;' iceihewas old enougli to, smoke a pipe this painter 'worshipped the diligent toiler who rose with the sun. He purveys no mystery. He makes no flamboyant appeal to, the imagination. Que has no remexubrance of any outstanding human figure ever exhibitedl by this craftsman of the village studio. With bis repertoire of rustic folk and villagers he miglit have portrayed more people and fewer Iandscapes. But he neyer wearies of the stout thick trees, the bulging hilI, the cattie trail and the snake fence, the autuxun wind shivering through at dusk and the stodgy days' worker whom he neyer illumines with the tender pessimism of a Millet-because he is too busy with the trees to, paint the human worker at ail. Trickery is impossible with the Watson technique, which in this country is very mucli bis own and occasionally bears some resemblance to the plastic arts. Irnpetuous ecstasy, seizing passièn-he seems to, have very littie. I should not say that lie lacks temperament; rather that lie lias an excess of one variety of its expres- 270",
         "Two Painters of Ontario sion. To fetch more luminosity into bis pictures would be fatal to the Watson genre, which requires a ineasure of gloom-though niuch less now than formerly. Isolated in the village, lie bas clung to the fine old virility of a first- outlook upon nature which is so often lost in a city studio. He was the first President of the Canadian Art Club whc, seceded from the Ontario Society of Artists because they believed in evolution by protest. For some years it was found quite superfinous to, seek for another Presîdent. When the Royal Canadian Academy was founded by Lord Lorne ini xt8o, Watson was made an associate. A few years ago lie was made a full member. Hie is now at the heiglit of bis old-fasbioned virility--and long may lie remain there. ArcbibaldBrowne's picturescontain nopioneerrealisins. A large majority of them for a good maniy years seemed like transcriptions of A Midsummer Night's Dream. Que of bis latest, doue according to the Browne recipe for the co-insinuation of paint, looks like a god-blown soap- bubble bleached out to mother-of-peari; a ghost of a grey salin a swoon of vapour that in tThe foreground may be water and in the background may be sky, but heaven only knows where one begins and the other leaves off. With such an etherealising technique Browne iniglit have ilustrated The Dream, of Gerontius--except tiat lie neyer paints figures. Hie personalises bis landscapes; and it must be adrnitted that a large ntumber of them. are feminine. With a littie elasticity of imagination one miglit take a fair percentage of Browne's pictures as an illustration to, the Ode on Intimations oflmtmortality: The glory and the freshness of a dreaxn.\" lu this business of poetising paint Browne bas taken the moon for a symbol. If all bis moon pictures were hnng side by side they would make a toue picture of Beetlioven's Moonliglt Sonata. The Browne moon is 271",
         "Two Painters -of Ontario unmistakable. Lt xnay be full, quai er, or new; it is always pensive with the pale cast of thouglit. You neyer catch a Bro\"ie moon riding the heavens and brooniig away the clouds with a bigh wind. It is always peering shyly into the nebula of the landscape, between ghosted. trees or over phantoniW waters, to see what the artist bas been doing rather than to give the beholder liglit. Critics have complained that the Browne nioon is flot distinctively Canadian. Browne aptly retorts that the moon is a universal object whibh. cannot be nationalised. But there are turnes when the Browne moon is not even an object: merely a subtlety. Thereg must have been some humour in Browne s original idea to exploit the moon. In so doing he seems to, have worked out an alleged theorem, of Corot that he could paint the saine subject in a hundred vaious ways and neyer repeat himseif. Browne neyer pretended that lie was interprefing Canada by translating the moon; neither can lie deny that a. good many of bis lumar pictures çWuld have been doue quite as well if lie had taken the original sketches to a studio in Bombay. Wliatever the first incention was, thle arýtist lias now somewbat outgrown it. He no longer dwells in the moon- liglit of art. Many of b is. later compositions. are exceed- ingly high-keyed, colourful, and bold--some of tli drarnatic. In fact some turne ago lie broke out iùto a species of realism. by painting old shacks and patches of city streets. -In bis best recent tbings, however, lie lias depicted the big valley and the bold cloud-scudded mountain on some arm of the Bay of Fundy. In sucli things lie revels in luminosity, rea]istic colour, and motion. Even in these lie shudderingly avoids any modem metliods iu the perpetration of paint. A Browne picture is hall done beère lie begins. He mixes bis colours on the palette, flot being sure that the beholder lias either the ability or the patience to mix thein after they are on the canvas. 0f course this* is an old device. But nowadays it requires occasional courage as an inuovator 272",
         "Two Painters of.Ontario for a man to spiritualise bis colours befre he piits themn on the canvas. Browne believes that ne good picture sÇ.ild be any- thinig resembling a literai transcription. He has worked out bis, belief. Nothing is so tiresome to the Browne temperament as the mere truth; nothing so reprehen- sible as the camera. It is the mission of the artist, to, interpret nature by selecting her more attractive aspects and by the use of the poetic faculty to make themn if need be more idyllic than nature could. Grant that premise to Browne and bis cwclusion is obvious. The ugly must neyer be painted-unless, by contrâst to empliasise the beautiful. Rapture is better than realism. Colours in themselves, are not necessafily oesthetic. They must be xnixed and blended with judicious 'subtlety. Merely human interest in themselves most of Browne's pictures, have not. They become interesting by huinan interpretation ini the recognition of the beautiful. He seemns to ignore a large percentage of people who prefer that a picture should be first of al an interesting sub- ject no matter what treatment the artist gives it. He prefers the more perceptive minority who, care lessi for the subject than for the art of the artist who, handies it. Browne is not a Canadian by birth. Accident made this Scotchman a native of Liverpool; but lie is not in the least English, and lie prefers to regard bimself as a Canadian. Which is not possible except in a cosmo- politan Canada. 273",
         ". 1",
         "REV. J. A. MACDONALD MIDDLES]EX COUNTY, Ontario, contributed two orators to Canadian public life, Sir George Ross andi J. A. Macdonald, both Ceits; inipassioned, somewhat bardic cha.racters, both quite celebrated ini politics. and both Liberals. The orations of George Ross, once Premier of Ontario anid for many years Minister of Education, have gone into living history. The orations of J. A. *Macdonald.are still in the rnaking. Thiese- eloquent Gaels camne up out of a fecunci, temperamiental, comxnunity w]iich had two mainsprings of progress, predestination and Libera]ism. Macdonald, however, with a]1 his belief ini what was to be and therefore rnust be, could scarcely have sus- pected when he was a student of the higher catechism on a Middlesex faim, that at the dawn of the twentieth century he would become editor-in-chief of the paper on wbich he had been nurtured once a week along with the syndicate sermons of Talmage. Neither was he Iikely to imagine that the day would corne in igin when he should be the accredited agent at Washington and Ottawa of the Taft-Fielding scheme of restricted reciprocity that drove the Liberal Goverment out of power. His first liberating passion was for the pulpit. The platform, the sanctum, and the lobby came in the fulness of turne. Hé attended college and went out to preach, in the days when great preaching was considered one of the civllising arts in a new country. Once upon a turne while he was preaching to, a rustic congregation in eastern Onta.rio, Macdonald pilgrimaged to Toronto for a week of theological examinations iu Knox College. On the Sabbath he trudged early down to St. Andrew's on Ring Street-seated devoutly before the organist",
         "Rev. J. A. Macdonald began to play the prelude. What a strange, gloomy Scotch place it was! And when the kist o' whustles began to drone in the rear of the kçirk, what unco, vibrations chased themselves up and down the spine of reverend young Macdonald! Neyer had lie heard a pipe organ before; nothing but cabinet reed organs and precentors. This was a wicked instrument and he liked it. Into the pulpit camne a pale-faced man in a black gown who, as lie worked through psalms and pipe- organing old St. Anti up to his sermon, caused the raw- boned young preacher in the gailery to crane over the rail. Neyer had Macdonald heard sucli a sermon; not so much the words as the ideas. That preacher was accused of being a heterocloxist; the first- freethinIng paison Macdonald had ever heard. And because that toc\u003e was a bit wicked, he liked it. That was the most momentous Sabbath J. A. Mac- donald had ever kno'wn; 'when lie stood cn the verge of the nnorthodox, hobnobbing with here\u003eies. After attending college at Edinburgh, Macdonald found hùmself, a young resounding Demosthenes--aso with a slight hesitancy of speecli-pastor of Knox Churcli, St. Thomas, Ontario, a railway town. No Canada Southeru train rushing through St. Thomnas ever :flung the miles over its boiler with finer ecstasy than Macdonald chucked behind hlm the verbiage of a grand sermonising discourse. People drove for miles to hear hlm go up and down the Jacob's ladder crowded with angels; now, and then having for a triumphal text, \" Blessed are the meek.\" Beginning with a zephyr-like conversation, minute by minute lie pulled out stop after stop lu bis pipe-organ discourse, until with ail the diapasons and tubes resounding the sermon becarme a grand ist o' whustles, the congregation -were dumb- founded with awe, and the minister visiting a sick lady on Monday told lier what a glorious time lie had lu the p'ulpit yesterday. Piously lie continued to read the Globe, sometimes 276",
         "Rev. J. A. Macdonald wondering why it was not even more passionate, with sucli a pack of Tory scoundrels at Ottawa violating Mosaic laws. Presently predestination took him out of St. Thomas and lie becaxne editor of the Westminster, a Presbyterian montbly, by means of wbich he was enabled to merge a number of littie Presbyterian papers into a syndicate. With Sir Wilfrid Laurier as a co-inspiration to John Knox, the very year that Laurier swept intô power at Ottawa, J. A. Macdonald beca.me the Principal of a Fresbyterian ladies' college. Hie dallied in a bower of valedictory roses and elocution. He studied the peace movernent. On platforms both in Canada -and the United States lie told of bis fighting ancestors, glorying ini their deeds with claymore and battie-axe -and preaching peace. And when any sceptic asked why sucli a brawny, cloud-splitting man could do sucli a tbing, it was to reply- '\u003cWell, you see, lie is Principal of a ladies' college.\"1 The dynanmo Principal was getting ready for another foreordained inetamorphosis. During those five years of bis dalliance with lingeried curricula, Canada and its politics were undergoing marvellous changes. His chief Laurier and an aggressive Cabinet were making a new twentieth -century Canada. The west was coming to the east and the new world was going to the west. Mere preaching was no longer the great tbing. Behind the scenes a play was going on, and the actors were the editor of the Toronto Globe, the directors thereof, and a capitalist who desired to start an independent news- paper that should tell the truth about politics no inatter whom the truth bit-for a while. It uiglit liave been expected that such a reform movement would have cauglit up Macdonald in a cloud. But almost as sudden as a bomb, from. a Zeppelin, John S. Wiflison resigned frora the Globe to, become editor of the Toronto News, backed by Mr. J. W. Flavelle. The sanctum of the Globe was vacant. 'Macdonald's the mnan,\" said Senator Jaffray, 277",
         "Rev. J. A. Macdonald President of the Globe. And echo answered, «Ay, Macdonà1d's the man.\" Macdonald becaine the editorial exponent of what vas then regarded as the new Liberalism, which con- sisted ini chastising the sins of the old Liberals. His old, Middlesex idol of oratory and politics, Sir George Ross, was the first victim, of what seemed like the new editor's uncompromising righteousness. The famous editorial onq \" barnacles\"'- was a bad blow to the leader of the party which for thirty-two ý,ears had governed Ontario. Other mren xnight look after the Globe newspaper. Macdonald from bis pulpit sanctnm looked after the propaganda. No mani could have done it better. H1e had a train-platform knowledge of many parts of Canada, a glowlng appreciation of big mxen, and a political in- petuosity that xnight have made hini an M.P. but that he played Coesar !or the sake of a better crown. By now the doctrine of predestination had nxany a crimp in it froin J. A. Macdonald. The Boanerges editor was famous for bis 'speeches in Washington and al points north and west; in Edinburgh and GlasgoW; and as xnany Sabbaths, a year as possible preaching in Canadian pulpits. No editor in Canada had ever preached so much; none in Anierica except W. J. Bryan who was a friend of Macdonald; none in England except the late W. J. Stead. lI no part of the world -was the oratory of Macdonald so fainous as lu the United States. Nowhere else did Macdonald on certain big occasions feel so mucli at home. Even in Canada we have at times feit rather proud of Macdonald's bardic oratory, different from. the polished eloquence of Sir Wilfrid Laurier and more impassioned thaxi the speeches of Sir George Ross. We were quite wllling to have the Globe editor go across the border now and then to thill audiences ini Washing- ton. But Canadians were souei-what startled on a Sabbath aftemnoon lu Massey Hall, Toronto, when, speaking at a congress of the Associated Clubs of Arnerica, Macdonald eulogised Canada as the \" greatest country under the Stars and Stripes.\" That was a slip :278",
         "Rev. J. A. Macdonald often made by Auerican speakers in -this country. In the case of Macdonald il: was merely a dramatic lapsis lingua. His audience were mainly Americans. He wished to make thema feel at home. So we follow the preaciler-editor down to the year 1911 -bis fateful year; bis trips to Washington, bis inter- views with President Taft, the reciprocity conferencs, at Albany and Ottawa, and the Taft-Fielding amend- ment to international foreordination, the restricted reciprocity plank in the Liberal platform which the editor of the Globe had helped to make-then the election. The Liberals went out of power and the editor went back to bis sancttun more startled than he had been on the Sabbath when lie first heard a kist o' whustles and a heterodox preacher. He consoled blimseif with the reflection that what had to, be could not well be avoided. Then camne the war; another act of foreordination. The editor of the Globe was a pacifist. When Bryan left the American Cabinet the Globe repudiated Bryan and continued to corne out as strongly as any other news- paper in Canada in favour of the Allies and of Canada's participation in a just war. Since the war began the Globe had been comxnitted to its prosecution by Canada. There was no cry of peace, peace, when there was no peace. Then came the peace propaga.nda again, to wbich the Globe was as much opposed as any other Canadian or British newspaper. And on Friday, October 15, 1915, the Toronto News published a leader headed \" Peace and Pacifists.\" This editorial said: \" Dr. J. A. Macdonald bas been in conférence with Pacifists at San Francisco and delivered there bis well- known address on The North.Axerican Experiment. .. . it is with the Pacifists that the editor of the Globe, a British newspaper in a British comamunity, confers. A British editor, supposedly in a position of leadership in this cou.ntry, goes to the United States and delivers a Iist of denunciations, niot against Germany, not against Austria, but against Europe. . . . Dr. Macdonald's friends in the United States declare roundly that the 279",
         "Rev. J. A. Macdonald British navy is as much a niilitarist organisation as the Gerinan arniy. . . . Does he agree? If he does flot, what is he doing in San Francisco? What is the meaning' of bis fuxious attacks on' European ' militarism?\" These were very inconsiderate questions. The editor of the Ncwis was neyer an orator or he neyer mould have asked thern. Not long after the end of the first year of war that was, to fetch peace upon earth-for corne it must-Rev. J. A. Macdonald resigned* from the chief editorship of the Globe. The editor who, had written the Globe war su.rnuary took bis place. The orator becarne a contribut- ing editoriai mriter. What will he do next? There is notbing in the doctrine- of predestination, to, forecast that. But there is always the platformn. After the war there must be peace. Where there is peace there mnust be oratory. And in the congre- gation of orators there must always be a J. A Macdonald. Tm£C TCMPtE ?a£. OLccéman"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.71612",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "label" : "Sons of Canada",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.71612"
   },
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.71612/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.75418/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "doc" : {
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.75418",
      "label" : "The world for sale",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.75418",
      "text" : [
         "CIHM Microfiche Series (i\\/lonographs) ICMH Collection de microfiches (monographies) Canadian Institut* for Historical Microrsproductiont / Inititut Canadian da microraproductions hiatoriquas",
         "1995 Ttdiniul and Bibliographic Notts / NotM tKhniquts at bibliographiquas Tht Inttilutt has atMmptad to obtain tht bast original COPY availabit for filming. Faaturts of ttiis copy which may ba biUiographicaHy uniqua, which may altar \u003c!ny of tha imagas in tha raproduction, or which may significantly changa tha usual mathod of filming, art chacfcad balow. Colourad covtri/ Couverture da coulaur 0 □ Covars damagad/ I D J Couvtrtura andommagia Covars rastortd and/or laminatod/ Couvtrtura rtstauria at/ou ptiliculia □ Covar titit missing/ La titra da couvtrtura manqua □ Colourad maps/ Cartas giographiquts an coulaur Colourad ink (i.«. othtf than blua or black)/ Encrt da coulaur (i.a. autra qua Maua ou noirt) D □ Colourad plans ind/or illustrations/ I I Planches ct/ou illustrations 9n coulaur n n Bound with othar matariil/ Ralii avtc d'autras documants n n Tight binding may causa shadows or distortion along interior margin/ La raliura serree paut causer de I'ombra ou de la distortion le long de la marga intirieure Blank leans added during restoration may appear within the text. Whenever possible, these have been omined from filming/ II se peut que certaines pages blanches ajouties lors d'une restauretion apparaissent dans le texte, mais. lorsque cela atait possible, ces pages n'ont pas M filmies. Additional comments;/ Commentaires supplemantaircs; L'Institut a microfilmi le meilleur exemplaire qu'il lui a M possible de se procc rer. Les details de cet exempleire qui sont peut-«tre uniques du point de aue bibliographique, qui peu\u003eent modifier una image reproduite. ou qui peuoent exiger une modification dans la mithode normale de f ibiiage sont indiqutt ci-dtssous. □ Coloured pages/ Pages de coulaur □ Pages damaged/ Pages endommagies □ Pagn restored and/or laminated/ Pages restauriet at/ou pallicul*es 0 Pages discoloured, stained or foxed/ Paget dicolories. tacheMes ou piquees n Pages detached/ Pages ditaehtes 0Showth rough/ Transparence print varies/ inigala de I'impression □ Duality of Qualiti ini □ Continuous pagination/ Pagination continue □ Includes indexlesi/ Comprend un (des) index Title on header taken from:/ Le titre de I'entlte provient: I I Title page of issue/ Page de titre de la livraison Caption of issue/ Titre de dipart de la linaison Masthead/ Ganerique (periodiques) de le livraison I I Caption of issue/ I I Masthead/ This item is filmed at the reduction ratio checked below/ Ce document est film* eu teux de rUuction indiqui ei.dessous. IQX ^.^ 14X 18X 22X 26X »x ^^^ 1 1 y 1 1 n t2X 1\u003eX 20X 24 X 2ax ' ^J 17",
         "» Tht copy fllmad h*r« hu bMn raproducad thanks to tha o^ncotity of: National Library of Canada L'axamplaira filmt fut raproduit grica i la gtntroaiU da: Blbllotheque nationals du Canada Tha imagas appaaring hara ara tha bait quality potsibia coniidaring tha condition and lagibility of tha original copy and in kaaping with tha filming contract apacificationa. Original copias in printad pspar covara ara fllmad baginning with tha front covar and anding on tha last paga with a printad or illuatratad impras- sion, or tha back covar whan appropriata. All othar original copiaa ara filmad baginning on tha first paga with a printad or illuatratad impraa- aion, and anding on tha last paga with a printad or illuatratad imprasaion. Tha last racordad frama on aach microficha shall contain tha symbol — ^ (moaning \"CON-TINUED\"), or tha symbol V Imaaning \"END\"), whichavar spplias. Las imagas suivantas ont ttt raproduitas avac la plus grand soin, compta tanu da la condition at da la nattat* da l'axamplaira filmt, at an conformity avac las conditions du contrat da fllmaga. Laa axamplairaa originaux dont la couvartura an papiar ast imprimta sont fllmis an commancant par la pramiar plat at an tarminant soil par la darnitra paga qui comporta una amprainta d'imprassion ou d'illustration, soit par la tacond plat, salon la cas. Tous las autraa axamplairas originaux sont filmAs an commandant par la pramlAra paga qui comporta una amprainta d'impraasion ou d'illuatration at an tarminant par la darnitra paga qui comporta una taila amprainta. Un daa symbolas suivants apparaitra sur la darniira imaga da chaqua microficha. salon la ess: la symbols — *\u003e signifia \"A SUIVRE\". la aymbola ▼ signifia \"FIN\". Mapa. plataa. charts, ate. may ba filmad at diffarant raduction ratios. Thosa too larga to ba antiraly includad in ona axposura ara filmad baginning in tha uppar laft hand cornar. iaft to right and top to bottom, as many framas as raquirad. Tha following diagrams illustrata tha mathod: Las csrtaa. planchas. tablaaux. ate pauvant itra filmta t das taux da rSduction diffSrents. Lorsqua la documant ast trop grsnd pour itra raproduit an un saul elich*. il ast film* S partir da I'angla supAriaur gaucha, da gaucha i droits. at da haut an baa, an pranant la nombra d'imagas ntcaaaaira. Laa diagrammas suivants illustrant la mtthoda. 1 2 3 1 2 3 4 5",
         "6 Mia/^-OTY aiSOlUTION TBI CHAIT {ANSI and ISO TEST CHART No. 2| A APPLIED IIVMGE In ^STm '65J Eos' Mail Street B*.^ Rochester, New York 1*609 USA \"-gg (716) *82 - 0300 - Phone ^= (716) 288 - 5989 -",
         "Fa. (Ovv, ^, 1^.,",
         "HVVM^ The World for",
         "Sale The World for Sale By Gilbert Parker Author of \" Th« Weavert,\" \" The Right of W»y,\" \" Donovan Paih.,\" etc. Toronto S. B. Gundy",
         "1916 98051 PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN",
         "I TO MY BELOVED NIECES KATHLEEN, JANE ELEANOR, AND",
         "CAROLINE NOTE This book was begun in 1911 and finished in 1912, a year before war broke out. It was published serially in the year 1915 and the beginning of 1916. It must, therefore, go to the public on the basis of its merits alone, and as a picture of the peace-life of the great North West.",
         "vU CONTENTS fAGB 3 CHAPnil BOOK I. I. \" THE DRUSES ARE UP I\" - n. THE WHISPER FROM BEYOND HI. CONCERNING INGOLBY AND THE TWO TOWNS IV. THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE V. \" BY THE RIVER STARZKE ... IT WAS SO DONE ' VI. THE UNGUARDED FIRES ... VII. IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 6 i6 24 30 45 55 75 BOOK II. VIII. THE SULTAN - . . IX. MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN X. FOR LT-3K ... XI. THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRtN XII. \" LET THERE BE LIGHT \" XIII. THE CHAIN OF THE PAST XIV. SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE - XV. THE WOMAN FROM WIND RIVER XTl. THE HATOB FILLS AN OFFICE XVII. THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD ■ XVIII. THE BEACONS XIX. THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE ix 93 \"3 142 156 «74 187 198 208 219 229 238",
         "243 CONTENTS BOOK III. CH*PTEH XX. TWO LII^ PUCES XXI. THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER - XXII. TI E SECRET HAN XXni. THE RETURN OF BELISARIUS - XXIV. AT LONG LAST XXV. MAN PROPOSES XXVI. THE SLEEPER XXVII. THE WORLD FOR SALE PAGE 376 287 299 306 317 326 331",
         "/ PRELUDE I Harvest-time was almost come, and the great new land I was resting under coverlets of gold. Prom the rise above I the town of Lebanon, there sf retched o»t ungamered wheat Im the ear as far as sight could reach, an( the place itself iMd the neighbouring town of Manitou on the other side' lof the Sagalac River were like islands washed by a topaz Standing upon the Rise, lost in the prospect, was an old Iwhite-haired man in the cassock of a priest, with grey ■beard reaching nearly to the waist. I For long he surveyed the scene, and his eyes had a raot ■ took. \"^ At last he spoke aloud ; M.J' I^* ^J\". *\" ^\"^ \"/ «\u003c*» *« \u003c*« t»rtk. high upon Mthe htUsi hts frwt shall shake likt Libanus. and shaU be 7f«f» in the city like grass upon the earth.\" A smile came to his lips— a rare, benevolent smile. He lad seen this expanse of teeming Ufe when it was thought Ito be an alkaU desert, fit only to be invaded by the Black- feet and the Cree and the Blood Indians on a foray for food and furs. Here he had come fifty years before, and I gone West and North into the mountains in the Sum-ner season, when the land was tremulous with light and wbrating to the hoofs of herds of bufialo as they stam-ped from the hunters ; and also in the Winter time, when •St was master and bUzzard and drift its malignant ervants. ° Even yet his work was not done. In the town of Mani- !ou he still said mass now and then, and heard the sorrows",
         "s -'^.. * THE WORLD FOR SALE and sins of men and women, and gave them \"«hn.Hv o^miort,\" while priests younger thS LS to^ burfen of parish-work from his shouMers^^ the few IT' ^^ ^^\"^ \"^\"\"S the Indians and Si?th« „^^ f^ »q«««w.men and half-breeds, with ndther settlement nor progre«i. Tien, all at on«, The railway; and people coming from aU the world and dt^ ^S \"P ' K*\"\"^. \"\"* \"\"\"^ »»« ^ living tSflifeol TS7\\!^^'^ ^T ^•^'^ °' fi* \"^d inimals a.^ ^n^n * ^ * u' I*\"«ni«w for the wheaten loaf- the ^Z.^ ^V^ \"\"^ *«'\"«' *ith the mansarf ^ SLS,^.^\"\"'*'' *^J *'^'*^ '°^ '^' refinements^ aVLT, *\" \"'^\"'^ *'*'' l\"** ''\"d white linen. . Ji ° *\"\"'' **\"* *'^*'\"« over his head. His eves aZ to'^t'lT ?**\"^ \"^ '\"^y °* herons strSf = SeeTJhi °S!' rwl;'rSi sJl ''7- ^\"^^ A great serpent was s tea^ ng ouSh^Zr r\"**\"*\" ^^dallytrai^tSir^SS^VthT^j; \"These things must be,\" he said aloud as he looked ^J:.i J^^J\"\"^ man's face and figure sn«est2 P°J^i,^ hjs buggy was a fishing-rod. *»«8««ted jnt nat was pulled down over his ptoq h„f i, •. ming cheerfully to himself Wh^n h^l' tu * ''*' •\"*\"• raised his hat r^pecS vet^th ,n •^*/''' P^^*' ^ •• Onni ,io„ i^^V^y' yet with an air of equality. had^eiLfn\"\"\"^\" \u003c*^' •'\"\"\"'^ »* the Chu«h The priest raised his hat and murmured the name, \"",
         "In- PRELUDE 5 Iri«it .I5T •T'*'*' ?*\"\" ,*'\"' '^'^^ t\"\"* West, who setie It, and divide it, and make it their own of Sijelitt •*'\"'\"*'' \"\"^ *\"'''' ■^*'*^ ■»ndmeUoutlhe vaUey \"Hush I Hush!\" he said to himself in reproach. Th«e things m«,t be. The country must be opened Uader^ ^^ *''\"\"'*\"**' ''\"\"« *'\u003e'' T™*'' beforV the Now another traveller came riding out of Lebanon towards him, galloping his horse up-hiU and down. He also was yoiuig, but nothing about him suggested power, only self-indulgence. He, too, raised his h^Vr rather swung ,t from his head in a devil-may-care way, and overdid his salutation. He did not sreak The priMfs face was very grave, if not a Uttle resentful. His satatation was reserved. \"The tyranny of gold,\" he murmured, \"and without the mmd or energy that created it. Felix was no name ^t^TbuildT''' \" * '\"^'^' ^'\"^^ ^ \\^-^^r: thf b '**'*** ^°^ *\" ^^'^'^ *°**^' ^^ y*\"\"* \"^ \" \" Sure, he is a builder. He has the Cortez eye. He th^re— -3' '''* ^'^^^ ^\"* ^^'^ Marchand He stopped short. \" Such men must be, perhaps,\" he added. Then, after a moment as he gazed round again upon the land of promise which he hac loved so long, he murmured as one murmurs a prayer : \" ^*«« sufferedst men to ride over our heads : we went Z'Um^^Z' \"^ \"\"\"^' \"\"\"^ ^*'^ broughtest hs out into a weauHy",
         "place. CHAPTER I \" THK DRUSES AKE UP I\" \" GMtAT Scott, look at her I She's goin' to try and take em! exclaimed Osterhaut, the Jack-ol-aU-trades at Lebanon. \" She ain't such a fool as aU that. Why, no one ever aone k alone. Low wter, too, when -.very rock's got its dwnce at the canoe. But, my gracious, she «j goin' to nde em I\" Jowett, the hone-dealer, had a sportsman's Jov In a danng thing. r-J * \"See, old Injun Tekewani 's after her I He's calling at her from the bauk. He knows. He done it himself years ago when there was rips in the tribe an' he had to sew up the tears. He run them Rapids in his canoe—\" '^ Just as the Druse girl there is doin' \" \" An' he's done what he liked with the Blackfeet ever smce. \"But she ain't a chief— what's the use of her doin' it ? She s gom straight for them. She can't turn back now. She oouldn t make the bank if she wanted to. She's got to run 'em. Holy smoke, see her wavin' the paddle at Tekewani I Osterhaut, she's the limit, that pettic;,at-so quiet and shy and don't-look-at-me, too, with eyes like brown diamonds.\" ^ \" Oh, get out, Jowett; she's all right ! She'll make this country sit up some day-by gorry, she'll make Manitou Md Ubanon sit up to-day if she runs the Carillon Rapids \" She's runnin' 'em all right, son. 6 She's— by jee,",
         "well \" THE DRUSES ARE UP !\" 7 done, Miw Druse I Well done, I say— well done I\" ex-claimed Jowett, dancing about and waving his arms to-wards the adventurous girl. The girl had reached the angry, thrashing waters where the rocks rent and tore into white ribbons the onnishing current, and her first trial had come on the instant the spitting, raging panthers oi foam struck the bow o( her canoe. The waters were so low that this course, which she had made once before with her friend Tekewani the Blackfeet chief, had perils not met on that desperate journey. Her canoe struck a rock slantwise, shuddered and swung ound, but by a dexterous stroke she freed the frail craft. It righted and plunged forward again into fresh death-traps. It was these new dangers which had made Tekewani try to warn her from the shore — ^he and the dozen braves with him: but it was characteristic of his race that, after the first warning, when she must play out the game to the bitter end, he made no farther attempt to stop her. The Indians ran down the river-bank, however, with eyes intent on her headlong progress, grunting approval as she plunged safely from danger to danger. Osterhaut and Jowett became silent, too, and, like the Indians, ran as fast as they coulU, over fences, through the trees, : tumbling and occasionally cursing, but watching with fascinated eyes this adventuress of the North, taking chances which not one coureur-de-bois or river-driver iu a thousand would take, with a five thousand-dollar prize as the lure. Why should she do it ? \" Women folks are sich dam fools when they git goin',\" gasped Osterhaut as he ran. \" They don't care a split pea what happens when they've got the pip. Look at her — my hair's bleacbin' \" \" She's got the pip all right,\" stuttered Jowett as he plunged I ■ they'i Igoti pip, foreign men and women both — ^but the women go",
         "crazy.\" 8 THE WORLD FOR SALE Druse was no longer on her f«.f \u003c;i,o i,^ u",
         "u \" THE DRUSES ARE UP I\" 9 gratitude— night and day she had heard this spirit murmtir- ing in her ear, and always the refrain was, \" Down the ^t\"*™ to Carillon I Shoot the Rapids of Carillon I\" Why? How should she know ? Wherefore should she know ? This was of the things beyond the why of the human nund. Sometimes aU our Uves, if we keep our souU young, and see the world as we first saw it with eyes Md heart unsoiled, we hear the murmuring of the Other Self, that Self from which we separated when we entered this mortal sphere, but which followed us, invisible yet whispermg uispu-ation to us. But sometimes we only hear It, our own soul's oracle, while yet our years are few, and we have not passed that frontier between inno-cence and experience, reahty and pretence. Pretence it IS which drives the Other Self away with waiUng on its lips. Then we hear It cry in the night when, because of the trouble of life, we cannot sleep; or at the play when we are caught away from ourselves into another air than ours; when music pours around us Ijke a softli^d from a garden of pomegranates; or when a chUd asks a question which bnngs us back to the land where everything is so true that it can be shouted from the tree-tops. Why was Fleda Druse tempting death in the Carillon Rapids ? She had heard a whisper as she wandered among *he pme-trees there at Manitou, and it said simply the one word, '• Now I\" She knew that she must do it; she had driven her canoe out into the resistless current to ride the Rapids of CariUon. Her Other Self had whispered to her. Yrader, thousands of miles away in Syria, there were the mils of Lebanon; and there was one phrase which made every Syrian heart beat faster, if he were on the march. It was, \" The Druses are up ! \" When that wild tnbe took to the saddle to war upon the Caravans and agamst authority, from Lebanon to Pahnyra,",
         "from 10 THE WORLD FOR SALE Jerusalem to Damascus men looked anxiously about them and rode hard to refuge. And here also in the Far North where the River Sagalac ran a wUd race to Carillon, leaving behind the new towns of Lebanon and Manitou, \" the Druses were up.\" The daughter of Gabriel Druse, the giant, was riding the Rapids of the Sagalac. The suspense to her and to those who watched her course— to Tekewani and his braves, to Osterhaut and Jowett— could roi be long. It was a matter of minutes only, in which every second was a miracle and might be a catastrophe. From rock to rock, from wild white water to wild white water she sped, now tossing to death as it seemed, now shooting on safely to the next test of skill and courage —on, on, till at last there was only one passage to make before the canoe would plunge into the smooth water ninnmg with great swiftness till it ahnost reached Carillon. Suddenly, as she neared the last dangerous point, round which she must swing between jagged and unseen barriers of rock, her sight became for an instant dimmed, as though a cloud passed over her eyes. She had never fainted in her life, but it seemed to hei now that she was hovering on unconsciousness. Commending the will and energy left, she fought the weakness down. It was as though she forced a way through tossing, buffeting shadows; as though she was shaking ofi from her shoulders shadowy lands which sought to detain her; as though smothering thmgs kept choking back her breath, and darkness like clouds of wool gathered about her face. She was fighting for her life, and for years it seemed to be; though indeed It was only seconds before her wiU reasserted itself, and hght broke again upon her way. Even on the verge of the last ambushed passage her senses came back; but they came with a stark realization of the peril ahead: it looked out of her eyes as a face shows itself at the window of a burning",
         "building. \" THE DRUSES ARE UP I\" u Memory shook itself free. It pieiced the tumult of waters, found the ambushed rocks, and guided the lithe brown arms and hands, so that the swift paddle drove the canoe straight onward, as a fish drives itself through a flume of dragon's teeth beneath the flood. The canoe quivered for an instant at the last cataract, then respond-ing to Memory and Will, sped throu:h the hidden chasm, tossed by spray and water, and swept into the swift cur-rent of smooth w_ er below. Fleda Druse had run the Rapids of Carillon. She could hear the bells ringing for evening service in the Catholic Church of Carillon, and beUs— soft, booming bells— were ringing in her own brain. Like muffled silver these brain-bells were, and she was as one who enters into a deep forest, and hears far away in the boscage the mystic summons of forest deities. Voices from the banks of the river behind called to her— hilarious, approving, agitated voices of her Indian friends, and of Osterhaut and Jowett, those wild spectators of her adventure; but they were not wholly real. Only those soft, booming bells in her brain were real. Shooting the Rapids of Carillon was the bridge by which she passed from the world she had left to this other. Her girlhood was ended— wondering, hovering, unreaUzing girlhood. This adventure was the outward sign, the rite in the Lodge of Life which passed her from one degree of being to another. She was safe; but now as her canoe shot onward to the town of Carillon, her senses again grew faint. Again she felt the bufieting mist, again her face was muffled in smothering folds; again great hands reached out towards her ; again her eyes were drawn into a stupefying darkness ; but now there was no will to fight, no energy to resist! The paddle lay inert in her fingers, her head drooped! She slowly raised her head once, twice, as though",
         "the 12 THE WORLD FOR SALE call of the exhausted will was hearf, but suddenly it fell heavdy upon her breast. For a moment so, a£d then as the canoe shot forward on a fresh current, the lithe body sank backwards in the canoe, and lay face upward to the evemng sky. The canoe sped on, but presently it swung round and lay athwart the current, dipping and rolling Ftom the banks on either side, the Indians of the S°\"* ^^*';y^'^'°\" '^^ *^« *^° ««» froni Lebanon ^iS^ \"!, .^'^t\"\"* °\"' ^°' '^'y ^^ that the girl had collapsed, and they knew only too weU that her dan|er was TJV'^^- ^r. \"^\"\"^ ™8h* '^\"^' ^g'^st the piers of the bndge at Carillon and overturn, or it ,nigh? be carn«i to the second cataract below the town n,ey they Si ^^^'^ *\" '*'\"' ''\"' ^^ ^^y ^P* *°\"t^8 M None responded to their call, but that defiance of the last cataract of the Rapids of Carillon had been seen by one who below an eddy on the Lebanon side of the river lZn„^''^v*\"°f'l\"P*'° maple-twigs, black bass ^d long-nosed pike. As he sat in the shade of the trees, he tt ^f*\"*''^ Pl«nge of the canoe into the chasm, and had held his breath m wonder and admiration. Even at that distance he knew who it was. He had seen Fleda only a few times before, for she was Uttle abroad; but when he had seen her he had asked himself what su^h a flee and form were domg m the Far North. It belonged to Andalusia to the Carpathians, to Syrian villages. p,^T?* ^^\"\"\"^ \"^ *h^. ■^^^ 'J«^l '\" he had exclaimed, as Fleda s canoe swept mto the smooth current, free of the himself she seemed much nearer to him than the hun-dreds of yards of water intervening. Presently, howeTr he saw her droop and sink away out of sight »„f°^h'^ \"\"^^T ^^ ^^ \"\"** '«*\"« «l^t had happened, and then, with angry self-reproach, he flmig",
         "thfo^ \" THE DRUSES ARE UP I\" 13 into the rowlocks of his skiff and drove down and athwart the stream with long, powerful strokes. \"That's like a woman I\" he said to himself as he bent to the oars, and now and then turned his head to make rore that the canoe was still safe. \" Do the trick better than a man, and then collapse like a rabbit.\" He was Max Ingolby, the financier, contractor, mana-ger of gi'eat interests, disturber of the peace of slow minds who had come to Lebanon with the avowed object of amalgamatmg three railways, of making the place the swivel of all the trade and interests of the Western North- but iiio with the declared intention of uniting Lebanon and Mamtou m one municipality, one centre of commercial and industrial power. Men said he had bitten off more than he could chew, but he had rephed that his teeth were good, and he would masti-cate the meal or know the reason why. He was only thirty- three, but his will was Uke nothing the West had seen as yet. Xt was sublime in its confidence, it was free from conceit, Md it knew not the word despair, though once or twice It had known defeat. Men cheered him from the shore as his skiff leaped throu^ the water. \" It's that blessed Ingolby,\" sdd Jowett, who had tried to \" do \" the financier in a horse- dea., and had been done instead, and was now a devout adinirer and idherent of the Master Man. \" I saw him dnvmg down there this morning from Lebanon. He's been fishing at Seely's Eddy.\" \" When Ingolby goes fishing, there's trouble goin' on somewhere and he's stalkin' it,\" rejoined Osterhaut. But, by gol, he s goin' to do this trump trick first • he's goin to overhaul her before she gits to the i -idee. Look at hm swing! Hell, ain't it pretty I There you go, old Ingolby You re right on it, even when you're fidiing.\" On the other-the Manitou-shore Tekewani and his braves were less talkative, but they were more",
         "con- 14 THE WORLD FOR SALE cwned in the incident than Osterhaut and Jowett. They taew little or nothing of Ingolby the hustlrr, but they knew more of Fleda Druse and her father than all the people of Lebanon and Manitou put together. Fleda had won old Tekewani's heart when she had asked him to take her down the Rapids, for the days of adventure for him and his tribe were over. The adventure shared wrth this girl had brought back to the chief the old days when Indian women tanned bearskins and deerskins day in, day out, and made pemmican of the bufialo-meat ; when the years were filled with hunting and war and migrant joumeyings to fresh game-grounds and pastures Danger faced was the one thing which could restore Tekewani's self-respect, after he had been checked and rebuked before his tribe by the Indian Commissioner for b«ng drunk. Danger faced had restored it, and Fleda Druse had brought the danger to him as a gift. If the canoe should crash against the piers of the bridge. If It should drift to the cataract below, if anything should happen to this white girl whom he worshipped in his heathen way, nothing could preserve his self-respect j he would pour ashes on his head and fire-water down his throat. Suddenly he and his braves stood still. They watched as one would watch an enemy a hundred times stronger than ones self. Tha white man's skiii was near the derelict canoe; the bridge was near also. Carillon now hned the bank of the river with its people. They ran upon the bridge, but not so fast as to reach the place where, m the nick of time, Ingolby got possession of the rolhng canoe; where Fleda Druse lay waiting like a prin-cess to be waked by the kiss of destiny. Only five hundred yards below the bridge was the second cataract, and she would never have waked if she had been carried into",
         "it. \" THE DRUSES ARE VP !\" W To Ingolby she was as beautiful as a human being could be as she lay with white face upturned, thu paddle still in hei hand. \" Drowning isn't good enough for her,\" he said, as he listened her canoe to his skifi. \" It's, been a full day's work,\" he added; and even in this human crisis he thought of the fish he had caught, of \" the big trouble,\" he had been thinking out as Osterhant had said, as well as of the girl that he was saving. \" I always have luck when I go fishing,\" he added presently. \" I can take her back to Lebanon,\" he con-tinued with a quickening look. \" She'll be all right in a jiffy. I've got room for her in my buggy— and room for her in any place that belongs to me,\" he hastened to reflect with a curious, bashful smile. \" It's like a thing in a book,\" he murmured, as he neared the waiting people on the banks of Carillon, and the ringing of the vesper bells came out to him on the evening air. \" Is she dead ?\" some one whispered, as eager hands reached out to secure his skiff to the bank. \" As dead as I am,\" he answered with a laugh, and drew Fleda's canoe up alongside his skiff. He had a strange sensation of new life, as, with delicacy and gentleness, he lifted her up in his strong arms and stepped",
         "ashore. CHAPTER II THE WHISMR FROM BEYOND Ingolby had a wiU Of his own, but it had never been really tned against a woman's will. It was, however tned sorely when Fleda came to consciousness again in lus arms and realized that a man's face was nearer to hers than any man's had ever been except that of her own father. Her eyes opened slowly, and for the instant she did not understand, but when she did, the blood stole swiftly back to her neck and face and forehead, and she started in dismay. \" Put me down,\" she whispered faintly. \" I'm taking you to my buggy, \" he replied. •\u003c I'll drive you back to Lebanon.\" He spoke as calmly as he could for there was a strange fluttering of his nerves, and the crowd was pressing him. \" Put me down at once,\" she said peremptorily. She trembled on her feet, and swayed, and would have fallen but that Ingolby and a woman in black, who had pushed her way through the crowd with white, anxious lace, caught her. \"Give her air, and stand back !\" called the sharp voice of the constable of Carillon, and he heaved the people back with his powerful shoulders. A space was cleared round the place where Fleda sat with her head against the shoulder of the stately woman m black who had come to her assistance. A dipper of water was brought, and when she had drunk it she raised her head slowly and her eyes sought those of Ingolby. One cannot pay for such things.\" she said to him",
         "16 THE WHISPER FROM BEYOND 17 meeting his look firmly and steeling heiself to thank him. Though deeply grateful, it was a trial beyond telling to be obliged to owe the debt of a life to any one, and in par-ticular to a man of the sort to whom material gifts could not be given. \" Such things are paid for just by accepting them, \" he answered quickly, trying to feel that he had never held her in his arms, as she evidently desired him to feel. He had intuition, if not enough of it, for the regions whei« the mind of Fleda Druse dwelt. \" I couldn't very well decline, could I ?\" she rejoined, quick humour shooting into her eyes. \" I was helpless. I never fainted before in my life.\" ^ \" I am sure you will never faint again,\" he remarked. \" We only do such things when we are very young.\" She was about to reply, but paused reflectively. Her half.opened lips did not frame the words she had been impelled to speak. Admiration was alive in his eyes. He had never seen this type of womanhood before— such energy and grace, so amply fft so lithely framed; such darkness and fairness in one living composition; such individuality, yet such intimate simplicity. Her hair was a very light brown, sweeping over a broad, low forehead, and lying, as though with a sense of modesty, on the tips of the ears, veiling them slightly. The forehead was classic in its intellectual fulness; but the skin was so iresh, even when pale as now, and with such an underglow of vitality, that the woman in her, sex and the possibilities of sex, cast a glamour over the intellect and temperament showing in every line of her contour. In contrast to the light brown of the hair was the very dark brown of the eyes and the still darker brown of the eyelashes. The face jhone, the eyes burned, and the piquancy of the contrast between the soft illumin-ating whiteness of the skin and the flame in the eyes had fascinated many more than Ingolby.",
         "a 18 THE WORLD FOR SALE U SdfTL 1 rtraight yet .upple, wmewhat fuller than ooine, and the curves of her bust, the long lines of her hmbs were not obscured by her absolutely plt„got?S soft ight-brown linen. She was tall, but not t^^m asjapenng a bare am, as ever made prisoner of a man's Je^^fn^tf ^'^ '° '^''y ''\"'*'^' ™ *he passionate rZ,^ , *•\"* ^™ shapeliness of the chin itself gave pwmise of great strength of wiU. From the g o,? of ?he stL^^jtSn'^I'' a history,\" Madame Bulteel, who now .\" tei^ \"'\"' \" -^ '\"«««. fmS. 5.:™^ ;; Ho, did you jM ],„ !■• Hed. „M",
         "j„. THE WHISPER FROM BEYOND 19 ' I remember. quittical smile. \"But, no,\" she added, you were to be here at CariUon.\" •' ij'Cit™!^ r\"^,\" \"*•* '\" '^^ Madame Bulteel. Th^lJ'^J^* few minutes ♦be crowd had faJlen back. ISnT^^ ^\"k ^'^ «»P«\u003c=tftJ admiration from a decen fSeristi; oftlil w *^ '^\"\"^y *°\"'''^ *'»^\" «\u003e •char-acteristic of the West. There was no vulgarity in their ain\u003c».ty, though most of them had never sLTh'er beSr^ AU, however had heard of her and her father, the giant greybeard who moved and Uved in an air of m Jery a \"d apparently secret wealth, for more than once he^^7riven when chanty was needed; as in the case of the floods the year before, and in the prairie-fire the year^fo^ hat fifty men had been mjured in one railway accident On these occasions he gave disproportionately^ his modeVf Now when they saw that Fleda was about to move away, they drew just a little nearer, and presently one o1 foioSr **'\"' *\" \"\"'\" ^ '^''\"^- \"^^ ^°^ »\u003e«««hs n™l^\"^K***^\" *\"' Ingolby,\" another cried, and the noise was boisterous but not so general fojmroftl SS°\" ^'''''\" '^°'''^' '^^ - '^ ',', »^ *°* *''*' Rapids,\" was the choral reply ^^ Who IS she ?\" came the antiphon. ^ is her name,\" was the gay response. What did she do ?\" in^fh \"^\"^ ^°° Rapids-diot -em dead. Hooray I\" In the middle of the chee ag, Osterhaut and",
         "Jowett M THE WORLD FOR SALE aiTivBd in a wagon which they had «.mmandee«d. and, xS^wSiLThirvr ^ *'\"• ''\"^'- «- -°w \"So«-r;\u003etthe\"£,t:?. '^'^\"■\" '^ °^«*'«*- fi»d on Teliewani who, siJent, and with inunobiiVfaT b^«. ^h t r\" ^\"•'''^ moccasin, and deenldn breeches, though his coat was rather Uke a shorten^ wortoan-s blo^. He did not belong to the ht a^ J7!}^T^~^' Te'a'wani, you have come.\" the girl said, and her eyes smUed at him as they had no smiLut Ingolby or even at the woman in black beside he? Howt the chief replied, and looked at her with searching, worshipping eyes. \"Don't look at me that way, Tekewani,\" she said comjng dose to him \" I had to do it, and I did If.\" ' TTie teeth of rock everywhere I\" he rejoined reproach- fullj with a gesture of awe. ~ reproacn- J^I Remembered aU-*ll. You were my mast«., Teke- \"ait only once with me it was. Summer Sonc \" h. pe««ted. Smnmer Song was his nake foTw. ^' \" T i^'^'ul^r®^* \"• ^\"\"\"^ ^°°* 0* the way,\" she insisted It aU. There was something singularly akin in tZ nature of the girl and the Man. She sjoke to Sm S she never spoke to any other. ro mm as dil'I'^h'?^ '**l°^' '* •' ^'^^^•\" ^'^ answered. \"Men SkTl ?^ m^ch seeing. I have seen them die. To took hard through deerskin curtains, to see through th^ rock, to behold the water beneath the earth, aS",
         "i^ THE WHISPER FROM BEYOND SI roclB beneath the black waten, it ii for man to lee if he hat a tool, but the seeing— behold, so those die who should live I\" \" I Uve, Tekewani, though I saw the teeth of racks be-neath the black water,\" she urged gently. *• Yet the half-death came \" \" I fainted, but I was not to die— it was not my time.\" He shook his head gloomily. \" Once it may be, but the evil spirits tempt us to death. It matters not what comes to Tekewani; he is as the leaf that falls from the stem; but for Summer Song that has far to go, it is the madness from beyond the Hills of Life.\" She took his hand. \" I will not do it again, Tekewani.\" \" Howl\" he said, with hand upraised, as one who greets the great in this world. \" I don't know why I did it,\" she added meaningly. \" It was selfish. I feel that now.\" Th\u003c) woman in black pressed her hand timidly. ^^ ■' It is so forever with the great,\" Tekewani answered. It comes, also, from beyond the Hills— the will to do It. It is the spirit that whispers over the earth out of the Other Earth. No one hears it but the great. The whis-per only is for this one here and that one there who is of the Few. It whispers, and the whisper must be obeyed. So it was from the beginning.\" .. ' J*^' ^°\" nnderstand, Tekewani,\" she answered softly. I did it because something whispered from the Other Earth to me.\" Her head drooped a Uttle, her eyes had a sudden shadow. He will understand,\" answered the Indian; \"your father will understand,\" as though reading her thoughts. He had clearly read her thought, this dispossessed, lUiterate Indian chieftain. Yet, was he so illiterate? Had he not read in books which so few have learned to read ? His life had been broken on the rock of civilization, but his sunple soul had learned some elemental",
         "truths— 22 THE WORLD FOR SALE not many, but the essential ones, without which there is no philosophy, no understanding. He knew Fleda Druse was thmkmg of her father, wondering if he would under-stand, half-feanng, hardly hoping, dreading the moment when she must meet him face to face. She knew she had been selfish, but would Gabriel Druse understand ? She raised her eyes in gratitude to the Blackfeet Chief. I must go home,\" she said. She turned to go, but as she did so, a man came swag- genng down the street, broke through the crowd, and made towards her with an arm raised, a hand waving, and a eer on his face. He was a thin, rather handsome, disso- lute-l^king fellow of middle height and about forty, in dandified dress. His glossy black hair feU carelessly over his smooth forehead from under a soft, wide-awake hat. .. T *'™*°'J:*°\"^ «ver I\" he cried, with a flourish of his hand. I salute the brave. I escort the brave to the gates of Salut/ Salui/ Wen done. Beauty 1 Beauty-Beauty —Beauty, well done again I\" \"c«'uiy He held out his hand to Fleda, but she drew back with disgust Fehx Marchand, the son of old Hector Marchand money-lender and capitahst of Manitou, had pressed his ' attentions upon her during the last year since he had returned from the east, bringing dissoluteness and vulgar pride with him. Women had spoiled him, money had comipted and degraded him. ^ ■• Come, beautiful brave, it's Salut I Salut I Salut '\"he said, bendmg towards her familiarly. Her face flushed with anger. \"^ Let me pass, monsieur,\" she said sharply. farth^**^ °^ '\"*^*°\" \" ^^ *P°^*™Ph*«\u003c'. but got no Ingolby caught him by the shoulders, wheeled him round, and then flung him at the feet of Tekewani and uis",
         "braves. THE WHISPER FROM BEYOND 23 At this moment Tekewani's eyes ha'' suj'i a fire as might bum in Wotan's smithy. He was ready enough '5 defy tlie penalty of the law for assaulti. g j. white r m, but Felix Marchand was in the dust, an'' v^int vouM do for the moment. With grim face Ingolby stood over the begrimed figure. \" There's the river if you want more,\" he said. \" Tekewani knows where the water's deepest.\" Then he turned and followed Fleda and the woman in black. Felix Marchand's face was twisted with hate as he got slowly to his feet. \" You'll eat dust before I'm done,\" he called after Ingolby. Then, amid the jeeis of the crowd, he went back to the tavern where he had been",
         "carousing. CHAPTER III CONCERNING INGOLBY AND THE TWO TOWNS A WORD about Max Ingolby. He was the second son of four sons, with a father «,!,« h^ been a faUure; but with a mother onmaSo^ S named n bnngmg up a family on nothing at all that there only emerged from her p^ssibihties \"Vea\"* do the .mpossible things. From her had corthelpiri? which would not be denied ^ In his boyhood Max could not have those things which cZSiit^on h '\"\"^i^\"^ ^^^ Pri^s at school open to competition; he could win in the running-jump, the high- lump, and the five hundred yards' ra^ 3 iT ,-i or^nize a picnic or the sportsTthe\"^;,S ttn-aj w..;rndJSwSLtch^^^£Clhtf^^^^ He became the village doctor's assistant and",
         "disoenser CONCERNING INGOLBY AND TWO TOWNS 26 with three scholarships. These were sufficient to carry Wm through in three years, and there was enough profit- sharing from the drug-business he had founded on terms to shelter his mother and his younger brothers, while he took honours at the University. There he organized all that students organize, and was called in at last by the Bursar of his college to re-organize the commissariat, which he did with such success that the college saved five thousand dollars a year. He had genius, the college people said, and after he had taken his degre^ with honours in classics and mathematics they offered him a professorship at two thousand dollars a year. He laughed ironically, but yet with satisfaction, when the professorship was offered. It was all so different from what was m his mind for the future. As he looked out of the oriel window in the sweet gothic building, to the green grass and the maples and ehns which made the college grounds Uke an old-world park, he had a vision of himself permanently in these surroundings of refinement growing venerable with years, seeing pass under his influence thousands of young men directed, developed and inspired by him. He had, however, shaken himself free of this modest vision. He knew that such a life would act like a narcotic to his real individuality. He thirsted for contest, for the control of brain and will; he wanted to construct; he was filled with the idea of simplifying things, of economizing strength; he saw how futUe was much competition, and how the big brain could command and control with ease, wasting no force, saving labour, making the things controlled bigger and better. So it came that his face was seen no more in the oriel wmdow. With a mere handful of dollars, and some debts, he left the world of scholarship and superior pedagogy, and went where the head offices of railways were. RaUways were the symbol of progress in his mind. The",
         "railhead 26 THE WORLD FOR SALE was the advance post of civilization. It was like Cortez and his Conquistadores overhauling and appropm'i^X ZT% °l'T« generations. So where shodd he |o H not to the Railway ? \u003c= 8\" \" th?l^i ^'\u003e 'J'''\"\" ^' S°* *° ^* ^eet inside the offices of the President of a big railway, was to show the great ^^X^'^'^S^''^'\" P'°^^ «\"es could be made one and then further merged into the company controlled by the mdhonaire m whose office he sat. He got his ST'LL.'\"' vevyaudacity-the President liked^audac' fi^; /•? ''\"rPu\"^ *'\"'\" \"^'•Se'-' I'owever, he had his fct fadure, but he showed that he could thiAk for himseTf vei of n^M ' increasingly responsible. After a few yea^ of notab e service, he was offered the task of build- north IT^ tu °^ \"\"\"^^y ^°\" I^l'^non ^d Maniton outslii^/ .'^'\"' *\"\"' P^*\"\"'\"g *o \"^erge certain outside hnes competing with that which he had in hand. For over four years he worked nignt and day, steadily advancmg towards his goal, brealdng down opSn manoeuvnng, concUiating, fighting. l'i«»\"ion. Most men loved his whimsical turn of mind, even those fouVr *?'%?S«\"tl°f the financial clique which h^ cuT^nH . V^^\"\" '^°''' *° set control of the commer-cial industrial, transpc.rt and banking resources ofTe junction city of Lebanon. In the days when ^ m^klts would be estabUshed for Canadian wheat in ShanghS ^d Tofao, then these two towns of Manitou and LebTon on the Sagalac would be Uke the swivel to the organi^ tion of trade of a continent. organiza Ingolby had worked with this end in view. In doing so he had tned to get what he wanted without tricke^^ to reach his goal by playing the game according to the' ?^.v .\"llJ^ ^^\"^ nonplussed his rivals and associates! table. Sharp, quick, resolute and ruthless, he was",
         "how- CONCERNING INGOLBY AND TWO TOWNS 27 ever if he knew that he was being tricked. Then he struck, and struck hard. The war of business was war and not goUyfoxing,\" as he said. Selfish, stubborn and self-centred he was in much, but he had great joy in the natural and sincere, and he had a passionate love of Nature. To him the flat prairie was never ugly. Its very monotony had its own individuahty. The Sagalac, even when mudrty had its own deep interest, and when it was full of logs drifting down to the saw-mills, for which he had found the money by interesting capitahsts in the East, he sniffed the stinging smell of the pines with elation. As the great saws in the mills, for which he had secured the capital, throwing off the spray of mangled wood, hummed and buzzed and sang his mouth twisted in the droll smile it always wore when he talked with such as Jowett and Osterhaut, whose idio-syncrasies were like a meal to him; as he described it once to some of the big men from the East who had been behmd his schemes, yet who cavilled at his ways. He was never diverted from his course by such men, and while he was loyal to whose who had backed him, he vowed that he would be independent of these wooden souls m the end. They and the great bankers behind them were for monopoly; he was for organization and for economic prudence. So far they were necessary to all he did; but it was his intention to shake himself free of aU monopoly in good time. One or two of his colleagues saw the dnft of his policy and would have thrown hun over if they could have replaced him by a man as capable, who would, at the time, consent to grow rich on their terms. They could not understand a man who would stand for a half-hour watching a sunset, or a morning sky dappled with all the colours that shake froir. a prism- they were suspicious of a bnsiness-mind which oould gloat over the light falling on snow-peaked mountains,",
         "while 28 THE WORLD FOR SALE On the occasion when he had quoted a verse of ooetrv to them, one of them said to him'with a side-to^ gC^ You seem to be dead-struck on Nature. Ingolby \" To that, with a sly qUrk of the mouth, and meaning InsweS\" \"j^-wc^en-headed questioner 's.U m^f I'mTw; .^f'^-^*™'=k? Dead-drunk, you mean ™\u003eh.!^ !' d,psomaniac-as yon can see,\" he add^ with a sly note of irony. »u\"ou Then instantly he had drawn the little circle of experts bmldmgs and finance, which made demands upon iU their resources and knowledge. In that confereC he gave especial attention to the snub-souled TS who in knT'l \"\\^' '°^\" \"' ^^'^'- He tied his ^[ic up in knots of self-assertion and bad logic which nresentlv Sf Tt ^^■'''' -' ^•^•^^ unUtfthfra as':?sros:jtif':^t£,^t^-s^ admirers. This was the President ^ho had fct wel^L^' taTnCisr\"\"' ^\"^ ''''^^'^ ^^ *° ^ -£^2 \" I shouldn't be surprised if the belt flew ofi the wheel some day,' savagely said Ingolby's snub-^uled crtte whose enmity was held in check by the fart that on JrSht SdinS' ''^ -^ -^tV^ t^e |hS*M^L:S2tS^l-='-- o^,^\"^\"; ,^'^«P*i'^'«''w''\u003c'- 'or financial ^as^SHeS opposed to him, and must therefore pit themselves a^a3 him, as the representatives of bigger forces",
         "iSdIZ COKCERNENG INGOLBY AND TWO TOWNS 29 he was a leader of whom Lebanon was combatively proud. At last he came to the point where his merger was practi-cally accomplished, and a problem arising out of it had to be solved. It was a problem wLich taxed every quality of an able mind. The situation had at last become acute, and Time, the solvent of most complications, had not quite eased the strain. Indeed, on the day that Fleda Druse had made her journey down the Carillon Rapids, Time's influence had not availed. So he had gone fishing, with millions at stake— to the despair of those who were risking all on his skill and judgment. But that vifs Ingolby. Thinking was the essence of his business, not Time. As fishing was the friend of thinkmg, therefore he fished in Seely's Eddy, saw Fleda Druse run the Carillon Rapids, saved her from drowning and would have brought her in pride and peace to her own home, but that she decreed",
         "otherwise. CHAPTER IV THE COMING OF JETHRO PAWE Gabriel Druse's house stood on a little knoll nn *^ outskirts of the town of Manitou backed bvf^^ 1 p.nes. Its front windows faced the't^^ Td'^the windows behind looked into cool covertrwherrfn „H days many Indian tribes had camped' where Hudson'^ Onginally Manitou had been the home of Icelanders was formed near by! VL^^pI^ch'-^J^-^-",
         "SO THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 31 arrived, how ver, the place became less discordant to the life of a new democracy, though they did little to make it modem in the sense that Lebanon, across * .e river, where Ingolby lived, was modem from the dav the first shack was thrown up. Manitou showed itself antagonistit to piogress; it was old-fashioned, and primitively agricultural. It looked with suspicion on the factories built after Ingolby came and on the mimng propositions, which circled the place with speculation. Unhke other towns of the West, it was insanitary and uneducated; it was also given to nepotism and a pnmitive kind of jobbery; but, on the whole, it was honest. It was a settlement twenty years before Lebanon had a house, though the latter exceeded the popu-lation of Manitou in five years, and became the home of all adventunng spirits— land agents, company promoters, muung prospectors, railway men, politicians, saloon keepers, and up-to-date dissenting preachers. Manitou was, however, full of back-water people, religious fanatics, httle farmers, guides, trappers, old coureurs-de-bois. Hud-son s Bay Company factors and ex-factors, half-breeds • and all the rest. The real feud between the two towns began about the time of the arrival of Gabriel Dmse, his daughter, and Madame Bulteel, the woman in black, and it had grown with great rapidity and increasing intensity. Manitou condemned the sacrilegiousness of the Protestants, whose meeting-houses were used for \"socials,\" \"tea-meet-ings^.\"' \" strawberry festivals,\" and entertainments of many kinds; while comic songs were sung at the table where the M)lemn Love Feast was held at the quarterly meetings. At last when attempts were made to elect to Parliament an Irish lawyer who added to his impecuniousness, elo- jnience, a half-finished University education, and an Orangeman's prejudices of the best brand of Belfast or Derry, mter-avic strife took the form of phyical",
         "violence \" THE WORLD FOR SALE The great bridge built by In.^olby between the two towns might have been ten thousand yards long, so deep was the estrangement between the two places. They had only one thing in common— a curious compromise— in the person of Nathan Rockwell, an agnostic doctor, who had arrived in Lebanon with a reputation for morality somewhat clouded; though, where his patients in Manitou and U- banon were concerned, he :M been the \" pink of nro- pnety.\" \"^ Rockwell had arrived in Lebanon early in its career, and had remained unimportant until a railway accident occurred at Manitou and the resident doctors were driven trom the field of battle, one by death, and one by illness. Then It was that the silent, smiling, dark-skinned, cool- headed and cool-handed Rockwell stepped in, and won for himself the gratitude of all -Com Monseigneur Lourde, the beloved Catholic priest, lo Tekewani, the chief. This acadent was followed by an epidemic. That was at the time, also, when Fleda Druse returned from Winnipeg where she had been at school for one memor-able and terrible six months, pining for her father, defying rules, and crying the night through for \" the open world \" as she called it. So it was that, to her father's dismay and joy in one, she had fled from school, leaving all her things behind her; and had reached home with only the clothes on her back and a few cents in her pocket. Instantly on her return she had gone among the stricken people as fearlessly as Rockwell had done, but chiefly among the women and children; and it was said that the Herbal medicine she administered was marvellous in its effect-^) much so, that RockweU asked for the prescrip-tion, which she declined to give. Thus it was that the French Canadian mothers with daughters of their own, bright-eyed brunettes, ready for the man-market, regarded with toleration the girl who took their children away for picnics down the river",
         "or THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 33 at the end of the day. Not that they faUed to be shocked jometimes when, on her wild, Indian pony. Fleda swept ttoough Manitou Uke a wind and ont into tto p3. nding, as it were, to the end of the world. Try ithey would, these grateful mothers of Manitou, they oouM not get as near to Fleda Druse as their children did, and thev were vast distances from her father. ' \"There, there, look at him,\" said old Madame Thiba- deau to her neighbour Christine Brisson-\" look at him with his great grey-beard, and his eyes like black fires, and that head of hair hke a bundle of burnt flax I He comes tram the place no man ever saw, that's sure.\" \"Ah, surelee. men don't grow so taU in any Christian country, announced Christine Brisson, her head nodding sagely. I ve seen the pictures in the books, and there's nobody so tall and that looks like him-not anywheo. smce Adam.\" ' \"A-om de pipe, sometimes— trulee, sometimes. Hookup there at where he lives, and I think I see a thousand men on;horses ride out of the woods behind his house and down here to gobble us aU up. That's the way I feel. It's fancy, but I can't help that.\" Dame Thibadeau rested her hands on her huge stomach as though the idea had its ongm there. \" I've seen a lot of fancies come to pass,\" gloomily returned her friend. \" It's a funny world. I don't know what to make of it sometimes.\" \" And that girl of his, the strangest creature, as proud as a peacock, but then as kind as kind to the children-of a good heart, surelee. They say she has plenty of gold nngs and pearls and bracelets, and all like that. Babette Courton she saw them when she went to sew. Why doesn t Ma'm'selle wear them ?\" Christine looked wise and smoothed out her apron as though It was a parchment, \" With such queer one»,",
         "a 84 THE WORLD FOR SALE who knows ? But, ye«, as you say, she has a Idnd heart. The children, weU, they foUow her everywhere.\" , '*'°* **»• children only,\" sagely added the other. From Lebanon they come, the men, and plenty here, too; and there's that Felix Marchand, the worst of all in Manitott or anywhere.\" \" I'd look sharp if Felix Marchand followed me,\" re-marked Christine. \"There are more papooses at the Reservation since he come back, and over in Lebanon !\" She whispered darkly to her friend, and they nodded knowingly. \" If he plays pranks in Manitou he'll get his throat cut, for sure. Even with Protes'ants and Injuns it's bad enou^i. remarked Dame Thibadeau, panting with the thought of it, \"He doesn't even leave the Doukhobors alone, mere fr- — ' Again Christine whispered, and again that ugly look came to their faces which belongs to the thought of forbidden things. \"Felix Marchand'll have much money— bad penny as he IS, continued Christine in her normal voice. ' He'll have more money than he can put in aU the trouser legs he has. Old Hector, his father, has enough for a goverment. But that M'sieu' Felix will get his throat cut If he follows Ma'm'seUe Druse about too much, bhe hates him-I've seen when they met. Old man Druse 11 make trouble. He don't look as he does for nothing. \"^Ah, that's so. One day, we shall see what we shall see murmured Christine, and waved a hand to a friend m the street. xu^'i,T''*\"*\"°° happened on the evening of the day that Fleda Druse shot the Carillon Rapids alone An hour after the two gossips had had their say Gabriel Druse paced up and down the veranda of his house",
         "i THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 38 ^ng now and then to view the tumbUng, hurrying \u0026^. or to dweU upon the .unset which cri^^Z^ pa^«ncei he seemed disturbed of mind and restless of tJlr SXlf\" •'\"P^«'«''°\" °\u003c great force. He would have been p.cked out of a multitude, not alone because of t^^lT^^t \"\"l^}- '^^ •^\"-^ »\u003e« ^-^ '^ air o\"^m To h^^?\" '\"\"'\"\"\" \"•••'='' ^•«\u003e- \"^ -- Efficient oMJl^^'^f^\"^ reflectively into the sunset, a strange, h«H r^f J^^^*?^ °°*'' P*'\"^'=«^ *•»« «\"\" evening air. His Sf^hi ^ T\"^^J-J^' ^^ \"^^ \"°* '°»'' '\" *!\u003e« directs^ of the sound which came from the woods behind the i,TT\\ ^i ''I\"'*' '\"'' '^'^ ^^ ^y\" half-closed, as though he hesitated what to do. The call was not that of a bW famihar o the Western world. It had a melLXS ^f ness like that of the bell-bird of the Australia^TS •niree times during the past week he had heard it-once r^t^::;'\"' ll *^/ ™^'\"t-Pl='\u003c* o« Manitou; oncel! h^ onrif H° ^V\"^^™\"\" Tekewani's Reservation, and once at dawn from the woods behind the house His fhr^Sur '\"'* '\"PP'^'*^ ''S^*^\"\"\" ^'^'J' bee» It was a caU he knew well. It was like a voice from a J^lT'\"; * ^^' ''^ '\"*^' *°^ ^ answering cSlt h! hnH ,• ^ market-place, and in that seven days elr^ \"1 ^^''' \"\"^'^\"e in this world which hL repeated On the three former occasions there had been airCT^ ^^ \"^^ ^\"^ *'«\"\"«! « the air but J^c^ and had died away mto unbroken sUence. Now how! ever, It rang out with an added poignancy. It vL hL a bird calling to its vanished mate",
         "^ W THE WORLD FOR SALE With sudden resolution Druse turned. Leaving the veranda, he walked slowly behind the house into the woods and stood still under the branches of a great cedar. Raising his head, a strange, solemn note came from his lips; but the voice died away in a sharp broken sound which was more human than birdlike, which had the shrill insistence of authority. The call to him had been almost ventriloquial in its nature. His lips had not moved at all. There was silence for a moment after he had called into the void, as it were, and then there appeared suddenly from behind a clump of juniper, a young man of dark face and upright bearing. He made a slow obeisance with a gesture suggestive of the Oriental world, yet not like the usual gesture of the East Indian, the Turk or the Persian; it was composite of all. He could not have been more than twenty-five years of age. He was so sparely made, and his face being clean-shaven, he looked even younger. His clothes were the clothes of the Western man; and yet there was a manner of wearing them, there were touches which were evidence to the watchful observer that he was of other spheres. His wide, felt. Western hat had a droop on one side and a broken treatment of the crown, which of itself was enough to show him a stranger to the prairie, while his brown velveteen jacket, held by its two lowest buttons, was reminiscent of an un-English life. His eyes alone would have announced him as of some foreign race, though he was like none of the foreigners who had been the pioneers of Manitou. Unlike as he and Gabriel Druse were in height, build, and movement, still there was something aldn in them both. After a short silence evidently disconcerting to him, \" Blessing and hail, my Ry,\" he said in a low tone. He spoke in a strange language and with a voice rougher than his looks would have",
         "suggested. THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 87 ^^ The old man made a haughty gesture of impatience. What do you want with me, my Romany chal ?\" * he asked shaiply. The young man repUed hastUy. He seemed to speak by rote. His manner was too eager to suit the irapressive- ness of his words. \" The sheep are without a shepherd,\" he said. \" The young men many among the Gorgios, or they are lost in the dties and return no more to the tents and the fields and the road. There is disorder in all the world among the Romanys. The ancient ways are for-gotten. Our people gather and settle upon the land and live as the Goigios live. They forget the way beneath the trees, they lose their skill in horses. If the fountain is choked, how shall the water run ?\" A cold sneer came to the face of Gabriel Druse. \" The way beneath the trees !\" he growled. \" The way of the open road is enough. The way beneath the trees is the way of the thief, and the skill of the horse is the skiU to cheat.\" There is no other way. It has been the way of the Romany since the time of Timur Beg and centuries beyond Timur, so it is toM. One man and ail men must do as the tribe has done since the beginning.\" The old man pulled at his beard angrily. \" You do not talk like a Romany, but Uke a Gorgio of the schools.\" The young man's manner became more confident as he replied. \" Thinking on what was to come to me, I read in the books as the Gorgio reads. I sat in my tent and worked with a pen; I saw in the printed sheets what the world was doing every day. This I did because of what was to come.\" \" And have you read of me in the printed sheets ? Did they teU you where I was to be found ?\" Gabriel Druse's eyes were angry, his manner was authoritative. ^^A glossary ot Romuy words will be fouad at the end of the",
         "in 88 THE WORLD FOR SALE •■ Sfl ^Ti, \"^ stretch^ out his hands eloquently. n««; f i?'^'\"\"^' \"\"y ^y- ^ t^'^e \"eed of printed RvtotL p \"\"' *''\"*' ,^' \"°* ^^''^•^g knoJofthe tWnl J tx T^y P*°P'^ *^*^°\"* ^^ ^\"en or printed thing? How does the wind go? How does the star sweep across the sky? Does not the whisper pL^ the hghtn^^g flashes ? Have you forgotten aU, ^R^J »W 'M \"^y '=^'°P ''* Scutari ? Shall it not know I^ K '^ \"^^ °* *'^'' ^\"^''^ °* Scotland and the S^^ ^s by the Tagus ? It is known always where my^ hnnd«!l= K ^°\"^ys everywhere know it. and many Wreds have come hither from ove^eas. Ihey aii east, they are south, they are west.\" mi? '^^A ^t^^^^ *°*^' ^^^^ *^«* P°»t* 0' the com- left i^^!i ?^? \"one should seek to foUow, that I be fct nilS ? \"\"^ pJgnmage was done. Even as the itae 'be fuSfflX.\"\"''' '\"\"\"^ ^\"^ \"^\"\"e you all tlTthe J^!\"\" T \" '^\"y look in the old man's eyes as he T^.ZT,^^'''- ''-^^ '-^ P-PO- ^owed^ \" No one has sought me but you in all these vears \" h» r^ and' T \"^ ^\"'^ *'\"'^°\" should ^m^Ti \u003cJd A bolder look grew in the other's face. His carriace gamed m ease \" There is tn,uble everywhere-i^ low \"I^H n / ^''.*'\"' °' ''^''*^«°\" \"^d bowed ■n» oH mm piuckrf bl! barf .jm 4,^1? ud",
         "hi THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 80 words came with guttural force. \" That is fool's talk. In the past I was never everywhere at once. When I was in Russia, I was not in Greece; when I was in England, I was not in Portugal. I was always ' vanished ' from one place to another, yet the body lived.\" \"But your word was passed along the roads every-where, my Ry. Your tongue was not still from sunrise to the end of the day. Your call was heard alwaj-s, now here, now there, and the Romanys were one; they held together.\" The old man's face darkened still more and his eyes flashed fire. \" Tliese are Hes you are telling, and they will choke you, my Romany chal. Am I deceived, I who have known more liars than any man under the sky ? Am I to be fooled, who have seen so many fools in their folly ? There is roguery in you, or I have never seen roguery.\" \" I am a true Romany, my Ry,\" the other answered, with an air of courage and a little defiance also. \" You are a rogue and a liar, that is sure. These wail- ings are your own. The Romany goes on his way as he has gone these hundreds of years. If I am silent, my people win wait until I speak again; if they see me not they will wait till I enter their camps once more. Why are you here f Speak, rogue and har.\" The wrathful old man, sure in his reading of the youth, towered above him commandingly. It almost seemed as though he wouM do him bodily harm, so threatening was his attitude, but the young Romany raised his head, and with a note of triu^^Jh said, \" I have come for my own, as it is my right.\" \" What is your own ?\" \" What has been yours until now, my Ry.\" A grey look stole slowly up the strong face of the exiled leader, for his mind suddenly read the truth behind the young man's confident",
         "words. 40 THE WORLD FOR SALE Me was maiiied to me when I ™. ««e, as my Ry knows iLth^J was seven years of Jethro Fawe ^ my^e T*^,,^\" °J ^\"^^ ^'''^ WM so ammiMrf fTk- ^ *'^ *^°\"^d pounds it pounds diT^fathS^^.f'\"'*''-!^ '^\"^ \"'\"'^d was but a cMd vTfn ^?' ^'^'^ \"^t^t^^^- I Lemuel Fawe, the husband of F^r^' \\^^'^not ^. King and DuS^d t^^i^X^ \"' ^'\u003e\"'^ I come for my own \" ''* Romanys ; and I\u003e^^^Sit* ^ If ^^T'^ '-^ Gabriel rigid pridHude tte d^?Jn« ^l '\"^ '^•^ \"\"^ P^' ^ «■ Jooked liteTwtriaS. T ^^'f \" *^«\" *\"'\"««■ H« hi* hand Md p^^r^tithT* ^^\"^ ^ •\u003e« raised of the Romany tnLs hTjT^^ ', *°«\"?l«e to the laws that the girl-but thrL '°\"-'°-^^*'- I* did not matter had no iS, Vf^re dT \" 1 *** .^'\"'° \" happened- he lay dying, and bv *!.»!• J °' ^\"\"'^ ^^we when Romany law anStistomwr^^tt'ih'r r** '\"'^«*-- « were man and wife nTd^o? i 1'' *''*° *''« *«\"\u003e \"»* rival of Gabriel Dnise for 1^\"\"\"' ^T' the old-time the claimant whose fo^ii„hHl'^P °' *^^ Romanys, for genex^tionTwo^X^ Dx^^ \"^^ °' *''«' ^'\"^^ not Fawe. dying «lk to f^/*^.. ^«*ndancy-did whathehadffi^JJfoS^-nby^marriage ■ means",
         "? THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE 41 All these things had at one time been part of Gabriel Druse s covenant of Ufe, until one year in England, when i-!!? WT'''* y**\" °^ *8«' *»s taJ^en ill and would have t^' *l f * ?^* ^^'^y descended upon their camp. ! J J ! ^^ *° ^\" °*\" ^'\"^- and there nursed and tended her, giving her the best medical aid the world could produce, so that the girl lived, and with her passionate nature loved the Udy Banowdale as she might have loved her own mother, had that mother hved Md she had ever known her. And when the Lady Barrowdale sickened and died of -he same sickn^ which had n^rly been her own death, the promise she made then overrode aU other covenants made for her. She had S r^ f'^'v ^^y *''° ^ Siyen her own widowed, cluWless hfe for her own, that she would not remain a bipsy, that she would not marry a Gipsy; but that if ever die gave herself to any man if would be to a Gorgio, a European, who travelled oftenest \"the open road \" leading to his own door. The years which had passed sm«! those tragic days m Gloucestershire had seeV^ shadoy^of that dark episode pass, but the pledge had remained; and Gabriel Druse had kept his W to the dead, because of the vow made to the woman who had given her hfe for the life of a Romany lass. The Romany tribes of all the nations did not know why their Ry had hidden himself in the New World- they did not know that the girl had for ever forsworn thei^ lace, and would never become head of aU the Romanys. hfe «ath that of Jethro Fawe. But Jethro Fawe had come to claim his own. fin«°* ^^J'\"? ^^™*''' \"y\"^ *°\"°*'^ his own menacing h fL!\" •u^^^'P insistence. In the past such a look had been m his ey^ when he had sentenced men to death. h!iu*^wt* \"^'f^^y *''* sallows or the swori or the bullet, but they had died as commanded, and none had",
         "Ir a THE WORID FOR SAIE helilffidtlT^^^ . '^^'^ consuming him, though iXSrCanTJ'^P\"*- \" S»\u003ee has cha„g«i. ^e ^I have seen her, and her beauty is like the rose and the an ,m\u003eeasy note in the commandtag tonT * ^ I have seen her three times of late, and the last tim» T oTci^or. \" '\"\"^ °' ^^ ^^--''- ^-\u003c^e t^^^^^ he^d notrak\"5f'lS ''n.'^''^- \"\"* ^°' ^ ~t fonoinrCa'^on^rrarhStr^Je^^ri^^- ^\"^^ a^s Of a Gorgio of Lebanl-LS^is Ws^n^e •\" **",
         "ship-tftSle^rthSlt^eSj^rS^^^ THE COMING OF JETHRO FAWE iS c ^^u\"^'\" *\"•\" ^™» ™\"*' with l\u003eM\u003eds clenching. J^l VT! \"^ *•*'•* aU he had seen, andZ- Boibed how he had run aU the way-four miIe»-ftom CMllon amving before Fleda and her Indian escort. it Z^^y, ^'^ *'^^*'* ^ **''• shrinking, as he told IL^^ fiercene^ of his chief, when a voice called from the direction of the house. \" Father— father,\" it cried. A clmge passed over the old man's face. It cleared as the face of the sun clears when a cloud drives past and ^.,tf °*', Preformation was startling. Without turther glance at his companion he moved swiftly towards the house. Once more Fleda's voice called, aid before he could answer they were face to face. J^J^^ '^''^* ^^ '\"^*'' '^^ «*■»«» not apprehen- ;; You have heard ?\" she asked reading her father's face. \" Tf fh ^* -r^'. ?*^* y°\" °° •'«'\"* '\" ^^ answered. It tne Rapids had drowned you I\" She came close to him and ran her fingers through his ^d^tenderly. 1 was not bom to be drowned^she Now that she was a long distance from Ingolby, the fact that a man had held her in his arms left no shadow of the Rapids. She tossed a hand affectionately towarfs Tekewani and his braves. \"ffwe./\" said Gabriel Druse, and made a gesture of salutation to the Indian chief. \" How r answered Tekewani, and raised his arm high in response. An instant afterwards Tekewani and his loUowers were gone their ways. Suddenly Fleda's eyes rested on the young Romany who was now standing at a little distance away. Appre- hension came to her face. She felt her heart stand",
         "rtill ** THE WORLD FOR SALE «er lather turned sharply A «fn™ *u . katti, \" '^ • J^ '\"•ta.a,\" unmd",
         "h^l„ CHAPTER V \" BY THB WVEK STAMKE it WAS 80 DONE \" THERE yna absolute sUence for a moment. The two men fiMd then: gaze upon the girl. The fear which naa arst come to her face passed suddenly, and a wiU new-bom and fearless, possessed it. YestenJay this will tad been only a trembling, undisciplined force, but since tlien she had been passed through the tests which her own soul, or Destiny, had set for her, and she had emerged a woman, confident and understanding, if tremulous. In days gone by her adventurous, lonely spirit had driven her to the prairies, savagely riding her Indian pony through the streets of Maniton and out on the North Trail, or south through coidies, or westward into the great woods, looking for what she never found. Her spirit was no longer the vague thing driving here and thMe with pleasant torture. It had found freedom and light; what the Romany folk call its own ton, its home, though it be but home of each day's trek. That wild spint was now a force which understood itself in a new if uncompleted way. It was a sword free from its scabbard. The adventure of the Carillon Rapids had been a kind of dehverance of an unborn thing which, desiring the overworld, had found it. A few hours ago the face of Ingolby, as she waked to consciousness in his arms, had taught her something suddenly; and the face of FeHx Marchand had taught her even more. Something new and strange had happened to her, and her father's uncouth but piercing mind saw the change in her. Her quick",
         "'I* *\" THE WORLD FOR SALE J»\u003em. called on caMo^ i* ^- *T\"*^ \"'* \"^^ «»«»K«d from pas^on^ ^J^t^K ''^* **\"* *• ^ good sense had C wi\"*\"^**\"\"\" «•\u003c» « some womS's^wSd ^ere'lh .\"\"^P* '»\"* °' «Wl\u003cU\u003eood into a a world how m^Ly 7hot,T,rr ^'^^^ '\"»«•'' •\u003eefore! here in a flash, also she^, Ti*f \"\" *•»* '\"tu«; and to a time be«^':^ ^^^P* '''« a wind back ;gai„ dim, distant time wCshTlivIfl T.\"\"*\"\" \u003c=W]dhood_a in the field or the vI^S )lf '^'^ ''** '\"'^ *'ept forever or on the edge of hlm^t Vh ^\"^' '^'*' *''* ^^''' strong armfor ifTStJ Jtirl?\" '^'' ^ ««^«\u003e « horse cantered down aXe iS °* * \"^* •\u003e'««* as a blooms never seersin.ffh^.'^thr \"^\"\"u* ''^- '^^ into that distant, unrej worTd bv^h T *^'*** »'»'=k Romany standing beside^a^nnl 7 \" ^«\"» °* » young some wild dweller of the jZleblT? ■S'^ '*\" *«« n«te back to the lair sheSfoSn^^ \"^ '\"'\" «-*« Fawfr.;ir '\" \"\" '\"•'\"''^ '\" *« -^ Jethro - offiptTotLTaieri^ 'o ^ «P«t. for he every relatio^p of w\" iWf^f ^^T *^ P^ \"^ its expression of fhe ind^Su \"^\"^ '^'^ \"' ''^«««°°. RoumeliancounCitw^i^do^..^'\"* ^^'^^''^ ^ the \" You were sealed to mj ^ m^Rv V'\"\"- '^^'''''^^y- you will remember, if you ^ ™L Z- f \" ^°'^' ^^ as , u yon nx your mmd upon it. ft",
         ",^ \" BY THE RIVER STARZKE \" 47 ^^J^ 1^ of Starzke three leagues, under the brown tte sun TOS by a quarter of its course. It haoDened before my father's tent, the tent of LeSJ^ Fawe^C you and I were sealed before our Romany folk ForS tho«and pounds which my father gave to yo„ LIS With a swift gesture she stopped him. WaUdng close up to h.m, she looked him fuU i„ tie eyes. C«*wa,^ contemptuous pride in her face whid, forcwl hiT^to lower his eyelids sulkily. ^™ *\" thfj\" *•\u003e«'«' have understood a torrent of words-to him £S tri i'^Vf^''*'^ *'\"' *\"•« ^\"« »' the situ^tS but this dBdamful oomposuns embarrassed him. He had ~me prepared for trouble and difficulty, but he £ rather more determination than most of his cIm^ mH people, and his spirit of adventure was hig^ £ tS mg her from her father, according to the pledge and bond Me and he had nsked that before. Ihis old man the Sitd'^j'^r ^ '\"^ \"^ *^* '\u003e'^^ of theTrt^: which had been his own father's and he had the loeic of lucre which is the most convincing ofTu lojc ^Yet ™n^*'\"' fw^\"^^« ^ 'y^ co.Landingly,^he S Zl^Z^^l^'r\" \"'^\"« \"\"^^ *an a Ro^many C to RnT, \"' ,*\" f ^^^^^\"^S ftom Romany jL^ roK T?^'' P^P'\"' ^S ^d 1««*n of them aU wh«n Gabnel Druse had passed away^ Fleda Druse ^uldl^ a queen of queens, but there was that queenliness in her ^1„ v.^ \"\"^ Romany-something which ^L Sr'ntm.^ '^''' ^\"\"^ \"^^ ^ '^^-^^ \u003c\u003e^^*-» V=^, ?\" ^^ T^\"\"' *\" '** \" '^ as he described it. Vaguely, cloudily, the scene passed before her.",
         "Now *• THE WORLD FOR SALE «■«», and wooded hill, and tent, and honemw, 3 •halting, and a lad that hdd her hand, ^Tn^ tZT^ ^1!, thew head,, and galloping and ,houting, and Itant at„r \"T' '^..'\"\"y \"««' and women p?h«ed about a tent, and a wailing thereafter. After which, in her faint remembrance, there Memed to faU a mirt, ind ^5*?**.^ Wankne», and then a starting up from a bed. A ?1? 5°'\"\"'y wagon fuU of it, hou«shold thing,. tad become hving memones, and die knew that he had T^Z ♦'i* *™*'\u003e-.ancl that these fleeting things ^ Kr. p '\"' \"^'\"^ *° J'*\"^ F\"*' and theXtH iZ^IVT'J^ *\"\" ''\"™^« »* »\" that belong^ to Wm m that last ntual of Romany faieweU to the dbad. ,l«™L^*!u\"°* l^* '•'• ^ •*•\" bargained for Ulce any f^^ K ^\"^^ *''°'^d* pounds. How far away it aU ^1^' 7^ ^\"^\"\"^ \"^ \"'^\"\"■\"K ' Yet here it iu wa, wUmg up like a flood to her feet, to bear her away intT^ P«t with It, «\u003erdidnes, and vagabondage, howevw gilded and graded above the lowest Vagabondage. Here at Manitou she had tasted a free Ufe which was not vagabondage, the passion of the open road which ^ d^fi,!l * *•*, '^ ^\"'' '^'°° o* the law and a defl^ce of soaal ostracism. Here she and her father W ^^.'\"k'^ atmosphere of esteem touched by mystery. o^nT *^ susp'cion; here civilization in it, most elastic orgamzation aad flexible conventions, had laid its hold upon her, had done in this expansive, loosely knitted social system what could never have been accomplished L K\".V\".^°1^°' ^^°^' ^'^- \"^ New York. She had had here the old free life of the road, so full",
         "of \" BY THE RIVER STARZKE •• 49 h^rJH* \"' **'*P woods-the song oi riven, the carol of bWs. the mumunng of trees, the mysterious and devout whisperings of the night, the happy wmmuninS oS market-place, the sound of church bells acrL a vau\" STes of^riZ :;\"' «?\"\"'\"8» \"\"d noshing torrentTth^' SL .hL^ \"*? ,'^'*' *''• *'\"'' '^ '\"'h of rain! the sharp paw of frost, and the agonies of some tost traveller rescued from the wide i^lemencv, the St Z^^ '\"\"'.*Kf ^^ °' ^^^ P^8ed air, Ld \"' r^y fingered mom blinking bUthely at the world. TT.e^i'i We of the open road she had had here without anythtae ^.l^'S'thf ,rr\"' '\"1 '*^ -P-teness, itsSrf! \"mmSy.'\"' ''\"''\"\"\"^ '\"''*' °' '''* '«'' -Sanized Wild moments there had been of late years when she lodged for the fa^ of Romany folk gathered aC Z fi«, while some Romany pral drew ^ hearts with the S^l°' \"*\" ^!i'=^'\"*'- ^«» Ambrose or GildCy or Chmto responded to the pleadings of some sentimlnt^ lass, and sang to the harpist's strings- '*\"^'™'«a' Sm w°'\"»k*''S **\"■' O\"\" »\u003ey t™e love Cold blow the drops of rain- I never, never had but one iweetheart ■ In the green wood he wa« slain,\" Md to cries of •• Again ! Aybor/ again 1\" the blacknived lover, hypnotizing himself into aiTecstasy. poiS^ oS «ce and i^ssion and war with the law, in t^ie'TiTGi^y ^L^'^ \"„'™« *'°\"' Transylvania to Yetholm^^ Carnarvon or Vancouver— '^'••\"uii 01 \" Time was I went to my true tovo lime was she came to mc \" The sharp passion which moved her now as she stood before Jethro Fawe would not have been so acute y^t^ day; but toKiay-^e had lain in a Gorgio's d toSy-",
         "\u003e W THE WORLD FOR SALE and though he was nothing to her, he was still a Gorgio wL^tTst'h\"^ \"^^ man before her-**, Husbant was at best but a man of the hedges and the byre and the clay-pit. the quarry and the wood; a nomid with no home, nothing that belonged to what she was now a part of-orgamzed, collective existence, the life of the house^weller, not the life of the tan. the *\u003c,^« a^d the vcUgauns-tbe tent, the blanket, and the faiT T *., \"T \"«^\" '»'»8ht, and I was never sold,\" she said to iLlhrL^r* ** ^r^~\" \"°* '\"' *•\u003e'•* ^•'\"'^^\"d pounds, not K™Fawer'°'°\"\"\"'~'^'''^^- I-^^'^-t-neweU, ■' You are mine-it was so done seventeen years ago,\" he answered, defiantly and tenaciously. \"I was three years old, seventeen years ago,\" she returned qmetly, but her eyes forced his to look kt her when they turned away as though their light hurt b:m ' people. It has been so, and it will be so while there is a Komany tent standing or moving on \" In his rage Gabriel Druse could keep silence no longer. R^e, what have you to say of such things ?\" he growled. \"I am the head of all. I pass the w^ and thmgs are so and so. By long and by last if I nask th« J^ ?f TV '?.« *^y ^°' °^'^t- It *i\" be longer' ^ing back. Let him have his say. It is his capit^! He has only breath and beauty.\" Jethro shrank from the sharp irony of her tongue as he wouU not have shrunk before her father's violent BHin^ rejection was m her tones. He knew dimly that the thmg he shrank from belonged to nothing Romany",
         "in if I \"BY THE RIVER STARZKE. Only breath and beautv i\" .1,. t j ' j could laugh at luTh^l^I ^ ^^- \"^^ t^at she « was il?r ^S.r^lwT,'!^:!^ l^^ P««' that there was raeeinhri,Jlr \"\"^^^ ^* 'claims. Now bring, yet that f b^Js^ wKv^^f .^\"i^.\" '^ \"^ ' purse has made my Rv^^-Tffl^y father had in his Gabriel I\u003eruse-'.Ld'^Su;:'*\u0026:^''°''**°*«*- my father did, true to my ^man^S^''*\" \"^ T' '^ the sun and the fatni«ts «/ \u002b», c 1 J f™- The wind and am. and nev^ta m^^:'^,^ TL tC °^'' \"« -»«* ' have the breath and the Sautv t.t'^t \"! '^ P\"'\"' You gold also; and what you s^ ^h f V ''\"* y°\" ^\"\"^ *\u003c» by the Romanyfew^s^d ft^^n if* T ^^* ^ \"^^o and by last.\" *^ **\"« *» \"e. by long Fleda turned quietly to her father \" K •♦ 1 . con«;ming the three thousand ^S ^ve if to h *\"! let him go. It will buy him w^L wnn,V ^ '^^ by what he is.\" '\"' *'\"^\u003c* °ever get The old man flashed a laaV «* .-_ «=^ empty, he shaS eo er^tl f ^' \"P°\" ^^- \" He his insoS bastSSt'^m^e^d^.T\"^'*'' his eyes skimied, or hTshaSLte no ^th'* ^ ^ to return. I am Gabrii^l iC- 1 _, *^ '^tb which people in all tTe SS'f^^ehel^^ ^t^°'^y across the seas and back a*»^ • JT,? .,^ ^'^' and He paused, rX^^ fT^'*\"'* '\"^\"^\"^''aUbedone.- added. \"When I re^ ;„ ^' \"1\"* ^ **\" do,\" he ^s matter^-^hJ T^l^S^ J^ diS 1' :hVi:?t?nt4!^' ' ^ «- *» -^^:",
         "«S: « THE WORLD FOR SALE \"r ^f ly^ ^^ ^\"\"8 \"^ eagerly. t„ „♦ .?^ ' \"\"y** ^'«^- \" When I retnm as I wiU The girl stopped him. \" It shall be when it shall be o^ ^tu hV° *\" T'''^ \"\"' '^y ^\" »5? my v^ V. i,^\" ^*ve \"^\"ght to do with any Romany law Not by Starzke shall the matter be dealt with bS? here' me Xf:^ ''«''^'=- ™s Romany has no ciaS u^ me^ My wUl is my own; I myself and no other shaU choose my husband, and he will never be a Romany.\" subtle look, submergmg the sulkiness which had fill^ Sh Jr he^sIIdT*^ *\" ^P^^^' '^' ^^^-^- At last \"For seventeen years I have kept the faith. I was ^ed o you and I hold by the seing. Wherever y^ I read the Gorgio books; I made ready for this day I ^Z fn th\"\" ^.\" *\"'' '^' ^''y ''y S*^^l«' \"l^e the young I taew that when I saw you again the brown eyes 3 ^browner the words at the lips would be sweJ'r^^S l\\u^ \" ^ ^ '•\"^\"^ ^°^ t^ie* long years. 1 was ever f^thful. By mght and day I saw you as^ou wl« when Romany law made you mine for ever. noXd forward to the day when I would take you to mTton and there we two would \" J- \" lo my tan. A flush sprang suddenly to Fleda Dmso'.! fe~ *i, I know you are one. 1 have not heard, but I kSow-^ know that you have had a hundred love;, and b^nTrue to none. The red scarfe you have given o the R^ ■ - ^.",
         "- \"BY THE RIVER STARZKE. . \" S8 ^1 *i^ SS S '^ ^\"^ -\u003e- * *-* ^o^ an the face and his «vm fili2? * \"* **'*?* a\"°» Ws He laughed in his anger. \"Is onlv t»,« ^ • . embrace the Romany lass? o„« « j, ^ . ^'S*\" *° his arms down t\"ere at^o?'^\"\"^^^ -»« '^.-^V i\" TTie old song tells the endSt^^''\"' ' '^ \"\"\"^ '* ^oes ! f)K^^° li;'rr^ '---wood tree. 'Time was I went to my true love Time was she came to me • •• his\":rS?::o°;sMo £rSv'^tr\"\"-^\"''^pp^'« draw a weapon was iteJ ^ m^ '''^' \"'°*'°\" *\u003c\u003e the \"breath and beaut^\" of TethL f! ^ \"^P'",
         "'^'* M THE WOKLD FOR SALE ''^1?^^^ she whUpered, awestricken. iJead ? The old man felt the breast of the nnr«n jaous man. He smUed grimly. \" He^ I,li™ T* f* be dead.\" 6\"\"\"y. ae is lucky not to J What shall we do ?■• the girl asked again vrith a white movSt^y\"^ ^'^^ ^'^'-'^ '\" '\"^ '^^ --0-ly. as he \"To the hut in the juniper wood,\" he answered She watched till he hS disap^arrf^^^i, li,„n burden into the depths of the t?^. Iti^ she t^ and went slowly towards the house ^^",
         "i CHAPTER VI THE UNGUARDED FIRES T^E public knew well that Ingolby had solved his biggest business problem, because thiM offices ofthr^ railways-one big and two small-^uddeSy beca^ M»n!f™ ?' °\"°7*^ ''y *''»'^y ''\"'^ indignation af S^Il orthe't'ffT °°^ \"'\"\"\"'^ *° ^^-°»: «W« ^^^. .^ i****' ^^\"^\"g P™^ed cantankerous, wer# promptly retired. As they were French Canadians thei? retirement became a public matter in Manitou Td Wot fresh quarrel between the rival towns ^ St atTnS'hoJlvr \"°* ^\"*\"* ^° «-* '\"^ -\"- r,)!^\"\"* *\"'* '^''u'^y been collision between his own S^ K^Tu ^^ *« \"^«™«n f^™ Manitou, whom Fe^ M^d^d had bribed to cause trouble: twokl^Z mtn had been seriously hurt, and feeling ran high. InZbVs HfloT:^^..^^' *^^\" ^« ^^^ MarchandVugS S He ^thed the dissolute fellow, but he realized now ^at his foe was a factor to be reckoned with, for M^^h^d had plenty of money as well as a bad nature. He\"awS. w\u003c^^m for a big fight with Manitou, and he had to think So this time he went pigeon-shooting. A, ft «°* ^%P*e«°\"S' and the slaughter did him good As though m keeping with the situadon, he shot ontofh",
         "1« M THE WORLD FOR SALE bim near to Gabriel Druse's ho^ * '* ^°'^^ \"\"\"« r,rfM ^\"\"^ T\"\" ^^^'^ \"\"^y twice since the episode at Canllon. and met her only once, and that was but fcr^ of g^r P''^\"*-P~P'« -''° •''y i\" wait for cniS wrpi?£irtre^ s^mSS-^l;- r.: awlt^ O^ly^M Mother TTnbadTau/wri^' rf»:!^ that sees, caught a look in Fleda's eyes, a warm \u0026ho\"i tt iSSet ^\"'^'''\" -—1 wisr^ n^tZo he««:::^\" '\" '*\"^ \" ^''^•'\" ^'\u003c^*«« « t'^^y were h.r/^*^-^ ^u \"*^' **\"'\"' '\"^''*'\"« ?\" asked the old white- headed pnest his eyes quizzically following Heda c-?' rthe's;^^' -\"^ ^•'^ -- »- '^^-^-",
         "t^-'s THE UNGUARDED FIRES 67 \"I'm not so sure,\" mused the priest. Smiling, he raised his hat as he caught Fleda's eyes. He made as if to go towards her, but something in her look held him back. He realized that Fleda did not wish to speak with him, and that she was even hurrying away from her father, who lumbered through the crowd as though unconscious of them all. Presently Monseigneur Lourde saw Fleda leave the Fete and take the road towards home. There was a sense of excitement in her motions, and he also had seen that tremulous, embarrassed look in her eyes. It puzzled him. He did not connect it wholly with Ingolby as Madame Thibadeau had done. He had lived so long among primi-tive people that he was more accustomed to study faces than find the truth from words, and he had always been oonsaous that this girl, educated and even intellectual, was at heart as primitive as the wildest daughter of the tepees of the North. There was also in her something of that mystery which belongs to the universal itiner-ary—that cosmopoUtan something which is the native human. \" She has far to go,\" the priest said to himself as he turned to greet Ingolby with a smile, bright and shy, but gravely reproachful, too. This happened on the day before the collision between the railway-men and the river-drivers, and the old priest abeady knew what trouble was afoot. There was Uttle Felix Marchand did which was hidden from him. He made his way to Ingolby to warn him. As Ingolby now walked in the woods towards Gabriel Druse's house, he recalled one striking phrase used by the aged priest in reference to the closing of the railway offices \" When you strike your camp, put out the fires.\" was the aphorism. Ingolby stopped humming to himself as the",
         "words 08 THE WORLD FOR SALE the ca^p-i^es.'^fi whS'tr;::s' *:?* \"^ \"°* P»* «\u003e«» Starzke aune arain in ;♦ • '^\" *'°\"« ''V *l\u003ee River unsuarf^4^C„'^^^^Womtedtime. Thl^tJ^, tag witl, anS^Sm th *^^*'V^*«'» «\u003c» ruin. foUow buiHed it. ^ ^\"^ *••* \"^^-^tag ^«t of those who Gabriel Drug's homr KT\"^' ^f\" \"^ ^'^'^ '\"^ thick, and here a„rthere^rih \"^Z^' \"\"^ ^^^ impenetrable. Few dm^u °° ' '1** '* *** \"^ost It belonged in gi^TeS t„ r ^?^°^^ this wood, part toThe hS? \u0026.?rl ''\"'' ^- \"\"* '» l«»«r and as the laM^J n^^ ^^^l^^ *^ Govermnent; there was pl^tv^ n™ • -^^^ *\"\" \" *\"\" «=l«ar«l. a«d neither stick S stnTm^tl*\" \"^ '^' '''\"^ ^^'^ were very lonelv S \"^! ^ wmoved, these woods was none ever 2e,S it'lC t^k f''\"\" ^\"'\"^ was no roadway leading anyXre^nt „ ^ ' «*\"*' *'''\" path, used in the old davs^ t'h \"\"V^ \"\" overgrown wWchlngolby trod liSC sit\"\" ^* '\"^ ^\"^ Path thehght breakinglKhtLtr ' '^\"^ ^ «ros. of him. It was FlS Sht Mr T' '^'^* '» ^^^t came hurrying tow^ „S* \\*^ °°* ^\" ^^' and sh. brightly-ribb^^ed 1? Sl^; ^\"^ r*'' ''*\"'' '^\"*' a seemed'^part of the w«\u003ei TJm'\" '\"I!\" ^«*»- She *^ *°°^' »*« W\"'^ simplicity, its",
         "depth. THE UNGUARDED FIRES 09 lt« cokmr— already Autnmn was crimsoning the leaves, touching them with amber tints, making the woodland warm and land. She wore a dress of golden brown which matched her hair, and at her throat was a black velvet ribbon with a brooch of antique paste which flashed the light like diamonds, but more softly. Suddenly, as she came on, she stopped and raised her head in a listening attitude, her eyes opening wide as if listening, too— it was as though she heard with them as well; alive to catch sounds which evaded capture. She was like some creature of an ancient wood with its own secret and immemorial history which the world could never faiow. There was that in her face which did not belong to civilization or to that fighting world of which Ingolby was so eager a factor. All the generations of the wood and road, the combe and the river, the quarry and the secluded boscage were in her look. There was that about her which was at once elusive and primevally real. She was not of those who would be lost in the dust of futility. Whatever she was, she was an independent atom in the mass of the world's breeding. Perhaps it was consciousness of the dynamic quality in the girl, her nearness to naked nature, which made Madame Bulteel say that she would \" have a history.\" If she got twisted as she came wayfaring, if her mind became possessed of a false passion or purpose which she thought a true one, then tragedy would await her. Vet in this quiet wood so near to the centuries that were before Adam was, she looked like a spirit of comedy listen-ing till the Spirit of the Wood should break the silence. Ingolby felt his blood beat faster. He had a feeling that he was looking at a wood-nymph who might flash out of his vision as a mere fantasy of the nfind. There shot through him the strangest feeUng that if she were his, he would be linked with something alien to the world of which be",
         "was. 60 THE WORLD FOR SALE f«isti„gly against W„, a^ he h^te^T* J\"* ^'-^^ \"\"' knew that he would hav^to „ u'^.u'\"'' ^°'^ ••» boat, he life if he meant not tol,\" m^ ^''^ ?'^*^* ^' o^ h\" acquaintance, so toucK; ^-\"0^ a'nH*''\" **\"' \"\"'^ was, maybe, somewhat senLTonal T '°\"^'^- \"« \u003en its present restrict^i Ti'^'J\"^ ''^'*' h^d, even romance, with its revenTs ^' -^ \"Pe^tacular; but impulses and its blind adventi^es hln '\"\"\"\"^i'-inss, its of his existence. \"\"ventures, had not been any part invoL\"ntIi^Iy,hadi!!'4S'him*^ ''^^ '''^*' ^\"lontarily or had sparkled to h^^gSces '.IJh'.v\" *''.'' ^* ''y^^ *hich head of hers was not tTe o^v oJ h' *\"TPhant Titian he had taken her hand at ^heVrnu'/^i' ^\"- When long and warm and fine had fo^T ^^**' ^'' \"\"K'\". singular confidence, an^owl t T^- ^' °^ '^th a and now as he watted E^te^r^'^r? ^\"«»\u003clliness; thing?-hesawherhandstr^trh??^~?'' '^\"^ ^'^ ^-me- sU»ce, the '. hush \u003e\" of'^^ S^ \" t^f ^ ™-««»8 This assniedlv was n«t *k . ,'\"6 gesture. lipids, for ^it^^:ziriT^'T'''^^n w^ptt^nS^aKaSt ^^^r-- which she waited- huthl.f\\^^ \"°*« of song for jook gave way to ^ntm'^at'distrsf ■^\"•^, *^^ -P* the wood-nymph underwent tral VV- V ^he fantasy of she was now liL a mSlhThaSn\". w\"«°'''^'^ \"^'^^' at immortal dictate was ret^;^ ^^ '^\" transformed, .To heighten the iilus^n^T'tWhf'.^ '*f* \"«''■\"• smgmg in the depths of the w^d r ^\\^^\"^ '^'\"t h.s ears for a moment, and tor^h;^ ^\"* '^^ ^^\"'^ to - that it was really sin^n^' I^r^K^^^-",
         "Je THE UNGUARDED FIRES and when be saw Fleda's face i •1 „ — , ..-J fresh evidence that his senses had not deceived him. After all, it was not strange that some one should be singing in that deepest wood beyond. Now Fleda moved forward towards where he stood, quickening her footsteps as though remembering some-thing she must do. He stepped out into the path and came to meet her. She heard his footsteps, saw him, and stood still abruptly. She did not make a sound, but a hand went to her bosom quickly, as though to quiet her heart or to steady herself. He had broken suddenly upon her intent thoughts, he had startled her as she had been seldom startled, for all her childhood training had been towards self possession before surprise and danger. This is not your side of the Sagalac,\" she said with a half -smile, regaining composure. \" That is in dispute,\" he answered gaily. \" I want to belong to both sides of the Sagalac, I want both sides to belong to each other so that either side shall not be my side or your side, or \" \" Or Monsieur Felix Marchand's side,\" she interrupted meaningly. \" Oh, he's on the outside I\" snapped the fighter, with a hardening mouth. She did not reply at once, but put her hat on, and tied the ribbons loosely under her chin, looking thoughtfully into the distance. \" Is that the Western slang for saying he belongs no-where ?\" she asked. \" Nowhere here,\" he answered with a grim twist to the comer of his mouth, his eyes half-closing with sulky meaning. \" Won't you sit down ?\" he added quickly, in a more sprightly tone, for he saw she was about to move on. He motioned towards a log lying beside the path and kicked some branches out of the",
         "way. • THE WORU) FOR SALE ^Yo«^ don't iik, Fdix M«ch«.d?\" ^ ^^ \" No. Do yon ?\" tlun is needed with a3hv^Je H K^fu \"\"\"• «»'»**y but he had not surprised tJ^J^«« »«'»•-«' ««\u003cl«cio«i •lightly, and he tho^hj ^ t^^' ^^^ ^'' \"'\"^ «»• 'o^.'-i - lilce vei:et^:4,'';f„k°Xr° •'^ \"\"* ago/S^rnl,*\" ^'^^ Oi^-i^iion not ion, -kedSy.^^^dfdnor\" °\u003e\"y «»«» «3™nJc?\" he voi^so'undiso^^Jllt^t^l\" ■\" '\"'^'=^' »«* '•^ in h«7onr.^';S; Xr^ ^^^ » \"*«• ^^ of deiUnc, \"Where?-' he queried recldessly. side.^ ^banon,\" she retorted, \"m Leba«,n-yo«r Spirit of the vSr^N^wsir'^P'\" '\"'*''' ^\"S\"^*^ a chan,ois-lil« aleXess wd a L\"^ *'^' •\"\"\"J\"^*' '^tb \"Now I Ifflow XT' H^H ^^\"J« ^80ur. -usingiy. \" In Mt^^„„'i^^„^„''^ -«s/' he replied ' ■•n^STharthr '-F\"S-^t^\"^^^^ -t,^?K:r1h?S:;^-' --\"^ -",
         "-ioined, THE UNGUARDED FIRES M JlJ*i„T **\"*\"• •» •*\u003e^ \" t»»»t ?\" the uM. unnM. ment in her eyas. •• So iharp 1 can feel the point when I can't see it,\" he »f'™^if^.Ji *'\"'*'\" *• \"^^ ^t\"* \" affectation of conceit. Of coune if you live in Ubanon you need surgery to make you feel a point.\" ^ ,*.' i**^ in— you have me,\" he remarked. .. J*!\" ^y \"• *° Manitou ?\" she asked provoWngly. ^^ Certamly not-only to yon. I said, ' You havem \u003e ' ' ■ ,. ST' ?!?\" *'^* ^ *° *'^* w'\"'* w°n't hurt you \" .. ^°'^''\" * y?\" »\"»« \"» ?\" he asked in a softening tone. «. Jr \"uV^^y ^'^^ *\"«'»•\" *• \"\"'\"ered with sudden ra^ty Hurt you ? I owe you what 1 cannot pay sudSy'Sr^^\"\" '\"' \"'»•\" •'' \"^\"^^^ ^- '^ *- \"Agam you are playing with woids-and with me\" ner eyw. Did he thmk that he could say a thing of that S^ hi,!^'\"''^\" ^ P'**^ ' ^^ \u003e»« t^k that beca^ wLtI. 1,^*'.* «\"*** **'^«'' h\" \u003c»\"ld say casually sJf .^^ »°?-^ *•• *•\"* \"^'^ «'°'°«»t* o* existence ? r„d J^ '* ^™u *'**' \"^'\"8 indignation, but there suddenly came to her the conviction that he had not ^^nt^A '^°\"- \"\"^ «*\"'^*'^- *»\"* '^^ ^°^ hi\" the t'Xli^fa^r\"*^ \"°* *\" •\" '\"'\"\"^ •'\u003e' *''• p'-- - presently. Yet there's many a true word spoken in jest.\" waT^jrf * °\"\"°«*'* «\"•»«• She realized th^t he ^g advantage of the thing which must ever be a bond oetwewi them, whatever came of Ufe. When she",
         "had 64 THE WORLD FOR SALE done TK.^ !r \" \"^\"^ *•\u003e*« any man had ever had Sled ;i^ P^\"'' '\" ^'\"\u003c* the thoughts of both asJ-^^tSdeSLLr-^'^'' '\"\"'' '-\"-'\" •'^ outriJ.t\"^Sli'h\"er^::t^ ^'\"\"f *^- ^^^ \u003e^\"«hed keenly roused— as thnncrt, it- *\"°^®\" when he was table.\" ^ '^ *\"® \"^\"^ \"pon the \" I don't know,\" she answered quietiv •• I \u003e,=..,« u",
         "j THE UNGUARDED FIRES 66 ever constructed anything ? \\tha.t did the building of a city or a country mean to a Romany chal or a Romany chi, they who lived from field to field, from common to moor, from barn to dty wall. A Romany tent or a Romany camp, with its families, was the whole territory of their enterprise, designs and patriotism. They saw the thousand places where cities could be made, and built their fires on the sites of them, and camped a day, and were gone, leaving them waiting and barren as before. They travelled through the new lands in America from the fringe of the Arctic to Patagonia, but they raised no roof-tree; they tilled no acre, opened no market, set up no tabernacle: they had neither home nor country. Fleda was the heir of all this, the product of generations of such vagabondage. Had the last few years given her the civic sense, the home sense ? From the influence of the Englishwoman, who had made her forsake the Romany life, had there come habits of mind in tune with the women of the Sagalac, who were helping to build so much more than their homes ? Since the incident of the Carillon Rapids she had changed, but what the change meant was yet in her imopened Book of Revelations. Yet something stirred in her which she had never felt before. She had come of a race of wayfarers, but the spirit of the builders touched her now. \" What are my plans ?\" Ingolby drew a long breath of satisfa :tion. \" Well, just here where we are will be seen a great thing. There's the Yukon and all its gold; there's the Peace River country and all its unploughed wheat -fields; there's the whole valley of the Sagalac, which alone can maintain twenty miUions of people; there's the East and the British people overseas who must have bread; there's China and Japan going to give up rice, and eat the wheatcn loaf; there's the U. S. A. with its _ hundred millions of people— it'll be that in a few years— and its exhausted wheat -fields; and here, right here, is",
         "S •• THE WORLD FOR SALE «d*'I!^*^'*ii*^^f ^'^-^O; peop^ \"\u003e\u003c» Manitou «fetributi„g centr*. I ^aSt to J V.^k^ wUl be the I'm not going to stay hlTtin^t^, *'\"' ^ ^^ right, to plan it alii, that it ^ 2^1 theT?^' \"\"* ' TS' a bigger thing somewhere ti^iS^tl,^^ \"\" \"^^ ^ got to come together- th^rm.,i. , *°*°^ ^\"\"^ I want to lay fhe 4e^' ^rT fi'sTh ''f ^•• capitalists to start DaDer-wnrtc • ^^y ^\"^ 6ot foundry, and a%LE;!°H kV Tf \"\"'\"« ^°'^- » beginning. That's^hv^vrn\"^ f factory-just the »i\u003cieofth'erivera„dSo;ihear\"° '^'\"'''^ °\" °- asked^^c;ldaj°\" *'\" ^*^«* *''°- ''^ctories?\" she vl course I It urac ^^^ t foolish enough to bu^anT^.n tK™^ P'^'' ^ *»^\"'* for the right people that hfdX\" \"y^\"' ^ '\"\"^ed and I let ihcm sweat-W thtm \"\"T^ ^'^ ^^^ »\u003erains, manufacturer; iTanlnv.nT \"'\"^} '* \"\"*' I\"\"- \"«* a the bridge over th\" nVer\" I^S^-\"** \" '\"^'^'•- ^ \"-\" She nodded. \" v»\u003c! *i,. u -j and.LhadhSL;:s^r!tr-r«'^^*^ -?rr4i--rrtS-----eme. monopoly, but it won't workrt Safwav It\"!!f»* \"\"T concentrate energy and save elbow-^eL ^ T^'^ \"^rvt'\"fK\"'^°*y^°^«\u003e*herthi^;T \"\"\"'\"* in th?:cr:nte':hoir r ^* -^-^^ -* -^y don't like that i^ Ma^touJl ™W/ystem, and they \" ITiey're rS^yTT^-.^^ ^^^^ ''\"\"J '\" =he urged\": s ' in a sense, he answered. •■ But",
         "the THE UNGUARDED FIRES 67 men will be employed at other things, which won't represent waste and capital overlapping. Overlapping capital hits everybody m the end. But who says all that ? Who raues the cry of ' wolf ' in Maniton ?\" T 1^,^°°^ \"\"'y I^P'* ^y '* °°W'\" *e answered, \" but I think Felix Marchand said it first. He is against you. and he is dangerous.\" He shrugged a shoulder. \" Oh, if any fool said it, it would be the same !\" he answered. \" That's a fire easily hghted; though it sometimes bums long and hard.\" He frowned, and a fighting look came into his face. \"Then you know all that is working against you in Maiutou— working harder than ever before ?\" \" I think I do, but I probably don't know all. Have you any special news about it ?\" \" Felix Marchand is spending money among the men. They are going on strike on your railways and in the milk.\" \" What mills— in Manitou ?\" he asked abruotlv \" In both towns.\" He laughed harshly. \"That's a taU order,\" he said sharply. \" Both towns— I don't think so, not yet.\" '■ A sympathetic strike is what he calls it,\" she rejoined. \" Yes, a row over some imagined grievance on the raU- way, and aU the men in all the factories to strike— that's the new game of the modem labour agitator ! Marchand has been traveUing in France,\" he added disdainfuUy but he has brought his goods to the wrong shop. What do the priests— what does Monseigneur Lourde say to it aU ?\" \" I am not a CathoUc,\" she replied gravely. \" I've heard, though, that Monseigneur is trying to stop the trouble. But \" She paused. '• Yes— i«//\u003e\" he asked. \"What were you going to say ?\" But there are many roughs in Manitou, and Felix Marchand makes friends with them. I don't think the pnests will be able to help much in the end, and if it is to be Manitou against Lebanon, you can't expect a great dc. \"",
         "ill «8 THE WORLD FOR SALE »^L^VT^ T! *''\"\" ^ 8*t-generaUy less,\" he ta«a restlessly, fingenng the lock and the trigeer softlv ^l^a^m su.. Fehx Marchand ™ea„s you ^^Tt \" Personal harm ?\" \" Yes.\" He laughed sarcastically again. \"We are not in B.U6ar.a or Sk ,.\" he rejoined, his jaw hardening; \"and I can take care of myself. What makes you say he means per^nal harm ? Have you heard an\u0026g ?^' \"No, nothing, but I feel it is so. That Z at the Hosp.tal Fete he looked at you in a way Jhat Sd me. aces yJu'r^d ^r f \"'\". '° ^^^^P^\u003c^ ^^ some you and I do so. This has been lucky in a wav this meetmg. Please don't treat what IVe Jd lightly Your plans are m danger and yon also \" R„!!^fn *'\"',• P'^\"'^ \"\"^ fortune-telling instinct of the l?fy..^r \"■ ^\" ^\"^ ''\"^'dng involuntarily doinc that fa.thfuUy which her people did so faithlS nf darkness wbch comes from intense feeling had gather^ underneath her eyes, and gave them a look of pen^lenS e^Ut oSrieer ''- «'°- °^ ^« ^^-^ ^«^*^- ^^ My father heard here and there, and I also and some I got from old Madame nibad^u who isTfriend of mme. I talk with her more than with any one et\"J Mamtou. First she taught me how to crochet, bu she teaches me many other things, too \" Sh\"^ ^uV^^ \"l** ^'^ ^y ''^^- She is a character She would know a lot, that woman.\" \"acier. He paused, seemed about to speak, hesitated th»n after a moment hastily said. \" A SLute Jo",
         "yol's^Sk^ THE UNGUARDED FIRES ♦hoMS^ t '\"'*'\"'^ °* \u003e\"\"\" ''«=«• »' something like that. What IS your race ? Is it Irish, or-do you mind my askmg ? Your EngUsh is perfect, but there is some-thing—something \" She turned away her head, a flush spreading over her tace. She was unprepared for the question. No one had ever asked it directly of her since they had come to Manitou. Whatever speculation there had been, she had never been obliged to tell any one of what race she was. She spoke English with no perceptible accent, as she spoke Spanish, Itahan. French, Hungarian and Greek; and from tTTnl^H ^T. ^\" '^\"^ '\"\"^•''\"S \u003e'«\"^ different from the ordinary Western woman. Certainly she would have been considered pure English among the polyglot population of Manitou. What must she say ? What was it her duty to say ? She was hvmg the life of a British woman, she was as much a Gorgio m her daily existence as this man beside her. Mamtou was as much home-nay, it was a thousand times more hom^than the shifting habitat of the days when they wandered from the CSspians to John o' Groat^ com°„l J^'\"^ [u'\"\"^ °* '^^ P''^* ^''^ ^'^ removed i completely as though the tide had washed over them- ran the Carillon Rapids. That day saw her whole horizon ,tt' f ^ ^^ \"V}^ \"*\" ^'^ her enter on the stage of her life. And on that very day also came lethro Fawe out of the Past and demanded her return ■' „nl r a\\ '^\" * ^^ \"* ^^\"\"y- The old, panting unrealized, tempestuous longing was gone. She wal fs 3 :;:m LtT \"' ^^^^' ''' -'-' '^' ^ '^^^^ *° -^« What would happen if she told this man that she was a G,psy_the daughter of a Gipsy ruler, which wL no more than being head of a clan of the world's transits the leader of the world's nomads. Money-her flther' u",
         "■amisMm^^iis- W THE WORU) FOR SALE ^th^r'*^\\^T}~:T'^ \"\"\"\"^y- e°* '\" ways that could ^ ^ *''•' ^l^^f* *\"\"«^' y*'*' '^ the world ^unts things, nrt dishonestly; for more than one great minister ^a \"oUble country m Europe had commissioned him. more S^Srf.\"''n'?r'^^\"''''\"'''^'^™^''»'' there ^ trouble m the Balkans.\" or the \" sick m^n of Europe \" was worse or the Russian Bear came prowling. His SToTth '\"\"\" '^\";^^«t ^^i\u003c=e- when he lived th^ stable nl»l'''''\"\"r^ '^' \"P^\" '^'ehway. He had no stable place among the men of aU nations, and yet secret W 'Si ™5^te\"es and a language which was known W a,khara to Wandsworth, and from Waikiki to iSSr;'\"'' '''\"*^ °' ' '^\"'^' '=^°*''«'' ^^^^ ^th tn.Th' *!. \"^\"'«\u003c! t° t«\" this man beside her the whole fl^ ;r \"^7^^' •\"= *\"\"\"* ''°- \"«'°\"'\u003c^ he turn his fa^ away m dispst ? What had she a right to tell ? She knew well that her father would wish her to keep lu t^rCetSomiS ''' ''^''-'' ^'^^ * •-' gone itrtc\":' '\"' '°°'^' '™ '\" **\"= '^'^^ ^^^ «\"^ fhr''^K°°*u^\"'''~^ ^ ^'^^ ^\"^h?\" she asked quietly, though her heart was beating unevenly mrv^°\"\u003c;/°\"'' r'^ ^\"''^ *'^\" =^\"ything else, except, \"lliJn'ifT ^P'''^''''^'' *\" \"«'•\" *« \"\"^wered slowly, but no Irish or Hungarian blood.\" ^l^'^rr^ *•*•** \"\" '\" ^^ ^'^ spontaneously, as she watched him so mtently that the pulses throbbed at her temples. cJ^i.^'^Tfi *lr ''^° ^''^'' \"'6^* ''^^« announced her ongin defiantly, now her courage faUed her. She did not wish him to be prejudiced against her. \\*ell, weU.\" he added, \"I only just guessed at",
         "it, THE XJNGUARDED FIRES 71 because there's something unusual and strong in yon. not becavae your eyes are so dark and your hair so brown.\" Not because of my ' wUd beauty '—I thought you were gomg to say that.\" she added ironically and a Uttle defiantly. \" I got soxe verses by post the other day from one of your friends in Lebanon-a stock-rider I thmk he was, and they said I had a ' wild beauty ' and a savage sweetness.' \" He laughed, yet he suddenly saw her sensitive vigilance and by instinct he felt that she was watching for some sign of shock or disdain on his part; yet in truth he cared no more whether she had Gipsy blood in her than he would have done if she had said she was a daughter of the Czar. _ *• Men do write that kind of thing.\" he added cheerfully, but It s quite harmtess. There was a disease at college we called adjectivitis. Your poet friend had it. He could have left out the ' wild' and • savage ' and he'd have been pleasant, and truthful too— no, I apologize.\" He had seen her face darken under the compliment, and he hastened to put it right. \"I loved a Gipsy once,\" he added whunsically to divert attention from his mistake, and with so genuine a sympathy in his voice that she was disarmed. \" I was ten and she was fifty at least. Oh, a wonderful woman ! 1 had a boy friend, a fat. happy. Uttle joker he was; his name was Charley Long. Well, this woman was his aunt. When she moved through the town, people looked twice. She was tall and splendidly made, and her manner-oh, as if she owned the place. She did own a lot— she had more money than any one else thereabouts anyhow. It was the tallest kind of a holiday when Charley and I walked out to the big white house-goUy but It was white-to visit her ! We didn't eat mrJb. the day before we went to see her; and we didn't eat much the day after, either. She used to feed us— I wish a't; '",
         "..^nKK-atea?'«\u003ei*^ 72 THE WORLD FOR SALE foll^^^ ^ *\"'* \"°* ' ^ «=»\" «» her brown eyes SheT.? us about, f„M o' fire, but soft and kind, t^ her ^H \" '^^ *rP*'' *'\"'y ^^' but everybody Kked or;,\"Jrr„^'1'''^- She-dhadonegirrbutsLdied Cvntt^^hlr' *°* w P'\"« °\"* •\" •»«* *'»*»'«• Aunt cChr\" \"\" \"•'''* ** '=*^'«' J'*' ^^ na^e being hSf;:T%f\\°T.''r P^'\"* '^'*'b- She blamed nerself for it. She had had those fits \" goinR back to w^ tht ^ \"\"^P °''*- ^^ *»'' ' ' *-' strong, and it ri^t?n A f ^'.\"'=1, '^'^ *be wrong time of %ar-aU nghtin August and all wrong in October. as I knit^'^T \"\"'\"■ ''^\"\" ^\"^'^ ^'^tb Aunt Cynthy was e^er w^ or''i\"',i°°'J'' '^ y°\"\"Sste« as n'^one else thfreTof th?l ^- ^\" **^-*''''''« *\" \"^ \"Kht: and ever at! hJl ''^' *\"\" banquets. The firs? time I jW ^L?.^?°^ ^'^ V •\"'^ ?*\u003c=«• A little while ago. S^sJ^^he ZkT\"' 'i'^°''«'* °' '•«^- A hedgehog tTi^h,,? T \"' \"\"** '* brought those da^back ♦h.TT^^7 ^\"\"6 and Aunt Cynthy and all YeT £u^ m\"!- V'Z ^^''.•'^''eehog iTs in' Aunt cUS's ^^fTZ t ^''**'\"'' \"^y\"' b'^t it was grd !•• askeSawSne \"\"'\" \"\"' *°^ '^'''^\"•'\"S '' ^^ Mtr'^'\"\"'\" \"\"\" ^^P\"^'* •\"^t='\"\"y- \"That's right, JJ ^**',** ,'' \"«^bt,\" she answered, and her £ves had » far-a^ylook.buttherewasakindof\\roubkltrrn?outh ''S^rTon,''\"\"^\"^.'''*^^'^'^'^ '»'\"«'' breaths «se.n3pdta-^,tr-th;s.^---^^^ ,, Wha was the history of Aunt Cynthy",
         "?\" THE UNGUARDED FIRES able as a house. The old 73 — — ~. suddenly died on the farm ot Charley s uncle. In a month the uncle married the girl. She brought him thirty thousand dollars.\" Fleda knew that this man who had flied her spirit for the first time had told his childhood story to show her the view he took of her origin; but she did not Uke hun less for that, though she seemed to feel a chasm between them still. The new things moving in her were hke breezes that stir the trees, not like the wind turning the windmiU which grinds the corn She had scarcely yet begun to grind the com of life. She did not know where she was going, what she would find, or where the new trail would lead her. The Past dogged her footsteps, hung round her like the folds of a garment. Even as she rejected it, it asserted its power, troubled her, angered her, humiliated her, called to her. She was glad of tlus meeting with Ingolby. It had helped her. She had set out to do a thing she dreaded, and It was easier now than it would have been if they had not met. She had been on her way to the Hut in the Wood, and now the dread of the visit to Jethro Fawe had diminished. The last voice she would hear before she entered Jethro Fawe's prison was that of the man who represented to her, however vaguely, the life which met bt hei future-4he settled Ufe, the life of Society and not of the Saracen. After he had told his boyhood story they sat in sUence for a moment or two, then she rose, and, turning to him was about to speak. At that instant there came distinctly throofih the wood a faint, trilling sound. Her face paled a Itttie. and the words died upon her Ups. Ingolby, having turned his head as though to listen, did not see the change m her face, and she quickly regained her self-control. \" I heard that sound before,\" he said, \" and I thought from your look you heard it, too. It's funny It is singing, isn't it",
         "?\" 74 THE WORLD FOR SALE .. ™ j\"^ »\"• hew in the old dayi.\" j^ Jes, I was going there. I am a heathen, also, you «yo;r:L!;\".?4J:^?-;t-; « you-U show me how; things in my tira^\" ^ \"\" ''°\"* * '\"* «\" heathen ,. Mayn t I go with you ?- he asked slowly. TeSttfnTi uZ I'^'l \"\"\"\"'\" *« \"\"^wered had ever r^! * * ''\"' '\"\"» \"■« fi\"* English book she to Robinson Crus,L*\" h^ ^'J r*\" *'.''\"* \"\"V '«P~t» of his arm. \" n , t^ mlt ?^ *•*\" *\"\" '\"*° 'he hoUow \"Not to-day.'..'^si:etr?J''«^,;*'' ^-'\" '^^ -«^'^- ^^Aga.n the voice came through the ^oods. a little louder •' ft kr'^,';!'\\* '''\"•\" '«'«'\"\u003e-ked. An insLnf 'aftt s^hThS'\"\" *'* \"^^ °' '\"\"^ »«-*•\u003e-•\" took a step in her direcUon '^'' ^^S\"'\"' '^\"'^ ''• Suddenly she turned and came back t- him \"",
         "v CHAPTER VII IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE As Fleda wound her way through the deeper wood, remembering the things which had just been said between herself and Ingolby, the colour came and went in her face. To no man had she ever talked so long and intimately, not even in the iar-ofi days when she lived the Romany U(e. Then, as daughter of the head of all the Romanys, she had her place apart ; and the Romany lads had been few who had talked with her even as a child. Her father had jeatottsly guarded her until the time when she fell under the spell and influence of Lady Barrowdale. Here, by the Sagalac, she had moved among this polyglot people with an assurance of her own separateness which was the position of every girl in the West, but developed in her own case to the nth degree. Never before had she come so near — not to a man, but to what concerned a man; and never had a man come so near to her or what concerned her inmost life. It was not a question of opportunity or temptation — these always attend the footsteps of those who would adventure; but for long she had fenced herself round with restrictions of her own making; and the secrecy and strangeness of her father's course had made this not only possible, but in a sense imperative. The end to that had come. Gaiety, daring, passion, elation, depression, were alive in her now, and in a s\u003einse had found an outlet in a handful of days — indeed since the day when Jethro Fawe and Max Ingolby had cone",
         "7S MICROCOPY DESOtUTION TiST CHART (ANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No. 2| 1.0 |rl^ K^ A APPLIED IN/HGE li SB-^ 165J Eost Mom Street —^ Rochester, New York U609 USA -.^S (?16) 482 - 0300 - Phone ^= (716) 288 - 5989 -",
         "Fo. 70 THE WORLD FOR SALE evil. Sh/ would hlvfrlS if^ ''^\"^ '^^'\"^ ^- Jethro Fawe came for good \"'^ suggestion that aJr;„tigLtJrryxt^/-.^''^ '•^'^ \"- -i-- as though a nnJ» . ^ *\"\"* '\" tJ^e wood. It was her not^o LnTr far 13 r\" .'\"\"\" ''^'^ °Serd oi herself awaited ht ft AsTh *^'\\°T\"y '='''''\"-* was drawn towards him h/h h ^'^ J'*'''° '\"^^ ^he which she and Ingoibv had h^ /\"\"^ '^' Gipsy songs «ight have shouted for rpt?*.\"^'\"' '''''\"\"'=\"• «« the attention of some Jf k\" '^' ^\"^^ \"^ attracting and brought conLronan^dn'';^' \"\"* '° '\"\"\"\"^ ^«'«asf Druse; but that was not P'tff/v \"''\"''\"' *° ^^^\"^1 he was a Romany good ^ w i\"\"- ^'\"\"^^ ^\"\"^ '^^^ obey his Ry of Rvs tL L^ ' f^ '* ™= '^'^ ''uty to acknowledged. - Though kTf^ \"^' ^''''='\u003e '^' R°™ny he would have said ff tJ? \"\"t ^''7'\" ' ''\"'' *•'\"'\" in his stubborn wa; L made th^ '\"^ *\"' P''^^'^^= \"\"* the pivot of his own actLr If h mT^ \"' ♦^'^ P^'ase to face, he made no doubt that r\"'fv\"* '^'^^ ^'^'^^ '=»« to his advantage. He would nnf ''\"\"'*'\"\"g would accrue a struggle. '*^°\"''^ \"°' g'^e up the hunt without ins];JTh: Sr^otthe hran'dVl^!^\" '\"^ -^ -*- but had not spoken to him av^l '°=k«\u003cl him fast again, that his fate had not vet w ^ f \"^ \"'^\" ''\"* '° ^ay reply had been that he was Snot*'.™'\"'''- J-^***'\"'^ wait for what he came to girtLat^t 'l- *''\"* ^^ \"\"\"^^ U was his own. and God'or' 2vU could tt°*\"~\"^ ^\"^ ' thmg meant to be from tt,„ u ■ ■ \"°* P^vent the He did not hear Fkd, ^'^'T\"^ \"^ the world, to himself a song he £dTr.^*'^^^\"*'''«-='^«-ging the Romany was'heM Lhigrretnr\"^^7\\ ^'^^^ h^s own father had",
         "give/tJI^itrgHrXt IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 77 fighting for their independence, by admirable weapons of Gipsy workmanship, setting all the Gipsies in that part of the Balkans at work to supply them. This was the song he sang: \" He gave his soul for a thousand days, The sun was his in the sky. His feet were on the neck of the world He loved his Romany chi. \" He sold his soul for a thousand days. By her side to walk, in her arms to lie; His soul might burn, but her lips were his. And the heart of his Romany ohi.\" He repeated the last two lines into a rising note of exultation : \" His soul might burn, but her lips were his, And the heart of his Romany chi.\" The key suddenly turned in the lock, the door opened on the last words of the refrain, and, without hesitation, Fleda stepped inside, closing the door behind her. \" Mi Duvel, but who would think— ah, did you hear me call then ?\" he asked, rising from the plank couch where he had been sitting. He showed his teeth in a smile which was meant to be a welcome, but it had an involun-tary malice. \" I heard you singing,\" she answered composedly, \" but I do not come here because I'm called.\" \" But I do,\" he rejoined. \" You called me from over the seas, and I came. I was in the Balkans; there was trouble— Servia, Montenegro, and Austria were rattUng the fire-irons again, and there was I as my father was before me. But I heard you calling, and I came.\" \" You never heard me call, Jethro Fa we,\" she returned quietly. \" My calling of you is as silent as the singing of the stars, where you are concerned. And the stars do not sing.\" J. if! M I",
         "I 78 he THE WORLD FOR SALE responded withi t^ T J\"\" ''*\" J\"=* *•»« *»\"\u003e«■\" againsfthe waT, ' -^vfherrd ^TT\"''' ^\"\"^ P°='\"« the noise they make in fh^^ ^ •?*\" \"\"S- that's You don't hefr^fh !h '\"\"' '* '* ^ \"\"* ringing? .\"» b, ,.rbi riTss Sir- *\"' \"' '-\"■ ment. forced her inwU '■\"■ difference to his imprison- by the fact that he S tTher^bo'^r \"^^^^^ and blood apart fro^ hTs mn * \"\"f- ^^ *'^' °* ^''^n He was indeed suchTLn \"'°f*''.°\"^ \u003c=laim of marriage, could yield\"' wi S ™ He' hrd \" \" °' \"\"^\"^' ~° grace, that phv^cal hnndc ^\" '\"^'\"\"''\"ng animal of th^ TzigatTirtrrrdToattf a'S ^° \"\"^^ in tli dTscipi and ron ™!'* '''' \"^^ ^\"^ \"^l^\"' ^l^i**- would have made Wm f \"^'=.\"*'°\"= °f organized society handsomenesT he CuT™'- ^°^' ^''^ ^ ^is sleek peasant andTcht:a!re?on„U°;^ •^'^^ ^ ^P'-\u003c«'^ =^:^ilSi^=^=^^=SS; power i^ contTjt,'\\Z1,rZ7':7ir \"\"\"^ \"«= ^' ' and yet h. had presence and",
         "^.'^iroYclmS™' i IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 79 Zi ^^n^\"- ^ \"\"\"\"^\"^^ ^^ ^\"\"^ \"°* '«*n bound to one But nf I '\" \"\"' \"*y- ^'^^ subservient to one flag atd chM^f \"\"'' r\"g= T^kewani had been the servant as that nf P ^\"\" c'''* ^'^^ *^ ^^^ ''\"'I bistorical as that of Russia or Spain. He belonged to a Deoole who had traditions and laws of their own orSd commun.t.es moving here and there, but ca r^ S them their system their laws and their national fLLg There was the difference. This Romany was the child of .rresponsibrnty, the being that fed upon life, that dd not feed hfe; that left one place in the world to escaDe and tTn \"= ?\"\"' T\"\"\"^ \"\"^ ^y '^y- ^^rew \"t away and then went seeking another day to bleed; for ever J3 S.^;'f']:'^\"'\"='\"«*°■'^'\u003e'°\"'y---^Pi^6- ground. Suddenly, Jiowever, she came to a stop in her S arthis^mln^'r- ''''\"^' ^\"^\"' '^^^ °^ ^'e \"^^ race as this man, the same unorganized, irresuonsible unless race, with no weight of civic or social XruSn' ts shoulders-where did he stand? Was he no b^t^er than such as Jethro Fawe ? Was he inferior to such ^ Ingolby, or even Tekewani ? ^ She realized that in her father's face there was the took of one who had no place in the ambitiotd^\" 3 „ men, who was not a builder, but a wayfarer ShfLi seen the look often of late, ^nd had never read^wS now, when Jethro Fawe stared at her Th he b^l^s She read his look, and while one part of her shrank iTr-to'he^ d\"™ ^°- \"—\" *bin'g, anotheTpt o' her_to her dismay and anger-understood him and U was inherited predisposition, the unregulated passions of her forebears, the mating of the fieldTthe gene3 dommance of the body, which Was not to be commaS into obscurity, but must taunt and tempt her wMe S It",
         "it 80 THE WORLD FOR SALE soul sickened. She put a hand on herself. She must make this man realize once and for all that they were as far apart as Adam and Cagliostro. \" I never called to you,\" she said at last. \" I did not know of your existence, and, if I had, then I certainly shouldn't have called.\" \" The Gorgios have taken away your mind, or you'd understand,\" he replied coolly. \" Your soiU calls and those that understand come. It isn't that you know who hears or who is coming— till he comes.\" \"A caU to all creation I\" she answered disdainfully. Do you think you can impress me by saying things Uke \" Why not ? It's true. Wherever you went in all these years the memory of you kept calling me, my little nnkne raUv-my pretty little girl, made mine by the Kiver Starzke over in the Roumelian country.\" '' You heard what my father said \" \" I heard what the Duke Gabriel said— M» Duvel I heard enough what he said, and I felt enough what 'he did ! ' He laughed, and began to roll a cigarette mechanically, keeping his eyes fixed on her, however. \" You heard what my father said and what I said and you will learn that it is true, if you live long enough,\" she added meaningly. ^ A look of startled perception flashed into his eyes. ' If I hve long enough, I'll turn you, my mad wife, into my Romany queen and the blessing of my tan.\" •'Don't mistake what I mean,\" she urged. \"I shall never be ruler of the Romanys. I shall never hear \" \" You'll hear the bosh played— fiddle, they call it in these heathen places— at your second wedding with Jethro Fawe,\" he rejoined insolently, lighting his cigarette. \" Hoine you'll come with mc soon — ay bor /\" \" Listen to me,\" she answered with anger tingling",
         "in I every IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 81 ! and you 'areTcWM Tt .\"J \"'\"'' \"' y°\"' ««' ^ ^\"^ what but thai is a H \" u\"^' \"\"^ '^^ '''\"'^ \"\"\"^ 'h^ ^°ad; we'/butTere-Tflj\" \"^«'^r*''«« yo« were born-weU, ■• i hLrfo .%f°'\"^\"^u'^'' '''**'^ ^°'g°t her cradle !\" T h, \u003e foi-gotten nothing. I have only moved on I have only seen that there is a better road ^o Talk than olL*d H^'?''' \"'*^y^ '\"''\"''\"e behind lest they be ollowed, and always looking in front to find refuge drop not gi back' ^^' ^\"'\"^ °\" \"\"'^ \"\" •'^'=^\"^« they dare Suddenly he threw his cigarette on the ground, and put and Hiir^T \" '\"/\"'y ^«^' °^ -^^\"'\"ed- '' Great Helven For reply ^hg went to the door and opened it wide T.]lT^'\" f ^\"\"^ *\"\" '*' J^thro Fawe to all tTe world SJrXmTu^TiT^H^\"^'*^^ °' ^^^\"^^ ^-'' th=,7 Z T r *h'''\" ^^^'■« '' \"O fault in him and ge\"t X' e^Lt £: ■■- \"'\" \"^^^^ -turn-never ! Now. Jhlfv^'^j^^ ^'°^^ ''\"\"°\"Sh the trees, and feU in a narrow into tl, ' ^ \"^\" '^' ''°°\"^^y- A little grey bi d fl^t™ Summer was upon the face of nature, ^^torld ^^^J c I: 'S ';",
         "\u003c 8S THE WORLD FOR SALE untroubled and serene; but in tl.is hidden hut two stormy spints broke the peace to which the place and the time were all entitled. I ^!^\" f °^*'f \"'°™'\"' \"\"\"\"^ °^ \"■'''^ase and dismissal. Jethro stood for a moment confounded and dismayed. He had not reckoned with this. During their talk it had come to him how simple it would be to overpower any check to his exit, how devilishly easy to put thVgirl at a disadvantage; but he drove the thought from him. In the first place, he was by no means sure that escape was what he wanted-not yet. at any rate; in the second piace. If Gabriel Druse passed the word alc.ig the sub-terranean wires of th.- Romany world, that Jethro Fawe should vanish, he would not long cumber the ground. K H K '/^T^' \"?' \u003c^°\"'\"^'« \u003c\"• f^ar of consequences which had held him back; it was a staggering admiration for this girl who had been given to him in marriage so many years ago. He had fared far and wide in his adventures and amours when he had gold in plenty; and he had swung more than one Gorgio woman in the wild dance of sentiment, dazzling them by the splendour of his passion. The fire gleaming in his dark eyes lighted a Jace which would have made memorable a picture bv Guido. He had fared far and wide, but he had never seen a woman who had seized his imafination as this girl was doing; who roused in him. not the old hot desire, but the hungry will to have a tan of his own, and go travelling down the world with one who alone could satisfy him for all his days. As he sat in this improvised woodland prison he had had visions of a hundred glades and valleys through which he had passed in days gone by-in England, in Spain, in Italy, in Koumania, in Austria, in Australia, in India— where his canip-fires had burned. In his visions he had seen her- Fleda Fawe, not Fleda Druse-laying the cloth, and bring-ing out the silver cups, or stretching the Turkey rugs",
         "upon IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 83 Itrthfni^rwt^S '\" r \"\"^'-'-^^''^ '— to had shut his eyl a\"dtltldS'id*'\"V\"\"°'^^^ «« castles stood, and the fox and u ' *■?\"\" \"handoncd gave shade a^d welcome to thn/'^T'' \"\"\"^ \"\"\u003e '^^w'' or, when the wird Ss ble^n \"^''^''^^^^^''-oad; wood for the fire ami , T, '\"■' «*^« =''«'*« and companionable tL \"\"'*' °' '\"\"\"\"''\"^^^ '\"\"\"\"S the fortunes, or .^ugt^nt tlSotf anrth\" V\"'' *\"\"' tinkered or worked in o^m u \"°'^^*'^' '\"'d the lesser still in a great rgt:ufinlf'\"='v'''^'=*\" *'-'''\"'-*•\u003e harness on the^ hots, iX i/ovt^all riS d\"^^\"^\"'* and admired, m his vision. lf» Lh ' ^' '^\"'n'nant babe carried in his arms tn,r^t^^^\" \"=*^\" '^ R°'n=\"'y baptized in grandeur aTbelL.^H\"'l\"\" '^\"\"''^ ^\"^ there people. Hif imaSation haH .1 ''\"'^^ *''^ '\u003e«=''» °f the in ^me thristirShyi^'rea^To t^T ^\"''=*°\"\u003c' where he would not bp Inn.i., \"^^'^to the church porch, hear the gos^p of th^ t f ^^\"J\"^ ^^' '^«^'^' ''\"t could church, and on thltomhf '' '^'^ ^'\"* '\" *\"\u003c^ »\"* of he had'seen once'at Szhdm \"\";„7;\\'\"r\"P*'- - «»\u003c« merciful:' '^ ^°^ *« g^ooiM buJ^dtl'^^i^L^.r;?^^^^^^^^^^^ '^^-^ \\«°-\"y to be to many great men oT^K' '* \"\"\"^ \"^^^ ^\"\"^ -chanced Lord pLuel at Iteinb^tk a'!;d\"^''/\"'^\"'*''^'\u003e'eh-born Mantua-all of whom hadt-t k? '' °* Kleinschild at Christian churches ,Wtn?h \"™''^.^°^'J monuments in they condescend rlhighTstat'e to\" ^\"'7^\"'\"« \"^^th with the dust of the ^rgio ° \"\"\"^'^ *^«'' ^^^^^ hke one who betrays, bu? he'acknoX^edt'a h?h\": !•«",
         "'■■'•■ft\" 84 THE WORLD FOR SALE force than his own and to superior rights when Gabriel Drose 3 strong arm brought him low; and. waking to life and confcousness again, he was aware that another force also had levelled him to the earth. That force was thi« woman's spirit which now gave him his freedom so scornfully; who bade him begone and tell their people everywhere that she was no longer a Romany, while she would go no doubt-a thousand times without doubt unless he prevented it-to the swaggering Gorgio who had saved her on the Sagalac. She stood waiting for him to go, as though he could not refuse his freedom. As a bone is tossed to a dog, she gave it ti) him. _ '• You have no right to set me free,\" he said coolly now I am not your prisoner. You tell me to take that word to the Romany people— that you leave them for evei\" I will not do It. You are a Romany, and a Romany you must stay. You belong nowhere else. If you married a Gorgio you would still sigh for the camp beneath the stars, for the tambourine and the dance \" ^^ \" And the fortune-telling,\" she interjected sharply and the snail-soup, and the dirty blanket under the hedge and the constable on the road behind, always just behind' watching, waiting and \" ' \" The hedge is as clean as the dirty houses where the low- class Gorgios sleep. In faith, you are a long way from the River Starzke !\" he added. \" But you are my mad wife and I must wait till you've got sense again.\" He sat down on the plank couch, and began to roll a cigarette once more. \"You come fitted out like a Gorgio lass now, and you look like a Gorgio countess, and you have the manners of an Archduchess; but that's nothing; it will peel off hke a blister when it's pricked. Underneath is the Romany It s there, and it will show red and angry when we've stripped off the Gorgio. It's the way with a",
         "woman M WHICH THE PRISOUER aOES FREE H ■„,^„ I, ® m.;ant to conquer it Shp h-^A ru.dt7cCr\"v'h ^'\"'^r ''''' '\"^ loved, aid she with Romanv hi «nH *\"'\"''\"'!- ''^P'^\"*^' ^'«' ^\"^^ \"\"'''hed sh^m/me Vn J\"*^ '\"^ ^'^^^ y°\" think'will hiu a^d fnrwor„ti];rrd.^ vrs3„ot^;:/°^'\"^ *°^^' words gathered in his throaTbut they choked hi-^ T\" the pause his wiU asserted itself Lil '*\"'' *\" dehberate. \"^ '^•^^^e cool and -.b..butthatwrSi;K?iX^^^^^^",
         ";t' M THE WORLD FOR SALE now are. You were standing by the Sagalac looking out to the west where the pack-trains were traveUing into the sun over the mountains, and you had your hand on the nock tr~ r?\" , r^ \"?* *•*\" '\"* \"^''y '™'\" yo\"- l^hind a Juniper-bush. I looked at you, and I wished that I had never Men a woman before and could look at the world as you did then-It was like water from a spring, that look. You are right in what you say. By long and by last I had , ^!^ u*\", • '^ *'■*\" ' '•'\" *'«'* ^'^ ''♦\"'ck down I never looked back But I saw you. and I wished I had never seen a woman before. You have been here alone with me with that door shut. Have I said or done anything that a Gorgio duke wouldn't do ? Ah, God's love, but you were bold to come I I married you by the River Starike ; I looked upon you as my wife; and here you were alone with me II had my nghts, and I had been trampled underfoot by your father \" •' \"By your Chief.\" \" Aybor, by my Chief 1 I had my wrongs, and 1 had my rights, and you we.e mine by Romany law. It was lor me here to claim you-here where a Romany and his wife were alone together !\" His eyes were fixed searchingly on hers, as though he would read the effect of his words before he replied, and his voice had a curious, rough note, as though with difficulty he quelled the tempest within him. \" I have my rights, and ^cu *f.!P\" \"P\"\" ™'\" *\u003e* ^'\"^ «''*•» ferocious softness. She did not blench, but looked him steadily in the eyes .. u : T!*\"* ^^** \"\"\"'^ ^ *\" y°\"'^ '\"'\"'i.\" she answered, but that did not keep me from coming. You would not bite the hand that set you free.\" \" You called me a wolf a minute ago.\" \" But a wolf would not bite the hand that freed it from the trap. Yet if such shame could be, I still would have had no fear, for I should have shot you as wolves are shot that come too near the",
         "fold.\" IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 87 He looked at her piercingly, and the pupils of his eves . narrowed to a pin-point. \" You would have shot mc- you arc armed ?\" he questioned. \" Am I the only woman that has armed herself against you and such as you ? Do you not sec ?\" \" Mi pim-l. but I do see now with a thousand eyes !\" he said hoarsely. His senses were reeling. Down beneath evorvthing had been the thought that, as he had prevailed with other women, he could prevail with her; that she would come to him in the end. He had felt, but he had declined to see, the significance of her bearing, of her dress, of her speech, of her present mode of life, of its comparative luxury. Its social distinction of a kind which fted her above even the Gorgios by whom she was ; .ounded A fatuous belief in himself and in his personal powers had deluded him. He had told the truth when he said that no woman had ever appealed to him as she did; that she had blotted out all other women from the book of his adventurous and dissolute life; and he had dreamed a dream of conquest of her when Fortune should hand out to him the key of the situation. Did not the beautiful Russian countess on the Volga flee from her liege lord and share his Ian? When he played his fiddle to the Austrian pnncess, did she not give him a key to the garden where she walked of an evening ? And this was a Romany lass, daughter of his Chieftain, as he was son of a great Romany chief; and what marvel could there be that she who had been made his child wife, should be conquered as others had been ! \" MiDuvel, but I see !\" he repeated in a husky fierce- \"*^^-x T u 1™ ^°^ husband, but you would have killed me If I had taken a kiss from your lips, sealed to me by all our tribes and by your father and mine.\" \" My lips are my own, my life is my own, and when 1 marry, I shall marry a man of my own choosing, and he , -J - :",
         "c 88 THE WORLD FOR SALE your fathV J° '\"T\" \"*^\" •' ^ ^^''l I ^°«1\u003c1 not go tUl shLd ^ hS r%h«\\i^'^band, and her husband snouid ^t himself free for his wife's sake \"-his voice ri n^l , \"l* ''°\"^ *° '^^ Romany people that you mv Rv r \"* *'\"\"\"u ^ ^\"^ ^ *\"^« RomanT I disobeyeS I waSt'llhr\"?^ '''\"' !''^'\"^ \"\"y ^\"^^''^ here, and aor^ ravhT; f T^ *™'' ^°'\"*\"y ''\"^•\"^d \u003e^ho will ^d no ^-'^ \"u* n° •\"=\" P^'P''^'- •\"»* I *iU have my way and no Gorgio shaU take her to his home She lilon^ to my tent, and I will take her there.\" ^'°\"^ hii?\"\" n\"rrL7f r^*' '\"'^^^ \"\"\"^ \"^^atlon infuriated r^dead •• hf. H ^\\^°\" *° '\"y *\"\"' \" '^\"l he because m dead, he said, and h.s white teeth showed fiercely. quietly ' ** ''\"' *''\"• ^\"^ ''^'^ •-«- 6°-\" «he rejoLd Suddenly he turned at the doorway. A look of oassion \"T^Z \"?r • \"\"' '^''' ^\u003c='«\"« «\u003e\" and p^ su\" ve Jl ^-h^F^l '^f. ?\"i ^^''^ \"\"'' ''\"'I he true to you my girl, he said. I shall be chief over all the Rom^v rZi L, !• . ^ *™ yours-^d I hold to my troth Come, beloved, let us go together \" ^ wat Iher^\"'\"' ^\"\"^ ''\"' \"P=' ^°\"\" *« ^^^ that, bad as he was there was a moment's truth in his words •■ Cn while you can,\" she said. •• You are nothing to me \" For an instant he hesitated, then, with a muttereToath trtTe^ \"*° '\"\"^ '\"'=''^\"' ^\"\"^ *^^ P--*'y 'o\"t a-ong For a long time she sat in the doorway, and aeain and again her eyes filled with tears. She felt J'cloud of trcubte",
         "i IN WHICH THE PRISONER GOES FREE 89 closing in upon her. At last there was the sound of foot-steps, and a moment later Gabriel Druse came through the trees towards her. His eyes were sullen and brooding. You have set him free ?\" he asked. She nodded. \"It was madness keeping him here.\" she said. ' .. «^* 's madness letting him go,\" he answered morosely. He will do harm. Ay hor, he will! I might have known— women are chicken-hearted. I ought to have put him out of the way, but I have no heart any more —no heart, I have the soul of a",
         "rabbit.\" BOOK",
         "II CHAPTER VIII THE SULTAN Ingolby's square head jerked forwards in stem inquiry and his eyes fastened those of Jowett, the horse-dealer. \" Take care what you're saying, Jowett,\" he said. \" It's a penitentiary job, if it can be proved. Are you sure you got it right ?\" Jowett had unusual shrewd:, jss, some vanity and a humorous tongue. He was a favourite in both towns, and had had the better of both in horse-dealing a score of times. That did not make him less popular. However, it was said he Uked low company, and it was true that though he had \" money in the bank,\" and owned a corner lot or so, \"le seemed to care little what his company was. His most constant companion was Fabian Osterhaut, who was the common property of both towns, doing a little of everything for a hving, from bill-posting to the soUcitation of an insurance agent. For any casual work connected with public functions Osterha- i was indispensable, and he would serve as a doctor's assistant and help cut ofE a leg, be the majordomo for a Sunday-school picnic, or arrange a soirie at a meeting-house with equal impartiaUty. He had been known to attend a temperance meeting and a wake in the same evening. Yet no one ever questioned his bona /E\u003ci«s, and if he had attended mass at Manitou in the morning, joined a heathen dance in Tekewani's Reserve in the afternoon, and Ustened to the oleaginous Rev. Reuben Tripple in the evening, it would have been taken as a matter of course. 93 ^ll 'li, ,'l ill m",
         "v\\^ 04 THE WORLD FOR SALE beSMSed ^r' P\"\"!^' ?'' impecunious, and he had been shifted from one boarding-house to another till at last having eidiausted credit in Lebanon, he had Id LnZ^ 'V^t ^\"^ °' \"'•* ^^'^ Thibadeau^P Man tou She had taken him in because, in years gone smixlXl'^t-^ \"\" ^^^'\"^'^ an^rtt'cH smallpox on the Siwash River, and somehow Osterhaut had always paid his bills to her. He was curiouTeSrt where she was concerned. If he had not enough for^^ weeks board and lodging, he borrowed it, chiefly o Jowett, who used him profitably at times to pass the word about a horse, or bring news of a possible deah ••IdiAn-^.^TT'\"^ i\"**' J\"*\"\"'\" I'-Kolby repeated. I (hdn t think MarchanH „ould be so mad as that!\" Say, It s all straight nough. Chief,\" answered Jowett sucking his unlighted cigar. \"Osterhaut got wind of a-he s staying at old Mother Thibadeau's, L you taow He moves round a lot, and he put me on to it. I trk on the job at once. I got in with the French touS over at Manitou, at Barbazon's Tavern, and I gave tS pn-we made it a gin night. It struck their ffncy-tT Iri • ^T.'^-^'i' \"\"^^''e *» ein different fr^m Siy other spint; but it fixed their minds, and took a^v suspicion. * *\"'*\" Tfil7l°* ^^7°^' yes. of course, blind drunk, didn't 1 ? Kissed me half a dozen of the Quebec boys did-^id eJZ' Sl^'.^'v^ 'hell-fell^, said'l was^n £ tw T' ^\"'f ^''\"'^^« « my best patois. Ttey hked that lye got a pretty good stock of monkev- French and I et it go. They laughed till they^ried at some of my mistakes, but they wTren't no mfLk\"s „o! onyoiu:life. It was aU done a-purpose. ITieysaldTw^ boiled, and they was going to have the blood of the Lebanon lot be ore they'd done. I pretended to get mad and I talked wild. I said that Lebanon would |et",
         "Zm THE SULTAN 85 first, that Lebanon wouldn't wait, but 'd have it out; and I took ofl my coat and staggered about— blind— fair blind boozy. I tripped over some fool's foot purposely, just beside a bench against the wall, and I come down on that bench hard. They laughed— Lord, how they laughed I They didn't mind my givin' 'em fits— all except one or two. That was what I expected. The one or two was mad. They begun raging towards me, but there I was asleep on the bench— stony bUnd, and then they only spit fire a bit. Some one threw my coat over me. I hadn't any cash in the pockets, not much— I knew better than that— and I snored hke a sow. Then it happened what I thought would happen. They talked. And here it is. They're going to have a strike in the mills, and you're to get a toss into the river. That's to be on Friday. But the other thing— well, they all cleared away but two. They were the two that wanted to have it out with me. They stayed behind. There was I snoring hke a loco-motive, but my ears open all right. \" Well, they give the thing away. One of 'em had just come from Fehx Marchand and he was full of it. What was it ? Why, the second night of the strike your new bridge over the river was to be blown up. Marchand was to give these two toughs three hundred dollars each for doing it.\" \" Blown up with what ?\" Ingolby asked sharply. \" Dynamite.\" \" Where would they get it ?\" \" Some left from blasting below the mills.\" \" All right ! Go on.\" \" There wasn't much more. Old Barbazon, the land-lord, come in and they quit talking about it; but they said enough to send 'em to gaol for ten years.\" Ingolby bUnked at Jowett reflectively, and his mouth gave a twist that lent to his face an almost drcil look. \" What good would it do if they got ten years— or one m",
         "■wm P6 THE WORLD FOR SALE Ju™ Id %''m*'^\\'\"! \"\"*\" \"P ' \" *''«y 6°t skinned aave, and if Marchand was handed over to a bamful of hungry rats to be gnawed to death, it wouldn^ helj Ive heard and seen a lot of hellish things, but there's nothmg to equal that To blow up the brid?^for what out o*^^^! \u003e,'\"?\"' ^\"? *° •\"\"'* \"\"«= *° ''\"°'='' the spokes out of my wheel. He's the dregs, is Marchand.\" nn«H f\"*\"\"*. ',*, ''*^'*\" ^y \"**\"\"' tl'at 'ellow.\" inter- K, ^ . i \"^ *''!.\" '\"•^ *=^ twenty-two. not fourteen sfte was-Lil ^rnia; and he got her away before-well, he got her away East; and she's in a dive in Winnipeg n^w f'nvT \" T^~u\" \"\"' * \"\"'' S'^l '^^ ^^^' and could ride buf th^ .° *''\"' \"T ''\"=''^'*- ^^* '^^ *''* i\" h^- h^H , ,5' ^ .! T' °1^y '^ '^\"'^' J\"^* the mind of a child she WH H t^i understand. He'd ha' been tarred and S\"Zt w '*\",*:*\"\" ^°™- ^-^^ °\"\u003e Mick Sarnia said t^S ^*'J^'^^ ' ''''\"'' \"\"\"* =° ^« hushed, and Sarnia's wife doesn t know even now. I thought a lot of Lil as Xn I r'^ \"\", ■! f\"''^ '^^ '\"y °*\"; *\"d '°t^ 0' times, when I think of it. I sit up straight, and the thing freezes me; and 1 want to get Marchand by the scruff of the neck. I got a horse, the worst that ever was-so bad I haven't had the heart to ride him or sell him. He's so bad he makes me laugh. There's nothirg he won't do, from biting Esquire, to his back, and let him loose on the prairie, and pray the Lord to save him if he thought fit. I fancy I know what the Lord would do. And Lil Sarnia's only ^r^i. T f \"^ ^^\"^ ''\"°'\" the States, he's the hmit, no;v. fhist' * \"\"\"• \"\"■' * P\"'* \"^ round-and Ingolby kept blinking reflectively as Jowett talked. He was doing two things at once with a facility quite his own. He was understanding all Jowett was saying, but he was also weighmg the whole situation. His mhid was",
         "pone THE SULTAN „ fishing, figuratively speaking. He was essentiaUy a man o action, but his action was the bullet of his mind S2 had to be qu,et physically when he was really Sng* Then he was as one in a dream where all physical motion was mechanical, and his body was acting^Somator Senomrar^\"\"\"' ^^ '''-'-' '^^ Itraction^l't. ais!-^'lLS^r:td^ -- -1--^ \"?! was as though Felix Marchand was being passeTrn \"Lew s^rtotweVtrron ' -^^\" -^^ -'^-^ --^ Canllon hurts still. It's a chronic inflammation. Closing them ra. way offices at M.nitou, and dislodging the offica^s. give h.m his first good chance. The feud^l^f w en Zl^^t ^ r' \" **'°'' '°' °* *°»ehs in Manitou. t?stand\\'n. '\"^^r; ''\"'' *•\u003e\"•'* \"'''■ ^'\"^ there's a wan^ to-stand-stiU and leave-me-alone feeUng. They don't want to get on. They don't want progress. They wan to throw the slops out of the top windows into the\"t they want their cesspools at the front door; they Wnk to t K -rH ^^t,\"\"\"\"\" *^^y ^^^« \" *he better; they want to be bribed; and they think that if a vote's worth hav'ng t s worth paying for-and yet there's a bridge between r vir Sata^o'Sr-'^^'- ^^''y- - \"- apai;!\" itl^y^'\" Sat?t- SS'^^ '\" ^\"^\"\"'^ -'^' -\u003c^- Jowett shifted with impatience. \" Say, Chief, I don't know what you're thinking about. Do you ttok v^ * could make a deal with Felix Marchand ? N7mud. Youve got the cinch on him. You could send hto to 7 1",
         "Hi •• THE WORLD FOR SALE quod, and I'd send him there as quick as lightning. I'd hang him, if 1 could, for what he done to Lil Samia. Years ago when he was a boy he offered me a gold watch for a mare I had. The watch looked as right as could be- TnH I \"rf*°\"'\"''V •\"* ^\"'^ '* *''^- «« 8°t ™y horse, and I got his watch It wasn't any more gold than h. was. It was filled-just plated with nine-carat gold. It was worth about ten dollars.\" \"What was the mare worth ?\" asked Ingolby, his mouth twisting again with quizzical meaning. \" That mare— she was all right.\" '' Yes, but what was the matter with her ?\" \" °'''.^ spavin-she was all right when she got wound up— go like Dexter or Maud S.\" \"But if you were buying her what would you have paid for her, Jowett ? Come now, man to man, as they say. How much did you pay for her ?\" or'tw*^'\"' *'\"' **\" *** **\"^''' ^'\"*'' '\"*•\"\" * \"^°\"\" \" And what was she worth ?\" \" What I paid for her— ten dollars.\" Then the two men looked at each other full in the eves and^Jowett threw back his head and laughed outrieht- laughed loud and hard. •• WeU, you got me. Chief, right under the guard,\" he observed. \"\"=1, ngm Ingolby did not laugh outright, but there was a bubble of humour m his eyes. \" What happened to the watch ?\" he asked. \" I got rid of it.\" \" In a horse-trade ?\" \" No, I got a town lot with it.\" \" In Lebanon ?\" \" Well, sort of in Lebanon's back-yard.\" \" What's the lot worth now ?\" \" About two thousand dollars I\" \" Was it your first town lot",
         "?\" THE SULTAN 90 ;; The first lot of Mother Earth 1 ever owned \" ,, Then you got a vote on it?\" '^^ *•*\"«'• ^^ Vei, my first vote.\" Felix Marcha^d If von S \",,' 5'°«'~* »*«»« «\" wouldn't have had tlt'JoJS\" ''' '''' ^\"'^ V- c !Jj ' '\"*'''*• \"°* \"»»t lot.\" selfatt strath? '^' '^' \"\"--» »\u003e^- had come back fro^ThinSn^I '\"^'•- \"*» «»\u003c» action. His plans were fo™^^' *\" ^'\"'^y »»* fo' and he had Lde T; hi °S hJ: *^t^^ « «*'\"' «ihTtt?go„rto'Fet M^rr^'*''''' J°-«- Vo« proved him I liar aTd g* t^^'^ht^ '\" ^'J^'\"^' '\"\"' you got a comer I'ot witf it^Tha^'s Ih^ iS'\" ^'^''^ o\"-faSS--S-S^^^^^ that watd,. I'm Joine tTtrv .L^'\"*\"* ** y°- «\"\u003c! w^th profit in th, end. FeSx Mal^dt '^«'/- *° **=\"\u003e\"« ^''d of n\u003ei„e-a mistafcrfn Sct^ft r^*V\"« ''J' \"^ \"'«t''ke board; and there's eno„grJ?„,Jir^'th™ •\"' ^P\"\"*' big blaze with a very litfle mltch 1 1^^ M\"''\"' **\" «•* « «;ething. Th. Chie^f ConsUble kee^^!: **\"* *^'\"8s are whafs going on here, and jiSry fS^to'^J^ '^ '» on in Manitou. The i)oH~ i„M ^ \"*'''*** 8oing enough. That's one c^mK' \"veS Fer'u**^*^'** there. T p,ess that the Chief oTstS^^ m ^\"'^^ Monse.gn.ur Lourde and old",
         "M^C'^^l^:^:i^^ 100 THE WORLD FOR SALE the only people that Marchftnd can't bribe. I tec I've got to face a icrimmage before I can ^et what I want.\" \" What you want you'll have, I be*,\" was the admiring reif ,e. \" i m going to have a good try. I want the«e two towni to be one. That'll be good for your town lots, Jowett,\" he added whimsically. \" If my policy is carried out, my town lot'll be worth a pocketful of gold-plated watches or a stud of spavined mares.\" He chuckled to himself, and his fingers reached towards a bell on the table, but he paused. \" When was it they said the strike would begin ?\" he asked. •• Friday.\" \" Pid they say what hour ?\" \" Eleven in the moRiing.\" \" Third of a day's work and a whole day's pay,\" he mused. \" Jowett,\" he added, \" I want you to have faith. I'm going to do Marchand, and I'm going to do him in a way that'll be best in the end. You can help as much if not more than anybody— you and Osterhaut. And if I succeed, it'll be worth your while.\" \" I ain't followin' you because it's worth while, but because I want to. Chief.\" \" I know; but a man— every man— Ukes the counters for the game.\" He turned to the table, opened a drawer, and took out a folded paper. He looked it through care-fully, wrote a name on it, and handed it to Jowett. \" There's a hundred shares in the Northwest Railway, with my regards, Jowett. Some of the counters of the game.\" Jowett handed it back at once with a shake of tl.e head. \" I don't live in Manitou,\" he said. \" I'm almoa vhite. Chief. I've never made a deal with you, and don't want to. I'm your man for the fun of it, and because I'd give my Ufe to have your head on my shoulders for one",
         "year.\" THE SULTAN 101 \" I'd ImI better if you'd take the shares, Jowett. Yon'v* helped me, and I can't let you do it for nothing.\" \" Then I can't do it at all. I'm discharged.\" Suddenly, however, a humorous, eager look shot into Jowctt's lace. ' Will you toss for it ?\" he blurted out. '' Certainly, if you like,\" was the reply. \" Heads I win, tails it's yours ?\" \" Good.\" Ingolby took a silver dollar from his pocket, and tossed. It came down tails. Ingolby had won. \"My corner lot against double the shares?\" Jowett asked sharply, his face flushed with eager pleasure. Ho was a born gambler. \" ' s you like,\" answered Ingolby with a smile. Ingolby tossed, and they stooped over to look at the dollar on the floor. It ha\u003cJ come up heads. \" You win,\" said Ingol'uy, and turning to the table, took out another hundred shares. In a moment they were handed over. \" You're a wonder, Jowett,\" he said. \" You risked a lot of money. Are you satisfied ?\" \" You bet, Chief. I come by these shares honestly now.\" He picked up the silver dollar from the floor, and was about to put it in his pocket. *' Wait— that's my dollar,\" said Ingolby. \" By gracious, so it is I\" said Jowett, and handed it over reluctantly. Ingolby pocketed it with satisfaction. Neither dwelt on the humour of the situation. They were only concerned for the rules of the game, and both were gamesters in their way. After a few brief instructions to Jowett, and a message for Osterhaut concerning a suit of workman's clothes, Ingolby left his oflices andjwalked down the main street of the town with his normal rapidity, responding cheerfully to the passers-by, but not encouraging evident",
         "desire 102 THE WORLD FOR SALE h^/h ^''^r^''' u'\"l- \"*\" ha»-started forwaid to him, but he held them back with a restraining eye. They knew his ^. He was responsive in a brusque, inquisitive, but jood-humoured and sometimes very droll way; but there were imes when men said to themselves that he was to be Tc^^\"V ? !l%**' '° \"'\"'=•• '\"''^*\" °f *•»« place that, as Osterhaut and Jowett frequently remarked. '' What he says goes ! It went even with those whom he had passed «« the race of power. He had had his struggles to be understood in his first tTeShirv \\^ 5T; \"I ^\"'^ '°\"8''* '\"*\"e\"« »\"«» «ven w^^ IT' ^^ \"^'^^^'^ «'°\"I» ^^'^^ ^e« the forces at work before he came to Lebanon, and had compelled the submission of others. AU these had vowed to '^et back « him, but when it became a question of Lebanon agamst Mamtou they swung over to his side and acknow- ™,!1 , *^ ^'^''- ■\"•* P^y^''^ «=°\"'^on between the rougher elements of the two towns had brought matters to a head, and nearly every man in Lebanon felt that his M^U^T ''' '''^' ^'■'* ^\"' ''\"^^ \" *° ^^''^ \" \"«'* ^^^ wif^ ?„' ^^u- *'°\"^ *•\" '\"'''\" '*^'*t \"^'ter his interview witn Jowett. his eyes wandered over the buildings risinr Z^'^wT ■''l^^' '\"^•^ ^*^«^\"* ^ ^ » picture thf same thinly inhabited street five years ago when he first came. Now farmers' wagons clacked and rumbled ck\"^^.?! P\"^'\"* '^'\"*' \"\"\"^U ^\"^ °' \u003c^ttle jerked and shuffled their way to the slaughter-yard, or out to the open prairie, and caravans of settlers with their effects moved sturdily forward to the trails which led to a new life beckon- ing from three points of the compass. That point which did not beckon was behind them. Flaxen-haired Swedes and Norwegians; square-jawed, round-headed North Germans; square-shouldered, loose-jointed Russians with heavy contemplative eyes and long hair, looked curiously at each other and nodded understandingly.",
         "Jostling THE SULTAN 103 them all, with a jeer and an oblique joke here and there, and crude chaff on each other and everybody, the settler from the United States asserted himself. He invariably obtruded himself, with quizzical inquiry, half contempt and half respect, on the young Englishman, who gazed round with phlegm upon his fellow adventurers, and made up to the sandy-faced Scot or the cheerful Irishman with his hat on the back of his head, who showed in the throng here and there. This was one of the days when the emigrant and settlers' trains arrived both from the East and from \"the States,\" and Front Street in Lebanon had, from early morning, been alive with the children of hope uad adventure. With hands plunged deep in the capacious pockets of his grey jacket, Ingolby walked on, seeing everything; yet with his mind occupied intently, too, on the trouble which must be faced before Lebanon and Manitou would be the reciprocating engines of his policy. Coming to a spot where a great gap of vacant lai.u showed in the street— land which he had bought for the new offices of hii railway combine— he stood and looked at it abstractedly. Beyond it, a few blocks away, was the Sagalac, and beyond the Sagalac was Manitou, and a little way to the right was the bridge which was the symbol of his policy. His eyes gazed almost unconsciously on the people and the horses and wagons coming and going upon the bridge. Then they were lifted to ♦he tall chimneys rising at two or three points on the outskirts of Maniton. \" They don't know a good thing when they get it,\" he said to himself. \" A strike— why, wages are double what they are in Quebec where most of 'em come from ! Mar- chand \" A hand touched his arm. \" Have you got a minute to spare, kind sir ?\" a voice asked. Ingolby turned and saw Nathan RockweU, the doctor. •i \u003er I' t I. ■t «;- ;- ^",
         "i?' 104 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" Ah, Rockwell,\" he responded cheerfully, \" two minutes and a half, if you Hke ! What is it ?\" The Boss Doctor, as he was familiarly called by every-one, to identify him from the newer importations of medical men, drew from his pocket a newspaper. ■' There's an infernal he here about me,\" he replied. \" They say that I \" ^ He proceeded to explain the misstatement, as Ingolby studied the paper carefully, for Rockwell was a man worth any amount of friendship. \" It's a lie, of course,\" Ingolby said firmly as he finished the paragraph. \" Well ?\" \" Well, I've got to deal with it.\" \" You mean you're going to deny it in the papers ?\" \" Exactly.\" ^ ^ \" I wouldn't, Rockwell.\" \" You wouldn't ?\" \"No. You never can really overtake a newspaper he. Lots of the people who read the he don't see the denial. Your truth doesn't overtake the he— it's a scarlet runner.\" \" I don't see that. When you're lied about, when a lie like that \" \" You can't overtake it. Boss. It's no use. It's sensa-tional, it runs too fast. Truth's slow-footed. When a newspaper tells a lie about you, don't try to overtake it, (ell another.\" He blinked with quizzical good-humour. Rockwell could not resist the audacity. \"I don't believe you'd do it just the same,\" he retorted decisively, and laughing. \" I don't try the overtaking anyhow; I get something spectacular in my own favour to counteract the news-paper li(.\" \" In what way ?\" \" For instance, if they said I couldn't ride a moke at a village steeplechase, I'd at once publish the fact that,",
         "with THE SULTAN 105 a jack-knife, I'd killed two pumas that were after me. Both things would be lies, but the one would neutralize the other. If I said I could ride a moke, nobody would see it, and if it were seen it wouldn't make any impression ; but to say I killed two mountain-lions with a jack-knife on the edge of a precipice, with the sun standing still to look at it, is as good as the original he and better; and I score. My reputation increases.\" Nathan Rockv-'l's equihbrium was restored. \" You're certainly a wonuer,\" he declared. \" That's why you've succeeded.\" \" Have I succeeded ?\" \" Thirty-three — and what you are !\" \" What am I ?\" \" Pretty well master here.\" \" Rockwell, that'd do me a lot of harm if it was published. Don't say it again. This is a democratic country. They'd kick at my being called master of anything, and I'd have to tell a lie to counteract it.\" \" But it's the truth, and it hasn't to be overtaken.\" A grim look came into Ingolby's face. \" I'd Uke to be master-boss of life and death, holder of the sword and balances, the Sultan, here just for one week. I'd change some things. I'd gag some people that are doing terrible harm. It's a real bad business. The scratch-your- face period is over, and we're in the cut-your-throat epoch.\" Rockwell nodded assent, opened the paper again, and pointed to a column. \" I expect you haven't seen that. To my mind, in the present state of things, it's dynamite.\" Ingolby read the column hastily. It was the report of a sermon delivered the evening before by the Rev. Reuben Tripple, the evangehcal minister of Lebanon. It was a paean of the Scriptures accompanied by a crazy charge that the Roman Church forbade the reading of the Bible. It had a tirade also about the Scarlet Woman and Popish idolatry. w",
         "fy 106 THE WORLD FOR SALE Ingolby made a savage gesture. \"The insatiable Chnstian beast 1\" he growled in anger. \"There's no terns what this may do. You know'what th^e feW w^r.r •^'\"\"l\"\"- ^\" P'\"** *^ ^ °f them going to t^ TWVe^:f ' *f * *°'^''^ ^* ^''^ -\"\"^^ -\"\u003c» in the favems Iheyre not psalra-singmg, and they don't keep the Ten Commandments but they're savagely fanatical^nd—\" And there s the funeral o{ an Orangeman to-morrow. The Orange Lodge attends in regalia.\" Ingolby started and looked at the paper again. \" The sneafang praying liar.\" he said, his 'jaw setting grimly! as wdWh»f -h\" \"fl *° f ^ '^''^'^ ^» ^'^'\"''\"t in libanon tha^^\" ^^\" ^^^^ *'\"'\" ^^- ^fs the kind of lie \"That you can't overtake,\" said the Boss Doctor S ''r,; r** ^ '^°\"'* ^°* that even you can tel work'here?^*\" \"\"*\"\"^ \"\" ^\"\"^ P^-^-P*'\"\" -\"\" An acknowledging smile played at Ingolby's mouth. b..II Z,^' ^°i *° ^'^\" \" *'^- W«'^« 6°t ?o dJaw ofi the wUI with a red rag somehow.\" \" I don't see how myself. That Orange funeral wiU bnng a row on to us. I can just see the toughs T^n^ when hey read this stufi, and know about'that funerS^\" It s announced ?\" \" Yes. here's an invitation in the Budget to Oranppm*.n Of thX':.^ \"'^ °' ' ''\"'''' «- 0'^\"= thf rhw'r f k;\"' \"'S'^S \"^^ ^'^'^ ^\"\"^ t™« that he see 2LS \"' '''\"' ^\"\"^ Monseigneur Lourde^t \" That;s exactly what I mean to do-with a number of \u003crther thmgs. Between ourselves, Rockwell. I'd have S^ yo2\" * \"^^ '''\"'^'' '\"\"\"' '•\" emergencies",
         "ifl THE SULTAN 107 I'll see to it. That collision the other day vM senous enough, and it's graduaUy becoming a vendetta. Last night one of the Lebanon champions lost his nose.\" His nose — how ?\" \" A French river-driver bit a third of it off.\" Ingolby made a gesture of disgust. \" And this is the twentieth century !\" They had moved along the street until they reached a barber-shop, from which proceeded the sound of a vioUn. Vm going in here,\" Ingolby said. \"I've got some bjMness with Berry, the barber. You'll keep me posted as to anything important ?\" \" You don't need to say it. Shall I see the Master of the Orange Lodge or the Chief Constable for you ?\" Ingolby thought for a minute. \" No, I'll tackle them myself, but you get in touch with Monscigneur Lomde. He's grasped the situation, and though he'd like to have Tnpple boiled in oil, he doesn't want broken heads and bloodshed.\" ' \" And Tripple ?\" \" I'll deal with him at once. I've got a hold on him. I never wanted to use it. but I will now without compunc-tion. I have the means in my pocket. They've been there for three days, waiting for the chance.\" \" It do«isn't look like war, does it ?\" said Rockwell, looking up the street and out towards the prairie where the day bloomed hke a flower. Blue above-a deep, joyous blue, against which a white cloud rested or slowly travelled westward; a sky down whose vast cerulean bowl flocks of wild geese sailed, white and grey and black, while the woods across the Sagalac were glowing with a hundred colours, giving tender magnificence to ihe scene. The busy eagerness of a pioneer life was still a quiet orderiy thing, so immense was the theatre for effort and move-ment. In these wide streets, almost as wide as a London square, there was room to move; nothing seemed huddled. iii 1(3",
         "1 108 THE WORLD FOR SALE peace.\" \"^ ' '\" ^P'^'S with this surface \"Old Berry never misses anvthine What \u003e xu- . wg, he's thinking. I eo ^ZlT^l r. * ** \" ^^'n'^' Berry plays his' fiddlf Je^a X,'\"'^\" '^\"\"\"'^^ friend.\" ™^ * philosopher and a \" You don't make friends as other people do \" I make friends of all kinds t Ji S i I've always had a k nr. nf v u- \" * '\"'°\"' \"•'V. but no-accounfs, ani the ro^e! ^\" ' \"*' *'' ^°'^''^' *•»« were like you It's the hii. ' \"^ *\" *•»« °*hers atJSp;e^i'.^TirreVtraS,r or ^^^^ ^\"\"\"^ other side of the street \"^Z\"^\"*'\"\" °i a man on the He wore a sui ' of Wes^^rn cTo'lf' '\" '*^'\"? ^''^°°°- wears mufti, if not S^rdl^ yeT :L\\\"man\"^ \"\"\"I wholly natural— the mat tn„ *• u! manner not short in the body Hotter if* '\"\"' ''^ •=^«=*' t\"\" and unusual in his l^nZl7 .°^\" \"'^^ handsome hair and well.:ared!foS:SaT/e' \"*' '^'^ \"^\"^ \u003c=-\"\"« It was Jethro",
         "Fawe. THE SULTAN IM Here was the man he wished to see— Max Ingolby, the man who stood between him and his Romany lass. Here was a chance of speaking face to face with the man who was robbing him. What he should do when they met must be according to circumstances. That did not matter. There was the impulse storming in his brain, and It drove him across tha street as the Boss Doctor wa ked away, and Ingolby entered the shop. All Jethro realized was that the man who stood in his way, the bie nch masterful Gorgio was there. He entered the shop after Ingolby, and stood for an mstant unseen. The old negro barber with his curly white head, slave-black face, and large, shrewd, meditative eyes was standing in a comer with a violin under his chin, his cheek lovingly resting against it, as he drew his bow through the last bars of the melody. He had smiled in welcome as Ingolby entered, ii.stantly rising from his stool, but continuing to play. He would not have stopped in the middle of a tune for an emperor, and he put Ingolby higher than an emperor. For one who hadbeen born a slave and had still the scars of the over-seer s whip on his back, he was very independent. He cut everybody's hair as he wanted to cut it, trimmed each beard as he wished to trim it, regardless of its owner's wishes. If there was dissent, then his customer need not come again, that was aU. There were other barbers in the place, but Berry was the master barber. To have your head massaged by him was never to be forgotten, especially If you found your hat too small for your head in the morning. Also he singed the hair with a skill and care which had ailed many a thinly covered scalp with luxuriant growth, and his hair-tonic, known as \" Smilax \" gave a pleasant odour to every meeting-bouse or church or public hall where the people gathered. Berry was an institu-tion even in this new Western town. He kept his place and he forced the white man, whoever he was, to keep his place",
         "t no THE WORLD FOR SALE nl^ ^1 '*\" l***\"\" ''■''• •\"*•' th* 'hop he did lln^ ^l^^\"^' •\"** •''\" 'y'\" »««ched the newcomer Komany. His first impression was one of admiration wh\"h re^ul^'v '^t\"\"'^!\"'\"? »*\u003c=l\"ded aboul the man! Which repeUed him. Yet he was interested. The dark face had a striking racial peculiarity froli^hufv '*''^/**y' '^d °'d Berry lowered the fiddle ifeth- ir ? he said questioningly. the L*^ 'hT!^H^'*!'\" T \"'\"''\"^•^- When he entered do It Vrf w \"°* \"^^ \"P •\"' '\"'\"'' \"hat he should 2'old l^r \"., T' \"\"P^'^ \"^\"^ ^''^ fe^«^ «\" his brain. Asold Berry spoke, however, his course opened out. Mv fin ; u .*\" * stwnger. My fiddle is not here My fingers itch for the cat-gut. Eh ?\" ins?nct'Z''rt'L.°''^ ^\"^'' '\"=' ^•'\"\"\"•'•J '^ «t««- His instinct had been against his visitor, and he had been S'\"S'd*he\":;l£r \"\"?« shop-besidi! ;:t'e^^ aay could he talk to the greatest man in the West. If you can play, there it is,\" he said after a slight pause, and handed the fiddle over ^ It was true that Jethro Fawe loved the fiddle He t-J'T ' '\" T' '^'^- Twice, in order to get H^ide the palace of a monarch for a purpose-once fn Berm and once in London-he had played tV^„d ZtV^ \\T-eany orchestra. He turned th^ fid^eZlJ round, looking at it with mechanical intentness. Through ^Ih^TnstLe^t^ SraSr S^ ^ S K ttts-?Li;ir ' « -",
         "-HheyaSrmK THE SULTAN m though he had drawn down blinds before hU inmost thoughts. \" It was not made by a professional.\" \" It was made in the cotton-field by a slave,\" observed old Berry sharply, yet with a content which overrode antipathy to his visitor. Jethro put the fiddle to his chin, and drew the bow twice or thrice sweepingly across the strings. Such a sound had never come from Berry's violin before. It was the touch of a bom musician, who certainly had skill, but who had infinitely more of musical passion. \" Made by a slave in the cotton-fields I\" Jethro said with a veiled look, and as though he was thinking of something else: \" Dordi, I'd like to meet a slave Uke that !\" At the Romany exclamation Ingolby swept the man wth a searching look. He had heard the Romany wife of Rulifi Zaphe use the word many years ago when he and Charley Long visited the big white house on the hill. Was the man a Romany, and, if so, what was he doing here ? Had it anything to do with Gabriel Druse and his daughter ? But no— what was there strange in the mm bemg a Romany and plajing the fiddle ? Here and there m the West, during the last two years, he had seen what he took to be Romany faces. He looked to see the effect of the stranger's remark on old Berry. J'} n*/i. ^ .*'*''*• \"\"* ^ *^^ \"''^ t''^*- My father made that fiddle m the cotton-fields of Georgia,\" the aeed barber said. ° The son of a race which for centuries had never known country or flag or any habitat, whose freedom was the soul of Its existence, if it had a soul; a freedom defying aU the usual laws of social order-the son of that race looked at the negro barber with something akin to awe. Here was a man who had lived a Ufe which was the staring antithesis of his own, under the whip as a boy, confined to compounds ; whose vision was constricted to the Umits «f an estate; who was at the will of one man, to b* sold and I",
         "^:-N IM THE WORLD FOR SALE look of resnect and «w ^ . '*\" ''\" *•\u003e* outward Of van. rj'tS ^^^ri-j':^t etroV\"^ feUow. who evidently knew all about fiddles Certain^ i™ ^UonVeSdS \"-\"^ •'^ \"^'^ ^-\u003c^-«» '-\" S thi!i!tKuritt'l 1° J*\"\" V'*'^'- \" P'-y -\"- h.,* fi • ^ ^* *°* business here with Mr Bpttv to hear him play-wouldn't we, Berry ?\" n.iJe^ufhertghTinXVir-^'^''^'\"*\"\"**^^ His words were almost like a challenge, and it reached gown, since it was first improvised by a Tzieanv in Hungary He had once played it to an EngiS ladv Tt he Amphitryon Club in London, and shfhJd sw2^,ed m the Mms of her husband's best friend. He haTseen men and women avert their heads when he had Ived It daring not to look into each other's eyes. He would play It now-a little of it. He would play it to A^ltrth. ^rl who had set him free in the Sagalac woot, to tfe ravishing deserter from her neonlp tn ti,^ , who had told him the truttli; S'if aid whoL~d lus magnetism as a ground-wire insulates lightning He W to TTT 1\" \"\"\"' \"\"y ^*^ invagination, an'd t^U sX« H \"\"ih'' '\"\"' ^\"'^ \u003c=''»ght'the music of the spheres. He would surround himself with an",
         "atmosphere THE SULTAN HI of tus own. His rage, his love, and his malignant hat. his tenderness and his lust should fill the bafter\"! 7h^ w,th a flood which would drown the Gorgio a^i' iSJ Xn^ \"T^l- \"i™\"'* \"\"'«\u003e'\u003e»\u003c=io\"»ly- Then suddeiS he leaned his cheek to the instrument and drew th^ s; ri?s oS;-\" \"\"^'\"^ 'p^'^'-^\" *^ «^'\"\" - ..♦l''\"^\"'!\"'!\"i*'\"~* ^^« '\"i\"«'es in which peoDl. Kr^ L fidlll ''°\".\u003c»«^-tl\u003ee palpitating Romany w^ .^ ^' ''\"'\" •\"' ='\"'\"■ and stood for a minute lookwg into space, as though he saw a vision ij*?* '?^ ^y \"'\"^ ^\"T''s voice. •• Das a fiddle I wouldn-t seU for a t'ousand dollars. If I could playUk! dat I wouldn't seU it for ten fousand. You kin plav a fiddle to make it worth a lot— you \" ^ ^ The Romany handed back the instrument. \" Ifs got something inside it that makes it better than it is It°» not a good fiddle, but it has something-ah man alive it hasjomething!\" It was as though he wks talSn/'to Berry made a quick, eager gesture. \"Ifs got the cotton, fields and the slave days in it. It's got the wh^ .„,i the stocks in it; it's go^; the cry of the old \"„,:JThat'J go7\"i^' '\" *='\"'\"\" ''\"'■ '\"'^''^ -hat thrfidml's\" Suddenly, in an apparent outburst of anger he swent do^ on the front door and drove the gat^ring S w \" °'«_,'^^barber-shop,\" he said with an angry wave of his hand; \" it ain't a circuse.\" ^^ \" One man protested. \" I want a shave,\" he said. He tried to come inside, but w . . driven back.",
         "■I 114 THE WORLD FOR SALE i.\",.!*\"'* ?\"* » \"\"\"^ '^»«'\"' «t the brittle ofl your ftce, the old barber declared peremptorily; \"and, if I »nd that » aU I'm going to take befo' I have my dinner. So you git away. There ain't goin' to be no more music.\" The crowd drew ofl, for none of them cared to ofle. d thi» autocrat of the shears and razor. Ingolby had listened to the music with a sense of beinc swayed by a wind which blew from all quarters of the compass at once. He loved music; it acted as a clearinB- bouse to his mind; and he played the piano himself with the enthusiasm of a wUful amateur, who took liberties with every piece he essayed. There was something in this fellow s playing which the great masters, such as Paganini, must have had. As the music ceased, he did not speak, but remained leaning against the great red-plush barber's chair looking reflectively at the Romany. Berry how-ever said to the stUl absorbed musician, \" Where did you learn to play ?\" The Romany started, and a flush crossed his face Everywhere,\" he answered sullenly. .. t' ^?°'I\" *\",* *•*• *^\"« Sarasate had,\" Ingolby observed. I only heard him play but once-in London years ago: •\u003eut there s the same something in it. I bought a fiddle of Sarasate. I've got it now.\" \" Here in Lebanon ?\" The eyes of the «jmany were burning. An idea had just come into his brain. Was it through his fiddling that he was going to find a way to deal, with this Gorgio, who had come between him and his own ? \" Only a week ago it came,\" Ingolby replied. \" They actually charged me Customs duty on it. I'd seen it advertised, and I made an offer and got it at last.\" \" You have it here— at your house here ?\" asked old Berry in surprise. \" It's the only place I've got. Did you think I'd",
         "put THE SULTAN ,„ to *« it under your chintr r^our I^XVT^ f?' to show it to you. WiJI you comer ^^^'\"'^'^^^ It WM lilce him to bring matters to . head «, quicldv The Romany's eyes glistened. \" To olav Vh.'^ ^\"x alone to you ?\" he asked. ^^ Sarasate \"7tu*«r'* \"'\"%'\u003e'«='°«\u003e' to-night, if you can.\" 'ids i.::Jin7o:;;;^S; vSl\"\"!\"'?'''\"' •\"»--»• «•»• the first ^ufdeTrf tt IZZ S *\"' *'' \"\"-'\"^ »' on •«?\" l«n7^''^'M?\"manff '^ ^\"\"^ '*\"-\"'■\"« that. Well, goodbye \" '** ^°\" '\"' « y\"\" 'how ha?L'nirmi::?'i.;'';^r:;isr'°'~-- «« could be a servant to the pleasure o£ th« mL i! \"' .teahng from him the wife 4led to bmt Zlo^ T country. But perhaps it was all for fi.^?^*\"**\" would make it'il fo^ theTst £ he leiTtT^^K '^ h-wever, and passed down ihT./r-Tf u- ''.\"*•\" »hop, in the barber-shon^He r* in •\"' \"'\"\"' ^'tr^nei Gorgio in th3plus? cLr JH\"\"\"*'\"\" ^ '°^*«^ ing over him, with'SJk ^/^^^^^\"trr '^''f '^''^^ itthatmorethro/ts^SorcuUnrtXi",
         "fZZ 116 THE WORLD FOR SALE it that while the I passed ^ through the beard of a man s face the points did not suddenly slip up and stab the light from helpless eyes ! How was it that men did not use their chances ? He went lightly down the street, absorbed in a vision which was not like the reality; but it was evidence that his visit to Max Ingolby's house was not the visit of a virtuoso alone, but of an evil spirit. As the Romany disappeared. Max Ingolby had his hand •n the old barber's shoulder. ' ' 1 want one of the wigs you made for that theatrical performance of the Mounted Police, Berry,\" he said. \" Never mind what it's for. I want it at once— one with the long hair of a French- Canadian coureur-de-bois. Have you got one ?\" \" Sub, I'll send it round— no, I'll bring it round as I come from dinner. Want the clothes, too ?\" \" No. I'm arranging for them with Osterhaut. I've sent word by Jowett.\" \" You want me to know what's it's for ?\" \" You can know anything I know— almost, Berry You're a friend of the right sort, and I can trust you.\" \" Yeth-'ir, I bin some use to you, onct or twict, I guess.\" \" You'll have a chance to be of use more than ever presently.\" \" Suh, there's goin' to be a bust-up, but I know who's oomin' out on the top. That Felix Marchand and his roughs can't down you. I hear and see a lot, and there's two or three things I was goin' to put befo'vou- yeth-'ir.\" ' He unloaded his secret information to his friend and was rewarded by Ingolby suddenly shaking his hand warmly. \" That's the line,\" Ingolby said decisively. \" When do you ge over to Manitou again to cut old Hector Marchand's hair ? Soon ?\" \" To-day is his day— this evening,\" was the reply. \" Good. You wanted to know what the wig and",
         "the I THE SULTAN 117 hahianls clothes are for. Berry- well, for k- to wear in Manitou. In disguise I'm goin • thf-re i.\u003e-rr. ht among them all, among the roughs and rcghs. 1 vInt to find out things for myself. I can spoak Ircnch as good as most of em, and I can chew tobacco and swear with the best. ^ \"You suhly are a wonder,\" said the old man'admiringly. How you fin' the time I got no idee.\" \" Everything in its place. Berry, and everything in its T T\" ..J' '°* \"■ '\"* *° ^° *°-\u003c'»y- but it's in hand, and I don t have to fuss. You'll not forget the wig-you'U bnng It round yourself ?\" \" Suh. No snoopin' into the parcel then. But if you go to Manitou to-night, how can you have that fiddler ?\" He comes at nine o'clock. I'll go to Manitou later, everything in its own time.\" He was about to leave the shop when some one came bustling m. Berry was between Ingolby and the door, and for an instant he did not see who it was. Presently he heard an unctuous voice: \" Ah, good day, good day, it saw ^\" \"'*\"* '° ^\"\"\"^ \"^ ^^ \"\"*' \" y°\" P^****'\" Ingolby smiled. The luck was with him to-day so far. The voice belonged'to the Rev. Reuben Tripple, and he would be saved a journey to the manse. Accidental meetings were better than planned interviews. Old aerry s grizzled beard was bristhng with repugnance, and he was about to refuse Mr. Tripple the hospitaUty of the shears when Ingolby said: \" You won't mind my having a word with Mr. Tripple first, will you. Berry ? May we use your back parlour?\" -^ A significant look from Ingolby's eyes gave Berry his dJ,?^' ^fu '\"^\"\"\"y- ^'\"^ P\"\"\"\"^-\" H« °P«°ed the door of another room. Mr. Tripple had not seen Ingolby when he entered, mi: i:h Hi '",
         "1 lis THE WORLD FOR SALE «nd he recognized him now with a Uttle shock of surnrise There was no reason whv he sho„M „„* '\"\"-\" «\" surprise. Kh skin that suggested fat foods, or worse ;; I speak as I am moved,\" he said, puffing out his lips \"Ae s^I£ng wastnLrr\"' '\"^^''^ «^-'y- day .. i\"\"\"\"* was last night, the moving comes to- Thl mt^rTh r ^°'^' meaning,\" was the thick rejoinder K« man had a feehng that there was some real'dan^r' \" You preached a sermon last nieht which miaUt",
         "k^- THE SULTAN uq belong to an of us. If there is trouble at the Orange \" The sword of the Spirit \" swordVj'\" 7''\\^' **°\"*' ^^ y°\"' You want the tZI^' r^ T*\" •^*^* \"' '''\"* ''*^« 't \"°*- « you had done what I'm gomg to do. I'm going to send you out You'^tt go.\"''\"\" \" ' ''' ''\"'^ '^«'^°- «•--* '^-- \" Who are you to tell me 1 must go ?\" The fat hands quivered on the table with anger and emotion, but a^so with fear of something. '■ You may ^ a rich man and own railways, but \" Ja f\"r^ *f °°* \"\"^ ^\"^ ^ \"^\"\"'t °^ railways. Lately bad feehng has been growing on the Sagalac, and only a park was needed to fire the ricks. You struck the sp^rk m your sermon last night. I don't see the end of it all. sel^ii frf ^' sure-you'r. not going to take the funeral service to-morrow. The slack red lips of the man of God were gone dry tTfighf it oT ^^' '°°*\" ^^^ *'^*^\"^ ***'' the struggle t^ld\" *\" « \"° °\"^\"\" ^''°\" y\"\"'\" *^* ^\"^^y voice pro- tht ;; *^ ^ =onsci«nce alone will guide me. I'll speak me\" \" *' *\"'' *•\" P*°P'« \"^\" ^*'^\u003ci by \"In that case you will take orders from me. I'm going o save the town from what hurts it, if I can. I've got no egal rights over you, but I have moral rights, and I mwn to enforce them. You gabble of conscience and truth, bu? isn t It a new passion with yo^i-conscitnce and truth ?• .^ -ffu °^\" ^}? **''^' \"\"\"^ ^''^t™'^'* the minister's ey^ with his own. \" Had you the same love of conscience and truth at Radley ?\" \"»».«nce \u003ci, ! ill i il",
         "ll 120 THE WORLD FOR SALE A whiteness passed over the flabby face, and the beady eyes took on a glazed look. Fight suddenly died out of tnem. A.\" ^°?, **\"* °\" * missionary tour on the Ottawa River. At Radley you toiled and rested from your toil-and feasted. The girl had no father or brother, but her uncle was a railway-man. He heard where you were, and he hired with my company to come out here as a foreman. He came to drop on you. The day after he came he had a bad accident. I went to see him. He told me aU: his nerves were unstrung, you observe. He meant to ruin you, as you ruined the girl. He had proofs enough. The girl herself is in Winnipeg. Well, I know life, and I know man and man's follies and temptations. I thought It a pity that a career and a life like yours should be ruined A groan broke from the twitching lips before him, and a heavy sweat stood out oh the round, roUing forehead If the man spoke, I knew jt would be all up with you for the world is very hard on men of God who faU I've seen men ruined before this, because of an hour's passion and folly. I said to myself that you were only human and that maybe you had paid heavy in remorse and fear. Then there was the honour of the toNvn-of Lebanon I cou dn t let the thing take its course. I got the doctor to tell the man that he must go for special treatment to a hospital in Momreal, and I-well, I bought him off on his promismg to keep his mouth shut. He was a bit stiff in *t^I!l^'^''?\"^' ^' ^^'^ **'* S\"^ \"«*'^e\u003cl the money. The child died, luckily for you. Anyhow I bought him off, and he went That was a year ago. I've got all the proofs in my pocket, even to the three silly letters you wrote her when your senses were stronger than your judgment I was going to see you about them to^ay.\" He took from his pocket a small packet, and held them before the other's face. \" Have a good look",
         "at THE SULTAN 121 your own handwriting, and see if you recognize it,\" Ingolby continued. But the glazed, shocked eyes did not see. Reuben Tripple had passed the several stages of horror during Ingolby 's merciless arraignment, and he had nearly collapsed before he heard the end of the matter. When he knew that Ingolby had saved him, his strength gave way, and he trembled violently. Ingolby looked round and saw a jug of water. Pouring out a glassful he thrust it into the fat, wrinkled fingers. \" Drink and pull yourself together,\" he said sternly. The shaken figure straightened itself, and the water was gulped down. \" I thank you,\" he said in a husky voice. \" You see I treated you fairly, and that you've been a fool ?\" Ingolby asked with no lessened determination. \" I have tried to atone, and \" \" No, you haven't had the right spirit to atone. You vat fat with vanity and self-conceit. I've watched you.\" \" In future I will \" \" Well, that rests with yourself, but your beahh is bad, and you're not going to take the funeral te- roorrow. You've had a sudden breakdown, and you're going to get a call from some church in the East — as far East as Yokohama or Bagdad, I hope ; and leave here in a few weeks. You understand ? I've thought the thing out, and you've got to go. You'll do no good to yourself or others here. Take my ad-/ice, and wherever you ga, walk six miles a day at least, work in a garden, eat half as much as you do, and be good to your wife. It's bad enough for any woman to be a parson's wife, but t» be a parson's wife and your wife, too, wants a lot of fortitude.\" The heavy figure lurched to the upright, and steadied itself with a force which had not yet been apparent. |[i '\u003e i\\ i '' \\\\r'. 11",
         "il-« \"2 THE WORLD FOR SALE andii'dSUd-S'' ^P ^- -S'Sby .plied. of bills into his hJnd ^fl ; ^\"\"^ ^''\"^talittle bundle your wife. IfU J'\" the elt? ' t ^\"\"\"^\"^ '^°^^ ^o' A look of wonder revelSTn °' \"\"\"^\"S-\" he said. Tripple'sfaoe. •■T^^iU^Zr^'''''^' \"'?' '\"*» he said again. ^ \"^ \"'°'\u003c*' ''o ''^'P me God !- tu^fj';^';' «°°'*-''\u003e'\"'\" \"^I-ndel Ingolby abruptly, and stu« in hijn-if it onlthas': ctatl \"'\"^*'- \"'^\"^'''^ -« *hop together. ^ ' ^\"^ *'*' '•\"'^^' \"\u003ed they left",
         "the CHAPTER IX MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN Promptly at nine o'clock Jethro Fawe knocked at Ingolby's door, and was admitted by the mulatto man-servant Jim Beadle, who was to Ingolby like his right hand, it was Jim who took command ot his house, \" bossed \" his two female servants, arranged his railway tours, superintended his kitchen— with a view to his own individual tastes; valeted him, kept his cigars within a certain prescribed limit by a firm actuarial principle which transferred any surplus to his own use; gave him good advice, weighed up his friends and his enemies with shrewd sense ; and protected him from bores and cranks, borrowers and \" dead-beats.\" Jim was accustomed to take a good deal of responsibility, and had more than once sent people to the right-about who had designs on his master, even .though they came accredited. On such occasions he did not lie to protect himself when called to account, but told the truth per-tinaciously. He was obstinate in his vanity, and carried off his mistakes with aplomb. When asked by Ingolby what he called the Governor General when he took His Excellency over the new railway in Ingolby's private car, he said, \"I called him what everybody called him. I called him ' Succelency.\" \" And \" Succelency \" for ever after the Governor General was called in the West. Jim's phonetic mouthful gave the West a roar of laughter and a new word to the language. On another occasion Jim gave the West a new phrase to its vocabulary which remains te 123 .1' ,r\\ 1: (! Mrji ,') 'i .;i J; PI",
         "■; IM THE WORLD FOR SALE private car? We've n.\u003evJrt,!i «.*'*'\"\"''* '\" \"\"y we've had ev\u003c.r!\u003e!.r '\"\"'^ finger-bowls before, and have 'em Cn's it. ™ ^' ^^ \"P\"\"*^' \"*« 8°* «« •She'.afi„,Si;,Uy-\"^ ^^\" °\" *'\u003e''* ^^'^y ^ -d- 'Finger-bowl lady' be hans^rf t™ j . Ingo^y protested bufjimlatSm fi.^^ '^\" *\" i»y, he said decisively, '\u003c she'U ask for ♦*,.„, « bowls-._h.,i aslc for 'en,, Ld wtTd^J ^M^^:: LT; wa.'t^bo.to,.the'ra^°ir^^iyr^'^ \"^''^ '\"^ prepared to turn the. «,oi*„, *\"'\u003e\"\u003e «\"sgujse. He was wan\\;d,bu?Sbv'scIrHr T^^' \"° \"\"^\"^ ^^at he made Wm pa^e Hc^S t\"v v° ^™ '^ ^^^ ^'''\"^\"y a card lil» fw \"^ J**'* \"«ver known his master give carefully, tu)i.ed it over Sed h,. '=='^''' f ™«'^«\u003c1 \" as though the final perLis fo„ ft 1^; T ^^^^'^^'^•''y' him, and finally adm'it^dTvi^ltor \" \"'\"* \"'\"\"\"^'* ^^'^ Showed the RomanrL^ClV'/rSgfrl^^' \" ''\" onto/oTwtirwe'r: ITiS ^^ ^'^'^ ^ -\" °^'",
         "clothes MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 128 Hi!.'^'*^!.!'^ ''?'*? \"•'«\" •»« wa in the room a half-hour pened it ^ince, had been called out, cover the things up or put them - .-«»,.. M^ TTB 111 luc luvin a nail- Detore. Ingolby had opened it --ince, had been caUed and had forgotten to away. \" S't down,\" Jim said to the Romany, stiU covering the disguise. Then he raised them in his arms, and passed hlnwelf '\"*° another room, muttering angrily to The Romany had seen, however. They were the first things on which his eyes had fallen when he entered the I,;^\"; ^ \"^J- ^ '='''* \"^^f^- ^n\u003cJ workman's clothes I What were they for ? Were these disguises for the Master Gorro? Was he to wear them? If so, he-Jethro Fawe-would watch and follow him wherever he went, l^s ? * ™'8uises to do with Fleda— with his Romany His pulses throbbed; he was in an overwrought mood. Me was ready for any illusion, susceptible to any vagarv of the imagination. ^ * ' He lw)ked round the room. So this was the way thu swaggering, masterful Gorgio lived ? Here were pictures and engravings which did not seem to belong to a new town in a new land, where everythlne was useful or spectacular. Here was a sense of oilture and refinement. Here were finished and unfinished water-colours done by Ingolby's own hand or bought by him from some hard-up artist earning his way mile by niile, as it were. Here were books, not many, but well-bound and important -looking, covering fields in which Jethro Fawe had never browsed, into which, indeed, he had never entered. If he had opened them he would have seen a profusion of marginal notes in pencil, and slips of paper stuck in the pages to mark important passages. '^ He turned from them to the welcome array of weapons on the walls-rifles, shotguns, Indian bows, arrows and ^1 I'll",
         "ffi IM THE WORLP FOR SALE f™m\";K'^^\"^ *\"'' 8r*** sheath-knives such as are used ^s^ss^xrs^r^^ts^^^'S Mutfnv I /L ^ *\"\"' '\" \"•• ^\"\"^ \"\"\"» i\" the Indian Mutiny Jethro's eyes wandered eagerly over the weapons the pI'T\"\"\"'\"\"' '; '•'\"' \"\u003c=^ °\"« *\" his hand Xm booksh h' *'^ ?'\"*\"''°\" •\"' '•='* *hen he looked at th\" iT ook,^^?f ^r^'\"* \"Kai^'^i '\"\"\u003e*\" kindof self-respect. arm ?he 0^' ' ^°^ ^\"' \"\"\" *h'\"8. but the strong Tokll d\\«er'^:;ett/e^' T '\"\"\"' '?°'\"\" \"\"'' *»»« skill nnf thV J^ \" ^*y *\"« °' a raan's own books rilw'T\"'^ '^'- '•'' ''\"°*»'\"'^ brains which Books give. He straightened his shoulders till he looked and with quick vain motions he stroked and twisted his b«.wn moustache, and ran his fingers through WscSling hair In truth he was no coward; and his conceit woJd not lessen his courage when the test of it came vaW enX^'/i*''*'\"\"/. '?\" 6'°*\"\" ''\"'^ ^-^e^ness to valiant enmity, they suddenly fell on a table in a com.r where ay a black coffin-sha^d thing of Tool l^^hls case he knew, was the Sarasate violin. Sarasate-once S rl, \"^\"\"\"'y °' '* *a* \"ke the sun on the douds to him now. In music such of him as was real found a home. It fed everything in him-Ws p^S hSr- ^^\" '\"'*• ^* **^ t^** \"\"eans whereby he raa^d »d tot and\"\"*\"\"' '°^ *° P\"«^''»=*«' *» '°v« ^d S and loot and spying and secret service here and there^ the east 0 Europe. It was the flagellation ofThese ^ w^ch exated him to do all that man may do =^ ^ He was going to play to the masterful Gorgi^",
         "anT^' MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 127 ZJIh^'t^ r'A' •\"\"* \"'^^ P'^y^* **'««• He would pour the soul of his purpose into the mu»ic-to win back « t„ /r \u003e *^ '''°\"'*' \"\"\"^ ^^ ™\" '«\"\" the chair to piZmiy\"\"'\" '*''' \"\"' '\"\"''\"* *\" «•* '* '*■\" •\u003e• \"^'^ .JIIa^^ \"?\" ?*. '°°'' '\" *''* «y*' °* '•'• Romany as he entered, and noted which way his footsteps were tending Well, we needn't lose any time, but will you have a drink and a smoke first ?\" he added. He threw his hat in a comer, and opened a spirit -table where shone a half dozen cut-glass tumblers and sever^ flanked them It was the height of modem luxury im-ported from New York, and Jethro eyed it withTvio^ mward comment. The Gorgio had the world on \"s ke^- thilJZ^ foor would open to him-that was writte^n on his f''\u003c*-unless Fate stepped in and closed .11 doors ! hAlrft / °'/'«^ l^eart had already been opened, but to heln 7^.^ 4T^ •\"' ^^ '\" '*' ■\"\"» *here was still time to help Fate, if her mystic finger beckoned. arink. But I do not dnnk much when I plav \" he remarked. \" There^ enough liquor in the head when the to make the pulses go !\" *^ \"As little as you like then, if you'll only play as weU as you did this afternoon,\" Ingolby said charily _ I will play better,\" was the reply. \" On Sarasate's violin— well, of course \" '•Not only because it is Sarasate's violin, kowadjir th.fA^K °^' f\"\"\" \"\"''• y°\" ««y be a Gipsy, but ^at doesnt m^ that you're an Egyptian or m Arab Why^Arabic— why«o»«rf,-,;\u003e\" *^ aa flrao. u i J,",
         "i!« 12t THE WORLD FOR SALE The other shrugged his shoulders. \" Who can tell I I speak many languages. I do not like the J»fM«#r. It is ugly in the ear. Uonsitur. sitnor, ifftndi, Mowtdii. they hava some respect in them.\" \" You wanted to pay me respect, eh ?\" \" You have Sarasate's violin !\" \" I have a lot of things I could do without.\" \" Could you do without the Sarasate ?\" \" Long enough to hear you play it, Mr.— what is your name, may I ask ?\" \" My name is Jethro Fawe.\" \" Well, Jethro Fawe, my Romany chal. you shall show me what a violin can do.\" \" You know the Romany lingo ?\" Jethro asked, as Ingolby went over to the violin -case. \" A little— just a little.\" \" When did you learn it ?\" There was a sudden savage rage in Jethro's heart, for he imagined Fleda had taught Ingolby. \" Many a year ago when I could learri anything and remember anything and forget anything.\" Ingolby sighed. \" But that doesn't matter, for I know only a doren words or so. and they won't carry me far.\" He turned the violin over in his hands, \" This ought to do a bit more than the cotton-field fiddle,\" he said dryly. He snapped the strings, looking at it with the love of the natural connoisseur. \" Finish your drink and your cigarette. I can wait,\" he added graciously. \" If you like the cigarettes, you must take some away with you. You don't drink much, that's clear, therefore you must smoke. Every man has some vice or other, if it's only hanging on to virtue too tight.\" He laughed eagerly. Strange that he should have a feeUng of greater companionship for a vagabond like this than for most people he met. Was it some",
         "temperamental MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 129 thing in him ? \" Dago,\" as he caUed the Romany inwardly, there was stiU a bond between them. They understood the glory of a little instrument like this, and could forget the world in the Ught on a great picture. There was something m the air they breathed which gave them easier understanding of each other and of the world Suddenly with a toss Jethro drained the glass of spirit though he had not meant to do so. He puffed the cigarette an instant longer, then threw it on the floor, and was about to put his foot on it, when Ingolby stopped him. \" I'm. a slave,\" he said. •• I've got a master. It's Jim. Jim s a hard master, too. He'd give me fits if we ground our cigarette ashes into the carpet.\" He threw the refuse into a flower-pot. •'That squares Jim. Now let's turn the world inside out, he proceeded. He handed the fiddle over. \"Here's the little thing that'U let you do the trick. Isn't it a beauty, Jethro Fawe ?\" The Romany took it, his eyes glistening with mingled feelmgs. Hatred was in his soul, and it showed in the sidelong glance as Ingolby turned to place a chair where he could hear and see comfortably ; yet he had the musician's love of the perfect instrument, and the woods and the streams and the sounds of night and the whisperings of trees and the ghosts that walked in lonely places and caUed across the glens-^1 were pouring into his brain memories which made his pulses move far quicker than the hquor he had drunk could do. •' What do you wish ?\" he asked as he tuned the fiddle. Ingolby laughed good - humouredly. \"Something Eastern; something you'd play for yourself if you were out by the Caspian Sea. Something that has hfe in it.\" Jethro continued to tune the fiddle carefully and abstractedly. His eyes were half-closed, giving them a sulky look, and his head was averted. He made no reply to Ingolby, but his head swayed from side to side in that 8",
         ":■) 180 THE WORLD FOR SALE TrnZ'^hf hln^l''\"\"^ \"^ self-hypnotism. so common among the half-Eastern races. By an effort of the wiU they send through the nerves a flcid of feeling whichU b^-anaasthetichalf-intoxicant. Carried into its St t^TZV \"^^\"\".^ \"^ ^°'' °' \"\"^kes of him a ho^ ?h^ ZLr thT^'T \"^ ^^P'^^'y ^nsuous orderf or SnHH^i .K P*'^\"™\" P'°'^eies of abandoned grace. Suddenly the sensuous exaltation had come upon J^hro Fawe. It was as though he had discharged into Ws system SeroTsorir:^ ^^ \"^^^ ^ '-' -^^^ -^^^^ the'otf; \"\"\" Ti^*,^\" \"^'^ '^'\"^^ °» *J^« strini^tag the quality and findmg the range and capacity of the mstrument. It was a scamper of hieroglVphi^ wwSb could only mean anything to a musician. Well, what do you think of him ?\" Ingolby asked as the Romany lowered the bow. \" Paganini-Joachim— Sarasate-any one, It la eood enough,\" was the half-abstracted reply. \"' \" \" Sood \" It IS good enough for you— almost, eh ?\" Ingolby meant his question as a compliment, but an evdookshot into the Romany-sface,andthebow^tSLS in his hand. He was not Paganini or Saiasate, but that was no reason why he should be insulted Ingolby's quick perception saw, however, what his words had done, and he hastened to add: •• I beUeve you can get more out of that fiddle than Sarasate ever could in your own sort of music anyhow. I've never heard 3Z one play half so well the kind of piece you played Tus the fiddle. 1 didn't, did I? I gave five thou^d dol^ \" It's worth anything to the' man that loves it,\" was",
         "the MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 131 r.^^/V'^ ^^ ^^ ''\"\"'y *° ^^ ''^' »Js eyes wandering round ti:e room, then projecting themselves into space! IZlH •♦K*?.'^ oriy returned to fix themselves on Ingolby with the veiled look which sees but does not see-such a look as an oracle, or a death-god, or a soulless monster of some between-world, half-Pagan god would the Tate Gallery m London. In an instant he was away in a world which was as far win I \"\"\"f ^.Jupiter is from Mars. It was the world of his soul-s origin-a place of beautiful and yet of noisome creations also; of white mountains and green hJls, and yet of tarns in which crawled, evil tWnS a place of vagrant hurricanes and tidal-wav.s and do^d- bursts, of forests ahve with quarrellmg and afirighted beasts. It was a place where birds sang divSf Jet where obscene fowls of prey hovered in the blue or waited by the dymg demzens of the desert or the plain; where dark-eyed women heard, with sidelong triumph 4^ whisks of passion; where sweet-faced children flU to fear from terrors undefined; where harpies and witch^ women and evil souls waited to amb^h; or scS through the coverts where men brought things tHe; or where they fled for futUe refuge from armed foes. It was a world of unbridled will, this, where the soul of \u0026. T Y '*' °\"ein; and to it his senses fled nyoluntanly when he put Sarasate's fiddle to his chin this Autumn evening. From that well of the First Things-the first things of tos own hfe, the fount from which his forebears drew drank his fill; and then into the violin he poured his own story-no improvisation, but musical legends and classic fantasies and folk-breathings and h^tories of",
         "u^ijll 132 THE WORLD FOR SALE anguished or joyous haters or lovers of Ufe; treated by the impressionist who made that which had been in other scenes to other men the thing of the present and for the men who are. That which had happened by the Starzke Rjver was now of the Sagalac River. The passions and wUd love and irresponsible deeds of the life he had lived m years gone by were here. It was impossible for Ingolby to resist the spell of the music. Such abandonment he had never seen in any musician, such riot of musical meaning he had never heard. He was conscious of the savagery and the bestial soul of vengeance which spoke through the music, and drowned the joy and radiance and almost ghostly and grotesque frivolity of the earlier passages; but it had no personal meaning to him, though at times it seemed when the Romany came near and bent over him with the ecstatic attack of the music, as though there was a look m the black eyes like that of a man who kills. It had, of course, nothing to do with him; it was the abandonment of a highly emotional nature, he thought. It was only after he had been playing, practically without ceasmg, for three-quarters of an hour, that there came to Ingolby the true interpretation of the Romany mutterings through the man's white, wolf-Uke teeth. He did not shrink, however, but kept his head and watched. Once, as the musician flung his body round in a sweep of passion, Ingolby saw the black eyes flash to the weapons on the wall with a malign look which did not belong to the music alone, and he took a swift estimate of the situation. Why the man should have any intentions against him he could not guess, except that he might be one of the mad-men who have a vendetta against the capitalist. Or was he a tool of Felix Marchand ? It did not seem possible, and yet if the man was penniless and an anarchist maybe' there was the possibility. Or— the blood rushed to his face— or it mi^t be that the Gipsy's presence here,",
         "this MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 133 \u003cHsplay of devilish antipathy, as though it were all part of the music, was due, somehow, to Fleda Druse. Tie music swelled to a swirling storm, crashed and flooded the feeUngs with a sense of shipwreck and chaos, through which a voice seemed to cry— the quiver and delicate shrilhiess of one isolated string— and then fell a sudden silence, as though the end of all things had come; and on the silence the trembUng and attenuated note which had quivered on the lonely string, rising, nsmg, piercing the infinite distance uid sinking into silence again. In the pause which foUowed the Romany stood panting, his eyes fixed on Ingolby with an evil exaltation which made him seem taUer and bigger than he was, but gave him, too, a look of debauchery like that on the face of a satyr. Generations of unbridled emotion, of license of the fields and the covert showed in his unguarded features. \" What did the single cry— the motif— express ?\" Ingolby asked coolly. •• I know there was catastrophe, the tumblings of avalanches, but the voice that cried— the soul of a lover, was it ?\" The Romany's lips showed an ugly grimace. \" It was the soul of one that betrayed a lover, going to eternal tortures.\" Ingolby laughed carelessly. \" It was a fine bit of work. Sarasate would have been proud of his fiddle if he could have heard. Anyhow he couldn't have played that Is It Gipsy music ?\" \" It is the music of a * Gipsy,' as you call it.\" \"Well, it's worth a year's work to hear,\" Ingolby replied admiringly, yet acutely conscious of danger. Are you a musician by trade ?\" he asked. \" I have no trade.\" The glowing eyes kept scanning the wall where the weapons hung, and as though without purpose other than to get a pipe from the rack on the wall. Ingolby moved to where he could be prepared for any rush",
         "11 134 THE WORLD FOR SALE ft seemed ateurd that there should be such a possibility; but the world was full of strange things. ^ fiiurt = * '\"u\"^* y°\" *° *^* West ?\" he asked as he filled a pipe, his back ahnost against the wall. I came to get what belonged to me \" Ingolby laughed ironically. \"Most\" of us are here for that purpose. We think the world owes us su^ a to'.\" 1 know what :s my own.\" ^^Ingolby lit his pipe, his eyes reflectively scamiing :he \" Have you got it again out here— your own ?\" Not yet, but I will.\" Ingolby took out his watch, and looked at it \"I haven t found it easy getting all that belongs to me.\" som7nn ^^^^^°™\\it easier getting what belongs to some one else,\" was the snarling response. ^ DidTl^/ r ^^\"^\"''*- ^** ^^ *''« feU°w mean ? Did he refer to money, or-was it Fleda Druse ? See here,\" he said, \"there's no need to say things ^^tw ; A\"f^'' '°°^ ^\"y*'^\"^ that didn't bdong t^ '^oiilder-l T' ^' r '\"\" °' ^y for-market p^ or founder s shares \"-he smiled grimly. \" YouVVgiven mJes to hear you play my Sarasate-K)r even old Berry's cotton-field fid^e. I'm as grateful as I can be, and^'d \\^.IIF7 r ^°' 1* = ^''* ^' y\"\"''^ \"°^ a professional, and It s one gentleman to another as it were, I can only thank you-or maybe help you to get what's your own^^^^^J S Sr\" ^^ '* \"''' '^''- *'«--'^^«' •\u003e-« - cig\" He was still between the Romany and the wall, and bv ift:. ^T^ *•\"' manoeuvring was all nonsense, that ^^Za k \"^ ™««ading the man; but he had alwa^ trusted his instmcts, and he would not let his reas^ rule him entirely in such a situation. He could also",
         "ring MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 136 the bell for Jim, or call to him, for while he was in the house Jim was sure to be near by; but he felt he must deal with the business alone. The Romany did not move towards the spirit -table, and Ingolby became increasingly vigilant. ^^ \" No, I can't pay you anything, that's clear,\" he said; \" but to get your own— I've got some influence out here— what can I do ? A stranger is up against all kinds of things if he isn't a native, and you're not. Your home and country 's a good way from here, eh ?\" Suddenly the Romany faced him. \"Yes. I come from places far from here. Where is the Romany's home ? It is everywhere in the world, but it is everywhere inside his tent. Because his country is everywhere and nowhere, his home is more to him than it is to any other. He is alone with his wife, and with his own people. Yes, and by long and by last, he wiD make the man pay who spoils his home. It is all he has. Good or bad, it is all he has. It is his own.\" Ingolby had a strange, disturbing premonition that he was about to hear what would startle him, but he j ;r- sisted. ' ' You said you had come here to get your own— is your home here ?\" For a moment the Romany did not answer. He had worked himself into a great passion. He had hypnotized himself, he had acted for a while as though he was one of life's realities; bu: suddenly there passed through his veins the chilling sense of the unreal, that he was only acting a part, as he had ever done in his life, and that the man before him could, with a wave of the hand, raise the curtain on all his disguises and pretences. It was only for an instant, however, for there swept through him the feeling that Fleda had roused in him— the first real passion, the first true love— if what such as he felt can be love- that he had ever known ; and he saw her again as she was in the hut In the wood defying him, ready to defend her- m I",
         "iiri 136 THE WORLD FOR SALE He was again a man with a wrong, a lover disDossesswl reality. '\" °^ *^P\u003c^ force and 4H \"t \"- \" - *\"\"-^'' \"• Ionise I It was too monstrous. It was an »„)i i;^ j PU-1- n- . ^' °' barbansm even to talk M i-leda Druse as thoueh he was nf f\u003e,« =,„ J **' J^ted Punishmen^^l-^rllm hTaSrS^t; tZ had\"'?-.-''\" ''«'5' '\"°°'» \u003c=^\"\u003e« 0° h'^! ^e orcl that had made him what he was filled aU his s;nses H« stra-ghtened himself; contempt of the",
         "IshLTlwS MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 187 you husband. She does not belong to the refuse of the The Romany made a sudden rush towards the waU where the weapons hung, but two arms of iron were flung out and caught him, and he was hurled across the room He ^.H ♦kT\"'* \" *''\"*' ^\"\"^y\"^- ™^'l '^ \u003c*air where If^lti h\"*^'^*\" ^°\"\"' ^^^^ '«=\" t° tl*' floor; but he staggered to his feet again, all his senses in chaos. TM K !!^\"°^* **\" °° ^^^ ^^^'■- « you had hurt it szie'\"'''^. a ^'- ^''^'■\" ^\"^\"\"'y '^'^ ^*b ^ 6ri'» nV^. „\"\"** °°^^ ^ 60* *oo much in it to waste it.\" ^* Duvat Mi Duvdl\" gasped the Romany in his \" You can say that as much as you like, but if you play any more of your monkey tricks here, my Paganini, I,vJI wnng your neck,\" Ingolby returned, his six feet of solid fl^h making a movement of menace. And look,\" he added, \" since you are here, and I said what I meant, that I'd help you to get your own. TU keep my word. But don't talk in damned riddles. Talk white men s language. You said that Gabriel Druse's t:^^^- '\"\"^ \"'^*- ^^'^'^ ^'^'^^ y- — t' -\u003c! The Romany made a gesture of acquiescence. \" She ^ made mine according to Romany law by the River IZl uJtT-^^ ''\"\"' ^SO. I was the son of Lemuel ^7^ \"*f ^ ^'?? °* \"\" '^' ^\"\"\"^\"y*- Gabriel Druse tT„^ H ^\"'t^?- ^\"^ \"\"y ^^t'^^' «^ve him three ^ou^d pounds that we should marry, she and I, and so bnng the headship to the Fawes again when Gabriel Dn^e should die; and so it was done by the River Starzfa in the Roumelian country.\" Ingolby winced, for the man's words rang true. A cloud came over his face, but he said nothing. Jethio ras^'\"°^.t'7/''\"\"'*^S''- \"You dW no! kniwr he asked. She did not tell you she was made my",
         "wife 188 THE WORLD FOR SALE those years ago ? She did not tell you she was the daughter of the Romany King ? So it is, you see, she u afraid to tell the truth.\" ^_ Ingolby's knitted bulk heaved with desire to injure. Your wife— you melodious sinner I Do you think such tomfoolery has any effect in this dviUzed country? ihe is about as much yonr wife as I am your brother. Don t talk your heathenish rot here. I said I'd help you to get your own, because you played the fiddle as few men t»J\u003e play It, and I owe you a lot for that hour's music ; but there s nothing belonging to Gabriel Druse that belongs to you, and his daughter least of all. Look out— don't sit on the fiddle, damn you I\" The Romany had made a motion as if to sit down on the chair where the fiddle was. but stopped short at Ingolby's warmng. For an instant Jethro had an inclination to seize the fiddle and break it across his knees. It would be an exquisite thing to destroy five thousand dollars' worth of this man's property at a single wrench and blow. But the spiHt of the musician asserted itself before the vengeful lover could carry out Ws purpose; as Ingolby felt sure it would Ingolby had purposely given the warning about the fiddle, m the belief that it might break the unwelcome mtensity of the scene. He detested melodrama, and the scene came precious near to it. Men had been killed before his eyes more than once, but there had been no rodomontade even when there had been a woman in the case. This Romany lover, however, seemed anxious to make a SiciUan drama out of his preposterous claim, and it sickened him. Who was the feUow that he should appear in the guise of a rival to himself! It was humiliating and offensive. Ingolby had his own kind of pride and vanity and they were both hurt now. He would have been less imtable if this rival had been as good a man as himself or better. He was so much a gamester that he",
         "would MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN 139 ' Let the best man win,\" and have taken his have said, chances. His involuntary strategy triumphed for the moment. The Romany looked at the fiddle for an instant with murderous eyes, but the cool, quiet voice of Ingolby asain speafang sprayed his hot virulence. \" Yott can make a good musician quite often, but a good flddte is a piize-packet from the skies,\" Ingolby said When you get a good musician and a good fiddle together It s a day for a salute of a hundred guns.\" Half-dazed with unregulated emotion, Jethro acted with indecision for a moment, and the fiddle was safe. But he had suffered the indignity of being flung Uke a bag of bones across the room, and the microbe of insane revenee vaa m him. It was not to be killed by the cr.lJ humour of the man who had worsted him. He returned to the attack. \" She is mine, and her father knows it is so. I have wuted aU these years, and the hour has come. I wiU \" Ingolby's eyes became hard and merciless again ' ' Don't talk your Gipsy rhetoric. I've had enough. No hour has come that makes a woman do what she doesn't want to do in a free country. The lady is free to do what she pleases here within British law, and British law takes no heed of Romany law or any other law. You'll do well to go back to your Roumelian country or whatever It IS. The lady will marry whom she likes.\" \" She will never many you,\" the Romany said huskily ana menacingly. •' \" I have never asked her. but if I do, and she said yes, no one could prevent it,\" \" I would prevent it.\" \" How ?\" \"She is a Romany: she belongs to the Romany people: I wiU find a way.\" j f i' \u003e Ingolby had a flash of",
         "intuition. 140 THE WORLD FOR SALE \"You know weU that if Gabriel Dru»e passed the word you, Ufa j^dn't be worth . day'.'^hS^ Jlt^''\"\\Z'^^ \"°* ^ \"\"^ ««*\"\" or roorTdeadly. If you do anything to hurt the daughter of Gabriel Druse youw,UpaytheftUlprice.andyoutaowit. ^eRoSl^' don t love you better than their rightful chief.\" I am their rightful chief.\" be'tK^M^i' *,'\"'' *'^'* '•y '»• **^' yo\" nught as weU th«!-.^ ^\"^ ^\"\"^ \"*\"™ *° *^* *«*' of the Gipsy (^, S l^LTL^ °\"=''r*\" ''*^'' 8*^« y°\" » good «Jarj; ^n'fj^ You ve got no standing in this cotwtry. Yon can t do anything to hurt me except try to kiU me. and 1 11 take my chance of that. You'd better have a drink now and go qmetly home to bed. Try and undLteSd h^ ,™ \"•\" \"^\"\"^ *\"*\"' '^^ ''* don't settle o^X, He jerked his head backwards towards the wall. \" Those things are for ornament, not for use. Come, Fawe have a dnnk and go home like a good citizen for one^^t Sy\" The Romany hesitated, then shook his head ind muttered chaotically. , U^^ r\"'\" \"\"^ *•\"* \"^°*'^* «P'y- Ingo'by pressed H« i!'h Vr r**\"\"*' J™ Beadle wTin the^^ He had evidently been at the keyhole. \" Jim,\" he saS show the gentleman out.\" ' But suddenly he caught up a box of cigars from the ableaad thrust it into the Romany's han^. \"^y-^ r-WI ^n il '^r\" P\"* \"°'' ^\"\"^y **\"! i°to your playing. ^. f 1 y.!' \"'T P^^y^ '^*«' than you've d^e S* ^L % ^T' ^ \" **'*'* \"y \"fe O\" that. Good night. Show Mr. Fawe out, Jim.\" ^^ The Romany had not time to thrust back the dears upon his host and dazed by the strategy of the tLS the superior force and mind of the nZ who a",
         "TLn? MATTER AND MIND AND TWO MEN Ul a«o be would have killed, he took the box and turned towards the door, taking bis hat dazedly from Jim. At the door, however, catching sight of the sly grin on the miJatto servant's face, his rage and understlmdin* returned to him. and he faced the masterful Gorgio once agam. ^ \" By God, I'll have none of it I\" he exclaimed roughly and threw the box of cigars on the floor of the room. Ingolby was not perturbed. \"Don't forget there's an east-bound train every day,\" he said meaningly, and turned his back as the door dosed. In another minute Jim entered the room. \" Get the clothes and the wig and things, Jim. I must be off,\" he said. \"The toughs don't get going tiU about this time over at Mamtou,' responded Jim. Then he told his master aboirt the clothes having been exposed in the room when the Romany arrived. \" But I don't think he seen them,\" Jim added with approval of his own conduct. \" I got em out quick as lightning. I covered 'em like a blanket \" All nght, Jim; it doesn't matter. That fellow's got other things to think of than that.\" He was wrong, however. The Romany was waiting outside m tha darkness not far away-watching and waiting.",
         "^^ CHAPTER X FOB LUCK Wack hair WM flung m waves of triumph over his heavZ hned forehead; one hand was on his hip with brave S ^Sr'''' ^^^'^ \"«''*''\"*'*«-\"« '\"*^^«5^^ ♦J'^i^^*°' .'\"™- ^'^* 8°* him-like that I\" he said eS^ha^k^^\" r '*°'^ \" \"\"^\"^ \"\"* be loosed by ai earthquake. For sure, ifg a thing finished as the sold^ of a pannikin— Mke that.\" \"^^^u as me soiaer i.\"*J^'J^''* I'P * \"° quart-pot from the bar-counter and showed the soldered bottom ofit. \"\"-counter and He was alone in the bar of Barbazon's Hotel excent for rZ^r°~J?*' y°'^8«'* »' '^^ officials who h^bi^ mS them\"''TS^\"' of the railways when IngolbytS ^Jfut ^' *** * \"\"^ who had got his position onginaUy by nepotism, and represented the wo«t efe^ents popular nund He had, however, a Uttle residue of that zation begets qualms as to extreme courses. rep?v. '^IMV'^'^r^y ** *'\"' 1«^\u003c^«° pot and said to acerie^dtrz?aS.^rp^--7-^^^^ Hes skmned this time^^all right.\" was",
         "Marchand's FOR LUCK ,43 BarbMon'. Th.,,-, ^ ^ ^ *''*\u003e\"■«' winding up at theVrllanlwrXv-n *\\*''''J:'^'' «°* «\u003e'« head, a s^ieezed oW- tWn ?'\"'%*'\u003e?* ^^-e\"! look like IngoTby'Sat ^el •to*t'!oirol'^irr \"l' \"■«*\" \"^'^u'\"^J''' \"» *h°»«h he had gone too far Bar^n the ^^^^XZlZ^:,^^^^!^-^- 'or -lSp.r^gKaKaShe*^~^ noise of the crowd was incr«L,inrtk \"* ^°°^- The «. loud that^rSiadT^U ♦t'*'\"*'^ '''°\"*^ *«« Barbazon had an evil face -kJZ ™*^*'^'°- he had been in gaol in SeW for ™h^ \"\"\"' .\"'\"\"'^ *hat had served Ms'Time hVh5^ J^r'^^JL'\"' *''* f \" ''* stolen and come West ^ hln c? J / \"\"\"\"^y ^e had at Manitou. and hSt^'^^ttltt SJ \"'^\" than one. He was heaw =n/i fi,- f \" \"\"\"^^ ^«\"ses shotUden, big hanl^ aSd^ad^e^^^nlt*' ^\"«^ stolid face where long horns i^Z a °°^**^ °\"* \"' « drink had left fbTmS^'^'^f '\"^^ ^^ \"ther than was therefore ready t\"^ie ^LnT \"^f v 'P'\"*^' '^d drink. More than one h^ ^^^^n^e of those who did and acre of landin the d^^t^\"^^'^ ^^ '^^ ox. 5 *l",
         "'•) 144 THE WORLD FOR SALE could Barbazon, and he sold more than wine and spirits. He had a wife who had left him twice because of his mis-demeanours, but had returned and straightened out his house and affairs once again ; and even when she went off with Lick Baldwin, a cattle-dealer, she was welcomed back without reproaches by Barbazon, chiefly because he had no morals, and her abilities were of more value to him than her virtue. On the whole, Gios Barbazon was a bad lot. At Marchand's words Barbazon shrugged his shoulders. \" The more spent to-night, the less to spend to-morrow,\" he growled. \" But there's going to be spending for a long time,\" Marchand answered. \" There's going to be a riot to-morrow, and there's going to be a strike the next day, and after that there's going to be something else.\" ' ' What else ? ' ' Barbazon asked, his be'\u003edy eyes fastened on Marchand's face. \" Something worth while — ^better than all the rest.\" Barbazon's low forehead seemed to disappear almost, as he drew the grizzled shock of hair down, by wrinkling his forehead with a heavy frown. \" It's no damn good, m'sieu',\" he growled. \"Am I a fool ? They'll spend money to-night, and to-morrow, and the next day, and when the row is on ; and the more they spend then, the less they'll have to spend by-and- bye. It's no good. The steady trade for me — all the time. That is my idee. And the something else — ^what ? You think there's something else that'll be good for me ? Nom it Dieu, there's nothing you're doing, or mean to do, but '11 hurt me and everybody.\" '* That's your view, is it, Barbazon ?\" exclaimed Mar-chand loudly, for the crowd was now almost at the door. \" You're a nice Frenchman and patriot. That crowd'll be glad to hear you think they're fools. Suppose they took it into their heads to wreck the place",
         "V Barbazon muttered stolidly, but FOR LUCK 145 ,0?^'?°\"^'\"\"''''^.*^^ «°* P'^'*'\"' ''\"* ^ eyes sharpened, ^1 toTlf °T *^' bar-counter, and said withTTnarl ! ^^.w f ' f y \"\"^^^ y°\" ^^' »\"\u003c! then I'U have something to say about something else, m'sieu' \" rw!!:^t ^\"/\"^f t° -^eply angrily, but he instantly ^^ged his mmd, and before Barbazon could stop him, 1^ Sd'trU'^ \"\"\"*\" ■\"' ^\"PP^-\"^ -*° *\u003e\u003e« °^ ^hl. w*°°'V'**t' \"\"y^'^ns- Barbazon,\" he said over his shoulder as he closed the door behind him I'U see to that,\" with malicious eyes. The front door was flung open now, and the crowd poured into the room, boisterous, reckless, though some w^e only suUen, watchful and angry. These IS we mostly men above middle age, and of a fanatical and racially bitter type. They were not many, but in one probably the less intelligent but the more tenacious and Z^^ ^They were black spots of gathering storm in an electnc atmosphere. All converged upon the bar. Two assistants rushed the dn^ along the counter with flourishes, while Barbazon took m the cash and sharply checked the rougher element, who were mchned to tieat the bar as a place for looting Most of them, however, had a wholesome fear of Barbazon and also most of them wished to stand well with him- credit was a good thing, even in a saloon. For a Uttle time the room was packed, then some of the more restless spirits, their thirst assuaged, sallied forth to taste the lager and old rye elsewhere, and \" raise Cain \" in the streets. When they went, it became possible to move about more freely m the big bar-room, at the end of which was a bjUiaid-table. It was notable, however, that the more sullen elements stayed. Some of them were strangers to each other. Manitou was a distributing point foTall",
         "10 146 THE WORLD FOR SALE radiations of the compass, and men were thrown together in its streets who only saw one another once or twice a year— when they went to the woods in the FaU or worked the rivers in the Summer. Some were Men- nonites, Doukhobois and Finlanders, some Swedes, Nor-wegians and Icelanders. Others again were birds of passage who would probably never see Manitou in the future, but they were mostly French, and mostly Catholic, and enemies of the Orange Lodges wherever they were, east or west or north or south. They all had a common ground of unity— half-savage coureurs-de-bots, river- drivers, raUway-men, factory hands, cattlemen, farmers, labourers ; they had a gift for prejudice, and taking sides on something or other was as the breath of the nostrils to them. The greater number of the crowd were, however, excitable, good-natured men, who were by instinct friendly, save when their prejudices were excited; and their oaths and exclamations were marvels of droll ingenuity. Most of them were still too good-humoured with drink to be dangerous, but aU hoped for trouble at the Orange funeral on principle, and the anticipated strike had elements of \"thriU.\" They were of a class, however, who would swing from what was good-humour to deadly anger in a minute, and turn a wind of mere prejudice into a hurricane of hfe and death with the tick of a clock. They would aU probably go to the Orange funeral to-morrow in a savage spirit. Some of them were loud in denunciation of Ingolby and \" the Lebanon gang \" ; they joked coarsely over the dead Orangeman, but their cheerful violence had not yet the appearance of realiiy. One man suddenly changed all chat. He was a river- driver of stalwart proportions, with a red handkerchief round his neck, and with loose corded trousers tucked into his boots. He had a face of natural ugliness made ahnost repulsive by marks of smallpox. Red, flabby lips and",
         "an FOR LUCK 147 :srLtjghT*' •\"\" ' \"^^ ^\"'='' '\"''° ^^' Jdln^ fr \"T *° .^\"°? *°-™6^* *»d have it out,\" he said ,n French. \"That Ingolby-lefs go break Ws wmdows and give him a dip in the river. He's the cuS^ of this oty. Holy, once Manitou was a pUce to UveT now . -s a place to die in 1 The factories, tL mills, h^y^e JScet!\" 1 Tl^\"\"^ ^'^'^'' \"^^ '^y^'^^' the railway w«ti^l\"!l°^''^\"°\"- I°e°% took it there. Manitou w^ the best town in the West ; it's no good now. Who's ^e .^use? Ingolby's the cause. Name of God, The was ^here I'd get him by the throat as quick as win! He opened and shut his fingers with spasmodic malice «°we'S^^^Te'add T-'^''''' ^°^°« *° ^^^ ^ ^' oJJr^r X u^, ^* ' e°^S *° take the bread and^n7\u003e,'\"°f''''.^f. t^°^« *° P\"^* ^' heel on Manitou\" and gnnd her down ,U he makes her knuckle to Lebanon- to a lot of mfidels, Protes'ants, and thieves Who's gomg to stand it ? I say-bagosh. I say, who's gol^ to Jl^'''l^!^T^ \"!*''* Monseignenr,\" ventured a factory- hand, who had a wife and children to support, and however ^^: \"\" '\"'\" \"^^' '°^ ^''^^ whTr would stop Ws \" SacribapUmel That's part of his game,\" roared the big nver-driver m reply. \u003c• I'U take the word of Fehx Marchand about that. Look at him! Ttat Fetx Marchand doesn't try to take the bread out of people's ^nt^k \\T'' \"\"\"•'y here, he gives it the^'^He ^t. the old town to stay as it is and not be swJlowS thl* f^ \"•\"?!? *f ^''^ Marchand,\" cried some one in the throng. AH cheered loudly save one old man ,^th gnzded hair and beard, wlio leaned ,gainst the wall half-way down the room smoking a oom^-oob p^. He '",
         "i 148 THE WORLD FOR SALE was a French Canadian in dress and appearance, and he spat on the floor like a navvy— he had fiUed his pipe with the strongest tobacco that one man ever offered to another. As the crowd cheered for Felix Marchand, he made his way up towards the bar slowly. He must have been tall when he was young; now he was stooped, yet there was still something very sinewy about him. \" Who's for Lebanon ?\" cried the big river-driver with an oath. \"Who's for giving Lebanon hell, and ducking Ingolby in the river ?\" \"I am— I am— I am— all of us !\" shouted the crowd. \" It's no good waiting for to-morrow. Let's get the Lebs by the scruff to-night. Let's break Ingolby's windows and soak him in the Sagalac. AUons—aUons gair Uproar and broken sentences, threats, oaths, and objurgations sounded through the room. There was a sudden movement towards the door, but the exit of the crowd was stopped by a slow but clear voice speaking in French. \" Wait a minute, my friends,\" it cried. \" Wait a minute. Let's ask a few questions first.\" ''Who's he?\" asked a dozen voices. \"What's he going to say ?\" The mob moved again towards the bar. The big river-driver turned on the grizzled old man beside the bar-counter with bent shoulders and lazy, drawUng speech. \"What've you got to say about ic, son?\" he asked threateningly. \" Well, to ask a few questions first— that's all,\" the old man replied. \"Yon don't belong here, old cock,\" the other said roughly. \" A good many of us don't belong here,\" the old man replied quietly. \" It always is so. This isn't the",
         "first FOR LUCK 149 time I've been to Manitou. You're a river-dWver, and you don't live here either,\" he continued. ,nH r^**'? ^°^ ^°* *° ^y *^\"* '* ' I\"'^\" »*en coming and going here for ten years. I belong-bagosh, what do you want to ask? Hurry „p. We've got'loA to do We re gomg to raise heU in Lebanon \" J-And give hell to Ingolby.\" shouted some one in the ^'^Suppose Ingolby isn't there?\" questioned the old J^^^'^^^-'^ °\"^,°* 5'°\"' questions, is it ?\" sneered the big nver-dnyer. \" Well, if you knew him as we do, you'd know that It's at night-time he sits studyin' how he'U cut Lebanon s throat He's home, all right. He's in Lebanon anyhow, and we'll find him.\" x-cua«uii •' WeU, but wait a minute-be quiet a bit,\" said the old 'Tv.^'^'' ^^^\"« ''°^^y ^* *•\"\u003e »''S river-driver. »„J -^K '°'\"\\'i^ ^°°^ ^^- ^\u003c^ I'^« had some experi- Zn '\"/^«,/°rf\u003cJ- Did you ever give that Ingo%a chance to tell you what his plans were ? Did you fver get dose to hnn and try to figure what he was driving ^ ? There s no diance of getting at the truth if you don't let a man state his case-but no. If he can't make you see his case then is the time to jib, not before\" crol?' \" w\"l'\" '\"',f * T^^ Relish road-maker in the crowd. We know all right what Ingolby's after.\" Eh, well, what is he after?\" asked the old man looking the other in the eye. ^ft'lr^w'' *\" t?'\"' O°f-\u003cx\u003ef-oof, that's what he's after. He s for his own pocket, he's for being boss of aU ^e woolly West. He's after keeping us poor'and m^^ ^n^tf M \"\" ' \"^f S'^*'°6 ^^'^ \"\"'^l' °n two town! and three railways, and doing what he likes with it aU: h^trirofdtss-^ '^^^ ^\"^ \"\" \"' ^°\" •«*■ ^^t'^ The other stroked his beard with hands which, somehow. if 1 l,v",
         "1$ 160 THE WORLD FOR SALE gave little indication of age, and then, with a sudden jerk forward of his head, he said : \" Oh, it's like that, eh ? Is that v/hat M'sieu' Marchand told you ? That's what he said, is it ?\" The big river-driver, eager to maintain his supreme place as leader, lunged forward a step, and growled a chaUenge. \" Who said it ? What does it matter if M'sieu' Marchand said it— it's true. If I said it, it's true. All of us in this room say it, and it's true. Young Marchand says what Manitou says.\" The old man's eyes grew brighter— they were exceedingly sharp for one so old, and he said quite gently now : \" M. Marchand said it first, and you all say it after-wards—ah, bah I But listen to me; I know Max Ingolby that you think is such a villain; I know him well. I knew him when he was a little boy and \" \" You was his nurse, I suppose,\" cried the Englishman's voice amid a roar of laughter. \" Taught him his A-B-C— was his dear, kind teacher, eh ?\" hilariously cried another. The old man appeared not to hear. \" I have known him all the years since. He has only been in the West a few years, but he has lived in the world exactly thirty- three years. He never willingly did anybody harm- never. Since he came West, since he came to the Sa^ac, he's brought work to Lebanon and to Manitou. There are hundreds more workmen in both the towns than there were when he came. It was he made others come with much money and build the factories and the mills. Work means money, money means bread, bread means Ufe— so.\" The big river-driver, seeing the effect of the old man's words upon the crowd, turned to them with an angry gesture and a sneer. \" I s'pose Ingolby has paid this old skeesicks for talking this swash. We know all right what Ingolby is, and what he's done. He's made war between the",
         "two FOR LUCK 161 towns— there's hell to pay now on both sides of the Sagalac. He took away the railway offices from here, and threw men out of work. He's done harm to Manitou— he's against Manitou every time.\" Murmurs of approval ran through the crowd, though some were silent, looking curiously at the forceful and confident old man. Even his bent shoulders seemed to suggest driving power rather than the weight of years. He suddenly stretched out a hand in command as it were. \" Comrades, comrades,\" he said, \"every man makes mistakes. Even if it was a mistake for Ingolby to take away the offices from Manitou, he's done a big thing for both cities by combining the three railways.\" \" Monopoly,\" growled a voice from the crowd. \" Not monopoly,\" the old man repUed with a ring to his voice, which made it younger, fresher. \" Not monopoly, but better management of the railways, with more wages, more money to spend on things to eat and drink and wear, more dollars in the pocket of everybody that works in Manitou and Lebanon. Ingolby works, he doesn't loaf.\" \" Oh, gosh all hell, he's a dynamo,\" shouted a voice from the crowd. \" He's a dynamo running the whole show— eh !\" The old man seemed to grow shorter, but as he thrust his shoulders forward, it was Uke a machine gathering energy and power. \" I'll tell you, friends, what Ingolby is trying to do,\" he said in a low voice vibrating with that force which belongs neither to age nor youth, but is the permanent activity uniting all ages of a man. \" Of course, Ingolby is ambitious and he wants power. He tries to do the big things in the world because there is the big thing to do— for sure. Without such men the big things are never done, and other men have less work to do, and less money and poorer f V* Hi!",
         "i^g IS2 THE WORLD FOR SALE homes. They discover and construct and design and invent and oiganize and give opportunities. I am a working man, but I know what Ingolby thinks. I know what men think who try to do the big things. I have tned to do them.\" The crowd v/ere absolutely still now, but the big river- dnver shook himself free of the eloquence, which somehow swayed them all, and said: \" You— you look as if you'd tried to do big things, yon do, old skeesicks. I bet you never earned a hunderd dollars m your life.\" He turned to the crowd with fierce gestures. \"Let's go to Lebanon and make the place smg, he roared. \" Let's get Ingolby out to talk for himself, if he wants to talk. We know what we want to do and we're not going to be bossed. He's for Lebanon and we're for Manitou. Lebanon means to boss us, Lebanon wants to sit on us because we're Catholics, because we're French, because we're honest.\" Again a wave of revolution swept through the crowd. ■Hie big river-driver represented their natural instincts, their native fanaticism, their prejudices. But the old man spoke once more. \" Ingolby wants Lebanon and Manitou to come together not to faU apart,\" he declared. \" He wants peace. If he gets rich here he won't get rich alone. He's working for both towns. If he brings money from outside, that's good for both towns. If he \" \" Shut your mouth, let Ingolby speak for himself,\" snarled the big river-driver. \" Take his dollars out of your pocket and put them on the bar, the dollars Ingolby gives you to say all this. Pu\u003c \u003c hem dollars of Ingolby's up for drinks, or we'U give you a jar that'll shake yon, old wart-hog.\" At that instant a figure forced itself through the crowd, and broke into the packed circle which was drawing closer upon the old",
         "man. FOR LUCK in He flung a hand out towards the It was Jethro Fawe. old man. \"You want Ingolby— weU, that's Ingolby,\" he shouted. Like hghtning the old man straightened himself, snatched the wig and beard away from his head and face, and with quiet fearlessness said: \" Yes, I am Ingolby.\" For an instant there was absolute silence, in which Ingolby weighed his chances. He was among enemies. He had meant only to move among the crowd to discover their attitude, to find things out for himself. He had succeeded, and his belief that Manitou could be swayed m the nght direction if properly handled, was correct. Beneath the fanaticism and the racial spirit was human nature; and untU Jethro Fawe had appeared, he had hoped to prevent violence and the coUision at to-moiiow's funeral. Now the situation was ail changed. It was hard to tell what sharp turn things might take. He was about to speak, but suddenly from the crowd there was spat out at him the words, \" Spy I Sneak I Spy !\" Instantly the wave of feeling ran against him. He smiled frankly, however, with that droU twist of hU mouth which had won so many, and the raillery of his eyes was more friendly than any appeal. \" Spy, if you like, my friends,\" he said firmly and dwrly. •' Moses sent spies down into the Land of Promise, and they brought back big bunches of grapes. WeU, I ve come down into a land of promise. I wanted to know just how you all feel without being told it by some one else. I knew if I came here as Max Ingolby I shouldn't hear the whole truth; I wouldn't see exactly how you see. so I came as one of you, and yon must admit, my French IS as good as yours almost.\" He laughed and nodded at them. \" There wasn't one of you that knew I wasn't a",
         "French- IM THE WORLD FOR SALE man. That's in my favour. If I knoT? the Ft«ndi language as I do, and can talk to you in French a* I've done, do you think I don't understand the French people, and what yon want and how you feel ? I'm one of the lew men in the West that can talk your language. I learned K when I was a boy, so that I might know my French fcUow-oountrymen under the same flag, with the same King and the same national hope. As for your religion, God knows, I wish I was as good a Protestant as lots of you are good Catholics. And I tell you this, I'd be glad to have a minister that I could follow and respect and love as I respect and love Monseignenr Lourde of Manitou. I want to bring these two towns together, to make them a sign of what this country is, and what it can do; to make hundreds Uke ourselves in Manitou and Lebanon work together towards health, wealth, comfort and happi-ness. Can't you see, my friends, what I'm driving at ? Im fbr peace and work and wealth and power— oot power for myself alone, but power that belongs to all of us. If I can show I'm a g«)od man at my job, maybe better than others, then I have a right to ask you to follow me. If I can't, then throw me out. I tell you I'm your friend— Max Ingolby is your friend.\" \"Spy! Spy! Spy !\" cried a new voice. It came from behind the bar. An instant after, the owner of the voice leaped up on the counter. It was FeUx Marchand. He had entered by the door behind the bar into Barbazon's office. \" When I was in India,\" Marchand cried, \" I found a snake in the bed. I killed it before it stung me. There's a snake in the bed of Manitou— what are you going to do with it ?\" The men swayed, murmured, and shrill shouts of \" Marchand ! Marchand I Marchand !\" went up. The crowd heaved upon Ingolby. \" One minute I\" he called with outstretched arm and commanding",
         "voice. FOR LUCK 150 S'm\\^:nJ.„.'°'^'^ i« him „«d. him ™.ter of At that moment two men were fiercely fi£htin« tlurir way through the crowd towards where lS?SL * S Go back-p back I\" he caUed to them. ^ of a^d^^o ^he tS\"'l\"T°*'7 •*\"'*\"8 °\" • »•\"• »» '«\u003e\"t :;rhJ::itii4»jr:,ri'' ^«'-*-'\u003e-^« A minute afterwards the bar was empty, save for Osterhaut, Jowett, old Barbaion, and his a^rtairt. Barbazon and Jowett Ufted the mo ionless fiL^\" ?^?; arms, and carried it into a little room. ^^ «3^° ^^t^\"\"\"* ^^^ \"P t''* horseshoe tied with its g^^lue nbbons, now stained with blood, and put hij to \"For luck,\" he",
         "said. CHAPTER XI THE SENTENCE OP THE PAniN Fleda waked suddenly, but without motion; just a wide opening of the eyes upon the darkness, and a swift beating of the heart, but not the movement of a muscle. It was as though some inward monitor, some gnome of the hidden life had whispered of danger to her slumbering •pirit. The waking was a complete emergence, a vigilant and searching attention. There was something on her breast weighing it down, yet with a pressure which was not weight alone, and maybe was not weight at all as weight is understood. Instantly there flashed through her mind the primitive belief that a cat will lie upon the breasts of children and suck their breath away. Strange and even absurd as it was, it seemed to her that a cat was pressing and pressing down upon her breast. There could be no mistaking the feline presence. Now with a sudden energy of the body, she threw the Thing from her, and heard it drop, with the softness of feline feet, on the Indian rug upon the floor. Then she sprang out of bed, and, feeling for the matches, lit a candle on the small table beside her bed, and moved it round searching for what she thought to be a cat. It was not to be seen. She looked under the bed; it was not there .-under the washstand, under the chest of drawers, under the improvised dressing-table ; and no cat was to be found. She looked under the chair over which hung her clothes, even behind the dresses and the Indian deer-skin cape hanging on the door. There was no Ufe of any kind save her own in the room,",
         "1S8 THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 187 •o far as she could see. She laughed nervously, though her heart was still beating hard. That it sh^;id 3 hUls infested by animals the enemy of man I vLo when a little girl had faced beasts of prey \"on,- S here .n her own safe room on the SagaJac^^.,^: - ^ he could not bear that last sign of his exile- . „. hr fortress o the town-dweUer there was a str: n,e t, I' • . o her puls,a in the presence of a mere U.iUu^^ mghtmare-the first she had had ever. H- r dr „„'! ,' SSci^L ^r^' *^A° '^PPy ■«\"» \"\"l^\"' ^he ..lack fancies of mghtmare. On the night that Jeth n , , ..c. had first confronted her father and herself, and he Had ^n earned to the Hut in the Wood, her s^ had b^J SlTSfthe H '•** T' \"\".* ^\"\"\"^''^■- '\" her sLp on the night of the day of his release, she had been tos^d uDon vague clouds of mental unrest; but that wasT^ C re^y disordered sleep she had eCer known. m,,r„, ^ 1^' T^f *'^^* ^\"^ '\u003e«*'^' she looked in the tZ^^K L, ? f ^'\"«-table, and laughed nervously at the Rocked look in her 'eyes, at the hand pressed upon the bo«,m whose agitations troubled the delicate hS^n at her breast. The pale light of the candle, the reflection from the white muslin of her dressing-table and her Sht\" wear, the strange, deep darkness of hef eyes, the u^Ithe^d al'h^w \\\"'T ^ ^\"^ '\" '^ \"^^ ^°\"\u003c^ ''s *« looked at herself, her tongue chiding her apprehensive eves t~m,l^ contemptuously adding its ^cSmment onT^ nS !k\\. ^i ^** '' '\"^ nightmare-a wakhj nightmare, that's what it was.\" \"^ She searched the room once more, however-everv corner, under the bed. the chest of drawers and",
         "thTw 1S8 THE WORLD FOR SALE ing-table, before, she got into bed again, her feet icily cold. And yet again before settling down she looked round, perplexed and inquiring. Placing the matches beside the candlestick, she blew out the light. Then, half-turning on her side with her face to the wall, she composed herself to sleep. Resolutely putting from her mind any sense of the supernatural, she shut her eyes with confidence of coming sleep. While she was, however, still within the borders of wakefulness, and wholly conscious, she felt the Thing jump from the floor upon her legs, and crouch there with that deadening pressure which was not weight. Now with a start of anger she raised herself, and shot out a determined hand to seize the Thing, whatever it was. Her hand grasped nothing, and again she distinctly heard a soft thud as of something jumping on the floor. Ex-asperated, she drew herself out of bed, lit the candle again, and began another search. Nothing was to be seen; but she had now the curious sense of an uriieen presence. She went to the door, opened it, and looked out into the narrow hall. Nothing was to be seen there. Then she closed the door again, and stood looking at it meditatively for a moment. It had a lock and key; yet it had never been locked in the years they had lived on the Sagalac. She did not know whether the key would turn in the lock. After a moment's hesitation, she shrugged her shoulders and turned the key. It rasped, proved stubborn, but at last came home with a click. Then she turned to the window. It was open about three inches at the bottom. She closed it tight, and fastened it, then stood for a moment in the middle of the room looking at both door and window. She was conscious of a sense of sufiocation. Never in her life had she slept with door or window or tent -flap entirely closed. Never before had she been shut in all night behind closed doors and sealed windows.",
         "Now, THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 1S9 ZJhj'T \"'.Imprisonment was felt, her body Sv 'it *P\"* \"^\"ted the funereal embn.ce of security. It panted for the freedom which gives the chaUenge to danger and the courage to face it. f„ Tfu *° *^' *^°**«' \"\u003e'! °Pened it slightly at the top, and then sought her bed again; but evef as she ay down, something whispered to her mind that it w« foSJ to lock he door and yet leave the window open, if it wa^ al^e'°1: With an exclamation of selfia^^ thr^nH ^''*'°\" ** something, she got up and dosed the window once more. vj^cu Again she composed herself to sleep, lying now with her face turned to the window and tb^ Zl She w2 s^^ sure that she had been the victim of a halludnat^ whiA, emerging from her sleep, had invaded the borders of^fulness, and then had reproduced itt^f S a SSg illusion-an mutation of its original existence. invT^fi *° T\"'\"''' *°y superstitious feeling, she mvoked deep and was on its borders once more wheS she was startled more violently than before. TTie S had sprung agam upon her feet and was crouched there Wide awake, she waited for a moment to makTsure t^t dream. In the pause, she felt the Thing draw up towards ^d^'t^T^ '*' '^''y ^°°« withtiger-Uke doseneS and with that strange pressure whid, was not weight but With a cry which was no longer doubt, but agonized t^u ^^- ^\"^ ^'''- ''\"'^' ^ '^^ \u003cJid so, sheila homble cold air breathing from a bloodless body, chill her .},lt \"**«^*^ ^**\"* ^^^ \"** \u003c\u003e■\u003e her feet again. With shaking angers she lighted the candle yet once more of L:S' teT^ \"\" 'T ^*-\u003c^\"« V the^h^ 01 drawers. The room was ahnost brilliantly bright^now. k i",
         "I!' MB THE WORLD FOR SALE ^th a gesture of incredulity she looked round. The doors and windows were sealed tight, and there was noth-ing to be seen; yet she was more than ever conscious of a presence grown more manifest. For a moment she stood staring straight before her at the place where it seemed to be. She realized its malice and its hatred, and an intense anger and hatred took possession of her. She had always laughed at such things even when thrilled by wonder and manufactured terrors. But now there was a sense of conflict, of evil, of the indefinable things in which so many believed. Suddenly she remembered an ancient Sage of her tribe, who, proficient in mjrsteries and secret rites gathered from nations as old as Phoenicia and Egypt and as modem as Switzerland, held the Romanys of the world in awe, for his fame had travelled where he could not follow. To Fleda in her earliest days he had been like one inspired, and as she now stood facing the intangible Thing, she recalled an exorcism which the Sage had recited to her, when he had sufficiently startled her senses by tales of the Between World. This exorcism was, as he had told her, more powerful than that which the Christian exorcists used, and the symbol of exorcism was not unlike the sign of the Cross, to which was added genuflection of Assyrian origin. At any other time Fleda would have laughed at the idea of using the exorcism; but all the ancient supersti-tion of the Romany people latent in her now broke forth and held her captive. Standing with candle raised above her head, her eyes piercing the space before her, she recalled every word of the exorcism which had caught the drippings from the fountains of Chaldean, Phoenician, and Egjfptian mystery. Solemnly and slowly the exorcism came from her lips, and at the end her right hand made the cabalistic sign ; then she stood like one transfixed with her arm extended towards the Thing she could not",
         "see. THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 161 Presently there passed from her a sense of oppression The air seemed to grow lighter, restored self-pissession came; there was a gentle breathing in the room like that iLi *iT\"^ fv''''- \" \"*' \" \"«\"\"«'^^ l^fo« she realized that the breathing was her own, and she looked round her like one who had come out of a trance. •il^* *' ?\"*'\" \"^^ ^'^ '^°'\"^- \" \" « gone.\" A great sigh came from her. * Mechanically she put down the candle, smoothed the piUows of her bed, adjusted the coverings, and prepared to he down; but, with a sudden impulse, she tintd to the window and the door. K„l'JV.*-^°\"^:\" ^^^ ^*'^ *g*'\"- '^'*h a little laugh of s^-^ t IT^^- *u' ^\"^'\"^ '^^ '\"^'1'' *Sain the cabXtic sign at the bed, where the Thing had first assaulted her, !^ K^*\"? ,!**** P°'\"* '\" ^^^ \"°°'\" °ear the door where sne had felt it crouching. \" Oh, Ewie Gal.\" she added, speaking to that Romany _i^age long since laid to rest in the Roumelian country you did not talk to me for nothing. You were right- yes you were right, old Ewie Gal. It was there,\"--she looked again at the place where the Thing had been- and your curse drove it away.\" With confidence she went to the door and unlocked it Oomg to the window she opened it also, but she com-promised sufficiently to open it at the top instead of at the bottom. Presently she laid her head on her piUow with a sigh of content. ^ Once again she composed herself to sleep in the dark-ness. But now there came other invasions, other dis- Iho r«H h m\\°'^*- v.^\" ^'' imagination a man came who had held her in his arms one day on the Sagalac River, who had looked into her eyes with a masterful but respectful tenderness. As she neared the confines ot sleep, he was somehow mingled with visions of things which her childhood had known-moonlit passes in the",
         "11 162 THE WORLD FOR SALE Bosnian, Roomelian, and Roumanian bills, green fields by the Danube, with peasant voices drowsing in song before the lights went out; a gallop after dun deer far away up the Caspian mountains, over waste places, carpeted with Sowers after a benevolent rain ; mornings in Egypt, when the camels thudded and slid with melan-choly ease through the sands of the desert, while the Arab drivers called shrilly for Allah to curse or bless; a tei .-r sunset in England seen from the top of a castle when all the western sky was lightly draped with saffron, gold and mauve and delicate green and purple. Now she slept again, with the murmur of the Sagalac in her ears, and there was a smile at her lips. If one could have seen her through the darkness, one would have said that she was like some \\vild creature of a virgin world, whom sleep had captured and tamed; for, behind the refinement which education and the vigilant influence with which Madame Bulteel had surrounded her, there was in her the spirit of primitive things: of the open road and the wilderness, of the undiscipUned and vagrant life, however marked by such luxury as the ruler of all the Romanys could buy and use in pilgrimage. There was that in her which would drag at her footsteps in this new life. For a full hour or more she slept, then there crept through the fantasies of sleep something that did not belong to slee[\u003e— again something from '^he wakeful world, strange, alien, troubhng. At first it was only as thougji a wind stirred the air of dreams, then it was like the sounds that gather behind the coming rage of a storm, and again it was as though a night -prowler plucked at the sleeve of a home-goer . Presently, with a stir of fright and a smothered cry, she waked to a sound which was not of the super-natural or of the mind's illusions, but no less dreadiul to her because of that . In some cryptic way it wus associated with the direful experience through which she had just",
         "passed. THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 163 What she heard in the darkness wiis a voice which sang there by her window-at it or beneath it-the words otl Komany song. It was a song of violence, which she had heard but a short time before in the trees behind her father's house, when a Romany claimed her as his wife: \" J?\"* ^™' ^ *•\"* to n\u003ey true love. Time was she came to mo \" Only one man would sing that song at her window, or anj-where m this Western world. This was no iUusion of her overwrought senses. There, outside her window, was Jethro Fawe. She sat up and Ustened. leaning on one arm, and staring mto the half-darkness beyond the window, the blind of winch she had not drawu down. There was no moon, but the stars were shining brightly, relieving the intensity of the dark. Thiough the whispering of the trees, and hushing the melancholy of a night-bird-s song, came the wild low note of the Romany epic of vengeance. It had a thnU of exultation. Something in the voice, insistent vibrating, personal, made every note a thrust of victory' In spite of her indignation at the insolent serenade, she thrilled; for the strain of the Past was in her, and it had been fighting with her all night, breaking in upon the Present, tugging at the cords of yonth. The man's daring roused her admiration, even as her anger mounted. If her father heard the singing, there could be no doubt that Jethro Fawe's doom would be seal^i. Gabnel Druse would resent this insolence to the daughter of the Ry of Rys. Word would be passed as silently as the electric spark flies, and one day Jethro Fawe would be found dead, with no due to his slayer Md maybe no sign of violence upon him; for while the Komany people had remedies as old as Buddha thev had poisons as old as Sekhet.",
         "i 164 THE WORLD FOR SALE Suddenly the song ceased, and for a moment there was silence save for the whispering trees and the night- bird's song. Fleda rose from her bed, and was about to put on her dressing-gown, when stw was startled by a voice loudly whispering her name at her window, as it seemed. \" Daughter of the Ry of Rys !\" it called. In anger she started forwsucl to the window, then, realizing that she was in her nightgown, caught up her red dressing-gown and put it on. As she did so she understood why the voice had sounded so near. Not thirty feet from her window there was a solitary oak-tree among the pines, in which was a seat among the branches, and, looking out, she could see a figure that blackened the star-lit duskiness. \" Fleda— daughter of the Ry of Rys,\" the voice called again. She gathered her dressing-gown tight about her, and, going to the window, raised it high and leaned out. \" What do you want ?\" she asked sharply. \" Wife of Jethro Fa we, I bring you news,\" the voice said, and she saw a hat waved with mock courtesy. In spite of herself, Fleda feh a shiver of premonition pass through her. The Thing which had threatened her in the night seemed to her now like the soul of this dark spirit in the trees. Resentment seized her. \" I have news for you, Jethro Fawe,\" she replied. \" I set you free, and I gave my word that no harm should come to you, if you went your ways and did not come again. You have come, and I shaL do nothing now to save you from the Ry's anger. Go at once, or I will wake him.\" \" Will a wife betray her husband ?\" he asked in soft derision. Stung by his insolence, \" I would not throw a rope to you, if you were drowning,\" she declared. \" I am",
         "a THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 160 Gorgio, and the thing that was done by the Starike River IS nothing to me. Now, go.\" \" You have forgotten my news.\" he said. \" It is bad news for the Goigio daughter of the Romany Ry.\" She was sUent in apprehension. He waited, but she Old not speak. \"The Goigio of Gorgios of the Sagalac has had a faU,\" he said. Her heart beat fast for an instant, and then the pre-sentiment came to her that the man spoke the truth. In ..?Ji^'\"* °* *''\"' accomplished thing, she became calm. ^^ What has happened ?\" she asked quietly. 'He went prowling in Manitou, and in Barbazon's Tavern they struck him down.\" Who struck him down ?\" she asked. It seemed to her that the night-bird sang so loud that she could scarcely hear her own voice. \"A drunken Gorgio,\" he replied. \"The horseshoe is tor luck all the world over, and it brought its luck to Manitou to-night. It struck down a young Master Gorgio who m white beard and long grey hair went spying.\" She knew m her heart that he spoke the truth. \" He is dead ?\" she asked in a voice that had a strance quietness. \" \" Not yet,\" he answered. \" There is time to wish him luck.\" She heard the ribald laugh with a sense of horror and loathing. \" The hand that brought him down may have been the hand of a Gorgio. but behind the hand was Jethro Fawe. she said in a voice grown passionate again. \"Where IS he ?\" she added. \"At his own house. I watched them take him there. It is a nice house-good enough for a Gorgio house- fi^!^'^' 1''\"°* \" ''^\"- Last night I played his Sai,isate hddle for him there, and I told him aU about you and me. and what happened at Starzke. and then",
         "\" IM THE WORLD FOR SALE \" You told him I was a. I omany, that I was married to you ?\" she asked \u003en a low vo\u003cce. \" I told him that, and asked him why he thought you had deceived him, had held from him the truth. He was angry and tried to kill me.\" \" That is a lie,\" she an^- ered. \" H he had tried to kill you he would have done w.\" Suddenly she realized the \"^\"ation as it was — ^that she was standing at her w;r. '■ w in the night, scantily robed, talking to a man in a i ee opposite her window ; and that the man had done a thing which belonged to the wild places which she had left so far behind. It flashed into her mind— what would Max Ingolby think of such a thing ? She flushed. The new Gorgio self of her flushed, and yet the old Romany self, the child of race and heredity had taken no exact account of the strangeness of this situation. It had not seemed unnatural. Even if he had been in her room itself, she would have felt no tithe of the shame that she felt now in asking herself what the Master Gorgio would think, if he knew. It was not that she had less modesty, that any stir of sex was in her veins where the Romany chal was con-cerned; but in the life she had once lived less delicate cognizance was taken of such things, and something of it stayed. \" Listen,\" Jethro said with sudden lowering of the voice, and imparting into his tones an emotion which was in part an actor's gift, but also in large degree a passion now eating at his heart, \" you are my wife by all the laws of our people. Nothing can change it. 1 have waited for you, and I will wait, but you shall be mine in the end. You see to-night— Mi Duvel, you see that fate is with me ! The Gorgio has bewitched you. He goes down to-night in that tavern there by the hand of a Gorgio, and the Romany has his revenge. Fate is always with me, and I will be the gift of the gods to the woman",
         "that THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 167 takes me. The luck is mine always. It will be always with me. I am poor to-day, I shall be rich to-morrow. I was rich, and I lost it all; and I was poor, and became rich again. Ah, yes, there are ways I Sometime:, it is a Government, sometimes a prince that wants to know, and Jethro Fawe, the Romany, finds it out, and money fills his pockets. I am here, poor, because last year when I lost all, I said, ' It is because my Romany lass is not with me. I have not brought her to my tan, but when she comes then the gold will be here as before, and more when it is wanted.' So, I came, and I hear the road calling, and all the camping places over all the world, and I see the patrins in every lane, and my heart is lifted up. I am glad. I rejoice. My heart bums with love. I will forget everything, and be true to the queen of my soul. Men die, and Gabriel Druse, he will die one day, and when the time comes, then it would be that you and I would beckon, and all the world would come to us.\" He stretched out a hand to her in the half-darkness. \" I send the blood of my heart to you,\" he continued. \" I am a son of kings. Fleda, daujiter of the Ry of Rys, come to me. I have been bad, but I can be good. I have killed, but I will live at peace. I have cursed, but I will speak the word of blessing. I have tre^assed, but I will keep to my own, if you will come to me.\" Suddenly he dropped to the ground, lighting on his feet like an animal with a soft rebound. Stretching up his arms, he made soft murmuring of endearment. She had listened, fascinated in spite of herself by the fire and meaning of his words. She felt that in most part it was true, that it was meant ; and, whatever he was, he was yet a man offering his heart and life, offering a love that she despised, and yet which was love and passion of a kind. It was a passion natural to the people from whom she came, and to such as Jethro Fawe it was something more than sensual longing and the aboriginal \u003e■",
         "L 168 THE WORLD FOR SALE «leM» of possession. She realized it, and was not whoUy revolted by it, even while her mind was fleeing to where the Master Gorgio lay wounded, it might be unto death; even while she knew that this man before her, by some means, had laid Ingolby low. She was all at once a human being torn by contending forces. Jethro's drop to the ground broke the sudden trance into which his words had thrown her. She shook herself as with an effort of control. Then leaning over the window- sui, and looking down at him, now grown so distinct that she cou^d see his features, her eyes having become used to tbe half-light of the approaching dawn, she said with something almost like gentleness: \" Once more I say, you must go and come no more. You are too far ofi from me. You belong to that which W for the Ignorant, or the low, the vicious and the bad. Behind the free life of the Romany is only the thing that the beasts of the field have. I have done with it for ever. Find a Romany who will marry you. As for me, I would rather die than do so, and I should die before it could come to pass. If you stay here longer I wiU call the Ry. ' Presently the feeling that he had been responsible for the disaster to Ingolby came upon her with great force, and as suddenly as she had softened towards this man she hardened again. \" \u0026\u003e, before there comes to you the death you deserve,\" she added, and turned away. At that moment footsteps stnnded near, and almost instantly there emerged from a pathway which made a ^ort cut to the house, the hgure of old Gabviel Druse. They had not heard him till he was within a few feet of where Jethro Fawe stood. His walking had been muffled in the dust of the pathway. The Ry started when he saw Jethro Fawe ; then he made a motion as though he would seize the intruder, who",
         "was THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 109 too dumbfounded to flee; but he recovered himself, and gwed \\ip at the open window. \" Fleda I\" he called. She came to the window again. •• Has this man come here against your will ?\" he asked, not as though seeking information, but confirmation of his own understanding. \"He is not here by my wiU,\" she answered. \"He came to sing the Song of Hate under my window, to tell me that ne bad ' \"That I had brought the Master Gorgio to the ground,\" said Jethro who now stood with sullen passiveness looking at Gabriel Druse. \" From the Master Gorgio, as you call him, I have just come returned the old man. \" When I heard the news, *♦ and \" ^* «'as you who betrayed him to the mob, I deld^\"'*' **'*' \"*^* '\"*** '° ^Ptation. \"Is-is he ' \" He is alive, but terribly hurt ; and he may die,\" was the reply. Then the old man turned to the Romany with a great anger and determination in his face. He stretched out an arm, making a sign as cabalistic as that which Fleda had used against her invisible foe in the bedroom \" Go, Jethro Fawe of all the Fawes,\" he said. \" Go and may no patrins mark your road I\" ♦i,^^*u'? ^*'*? '•'\"\"'' ***'=^' \"\"d half raised his arm, as though to fend himself from a blow. „„^K* ^\"\"1\" 'I *''* '='\"* '\"^'\"'^ ^'^^^ l'*^\" behind them on the road they go, that other Gipsies who travel in it may know they have gone before. It may be a piece of stnng, a thread of wool, a twig, or in the di-st the ancient cross of the Romany, which preceded the Christian cross and belonged to the Assyrian or Phoenician world. The mvocatioa that no patrins shaU mark the road of a",
         "Romany MIOOCOPY RESOLUTION TIST CHART (ANSI ond ISO TEST CHART No. 2) A APPLIED IIVHGE In ^^. 1653 East Main Street g\".S Rochester, New York 14609 u5A ■J^S CS) *82 ^ 0300 - Phone ^= (716) 288 - 5989",
         "-Fax 170 THE WORLD FOR SALE is to make him an outcast, and for the Ry of Rys to utter the curse is sentence of death upon a Romany, for thence-forward every hand of his race is against him, free to do him harm. It was that which made Jethro Fawe shrink and cower for a moment. Fleda raised her hand suddenly in protest to Gabriel Druse. \" No, no, not that,\" Fleda murmured brokenly to her father, with eyes that looked the pain and horror she felt. Though she repudiated the bond by which the barbarian had dared to call her wife, she heard an inner voice that said to her: \" What was done by the Starzke River was the seal of blood and race, and this man must be nearer than the stranger, dearer than the kinsman, forgiven of his crimes Uke a brother, saved from shame, danger or death when she who was sealed to him can save him.\" She shuddered as she heard the inner voice. She felt that this Other Self of her, the inner-seeing soul which had the secret of the far paths, had spoken truly. Even as she begged her father to withdraw the sentence, it flashed into her mind that the grim Thing of the night was the dark spirit of hatred between Jethro Fawe and the Master Gorgio seeking embodiment, as though Jethro's evil soul detached itself from his body to persecute her. At her appeal, Jethro raised his head. His courage came back, the old insolent self-possession took hold of him again. The sentence which the Ry had passed was worse than death (and it meant death, too), for it made him an outcast from his people, and to be outcast was to be thrown into the abyss. It was as though a man without race or country was banished into desolate space. In a vague way he felt its full significance, and the shadow of it fell on him. \" No, no, no,\" Fleda repeated hoarsely, with that new sense of responsibility where Jethro was concerned. Jethro's eyes were turned upon her now. In the",
         "starlit THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 171 night, just yielding to the dawn, she could faintly see his burning look, could feel, as it were, his hands reach out to claim her; and she felt that while he lived she was not wholly free. She realized that the hand of nomad, dis-orderly barbansm was dragging her with a force which was inhuman, or, maybe, superh'^man. Gabriel Druse could know nothing of the elements fighting in his daughter's soul; he only knew that her interest in the Master Gorgio was one he had never seen before, and that she abhorred the Romany who had brought Ingolby low. He had shut his eyes to the man's unruliness and his daughter's intervention to free him; but now he was without pity. He had come from Ingolby's bedside, and had been told a thing which shook his nigged nature to Its centre-a thing sad as death itself, which he must tell his daughter. To Fleda's appeal he turned a stony face. There was none of that rage in his words which had marked the scene when Jethro Fawe first came to claim what he could not have. There was something in him now more deadly and inevitable. It made him like some figure of mythology implacable, fateful. His great height, his bushy beard and stormy forehead, the eyes over which shaggy eye-brows hung Uke the shrubs on a cliff-edge, his face hned and set Uke a thing in bronze— all were signs of a power which, in passion, would be like that of (Edipus: in the moment of justice or doom would, with unbhnking eyes, slay and cast aside as dftris is tossed upon the dust-heap. As he spoke now his voice was toneless. His mind was flint, and his tongue was but the flash of the flint. He looked at his daughter for a moment with no light of fatherhood m his face, then turned from her to Jethio Fawe with slow decision and a gesture of authority. His eyes fastened on the face of the son of Lemuel Fawe, as though it was that old enemy himself.",
         ";i! 172 THE WORLD FOR SALE \"I have said what I have said, and there is no more to be spoken. The rale of the Ry will be as water for ever after if these things may be done to him and his. For generations have the Rys of all the Rys been like the trees that bend only to the whirlwind; and when they speak there is no more to be said. When it ceases to be so, then the Rys will vanish from the world, and be as stubble of the field ready for the burning. I have spoken. Go ! And no patrins shall lie upon your road.\" A look of savage obedience and sulJ-.ii acquiescence came mto Jethro '^awe's face, and he took off his hat as one who stands ir e presence of his master. The strain of generations, the tradition of the race without a country was stronger than the revolt in his soul. He was young his blood was hot and brawling in his veins, he was ali carnal, with the superior intelligence of the trained animal, but custom was stronger than all. He knew now that whatever he might do, some time, not far, his doom would fall upon him suddenly, as a wind shoots up a ravine from the desert, or a night-bird rises from the dark. He set his feet stubbornly, and raised his sullen face and fanatical eyes. The light of morning was creeping through the starshine, and hie features showed plainly I am your daughter's husband,\" he said. \" Nothing can change that. It was done by the River Starzke, and It was the word of the Ry of Rys. It stands for ever. There is no divorce except death for the Romany.\" \" The patrins cease to mark the way,\" returned the old man with a swift gesture. \" The divorce of death will come.\" Jethro's face grew still paler, and he opened his lips to speak, but paused, seeing Fleda, with a backward look of pity and of horror, draw back into the darkness of her room. He made a motion of passion and despair. His voice was almost shrill when he spoke. \" TiU that divorce",
         "comes. THE SENTENCE OF THE PATRIN 173 the daughter of the Ry of Rys is mine,\" he cried sharply. I will not give my wife to a Gorgio thief. His hands shall not caress her, his eyes shall not feed upon her \" \" His eyes will not feed upon her,\" interrupted the old man: \"so cease the prattle which can alter nothine. Begone.\" For a moment Jethro Fawe stood like one who did not understand what was said to him, but suddenly a look of triumph and malice came into his face, and his eyes hghted with a reckless fire. He threw back his head, and laughed with a strange, offensive softness. Then, -^ving a hand to the window from which Fleda had g\u003c. vimg his cap on his head and plunged into the trees. A moment afterwards his voice came back exultingly, through the morning air : \" ^\"i* ''°'^S'° sleeps 'neath the greenwood tree- He 11 broach my tan no mere: And my love, she sleeps afar from me But near to the churchyard door.\" As the old man turned heavily towards the house, and opened the outer door, Fleda met him. \" What did you mean when you said that Ingolby's eyes would not feed upon me ?\" she asked in a low tone of fear. A look of compassion came into the old man's face. He took her hand. \" Come and I will tell you,\" he said. n'",
         "mi CHAPTER XII \" LET THERE BE LIGHT \" In Ingolby's bedroom, on the night of the business at Barbazon's Tavern, Dr. Rockwell received a shock. His face, naturaUy colourless, was almost white, and his eyes were moist. Ho had what the West called nerve. That the cnsis through which he had passed was that of a friend's life did not lessen the poignancy of the experience. He had a smgularly reserved manner and a rare economy of words; also, he had the refinement and distinction of one who had, aforetime, moved on the higher ranges of social ufe. He was always simply and comfortably and in a ^nse fashionably dr.?ssed. yet there was nothing of the dude about him, and hi- black satin tie gave him an air of old-worldishness which 'omehow compelled an extra amount of respect. This, in spite of the fact that he had l\u003eeen known as one who had left the East and come into the wilds because of a woman not his wife. It was not, however, strictly true to say that he had come West because of a woman, for it was on account of three women, who by sudden coincidence or collusion sprang a situation from which the only rehef was flight. In that he took refuge, not because he was a coward, but because it was folly to fight a woman, or three women and because it was the only real solution of an ungovernable situation. At first he had drifted from one town to another, dissolute and reckless, apparently unable to settle down,' or to forget the unwholesome three. But one day there was a terrible railway accident on a construction train, and Lebanon and Manitou made a call upon bis skiU, and",
         "174 \"LET THERE BE LIGHT\" 175 Dul^t^thU r \"''T *** ^l' P'°*\"'''°\" ^°' °\"« «*ole month. arMontl! H 1 ^\" '\"\"* \"''* \"y ^'^^ R^\"^^y Directors at Montreal declared were masterpieces. When that month was up he was a changed nan, and his past, and woinen learned that there was never a moment when h,s pulses beat unevenly in their presence NaThan KTaS 't V '^^^°\" ^\"^ ■* ^^'-* ---y o learn it agam. To him, woman, save as a subject of hi, sm was a closed book. He regarded them as h rega ded himself, with a kindly cynicism. He never forgot t hat Ws ZS'tr'\" '^\"' \"°\"'' \"\"''' '^^ avof^d hadt The 1 ,, \"'\"'\"u\" ' ^^\"'^y ^'\"^ consequent cruelty. Sell \"\"\"^ '}''' ^\"\"^ '^\"\"^ ^^' '\"°^1 1-P^e wkh wide^pen eyes and were in no sense victims of ^s- but Thus It was that both men and women called Rockwf-II a handsome man, but thought of him as halg oniyl' crater of e^austed fires in place of a heart. They came who r/^ V^''' troubles^ven the women of MaX who ought to have gone to the priest. ™anitou =,n?H \"'\"\"'f ^'^\"* ^^''^°°\" ^ °\"« *ho had authority and desired not to use it; as one to whom life w^s Ife a case m surgery to be treated with scientific coolness v^th humanity, but not «ith undue sympathy; \"eeTrv B°™°' °' i?' 1? \"\"'''' '\"^\"\"'y '^^^ had h/s IccMem S^ Barbazon's Hotel found him the slave of an emotion which hook him from head to foot. He had saved hiLfnWs hfe by a most skilful operation, but he had beei shocktd beyond control when, an hour after the operatioTw™ and consciousness returned to the patient in the brilL,^T' lighted iwm, Ingolby said ■ bnUiantly",
         "-\"'•!, 176 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" Why don'i you turn on the light ?\" It was thus Rockwell knew that the Master Man, the inend of Lebanon and Manitou, was stone blind. When Ingolby's voice ceased, a horrified silence filled the room for a moment. Even Jim Beadle, his servant standmg at the foot of the bed, clapped a hand to his mouth to stop a cry, and the nurse turned as white as the apron she wore. Dumbfounded as Rockwell was, with instant profes-sional presence of mind he said : \"No, Ingolby, you must be kept in darkness a while yet.\" Then he whipped out a silk handkerchief from his pocket. \"We will have light.\" he continued, \"but we must bandage you first to keep out the glare and prevent pam. The nerves of the eyes have been injured.\" Hastily and tenderly he bound the handkerchief round the sightless eyes. Having done so, he said to the nurse with unintentional quotation from the gospel of St. John, and a sad irony, \" Let there be light.\" It all gave him time to puU himself together and prepare for the moment when he must tell Ingolby the truth. In one sense the sooner it was told the better, lest Ingolby should suddenly discover it for himself. Surprise and shock must be avoided. So now he talked in his low soothing voice, telling Ingolby that the operation had put him out of danger, that the pain now felt came chiefly from the nerves of the eye, and that quiet and darkness were necessary. He insisted on Ingolby keeping silent, and he gave a mild opiate which induced several hours' sleep. During this time Rockwell prepared himself for the ordeal which must be passed as soon as possible; gave all needed directions, and had a conference with the assistant Chief Constable to whom he confided the truth. He suggested plans for preserving order in excited Lebanon, which was determined to revenge itself on Manitou;",
         "and \"LET THERE BE LIGHT\" 177 tL^l7 T', '\"'*:'! '\"^ '^''^•' instructions to Jowett the horse-dealer. Also, he had conferred with Vrhrill home He had noted with admiration the strange centle- ness of the giant Romany as he, alone, carried Wofbvt his arms, and laid him on the bed from whkh he was o the bl nd victim of a hard fate. He had noticed throW !tn ., As he looked round in that instant of ghastly ^lence he had observed almost mechanically that f he old oTFledJ'nr'' H T r \"i ^\"'^*^\"«- Then the thou^I oFleda Druse shot into Rockwell's mind, and it harasfed Gn,v Hf ^' K°\"f ^\"8°\"'y ^'^P*' «nd after the giant Gipsy had taken his departure jusi before the dawn. Im afraid it will mean more there than anywhere t^J\" T^ \"^^\\\"' ''™=^\"- \"There was evSly something between those two; and she isn't the kind to Uke It philosophically. Poor girl ! Poor girl ! It s ^ bitter dose, if there was anything in it,\" he added He watched beside the sick-bed tiU the dawn stared in and his patient stirred and waked, then he took Ingolby's hand grown a little cooler, in both his own. \" How are you feeling, old man ?\" he asked cheerfully. \" YouVe had a good sleep-nearly three and a half hours. Is the pain in the head less ?\" \"^ _ \"Better Sawbones, better,\" Ingolby replied cheerfully They ve loosened the tie that binds-begad. it did stretch the nerves. I had gripes of colic once, but the pain I had in my head was twenty times worse, till you gave the \"That's the ej'es,\" said RockweU. \" I had to lift a bit of bone, and the eyes saw it and felt it, and cried out- shneked, you might say. They've got a sensitiveness all their own, have the eyes.\"",
         "12 178 THE WORLD FOR SALE T ' !''*°'!f .*•'*'■«'\"•'''* «\"°«««\u003edents to them,\" answered Ingolby- just a little ball of iridescent pulp with strings tied to the brain.\" \" •^,'1 what hurts the head may destroy the eyes some-times, Rockwell answered cautiously. \" We know so little of the dehcate union between them, that we can't be sure we can put the eyes right again when, because of some blow to the head, the ricochet puts the eyes out of commission.\" T \"Tv\"*'.^ T^^^'^ *^* \"\u003e*\"«■■ '\"*'» \"\"e, then?\" asked Ingolby, feeling the bandage on his eyes feverishly and stirring in his bed with a sense of weariness. \" Yes, the ricochet got them, and has put them out of commission, replied RockweU, carefully dwelling upon each word, and giving a note of meaning to his tone Ingolby raised himself in bed, but Rockwell eentlv forced him down again. \" Will my eyes have to be kept Un°,^t^1. ^'.. T^'\"^.^ ^\"\"^^ *° 8ive up work for any length of time ?\" Ingolby asked. ;; Longer than you'll like,\" was the enigmatical reply. _ « s the devil's own business,\" was the weary answer. Every minute's valuable to me now. I ought to be on deck mormng, noon, and night. There's all the trouble between the two towns; there's the strike on hand: there's that business of the Orange funeral, and more than all a thousand times, there's \" he paused. He was going to say, \" There's that'devU Marchand's designs on my bridge,\" but he thought better of it and stopped. It had been his intention to deal with Marchand directly, to get a settlement of their differences without resort to the law, to prevent the criminal act without deepemng a feud which might keep the two towns apart for years. Bad as Marchand was, to prevent his crime was far better than punishing him for it afterwards To have Marchand arrested for conspiracy to commit a crime was a business which would gravely interfere",
         "with \"LET THERE BE LIGHT\" 179 s:nSr„,^r*tirc;r sr-- ^-^^ -- indirect ways. Th : was whvT- h !,^ ,°*\" P\"'T»*\"« « that even Felix MarchTnd h/Ai. *^\"''^ '° 0**\"'\"'« try negotiations fet '\"' P\"\"' \"\"\u003e '^»''* he would an?:^t^:iSrt^^^^^^^^^ row. or that Pockwell woulHir k \"^''* ''^ *°-\"'0f • felt in his own mindThaTtl iS^ tV^ ^'' \"P\" He a serious one, and that th- ^ u^ u ^^^ ''^'^'\"^ \"-a* Marchand's work for Sjl'tooS 'S\" 't\" '^°\"« hira. RockweU could see his VhlA ^^'*\"0\"ght shook ment gravely injurious to hfstnL''' ^*^ \"\" ««\u003c^'t«- told the woit. ir\"he shoct^oS \"' T* ''^ '\"\"** \u003e« he was blind migh rive hfm 1^^^'\" ''yj^\"=«'\" that that he must hasfen ZcSl '''\"• ^\"^^«\" *\"\" chln«3m';';s;X't^s'''f ^''\"^' \"'^ *•\u003e-« -y He to„ehed thJ^lS iKsT^ *°;™^- '\" matter about the head bandages but tht '^°*'\" * plough the wraps -morrow p'^l' £ itc^^-pLi ca:irrin'=Koi;; !f;rrX -™^^^ answered closing i„ on the last'^^efeS ''''''''\" iJut I don t mind being in the dark f«^, i • .„ me fitter for to-, lorrow and Lf ^5 V. \"^^^ '* '* \" \"^ke a fool. There's trmrhca^' ?.!,\"«\" ^°\"«'-- ^'\"^ \"°t People often don't eVrfhemiiv: T.h\"* '\"\"\"^ '^''^■'■ by being in too utlh^\"'^Z' ^ *«\u003c=« *» get right to-day, if you want to, oldTan. FofTCtt V\"^'''^ too big a hurry, you see I'm fnr h i^- '*'' ^ \"\" \"«* \"\u003e bigger jumpT ^ ^ \" ^°' ^°''^°8 back to get a \" You can't be in a big h«^. even if you want",
         "to. IM THE WORLD FOR SALE Ingolby,\" rejoined Rockwell, gripping the wrist of the sick man. and leaning over him. Ingolby grew suddenly very still. It was as though vague fear had seized him and held him in a vice. \" What is it ? What do you want to say to me ?\" he asked in a low, nerveless tone. \" You've been hit hard. Chief. The ricochet has done you up for some time. The head wiU soon get weU, but I'm far from sure about your eyes. You've got to have a specialist about them. You're in the dark, and as for making you see, so am I. Your eyes and you are out of commission for some time, anyhow.\" He leaned over hastily, but softly and deftly undid the bandages over the eyes and took them off. \" It's seven in the morning, and the sun's up. Chief, but it doesn't do you much good, you see.\" The last two words were the purest accident, but it was a strange, mournful irony, and Rockwell flushed at the thought of it. He saw Ingolby's face turn grey, and then become white as death itself. \" I see,\" came from the bluish-white lips, as the stricken man made caU on all the will and vital strength in him. For a long minute Rockwell held the cold hand in the grasp of one who loves and grieves, but even so the physician and surgeon in him were uppermost, as they should be, in the hour when his friend was standing on the brink of despair, maybe of catastrophe irremediable. He did not say a word yet, however. In such moments the vocal are dumb and the blind see. Ingolby heaved himself in the bed and threw up his arms, wresting them from Rockwell's grasp. \" My God— oh, my God— blind !\" he cried in agony. Rockwell drew the head with the sightless eyes to his shoulder. For a moment he laid one hand on the heart, thai, suddenly still, now went leaping under his fingers.",
         "' \" LET THERE BE LIGHT ■' 181 tem2rS''\"K' \"\"''\"\"!?■• \" ^\"\"\"\"y- \" \"-ay be only temporary. Keep your head up to the storm. We'll Sdy-S\"*' \"' ^\"^ \"■\"'' \"'\" ««\" \"-'• till thL whlt^chief^'f '\"uT™\"\"'* '\"8''\"'y- \"»«\" God. thin! hv 1 \" \"' \"'-\"y^^^^S. and I've lost every: XVw^op. ;:rt^- shrrru,d-rti:rSt^ des^g^ 2ttl1- \"'^''\"\"8«' o' Marchand's devilish ' The bridJ\" n,\" T;\"V\"'' \"\"\"=•' \"'^^« ••* was shaken, f Jil , ^ ^''\"'' ' *'°\"'«^ '\" he called in a voice tw, ted m an agony which only those can Juo w°.^ ^ibTZnle\": '^''\" '\"\" *'\"'\" '\"•' itself ^en Ter l^Z' rJ^'T -\\\"^\"««^- ''\"J his head rolled wasasfwl^ ^'\"l'''^''- The damp of his brow \"Aw .If,\"' '^\"''^^ ^ Rockwell's lips touched it it h H K^^' \"'\"^ '^y'\" '*°\u003c=''*''\" ^aid derly \"I wish and i Se tT '\"'T-'- ^'''^ '\"''=^- ^ \"-h 'to you- and'C^\"\"-,!\" \"\"^, '^°'^- '^°=''*«\" summoned the nurse and Jim Beadle and spoke to them in low tones \"He knows now, and it has hit him hard, but not «, hard that he won't stiffen to it. It might have been worse\" nnH ^T 'f *™\u003c=ti°\"^ as to the care that should be taken long Sre intr'^^\" °\" '\"\"^ ^^«=- '' --' h-t;\"'. win if cle pn^n \"'tf ''''°'\"^ t° consciousness, and wnen It came. Rockwell put to his lips a cooling drink ZeTL'in'^r'' \"^if^\" Ingolby' drank i^^tut protest and m silence. He was like one whose sense of hfe was automatic, and of an inner rathertan an outer S:fd':Sy'; ^--'•-h^'aybackonthepillowaS:: \" I want the Chief Constable to come here to-night at",
         "m 182 THE WORLD FOR SALE if^^n^t- A^,f\"''*\u003ci«^kthen. He must come. It IS important. Will you see to it, RockweU ?\" there 1^*^*^ ^\"\"^ ? ^'\"\"^ *° ^^ RockweU's, and fi^rrcv^*^ *'*'\"** *°\"^ \"\" ^PP*\"^ '° *he pressure of his fingers which went to RockweU's heart All right. Chief. I'U have him here,\" RockweU I'ZfK 1\" f ^' \"\"* ^^'^ ^^\"^ «*^\"ding in Ws ey^ Ingolby had, as .t were, been stricken out of the active sentient, compamonable world into a world where he was an'wnw ''r\"*\"^- ^^ ^-^ seemed landed \" an atmosphere of misery and helplessness. Ulind/ I am blind r That was the phrase wHch ^f\\^^'^^.^''' '^ P\"^^^ » Ingolby's veLs 2 throbbed, and throbbed, and throbbed Uke enrine; in a Z^ T ''!f '^*™^\" *•\"\" ^\"^''l^- H«^« was the onf incomprehensible, stupefying fact: nothing eke matter^ miM? ''k'\"' ''\"\"•''^'^' ^^•'^ ^^'i which hS iT^^d l!r ^ ^\" Tf'\"\"*^ ^''^t even his foes acknow-ledged, were passing before his brain in swift procession slumng, magmfied and magnificent, and in tlS^den clear-seeing of his soul, he beheld their fuU value thri? exact concrete force and ultimate effect. Yerhe'toew he'\"col'^*'.*''' ''\"\"J? *'\"'\"' '\"'''=*•-• incapable, beca^ he could not see with the eyes of the body, fhe gr^ essential thing to him was that one thing he h d tost A man m,ght be a cripple and stiU direct the great c^ncernl IIa '\"'t}^^^'\"^ °* «*«• He might beVm of Umb !f t!fn,°^ ^^y- b-it witheyesight stiU direct the comS were at work He might be deaf to every sound and to ever dumb, but seeing enabled him stiU to cany f^rwa^d every enterprise. In darkness, however, those mu^Z\"^ naught, because judgment must depend on the e^eslTd senses of others The report migh\"be true or SLe.Tht deputy might deceive, and his bUnd chief",
         "mig^nev^ know the 1 \" LET THERE BE LIGHT \" 183 = *™t5i unless some other spectator of his schemes shoiJd report it; and the truth could not surely be Checked, save by someone, perhaps, whose Ufe was joined to his, by one that truly loved him, whose fate was his. His brain was afire. By one that truly loved him I Who was there that loved him ? Who was there at one with him in all his deep designs, in all he had done and meant to do ? Neither brother, nor sister, nor friend, nor any other. None of his blood was there who could share with him the constructive work he had set out to do There was no friend whose fate was part of his own. There was the Boss Doctor: but Rockwell was tied to his own responsibUities, and he could not give up, of course, would not give up his life to the schemes of another. There were a dozen men whom he had helped to forge ahead by his ovm schemes, but their destinies were not linked with his. Only one whose life was linked with his could be trusted to be his eyes, to be the true reporter of all he did, had done, or planned to do. Only one who loved him. But even one who loved him could not carry through his incompleted work against the assaults of his enemies, who were powerful, watchful, astute and merciless; who had a greed which set money higher than aU else in the world They were of the new order of things in the New World. The business of life was to them not a system of barter and exchange, a giving something of value to get something of value, with a margin of profit for each, and a sense of human equity behind; it was a cockpit where one man sought to get what another man had— and eet it almost anyhow. It was the work of the faro-bank man, whose sleight-of- hand deceived the man that carried the gun. All the old humanity and good-feUowship of the trader the man who exchanged, as it was in the olden days of the world and continued in greater or less degree till the '",
         "\\m IM THE WORLD FOR SALE present generation— all that was gone. It was held in contemjjt. It had prevailed when men were open robbers and filibusters and warriors, giving their Uves, if need be to get what they wanted, making force their god. It had triumphed over the violence and robbery of the open road until the dying years of one century and the young years of a new century. Then the day of the trickster came and men laughed at the idea of fair exchange and strove to give an illusive value for a thing of real value— the remorseless sleight-of-hand which the law could not reach. The desire to get profit by honest toiling was dying down to ashes. Against such men had Ingolby worked— the tricksters, the manipulators. At the basis of his schemes was or-ganization and the economy which concentrated and conserved energy begets, together with its profit. He had been the enemy of waste, the apostle of frugality and thrift ; and it was that which had enabled him, in his short career, to win the confidence of the big men behind him in Montreal, to make good every step of the way. He had worked for profit out of legitimate product and in-dustry and enterprise, out of the elimination of waste. It was his theory (and his practice) that no bit of old iron, no bolt or screw, no scrap of paper should be thrown away; that the cinders of the engines could and should be utihMd for that which they would make; and that was why there was a paper-mill and foundry on the Sagalac at Manitou. That was why and how, so far, he had beaten the tricksters. But while his schemes flashed before his mind, as the opiate suspended him in the middle heaven between sleep and waking, the tricksters and manipulators came hurrying after him like mp-?nders that waited for the moment when they could rush the camp in the watches of the night. His disordered imagination saw the ruin and wreck of his work, the seizure of what was his own— the place of control on his railways, the place of the Master Man who cared mfinitely more to see his designs accomplished, than",
         "for \" LET THERE BE LIGHT \" 186 the profit they would bring to himself. Yesterday he had been just at the top of the hill. The key in his fingers was tuniing in the lock which would make safe the securities of his hfe and career, when it snapped, and the world grew dark as the black curtain fell and shut out the lighted room from the wayfarer in the gloom. Then, it was, came the opaque blackness which could be felt, and his voice calling in despair : ' ' Blind 1 I am blind /\" He did not know that he had taken an opiate, that his fnend had mercifuUy atrophied his rebeUious nerves. These visions he was seeing were terribly true, but they somehow gave him no physical torture. It was as though one saw an operation performed upon one's body with the nerves stilled and deadened by ether. Yet he was cruelly conscious of the disaster which had come to him. For a time at least. Then his mind seemed less acute, the visions came, then without seeing them go, they went. And others came in broken patches, shreds, and dreams, phantasmagoria of the brain, and at last all were mingled and confused; but as they passed they seemed to bum his sight. How he longed for a cool bandage over his eyes, for a soft linen which would shut out the cumuli of broken hopes and designs, life's goals obliterated ! He had had enough of the black procession of futile things. His longing was not denied, for even as he roused him-self from the obUvior. v.oming on him, as though by a last effort to remember his dire misfortune, maybe his ever- iastmg tragedy, something soothing and soft Uke linen dipped in dew was laid upon his forehead. A cool, dehcious hand covered his eyes caressingly; a voice from spheres so far away that worlds wire the echoing points of the sound, came whispering to him like a stir of wings in a singing grove. With a last effort to remain in the waking world, he raised his head so very little, but fell gently back again with one sighing word on his lips • \" Fleda !\"",
         "^ 186 THE WOrJD FOR SALE It was no illusion. Fleda had come from her own night of trouble to his motherless, wifeless home, and would not be denied admittance by the nurse. It was Jim Beadle who admitted her. \" He'd be mad if he knew we wouldn't let her come,\" Jim had said to the nurse. It was Fleda who had warned Ingolby of the dangers that su' \"ounded him — ^the physical as well as business dangers. She came now to serve the blind victim of that Fate which she had seen hovering over him. The renegade daughter of the Romanjrs, as Jethro Fa we had called her, was, for the first time, in the house of her master",
         "Gorgio. CHAPTER XUI THE CHAIN OF THE PAST For once in its career, Lebanon was absolutely united. The blow that had brought down the Master Man had ^ ^^\u003c='' the town between the eyes, and there was no T'Z f °l ^^ °* H°%-who did not regard it as an If mI ^* %'il'''°«*- ^* ^'^ °°* ^\"'o^ '^^ the roughs of Mamtou, led by the big river-driver, were about to stert on a raid upon Lebanon and upon Ingolby at the verv moment 'ae horseshoe did its work. All night there were groups of men waiting outside Ingolby's house. They were of all classes-\u003carters, raUwajT workers, barten^rs lawyers, engineers, bankers, ac^untants, m^^antT S^Tor.^rknfrn'^* agents, manufa^urer.; ..f'^ ^'\"^f *°' ^°«°^^y'' \"**' others swore viciously; and those who swore had no contempt for those who prayed, while those who prayed were tolerant of those who J^^L^ ZV- * .'^'*\" \"* incongruous elements. Men f^^l^ °^\"^« \"\" «'°\"°°\" ^\"* °\"« ^ the spirit of faction; and all were determined that the Orai^eman «t^^ ^ '\"\"'^ \"^ *'y *° ^ Srave. Civic pridTtS almost become civic fanaticism in Lebanon. One of t^ men beaten by Ingolby in the recent struggle for contra! of the railways said to the others shivering in the g«y dawn : They were bound to get him in the back. They're Xi^X^' °' '\"• '■^'^ -' ^^'-' -\" ^^- When, just before dawn, old Gabriel Druse issued from",
         "in 188 THE WORLD FOR SALE the house into whif-h he had carried Ingolby the night before, they questioned him eagerly. He had been a figure apart from both Lebanon and Manitou, and they did not regard him as a dago, particularly as it was more than whispered that Ingolby \" had a lien \" on his daughter. In the grey light, with hi:i long grizzled bearO and iron-grey, shaggy hair. Druse looked like a mystic figure of the days when the gods moved among men like mortals. His great height, vast proportions, and silent ways gave him a place apart, and added to the super-stitious feeling by which he was surrounded. \" How is he ?\" they asked whisperingly, as they crowded round him. \" The danger is over,\" was the slow, heavy reply. \" He will live, but he has bad days to face.\" ' SVhat was the danger ?\" they asked. \" tever— maybe brain-fever,\" he replied. \" We'll see him through,\" someone said. \" Well, he cannot see himself through,\" rejoined the old man solemnly. The enigmatical words made them feel there was something behind. \" Why can't he see himself through V asked Osterhaut the universal, who had just artived from the City Hall. \" He can't see himself through because he is blind,\" was the heavy answer. There .vas a moment of shock, of hushed surprise, and then a voice burst forth : \" Blind— they've blinded him, boys ! The dagos have killed his sight. He's blind, boys !\" A profane and angry muttering ran through the crowd, who were thirsty, hungry, and weary with watching. Osterhaut held up the horseshoe which had brought Ingolby down. \" Here it is, the thing that done it. It's tied with a blue ribbon— for luck,\" he added ironically. \"It's got his blood -n it. I'm keeping it till Manitou's paid the price of it. Then I'll give it to Lebanon for",
         "keeps.\" THE CHAIN OF THE PAST ISO \"That's the thing that did it, but where's the man behind the thing ?\" snarled a voice. Again there was a moment's silence, and then Billy Kyle, the veteran stage-driver said: \"He's in the jug, but a gaol has doors, and doors'll open with or without keys. I'm for opening the door, boys.\" \" What for ?\" asked a man who knew the answer, but who wanted the thing said. \" I spent four years in Arizona, same as Jowett,\" Billy Kyle answered, \" and I got in the way of thinking as they do there, and acting just as quick as you think. I drove stage down in the Verde Valley. Sometimes there wasn't time to bring a prisoner all the way to a judge and jury, and people was busy, and hadn't time to wait for the wagon ; so they done what was right, and there was always a tree that would carry that kind o' fruit for the sake of humanity. It's the best way, boys.\" \" This isn't Arizona or any other lyncher's country,\" said HaJliday, the lawyer, making his way to the front. It isn't the law, and in this country it's the law that counts. It's the Gover'ment's right to attend to that drunken dago that threw the horseshoe, and we've got to let the Gover'ment do it. No lynching on my plate, thank you. If Ingolby could speak to us, you can bet your boots it's what he'd say.\" \"What's your opinion, boss?\" asked Billy Kyle of Gabriel Druse, who had stood listening, his chin on his breast, his sombre eyes fijced on them abstractedly. At Kyle's question his eyes U^jhted up with a fire that was struck from a flint in other spheres, and he answered: \" It is for the ruler to take Ufe, not the subject. If it is a man that rules, it is for him; if it is the law that rules, it is for the law. Here, it is the law. Then it is not for the subject, and it is not for you.\" \" If he was your son ?\" asked Billy Kyle. \" If he was my son, I should be the ruler, not the law,\"",
         "w IM THE WO\"JJ) FOR SALE was the grim, enigmatic reply, and the old man stalked away from them towards the bridge. \"I'd bet he-d settle the dago's hash that done to his son what the Manitou dagos done to Ingolby-«nd settle it quick, remarked Lick Farrelly, the tinsmith. '^,'**^J??,'' ^^'^ * \"^^ °'^ something somewhere.\" remarked Billy Kyle. \" I bet I'm going home to breakfast,\" interposed Halli- day. the lawyer. \" There's a straight day's work before us. gentlemen,\" he added, \"and we can't do anything here. Orangemen, let's hoof it.\" Twenty Orangemen stepped out from the crowd. HalU- day was a past master of their lodge, and they all meant what he meant. They marched away in procession— to breakfast and to a meeting of the lodge. Others straggled after, but a few waited for the appearance of the doctor. When the sun came up and RockweU, pale and downcast. iMued forth, they gathered round him, and walked with him through the town, questioning, listening and threate: ing. A few still remained behind at Ingolby's house. They were of the devoted slaves of Ingolby who would follow him to the gates of Hades and back again, or not back if need be. TTie nigger barber. Berry, was one; another was the Jack-of-aU-tiades. Osterhaut, a kind of municipal odd-man with the weU-known r«d hair, the face that constantly nwded shavmg. the blue serge shirt with a scarf for a coUar. the suit of canvas in the summer and of Irish frieze m the winter; the pair of hands which were always in his own pocket, never in anyone else's; the grey eye, doglike m Its mildness, and the long nose which gave him the name of Snorty. Of the same devoted class also was Jowett who. on a higher plane, was as wise and discerning a scout as any leader ever had. While old Barry and Osterhaut and all the others",
         "wei« THE CHAIN OF THE PAST ifll widtmg at Ingolby's house. Jowett was scooting among the Manitou roughs for the Chief Constable of Lebanon to find out what was forward. What he had found was not reassuring, because Manitou, conscious of being in the wrong, reahzed that Lebanon would try to ixMkt her understand her wrong-doing; and that was intolerable. sl^t LnH^'v^^\"^\" '\"\"\"^' \"«* ^^' the threatened stnke would take place at the sametime in spiteoflngolby's catastrophe. AJready in the early moriing revLrf^ KL \".^?r?\" •\"\"* '\"^*^«** '\"^ outerVrtioTS Manitw, and ha i taken satisfaction out of an equal number of Dogans, as they called the Roman Catholic labourers, one of whom was carried to the hospital with an elbow out of jomt and a badly injured back With as rauch information as he needed. Jowett made his way back to Lebanon, when, at the approach tHhe bndge, he met Fleda hurrying with bent head and pale, d^tressed face m his own direction. Of aU Western men none had a better appreciation of the sex that takes its H V .^ly^'y *'*'\"'\"*' ^\" ^^ ^^ than Aaron Jowett. T^'i^u^ '^ u\"\"\"' ^ ^^ \"^\"y \"\"\"\"K those of his own ST; W J^ ^^ f ,\"\"\" °* ^' \"'\"\"^'^ ^'^ become but a fiunt stirnng of leaves which had tinges of days K^ ♦\"* '^' ^^ '*\"' ^ \"^ «y« unmatch^for fem^!^ beauty. The sun which makes that northern land a paradise m summer caught the gold-brown hair of Gabriel Dru«,s daughter, aad made it glint and shine. It coq«\u003ettJd with the umber of her eyes and they grew lumi^us ^ ^d ly iTv ^^'^^ ?\"°^ '^^ P^« \"^ °f ber chee^ and made it hke an apple that one's lips touch lovingly when one caUs It too good to eat.\" It made an at^I phere of hajf-silver and half-gold with a touch of sunrise SS^f°S^\" *° \"'\"'\"•''\"\"'**'•« •^^^ *°\"\" ^*° -'t-8 Jowett knew that Druse's daughter was on her way",
         "to 19S THE WORLD FOR SALE El|i i i the man who had looked once, looked twice, looked thrice into her eyes and had seen there his own image; and that she had done the same; and that the man. it might be, would never look into their dark depths again. He might speak once, he might speak twice, he might speak thrice, but would it ever be the same as the look that needed no words ? When he crossed Fleda Druse's pathway she stopped ^ort. She knew that Jowett was Ingolby's true friend. She had seen him often, and he was intimately associated with that day when she had run the Carillon Rapids and had lain (for how k\u003eng she never dared to think) in Ingolby's arms in the sight of aU the world. First among those who crowded round her at Carillon that day were Jowett and Osterhaut, who had tried to warn her. \" You are going to him ?\" she said now with confidence in her eyes, and by the in imacy of the phrase (as though she could speak of Ingolby only as Mm) their own under-standing was complete. \" To see how he is and then to do other things,\" Jowett answered. There was silence for a moment in which they moved slowly forward, and then she said: \" You were at Bar- baxon's last night ?\" \" When that Gipsy son of a dog gave him away !\" he assented. \"I never heard anything Uke the speech Ingolby made. He had them in the throat. The Gipsy would have had nothing out of it, if it hadn't been for the horseshoe. But in spite of the give-away, Ingolby was getting them where they were soft — fairly drugging them with good news. You never heard such dope. My, he was smooth ! The golden, velvet truth it was, too. That's the only kind he has in stock ; and they were sort of stupefied and locoed as they chewed his word -plant. Cicero must have been a saucy singer of the dictionary, and Paul the Apostle had a u^pe of his own you couldn't buy, but",
         "the THE CHAIN OF THE PAST m W gamut that Ingolby ran gives them aU the cold good- She held herself very stUl as he spoke. There was Sr^^ofnThfl'r'^ '~i,'\" hefeyes-'lSe Z' n«t f^ f ,^* darknesi o i)ody and mind yonder was ?o l^f and^sh^T '°^''* \"^^ \"^^ \"*• '^''l '\"«=t of love L^ Y^ th^r '* '\"'\".'*' \"\"'*■ ^°^ \"\"Jd she love itlnti^ ♦ ' *\" »*'™«*Wng between them which had Its authonty over their lives, overcoming even that maiden modesty which was in contrast to the boMpwS thing she had done in running the CariUon RapdS giaa. bo much had come snce that dav \u003ch. ho^ trave led so far on the highway of Fate £t' ' *LS Z^ J^\"\"\"^ ^^^ °'=«'™\u003c^ »\"'l *e felt so old this w fK Ki V,^* \"\"\"* \"^P !\u003e*' ^\"\"\"ant Spring of life for the blmd Gorgio if he needed it-if he nfeded it SerS?\"\"\" '*' \"'\"^ °' ^'«^* ''\"'» -*»\u003e \"» ^fe-work She shuddered as she thought of what it meant to T: K !. .\"\"'\" \" *° '^°'^' •\"* \"\"\"t liave eye. to see Yet what had she to do with it, after aU ? She had n^ght to go to h.m even as she was going. Yet had she not the SS no ~™\"°\" •'\"\"««ity ? This Gorgio was her friend! Did not the world know that he had saved her life ? As they came to the Lebanon end of the bridge Fleda turned to Jowett and, commenting on his description of Smr \"'^ *°° \"'\"*• \"^^t *« \"o Pl-oe \"Big men like him think they can do anything,\" Jowett rephed, a httle .ronica^y, subtly trying to force a «)„S of her preference for Ingolby \"\"»sion He succeeded. Her eye lighted with indignation. She",
         "13 IM THE WORLD FOR SALE bmuU might challenge him, but the wonld not allow another to do to. \" It is rot the truth,\" she rejoined sharply. \" He does not measure b'mself against the world so. He is like — like a child,\" she added. \" It seems to me all big men are like that,\" Jowett rejoined; \"and he's the biggest man the West has seen. He knows about every man's business as though it was hit own. I can get a margin off most any man in the West on a horse-trade, but I'd look shy about doing a trade with him. You can't dope a horse so he won't know. He's on to it, sees it— sees it like as if it was in glass. Sees anything and everything, and \" He stopped short. The Master Gorgio could no longer see, and his henchman flushed like a girl at his \" brer'. \" ; though, as a horse-dealer, he had in his time listened without shame to wilder, angrier reproaches than most men living. She glanced at him, saw his confusion, forgave and understood him. \" It was not the horseshoe, it was not the Gipsy,\" she returned. \" They did not set it going. It would not have happened but for one man.\" \" Yes, it's Marchand, right enough,\" answered Jowett, \" but we'll get him yet. We'll get him with the branding- iron hot.\" \" That will not put things right if — \" she paused, then with a great efiort she added : \" Does the doctor think nt will get it back and that \" She stopped suddenly in an agitation he did not care to see and he turned away his head. \" Doctor doesn't know,' he answered. \" There's got to be an expert. It'll take tine before he gets here, but—\" he could not help but say it, seeing how great her distress was—\" but it's going to come back. I've seen cases — I saw one down on the Border '' — how easily he lied ! — \"",
         "just THE CHAIN OF THE PAST im £,!^hf i! *^ ••i\"!!\"« *•** ■*«*\"• '*-»«»• •hock. But !L„ 1*^ T' '\"\"\"' \"^^ \"8^*' \"\"'l q\"*\u003c=k too-like as Tve ™v., £!lf «!* \"P ''\" ** \"\"\"^ »\"'' ^aJk \u003cu though he^d la^L^^ ^- , ^y- ^ A-mighty dont if? men iMlv ?«. It '\" .^, Almighty ?\" ,he said half-wonder- Him .\"^J^V? \"\"\"y *'''°«'' \"'^ *° ^^ and deal fair with Him and not try to cheat Him,\" he answered. \" I ,1, hings lots of time, that wasn't ever bom on the prairie « ibruTiyl'rj;:^'-\"-^'- -\" enough.--irj itgcS?*orW?\"'\"\" \"*\"'■' •\"• \"^'\"'^ '\"«'^'y- \"Was rtii't^?'\" V**?\"^ ''\"^'^\"y- \" ^ *as stalked once- staJV^vl I was by night and often in the open day. by sTme «. kly loathsome thing, that even made'^e fi^^t it^^h at rt. enough o toll an army, till I near vent mad. I wL mallyand truly getting loony. Iten I .ok to praying\" ^e best woman I ever knov..d. i never had a mother but she looked after me-my sister, Sara, it wi^ Sh« thing to hang on to. I didn't taiow all I'd lost till she wL gone. But I guess she knew what I though o her 1^ she come back-^fter I'd prayed till I couldn't see she come back into my room one night when thfcu^d haunt was prowhng round me, and as plain as I see vori said. S^a-why, Sara !' and she smiled, and went awav mto nothmg-like a bit o' cloud in the sun.\" ^ though h?'?'^' '^'^■'^ '\"\"\"^\"^ '^\"^^^^ ^^°'^ him as tnough he saw a vision. \" It went ?\" she asked breathlessly. It went Uke that-' He made a swift, outward",
         "'m IN THE WORLD FOR SALE gesture. \"It went and it never came back; and she didn't either— not ever. My idee is,\" he added, \" that there's evil things that mebbe are the ghost-shapes of living men that want to do us harm; though, mebbe, too, they're the ghost-shape* of men that's dead, but that can't get on Over There. So they try to get back to us here; and they can make life Hell while they're stalking us.\" \" I am sure you are right,\" she said. She was thinking of the loathsome thing which haunted her room last night. Was it the embodied second self of Jethro Fawe, doing the evil that Jethro Fawe, the visible corporeal man, wished to do ? She shuddered, then bent her head and fixed her mind on Ingolby, whose house was not far away. She felt strangely, miserably alone this morning. She was in that fluttering state which follows a girl's discovery that she is a woman, and the feeling dawns that she must complete herself by joining her own life with the life of another. She showed no agitation, but her repression gave an almost statuesque character to her face and figure. The adventurous nature of her early hfe had given her a power to meet shock and danger with coolness, and though the news of Ingolby's tragedy had seemed to freeze the vital forces in her, and all the world became blank for a moment, she had controlled herself and had set forth to go to him,' come what might. As she entered the street where Ingolby hved, she sudd.enly realized the difficulty before her. She might go to him, but by only one right could she stay and nurse him, and that right she did not possess. He would, she knew, understand her, no matter how the world babbled. Why should the world babble ? What woman could have designs upon a blind man ? Was not humanity alone sufficient warrant for staying by his side ? Yet would he wish it ? Suddenly her heart sank; but again she",
         "remem- THE CHAIN OF THE PAST 197 he JnTfi?^^ \"J^\" '\"\"■ ^°* •\"«•«»* it would have been if",
         "u;j CHAPTER XIV SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE A FEW hours .'.-Iter Fleda slowly made her way home-ward through the woods on the Manitou side of the Sagalac. Leaving Ingolby's house, she had seen men from the ranches and farms and mines beyond Lebanon driving or riding into the town, as though to a fair or fete-day. Word of anticipated troubles had sped through the country-side, and the innate curiosity of a race who greatly love a row brought in sensation-lovers. Some were skimming along in one-horse gigs, a small bag of oats dangling beneath Uke the pendulum of a great clock. Others were in double or triple-seated light wagons — \" democrats \" they were called. Women had a bit of colour in their hats or at their throats, and the men had on clean white collars and suits of \" store-clothes \"—a sign of being on pleasure bent. Young men and girls on rough but serviceable mounts cantered past, laughing and joking, and their loud talking grated on the ear of the girl who had seen a Napoleon in the streets of his Moscow. Presently there crossed her path a gruesomely ugly hearse, with glass sides and cheap imitation ostrich plumes drawn by gorged ravens of horses with egregiously long tails, and driven by an undertaker's assistant, who, with a natural gaiety of soul, displayed an idiotic solemnity by dragging down the corners of the mouth. She turned away in loathing. Her mind fled to a scene far away in the land of the Volga when she was a child, where she had seen buried two men, who had fought for their insulted honour till both",
         "198 SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE 109 had died of their wounds. She remembered the white and red sashes and the gay scarfs worn by the women at the burial, the jackets with great silver buttons worn by the men, and the silver-mounted pistols and bright steel knives in the garish belts. She saw again the bodies of the two gladiators, covered with crimson robes, carried shoulder-high on a soft bed of interlaced branches to the graves beneath the trees. There, covered with flowers and sprigs i. ;d evergreens, ribbons and favours, the kindly earth hid them, cloaked for their long sleep, while women wept, and men praised the dead, and went back to the open road again cheerily, as the dead would hive them do. If he had died— the man she had just left behind in that torpid sleep which opiates bring— his body would have been carried to his last home in just such a hideous equip-age as this hearse. A shiver of revolt went through her frame, and her mind went to him as she had seen him lying between the white sheets of his bed, his hands, as they had lain upon the coverlet, compact of power and grace, knit and muscular and vital -not the hand for a violin but the hand for a sword. As she had laid her hand upon his hot forehead and over his eyes, he had unconsciously spoken her name. That had told her more of what really was between them than she had ever known. In the presence of the catas-trophe that must endanger, if not destroy the work he had done, the career he had made, he thought of her, spoke her name. What could she do to prevent his ruin ? She must do something, else she had no right to think of him. As though her thoughts had summoned him, she came suddenly upon Felix Marchand at a point where her path resolved itself into two, one leading to Manitou, the other to her own home. There was a maUdous glint in the greenish eyes of the ; t '-ll",
         "..'.I, MO THE WORLD FOR SALE dissolute demagogue as he saw her. His hat made a half-circle before it found his head again. \" You pay early visits, mademoiselle,\" he said, his teeth showing rat-like. \" And you late ones ?\" she asked meaningly. \" Not so late that I can't get up early to see what's going on,\" he rejoined in a sour voice. \" Is it that those who beat you have to get up early ?\" she asked ironically. \" No one has got up earlier than me lately,\" he sneered. \" All the days are not begun,\" she remarked calmly. \" You have picked up quite an education since you left the road and the tan.\" he said with the look of one wxio delivers a smashing 1:\u003elow. \" I am not yet educated enough to know how you get other people to commit your crimes for you,\" she retorted. \" Who commits my crimes for me ?\" His voice was sharp and even anxious. \" The man who told you I was once a Gipsy— Jethro Fawe.\" Her instinct had told her this was so. But had Jethro told all ? She thought not. It would need some catas-trophe which threw him off his balance to make him speak to a Gorgio of the inner things of Romany life; and child-marriage was one of them. He scoffed. \" Once a Gipsy always a Gipsy. Race is race, and you can't put it off and on like— your stoc'cing.\" He was going to say chemise, but race was race, and vestiges of native French chivalry stayed the gross simile on the lips of the degenerate. Fleda's eyes, however, took on a dark and brooding look which, more than anything else, showed the Romany in her. With a murky flood of resentment rising in her veins, she strove to fight back the half-savage instincts of a bygone life. She felt as though she could willingly sentence this man to death as her father had done Jethro Fawe",
         "that SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE 201 very morning. Another thought, however, was working and fighting in her— that Marchand was better as a friend than an enemy; and that while Ingolby's fate was in the balance, while yet the Orange funeral had not taken place and the strikes had not yet come, it might be that he could be won over to Ingolby. Her mind was thus involun-tarily reproducing Ingolby's policy, as he had declared it to Jowett and RockweU. It was to find Felix Marchand's pnce. and to buy off his enmity— not by money, for Marchand did not need that, but by those other coins of value which are individual to each man's desires, passions and needs. \" Once a Frenchman isn't always a Frenchman,\" she replied cooUy, disregarding the coarse insolence of his last utterance. \" You yourself do not now swear faith to the tricolour or the fleur-de-lis.\" He flushed. She had touched a tender nerve. I am a Frenchman always,\" he rejoined angrily. \" I hate the English. I spit on the English flag.\" Yes, I've heard you are an anarchist,\" she rejoined. \" A man with no country and with a flag that belongs to no country— ^«(!//e affaire et quelle ir6lerie !\" She laughed. Taken aback in spite of his anger, he stared at her. How good her French accent was ! If she would only speak altogether in that beloved language, he could smother much malice. She was beautiful and— weU, who could tell ? Ingolby was wounded and blind, maybe for eve.-, and women are always with the top dog— that was his theory. Perhaps her apparent dislike of him was only a mood. Many women that he had conquered had been just like that. They had begun by disUking him— from Lil Samia down— and had ended by being his. This ijrl would never be his in the way that the others had .jen, but— who could tell ?— perhaps he would think enough of her to marry her ? Anyway, it was worth while making such a beauty care for him.",
         "The 202 THE WORLD FOR SALE other kind of women were easy enough to get, and it would be a piquant thing to have one iireproachable affaire. He had never had one; he was not sure that any girl or woi.ian he had ever known had ever loved him, and he was certain that he had never loved any girl or woman. To be in love would be a new and piquant experience for him. He did not know love, but he knew what passion was. He had ever been the hiinter. This trail might be dangerous, too, but he would take his chances. He had seen her dislike of him whenever they had met in the past, and he had never tried to soften her attitude towards him. He had certainly whistled, but she had not come. Well, he would whistle again — a different tune. \" You speak French much ?\" he asked almost eagerly, the insolence gone from his tone. \" Why didn't I know that ?\" \" I speak FreriCh in Manitou,\" she replied, \" but nearly all the French speak English there, and so I speak more English than French.\" \" Yes, that's it,\" he rejoined almost angrily again. \" The EngUsh will not learn French, will not speak French. They make us learn English, and \" \" If you don't like the flag and the country, why don't you leave it ?\" she interrupted, hardening, though she had meant to try and win him over to Ingolby's side. His eyes blazed. There was son.ething almost real in the man after all. \" The English can kill us, they can grind us to the dust,\" he rejoined in French, \" but we will not leave the land which has always been ours. We settled it; our fathers gave their lives for it in a thousand places. The Indians killed them, the rivers and the storms, the plague and the fire, the sickness and the cold wiped them out. They were burned alive at the stake, they were flayed; their bones were broken to pieces by stones— but",
         "they SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE 203 blazed trails with their blood in the wilderness from New Orleans to Hudson's Bay. They paid lor the land with their lives. Then the Erglish came and took it, and since that time— one hundred and fifty years — we have been slaves.\" \" You do not look like a slave,\" she answered, \" and you have not acted like a slave. K you were to do the things in France that you've done here, you wouldn't be free as you are to-day.\" \" What have I done ?\" he asxed darkly. \" You were the cause of what happened at Barbazon's last night,\" — ^he smiled evilly — \"you are egging on the* roughs to break up the Orange funeral to-day ; and there is all the rest you know so well.\" \" What is the rest I know so weU ?\" He looked closely at her, his long, mongrel eyes half-closing with covert scrutiny. \" Whatever it is, it is all bad and it is all yours.\" \" Not all,\" he retoned coolly. \" You forget your Gipsy friend. He did his part last night, and he's still free.\" They had entered the last little stretch of wood in which her home lay, and she slackened her footsteps slightly. She felt that she had been unwise in challenging him ; that she ought to try persistently to win him over. It was repugnant to her, still it must be done even yet. She mastered herself for Ingolby's sake and changed her tactics. \" As you glory in what you have done, you won't mind being responsible for all that's happened,\" she replied in a more friendly tone. She made an impulsive gesture towards him. \" You have shown what power you have — ^isn't that enough ?\" she asked. \" You have made the crowd shout, ' Vive Marchand /' You can make everything as peaceful as it is now upset. If you don't do so, there will be much misery. If peace must be got by force, then the",
         "force 20* THE WORLD FOR SALE of Soveniment wUl get it in the end. You have the rift Y;Xr*r\"°:ri\"'\"*''*''*'\"''8ain in the other way? Jameta? £?\" \"'\" \"^ '^\" '' \"^'- ^ '\"''\"\" -!\u003e-* the did^nofZ \"^'^ «*\" •'''■ ^'''' *•\u003e'»\"'' '\"^\"^d^y. but she ftln^ or,r\" ^ ^rr^ 'y\"\" **'\" *ide o^n in the luiness of eloquence and desire. \"You have a tongue Mke none I ever heard,\" he said ^t'^dir^-. ''''\"'? S°* '^ ™\"'^ that thinl^, youVe fn th, r \"n*^ '^\" *'''\"' \"^'\"- You took risks that day on the CanUon Rapids. It was only the day before tha? d^Jl on 7u'','^°^^^^' °« ** though I was a wolf or a devil on the loose. The ne-tt day when I saw Incolbv hand you out to the crowd from Ws anSs. I ^rnSfv-I m^MiSui?' that --times when I've hl/a UtTl^too much hquor I felt it more because you're the only kind of woman that could ever get a real hold on me It wm rZ aT ''^ *\"* ^'' \"''\"P'e'\"8 and set the touj^ rj^\" -.^ ^°\" ^y- ^ •=»\" 6«t hold of a crowd. li 's not hard-with money and drink. You can buy hm\"an nature cheap. Every man has his price they .ay-^S every woman too-6.\u003e„ sHr I The thing is to fted out wS on fnThl';\"\"' *''\" ''°* *° ''\"y- Yo\" can't buy v\"^ You'vV.a! IT^r^' r\"\" \" y°\" \"^ » difierent price. S to 1^ hlnd^d „°\"* ^r '\"\"\"\"^ ^*°* *•\u003e* Price-whether It s to be handed over the counter, so to speak, or to be kept on the wmdow-siU, or left in a pocket o dropped believe that fools nobody, but just plays to the hypocrite m everyone everywhere. I'm saying this to you ^ca^! e^eVtU'rr.\"' '\"\"^ \"°^''- ' ^''\"^^ o- '- * even though you re so young. I don't see why we can't come together. I'm to be bought. I don't say that",
         "my SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE 20S price isn't high. You've got your price, too. You wo^dn't fass yourself about things here in Manitou Z 2wT; 'w «''* '^'\"\"'* ^'^^thi'^K yo^ wanted to get. Tout f« / WeU isn't it worth while making the bargain ? You ve got such gift of speech that I'm just as if Fd b^„ g rdle, you're worth giving up a lot for. I've seen p entv of your sex. and I've heard cJ^wds of them tairbufthey never had anything for me beyond the minute. You'te got the real thing. You're my fancy. You've been ht\". \"* ^ '^\"'\"*\"'\u003e °' ^\"S^'by- H-^^ done HeTa the tZ?? There's nothing he's done that isn't on the tumble smce last night. The financial gang that he downed are out already against him. They'll have Ws e^nomic blood. He made a splash while he was at it. but the alligator's got him. It's ' Exit Ingolby.' now.\" ,n«l rf'u\" P^^'on'^te gesture, and seemed about to speak, but he went on: \"No. don't say anything I taow how you feel. You've had your face tSd'hi way, and you can't look elsewhere all at once But JZl 7^„^'\"\u003c=''' \" y°\"'« a good healthy human being Ingolby was the kind hkely to draw a girl He's a six-footer and over; he spangled a lot. and he'smUed CnlV.'^T' \" ^\"1.\"\"^'' ^\"\"^ ^^^ ^W enough ^ keep clear of women that could hurt him. That wis his strongest point after all, for a little, sly sprat of a woman that s made eyes at you and led you on. till you sent her It an^ V '^T\\'°'\"' ''\"\"\" ^*^ ^\"-^ '«\u003e^« ^ot words ta It ana she got what she'd wanted, will make you pay a hundred times for the goods you get. Ingolby w^ C enough to walk shy. until you came his wty. and^heS -wf hi'^^\"\"\"\"'\";. ^\"* ''^* \"'S''* sot him in the :?tal hit km between the eyes; and his stock's not worth ten cents in the dollar to-day. But though the pumrfre out, and he'c done, and'll never see his way out of the ho^ he s m \"-he laughed at his grisly joke-'' it's natu^^ to 4",
         "■,M\\ 206 THE WORLD FOR SALE let him down easy. You've looked his way; he did yon a good turn at the Carillon Rapids, and you'd do one for him if you could. I'm the only one can stop the wont from happening. You want to pay your debt to him. Good. I can help you do it. I can stop the strikes on the railways and in the mills. I can stop the row at the Orange funeral. I can stop the run on his bank and the drop in his stock. I can fight the gang that's against him — I know how. I'm the man that can bring things to pass.\" He paused with a sly, mean smile of self-approval and conceit, and his tongue licked the comers of Us mouth in a way that drunkards have in the early morning when the effect of last night's drinking has worn ofi. He spread out his hands with the air of a man who had unpacked his soul, but the chief characteristic of his manner was egregious belief in himself. At first, in her desire to find a way to meet the needs of Ingolby, Fleda had listened to him with fortitude and even without revolt. But as he began to speak of women, and to refer to herself with a look of gloating which men of his breed cannot hide, her angry pulses beat hard. She did not quite know where he was leading, but she was sure he meant to say something which would vex her beyond bearing. At one moment she meant to cut short his narrative, but he prevented her, and when at last he ended, she was almost choking with agitation. It had been borne in upon her as his monologue proceeded, that she would rather die than accept anything from this man —anything of any kind. To fight him was the only thing. Nothing else could prevail in the end. His was the service of the unpenitent thief. \" And what is it you want to buy from me ?\" she asked evenly. He did not notice, and he could not realize that ominous thing in her voice and face. \" I want to be friends",
         "with SUCH THINGS MAY NOT BE 207 you. I want to see you here in the woods, to meet you as you met Ingolby. I want to talk with you, to hear you talk; to learn things from you I never learned before; She interrupted him with a swift gesture. \" And then —after that ? What do you want at the end of it all ? One cannot spend one's time talking and wandering in the woods and teaching and learning. After that, what ?\" \" I have a house in Montreal,\" he said evasively. \" I don't want to live there alone.\" He laughed. \" It's big enough for two, and at the end it might be us two, if \" With sharp anger, yet with coolness and dignity she broke in on his words. \" Might be us two !\" she exclaimed. \" I have never thought of making my home in a sewer. Do you think— but, no, it isn't any use talking ! You don't know how to deal with man or woman. You are perverted.\" \" I did not mean what you mean; I meant that I should want to many you,\" he protested. \" You think the worst of me. Someone has poisoned your mind against me.\" ' \"Everyone has poisoned my mind against you,\" she returned, \" and yourself most of all. I know you will try to injure Mr. Ingolby; and 1 know that you will try to injure me; but you will not succeed.\" She turned and moved away from him quickly, taking the path towards her own front door. He called something after her, but she did not or would not heir. As she entered the open space in front of the house, she heard footsteps behind her and turned quickly, not with-out apprehension. A woman came hurrying towards her. She was pale, agitated, haggard with fatigue. \" May I speak with you ?\" she asked in French. \" Surely,\" replied",
         "Fleda. CHAPTER XV THE WOMAN FBOM WINO BITEK \" What is it ?\" asked Fleda, opening the door of the house. \" I want to speak to you about m'sieu',\" replied the sad- faced woman. She made a motion of her head backwards towards the wood. \" About M'sieu' Marchand.\" Fleda's face hardened; she had had more than enoxigh of \" M'sieu' Marchand.\" She was bitterly ashamed that she had, even for a moment, thought of using diplomacy with him. But this woman's face was so forlorn, apart, and lonely, that the old spirit of the Open Road worked its will. In far-o£E days she had never seen a human being turned away from a Romany tent, or (\"jri'-cn from a Romany camp. She opened the door and stood aside to admit the wayfarer. A few moments later, the woman, tidied and freshened, sat at the ample breakfast which was characteristic of Romany home-life. The woman's plate was bountifully supplied by Fleda, and her cup filled more than once by Madame Bulteel, while ^.d Gabriel Druse bulked friendly over all. His face now showed none of the passion and steriuiess which had been present when he passed the Sentence of the Patrin upon Jethro Fawe; nothing of the gloom filling his eyes as he left Ingolby's house. The gracious, bountiful look of the patriarch, of the head of the clan, was upon him. The husband of one wife, the father of one child yet the Ry of Rys had still the overlooking, protective sense of one who had the care of great numbers of people. His",
         "808 THE WOMAN FROM WIND RIVER 200 iTfl-'-Ki ^ f \" \"\"\"y **«* *°\"M\"\u003e \" tWs, and had wronged them. drew'lSrc'^'* '\"'\" \"\"\"• '\"\"\" '\" »•• '\"'^' \" *\"* \"\u003e*»' \" From Wind River and under Elk Mountain,\" the woman answered with a look of relief. Her face was of those who no longer can bear the soul's secrets. There was silence while the breakfast things were cleared «r^' ui I *'^'*°* *\" *''\"^' *'^« *» the full morning sun. It broke through the branches of pine and cedar and juniper; It made translucent the leaves of the maples; U shimmered on Fleda-s brown hair as she puUed a ros^ from the bush at the window, and gave it to the forlorn weature .n the grey \" linsey-woolsey \" dress and the loose blue flannel jacket, whose skin was coarsened by outdoor hlnl \"J^ '\"\"* ^\"ething of real beauty in the intense her ^t days, for her waist was smaU, her bosom gently and firmly rounded, and hc-r hands were finer than those ol most who hve and work much in the open air. .,i^^?V^^ I^\"** \"^ something you wished to teU me,\" said Fleda at last. The womwi gazed slowly round at the three, as though with puzzled appeal. There was the look of the oT lander m her face ; of one who had been exiled from famiUar things and places. In manner she was like a child. Her glance wandered over the faces of the two women, then her eyes met those of the Ry, and stayed there. I am old and I have seen many sorrows,\" said Gabriel Drase, divirang what was in her mind. \" I will try to understand.\" •' \"I have known all the bitterness of Ufe,\" interp' -d the low. soft voice of Madsmp Bulteel,",
         ".:'ii 210 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" All ears are the same here,\" Fleda added, looking the woman in the eyes. \" I will tell everything,\" was the instant reply. Her fingers twined and untwined in her lap with a nervousness shown by neither face nor body. Her face was almost apathetic in its despair, but her body had an upright courage. She sighed heavily and began. \" My name is Arabella Stone. I was married from my home over against Wind River by the Jumping Sandhills. \" My father was a lumberman. He was always captain of the gang in the woods, and captain of the river in the summer. My mother was deaf and dumb. It was very lonely at times when my father was away. I loved a boy— a good boy, and he was killed breaking horses. When I was twenty-one years old my mother died. It was not good for me to be alone, my father said, so he must either give up the woods and the river, or he or I must marry. Well, I saw he would not marry, for my mother's face was one a man could not forget.\" The old man stirred in his seat. \" I have seen such,\" he said in his deep voice. \" So it was I said to myself I would marry,\" she con-tinued, \" though I had loved the Boy that died under the hoofs of the black stallion. There weren't many girls at the Jumping Sandhills, and so there were men, now one, now another, to say things to me which did not touch my heart ; but I did not laugh, because I understood that they were lonely. Yet I liked one of them more than all the others. \" So, for my father's sake, I came nearer to Dennis, and at last it seemed I could bear to look at him any time of the day or night he came to me. He was built like a pine-tT«e, and had a playful tongue, and also he was a ranchman like the Boy that was gone. It all came about on the day he rode in from the range che wild wicked",
         "black THE WOMAN FROM WIND RIVER 211 suilion which aU range-riders had tried for years to cap- Sbo\" LV\" r4'\" m7„' D ^ '°\"'' ^-\"^ \"^\"^^^ rode hi; tr L aoor I ^H \"\"\"' '\"^*\"«'' ^\"^ »°d whispendto me 0° .r th. h\"P \"\"^^T\"^' ^^ *»»«\" he him I said 'V ° f P^^'' °* ''\"\"ermilk I gave thrt'arnian^Ikes LTLKelv\"\"- «« '^'^ ^•\"i tohea, though the;Sh-^--S anftrR^r grSt''-^^^^^ - * W,^ ^n a dream. Chair-arm Ld ^.^' :lTo,i,'Z To^\"\" Z,^^ hands were clasped in her Ian and w^ *^ = Ihe woman's fai '' '\" '« \"\"' »«™ la\" ■..■S'iTnur .^ ' \" \"\"'\"' \"\"■•\" \"» 5r„ra:T^S;~'''^\"^irs S\"AS!SnjSHF--^' with me-and cruel tcK. ' \"\"^^ quarrelsome turned my eyes to any other m^ \" ' *° ^\"'' '\"'* \"'=^«-- Suddenly she stopped as though the nain „f = ,",
         "• 212 THE WORLD FOR SALE Two or three times the woman essayed to speak again, but could not. At last, however, she overcame her emo-tion and said: \" So it was when M'sieu' FeUx Marrhand came up from the Sagalac.\" The old man started and muttered harshly, but Fleda had foreseen the entrance of the dissolute Frenchman into the tale, and gave no sign of surprise. \"M'sieu' Marchand bought horses,\" the sad voice trailed on. \"One day he bought the mining-claims Dennis had been holding till he could develop them or sell them for good money. When Dennis went to town again he brought me back a present of a belt with silver clasps; but yet again that night he slept upon the floor alone. So it went on. M. Marchand, he goes on to the mountaiiis and comes back; and he buys more horses, and Dennis takes them to Yargo, and M. Marchand goes with him. but comes back before Dennis does. It was then M'sieu' begun to talk to me; to say things that soothe a woman when she is hurt. I knew now Dennis did not want me as when he first married me. He was that kind of man — quick to care and quicker to forget. He was weak, he could not fasten where he stood. It pleased him to be gay and friendly with me when he was sober, but there was nothing behind it— nothing, nothing at all. At last I began to cry when I thought of it, for it went on and on, and I was too much alone. I looked at myself in the glass, and I saw I was not old or lean. I sang in the trees beside the brook, and my voice was even a little better than in the days when Dennis first came to my father's house. I looked to my cooking, and I knew that it was as good as ever. I thought of ray dothes, and how I did my hair, and asked myself if I was as fresh to see as when Dennis first came to me. I could see no difierence. There was a dear pool not far away under the Kttle hills where the springs came together. I used to bathe in it every morning and dry myself in the sun; and my body was",
         "like THE WOMAN FROW WIND RIVER 213 She paused an, hunrheTh^aJte'^^g^Tnr •\"' And aU the tinS^M m! ^ ^ f ^ ''^' *°°*^\" «\"\u003e'»»\"• good reason for comWi, ' \"\"^ \"^^^^^ ^'*1» «\"\"e bought of th In^'nT'^rC\"'' ^'°°*\"\"^' °' *\"\" came at first for an hour Ttwo asTf bv ch \"°* ^IT' '^ a whole day, because h. J,^i u , ^ chance, then for day. I was'sitdngt; t Sotit\":! ' \"^^ ''\"''''■ °- shoulder-hf cZll^^y™:,:? ,P\"* ^ ^-^ \u003c\u003e\" -y till he touched me. He 3e tn ^ T* '''^' '^'» saddened his soul \" ^^\"^ *''y ^ '\"«**■ and it be'^f soul-the jackal!\" gn^wled the old man in his there was a woman at YarRo-thaflvf • ^ i \"^ \"^ *''^* for busine;s, but to her Fvlrvlu' *'^ \"°* S° *''\"\u003c' he said, h; told L to asroldXo '^r '!. ''\"''^' '\"^' helper, if he had sp^kenTh. t^^*? 7 ^\"^ *^* ^\"\"^'an anX and crazy, ^ TtSnk sLl T/'•^\"?^'- \"\"'^ Hard and asked him He safd L J ,7\"* *°, \"'\" \"^\"^ andthathewouldnoth^Lr'Setit^lf-S: I",
         "M 214 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" How do I know what was in my mind ? Is a woman not mad at such a time ! There I was, tossed aside for a flyaway, who was for any man that would come her way. Yes, I think I was mad. The pride in me was hurt— as only a woman can understand.\" She paused and looked at the two women who listened to her. Fleda's eyes were on the world beyond the window of the room. \" Surely we understand,\" whispered Madame Bulteel. The woman's courage returned, and she continued: \" I could not go to my father, for he was riding the river scores of miles away. I was terribly alone. It was then that M'sieu' Marchand who had bribed the woman to draw Dennis away begged me to go away with him. He swore 1 should marry him as soon as I could be free of Dennis. I scarcely knew what I said or thought; but the place I had loved was hateful to me, so I went away with him.\" A sharp, pained exciamation broke from the lips of Madame Bulteel, but presently she reached out and laid a hand upon the woman's arm. \" Of course you went with him,\" she said. \" You could not stay where you were and face the return of Dennis. There was no child to keep you, and the man that tempted you said he adored you ?\" The woman looked gratefuUy at her. \" That was what he said,\" she answered. \" He said he was tired of wandering, and that he wanted a home— and there was a big house in Montreal.\" She stopped suddenly upon an angry, smothered word from Fleda's lips. A big house in Montreal ! Fleda's first impulse was to b/eak in upon the woman's story, and tell her father what had happened just now outside their own house; but she waited. \" Yes, there was a big house in Montreal ?\" said Fleda, her eyes now resting sadly upon the",
         "woman. THE WOMAN FROM WIND RIVER 215 \"He said it should be mine. But that did not count. To be far away from all that had been was more than all eke. I was not thinking of the man, or caving for him, I was flying from my shame. I did not see then the shame to which I was going. I was a fool, and I was mad and nn,\u003eW .^'\",.^ waked-and it was soon-there was qmck understanding between us. The big house in \"S ~ \"\"^^ \"^''^ \"\"**\"* ^°'' \"\"*• \"* *^' ^^^'•y h.l^^ °''imf stretched heavilj. to his feet, leaned both hands on the table, and looked at the woman with glower- mg eyes, while Fleda's heart seemed to stop beating Married!\" growled Gabriel Druse, with a blur of r\"^'!!- ;f \"T- \"^ ''\"^^ ^''^t ^^^'^ Marchand had followed his daughter as though he were a single man. Fleda saw what was working in his mind. Since her father suspected, he should know all. \" He almost offered me the big house in Montreal this morning, she said evenly and coldly. A malediction broke from the old man's Ups J'a^^J^T^^ *^°\"^* ^^ ^^''t^'^ •»« to marry him,\" Fleda added scornfully. ' ' \" And what did you say ?\" Druse asked '• There could only be one thing to say. I told him I had never thought of making my home in a sewer \" A grim smile broke over the old man's face, and he sat down again. \" Because I saw him with you I wanted to warn vou \" the woman continued. \" Yesterday, I came to warn him of his danger and he laughed at me. From Madame Thibadeau I heard he had said he would make you sine his song. When I came to tell you, there he was with you. But when he left you I was sure there was no need to speak. Still I felt I must teU you-perhaps because you are nch and strong, and will stop him from doimj more harm.\" ^",
         "i 216 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" How do you know we are rich ?\" asked Druse in a rough tone. \" It is what the world sajrs,\" was the reply. \" Is there harm in that ? In any case it was right to tell you all; so that one who had herded with a woman Uke me should not be friends with you.\" \" I have sesn worse women than you,\" murmured the old man. \" What danger did you come to warn M. Marchand about ?\" asked Fleda. \" To his life,\" ansvered the woman. \" Do yon want to save his life ?\" asked the old man. \" Ah, is it not always so ?\" intervened Madame Bulteel in a low, sad voice. \" To be wronged like that does not make a woman just.\" \" I am just,\" answered the woman. \" He deserves to die, but I want to save the man that will kill him when they meet.\" \" Who wiU kiU him ?\" asked Fleda. \" Dennis— he will kill Marchand if he can.\" The old man leaned forward with puzzled, gloomy interest. \" Why ? Dennis left you for another. Yon say he had grown cold. Was that not what he wanted — that you should leave him ?\" The woman looked at him with tearful eyes. \" If I had known Dennis better, I should have waited. What he did is of the moment only. A man may fall and rise again, but it is not so 'vith a woman. She thinks and thinks upon the scar that shows where she wounded her-self; and she never forgets, and so her life becomes nothing — ^nothing.\" No one saw that Madame Bulteel held herself rigidly, and was so white that even the sunUght was gold beside her look. Yet the strangest, saddest smUe played about her lips; and presently, as the eyes of the others",
         "fastened THE WOMAN FROM WIND RIVER 217 on the woman and did not leave her, she regained her usual composure. The woman kept looking at Gabriel Druse. \"When IJemus found that I had gone, and knew why— £or I left word on a sheet of paper— he went mad like me. Trailing to the south, to find M'sieu' Marchand, he had an accident, Mid was laid up in a shack for weeks on the Tanguishene River, and they could not move him. But at last a ranchman wrote to me. and the letter found me on the very day I left M'sieu'. When I got that letter begging me to go to the Tanguishene River, to nurse Dennis who loved me still, my heart sank. I said to myself I could • not go; and Dennis and I must be apart always to the end ^time. But then I thought again. He was ill, and his body was as broken as his mind. Well, since I could do his mind no good, I would try to help his body. I could do that much for him. So I went. But the letter to me had been long on the way, and when I got to the Tan- gmshene River he was almost well.\" She paused and rocked her body to and fro for a moment as though in pain. •' He wanted me to go back to him then. He said he bad never cared for the woman at Yargo, and that vbat he felt for me now was different from what it had ever been. When he had settled accounts we could go back to the ranch and be at peace. I knew what he meant by settling accounts, and it frightened me. That is why I am here. I came to warn the man, Marchand, for if Dennis kills him, then they will hang Dennis. Do you not see? This is a country of law. I saw that Dennis had the madness in his brain, and so I left him again in the evening of the day I found him, and came here— it is a long way. Yesterday, M sieu Marchand laughed at me when I warned him. He said he could take care of himself. But such men as Dennis stop at nothing; there wiU be kiUing, if M'sieu' stays",
         "here.\" 218 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" You will go back to Dennis ?\" asked Fleda gently. \" Some other woman will make him happy when he forgets me,\" was the cheerless, grey reply. The old man got up and, comir er, laid a hand upon her shoulder. \" Where did you think of going from here ?\" he asked. \" Anywhere — I don't know,\" was the reply. \" Is there no work here for her ?\" he asked, turning to Madame Bulteel. \" Yes, plenty,\" was the reply. \" And room also ?\" he asked again. \" Was ever a tent too full, when the lost traveller stumbled into camp in the old daj?s ?\" rejoined Fleda. The woman trembled to her feet, a glad look in her eyes. \" I ought to go, but I am tired and I will gladly stay,\" she said and swayed against the table. Madame Bulteel and Fleda put their arms round her, steadying her. \" This is not the way to act,\" said Fleda with a touch of sharp reproof. Had she not her own trouble to face ? The stricken woman drew herself up and looked Fleda in the eyes. \" I will find the right way, if I can,\" she said with courage. A half-hour later, as the old man sat alone in the room where he had breakfasted, a rifle-shot rang out in the distance. \" The trouble begins,\" he said, as he rose and hastened into the hallv/ay. Another shot rang out. He caught up his wide, felt hat, reached for a great walking-stick in the corner, and left the house",
         "hurriedly. CHAPTER XVI THE MAYOR FILLS AN OFFICE It was a false alarm which had startled Gabriel Druse, but it had significance. The Orange funeral was not to take place until eleven o'clock, and it was only eight o'clock when the Ry left his home. A rifle-shot had, however, been fired across the Sagalac from the Manitou side, and it had been promptly acknowledged from Lebanon. There was a short pause, and then came another from the Lebanon side. It was merely a warning and a challenge. The only man who could have controlled the position was blind and helpless. As Druse walked rapidly towards the bridge, he met Jowett. Jowett was one of the few men in either town for whom the Ry had regard, and the friendliness had had its origin in Jowett's knowledge of horse-flesh. This was a field in which the Ry was himself a master. He had ever ■ been too h' 'h-placed among his own people to trade and barter horses except when, sending a score of Romanys on a hunt for wild ponies on the hills of Eastern Europe, he had afterwards sold the tamed herd to the highest bidders in some Balkan town; but he had an infallible eye for a horse. It was a curious anomaly also that the one man in Lebanon who would not have been expected to love and pursue horse-flesh was the Reverend Reuben Tripple to whom Ingolby had given his congi, but who loved a horse as he loved himself. He was indeed a greater expert in horses than in souls. One of the sights of Lebanon had been the appearance in 819 m .1",
         "jiii 2S0 THE WORLD FOR SALE the field of the \" Reverend Tripple,\" who owned a great, raw-boned bay mare of lank proportions, the winner of a certain great trotting-race which had delighted the mockers. For two years Jowett had eyed Mr. Tripple's rawbone with a piratical eye. Though it had won only a single great race, that, in Jowett's view, was its master's fault. As the Arabs say, hov.ever, Allah is with the patient ; and so it was that on the evening of the day in which Ingolby met disaster, Mr. Tripple informed Jowett that he was willing to sell his rawbone. He was mounted on the gawky roadster when he met Gabriel Druse making for the bridge. Their greeting was as cordial as hasty. Anxious as was the Ry to learn what was going on in the towns, Jowett's mount cau.i,hi his eye. It was but a little time since they had met at Ingolby's house, and they were both full of the grave events afoot, but here was a horse-deal of conse-quence, and the bridle-rein was loose-flung. \" Yes, I got it,\" said Jowett, with a chuckle, interpre-ting the old man's look. \" I got it for good— a wonder from Wonderville. Damned queer-looking critter, but there, I guess we know what I've got. Outside like a crinoline, inside like a pair of ankles of the Lady Jane Plantagenet. Yes, I got it, Mr. Druse, got it dead-on !\" \" How ?\" asked the Ry, feeling the clean fetlocks with affectionate approval. \" He's oft East, so he says,\" was the joyous reply; \"sudden but sure, and I dunno why. Aayvfiy, he's got the door-handle offered, and he's ofi without his camel.\" He stroked the neck of the bay lovingly, \" How much ?\" Jowett held up his fingers. The old man lifted his eyebrows quizzically. \" That— h'm ! Does he preach as well as that ?\" he",
         "asked. THE MAYOR FILLS AN OFFICE 22J Jowett chuckled. \"He knows the home-country better than the New Jerusalem, I guess; and I wasn't oH my feed, nor hadn't lost my head neither. I wanted that dust-hawk, and he knew it; but I got in on him with the harness and the sulky. The bridle he got from a Mexican that come up here a year ago, and went broke and then went dead; and there being no padr$, Tripple did the burying, and he took the bridle as his fee, I s'pose. It had twenty dollars' worth of silver on it— look at these conchs.\" He trifled with the big beautiful buttons on the head-stall. The sulky's as good as new, and so's the harness almost; and there's the nose-bag and the blankets, and a saddle and a monkey-wrench and two bottles of horse- liniment. and odds and ends. I only paid that \"—and he held up his fingers again asthough it was a sacred rite— \"for the lot. Not bad, I want to say. Isn't he good for all day, this one ?\" „ 3* °'^ ™*° nodded, then turned towards the bridge. The gim-shots— what ?\" he asked, setting forward at a walk which taxed the rawbone's stride. \" An invite— come to the wedding; that's all. Only it's a funeral this time, and, if something good doesn't happen, there'll be more than one funeral on the Sagalac to-morrow. I've had my try, but I dunno how it'U come out. He's not a man of much dictionary is the Monseenoor.\" \" The Monseigneur Lourde ? What does he say ?\" \" He says what we all say, that he is sorry. ' But why have the Orange funeral while things are as they are ?' he says, and he asks for the red flag not to be shook in the face of the bull.\" \" That is not the talk of a fool, as most priests are,\" growled the other. \" Sure. But it wants a real wind-warbler to make them seeit in Lebanon. They've got the needle. They'll pray to-day with the taste of blood in their mouths. It's",
         "gone «» THE WORLD FOR SALE too far. Only a miracle can keep things right. The Mayor has wired for the mounted police— our own bat-talion of militia wouldn't serve, and there'd be no use ordering them out-but the Riders can't get here in time. The train's due the very time the funeral's to start, but that train's always late, though they say the ingine-driver IS an Orangeman 1 And the funeral will start at the time fixed, or I don't know the boys that belong to the lodge. So It s up to We, Us \u0026 Co. to see the thing through, or go Dust. It don't suit me. It wouldn't have been like this, iMt hadn t been for what happened to the Chief last night. There s no holding the boys in. One thing's sure, the l^ipsy that give Ingolby away has got to lie low if he hasn t got away, or there'll be one less of his tribe to eat the juicy hedgehog. Yes, sir-ee !\" To the last words of Jowett the Ry seemed to pay no attention, though his lips shut tight and a menacing look came into his eyes. They were now upon the bridge, and could see what was forward on both sides of the Sagalac. There was unusual bustle and activity in the streets and on the nver-bank of both towns. It was noticeable also that though the mills were running in Manitou, there were fewer chimneys smoking, and far more men in the streets than usual. Tied up to the Manitou shore were a half-dozen cnbs or rafts of timber which should be floatine •astward down the Sagalac. \" If the Monseenoor can't, or don't, step in, we're bound for a shindy over a corpse,\" continued Jowett after a moment. \" Can the Monseigneur cast a spell over them all ?\" remarked the Ry ironically, for he had little faith in priests, though he had for this particular one great respect. Hes a big man, that preelate,\" answered Jowett quickly and forcibly. \" He kept the Crees quiet when they was going to rise. If they'd got up, there'd have been hundreds of settlers massacreed. He risked his",
         "Ufe THE MAYOR FILLS AN OFFICE 223 to do that-went right into the camp in face o( levelled 2^1 ^if.T l^T \"\"\"^ **«\"\" *° **\"'• A minute after- ^?^ t^/ •'\" *** 'I\"*\"'\"!:, too. Then the tussle bepin between a man with a soul and a heathen gang th^frhfi, ''*!*\"• '^'^ \"*\" **'\u003c='\" °' *°\u003c\u003ed through ftf« h \"* ^*\"\"''' J\"'* '° »''°* ♦»\u003e»' they're heathens. But he won out, this Jesueete friend o' man. Thafs why I m pnttmg my horses and my land and my pants and my sh.rt and the bufl that's underneath on the little fiH^n''\"*'..^™'''* '\"'='' ^'\"^ \"°* '\"'^'\u003c=''*« the same con- ;n„l^\" K \"/°* *\" '\"«\" °^ ™\"\"='«»: *»•« priest is not enough,\" he said sceptically. By twos, by threes, by tens, men from Manitou came satmtenng across the bridge into Lebanon, until a goodly number were scattered at different points through the town. They seemed to distribute themselves by a pre- conceived plan and they were all habitats. There we^ amonrihem VT' ^\"'''''■, ^onvegians. or Germans among them. They were low-browed, sturdy men arZ^ti\"\"'\"/ \"\"' '*\"'«^ ^''*^'' «\"\"« -ith^aThes in iT^ ^'l \"^'T- '\"'\"' ^^'^ •\"•\"\"8\" '» ^^^\" «»\", some rivS^tr Mo \"\"\"\" \"^'^l^' ''**^ ''P''*^ ^'^ °\u003c the nver-dnver. None appeared to carry any weapon that would shoot, yet in their belts was the sheath-S thi mvanable equipment of their class. It would have seemed more suspicious if they had not carried them nt railwaymen miners, carters, miU-hands, however, appeared to cany nothing save their strong arms and hairy'^han,^: m« ^I^ ''\" M *\" ^'^ *\" '\"''\"^^- These backwoods, men also could, without weapons, turn a town into a Teeth tore oft an ear or sliced away a nose, hands smote",
         ".iMii 224 THE WORLD FOR SALE like hammers or gouged out eyes, and their nailed boots were weapons of as savage a kind as could be invented. They could spring and strike an opponent with one foot in the chest or in the face, and spoil the face for many a day, or for ev;r. It was a gift of the backwoods and the lumber-camps, practised in hours of stark monotony when the devils which haunt places of isolation devoid of family life, where men herd together like dogs in a kennel, break loose. There the man that dips his fingers \" friendly-like \" in the dish of his neighbour one minute wants the eye of that neighbour the next : not so much in innate or momentary hatred, as in innate savagery and the primeval sense of combat, the war which was in the blood of the first man. The unarmed appearance of these men did not deceive the pioneer folk of Lebanon. To them the time had come when the reactionary forces of Manitou must receive a check. Even those who thought the funeral fanatical and provocative were ready to defend it. The person who liked the whole business least was Rockwell. He was subject to the same weariness of the flesh and fatigue of the spirit as all men ; yet it was expected of him that at any hour he should be at the disposal of suffering humanity — of criminal or idiotic humanity — patient, devoted, calm, nerve-strung, complete. He was the one person in the community who was the universal necessity, and yet for whom the community had no mercy in its troubles or out of them. There were three doctors in Lebanon, but none was an institution, none had prestige save Rockwell, and he often wished that he had less prestige, since he cared nothing for popularity. He had made his preparations for possible \" accidents \" in no happy mood. Fresh from the bedside of Ingolby, having had no sleep, and with many sick people on his list, he inwardly damned the foolishness of both towns. He even sharply rebuked the Mayor, who urged",
         "surgical THE MAYOR FILLS AN OFFICE 226 E^m'r f^\" J^\"\"' ^°' \"°* «'°'^\"8 «\u003eo\"«' to the prevent the procession. G^n^Dnlf ?' T ^°'°« ^ ^''^^ J\"**^* *PP«=^'^ ^tl\u003e uapnel Druse to interview the Mayor. fan^rli\" \"if l'*'''\" \"'^'^ J°^^\"- \"In mother hour the Wal will start There's a lot of Manitou huskies in Lebanon now and their feet is load^, if their guns ain't. ^IdL^T^^^ '^\"\"^'' ^\"1 by-and-bye, whlTtheyVe S^ttt ^ J'\"'\"''\"^^'''' *^^^«'\" he a marching column anl h^.=,^T/r*°\"; ^''' \"\" \"'^\"S^'l to '°*1'« trouble we ve had between the towns, and it'll be nasty. If the predate doesn't dope them, there'll be pertiWer heU to pay. L^J^Ta^T ?^ '/\"\"y °* ^^ ^='t to Monseigneur Lourde. and the details of what was going forward in OsZl?/S f '\\^' ''\"'' '^'^- Al^ the ubiqi^to,^ h^dfd tl jt:;? ''^^\" ''\"^- '^'^ '^^ \"^^'^^ ^' i-t been •• There's one thing ought to be done and has got to be done Jowett added, \" if the Monseenoor don't pull it off The leaders have to be arrested, and it had better be orMatou- ■'^'- ^° ' ^^- '^\"\"'^ '^'-« *° '^^^^^ ^h-- ^e Mayor shook his head. \" I don't see how I can in SiTclse^^ arrest-not till he breaks the Iat° ''It's against the law to conspire to break the law \" replied Jowett. \" You've been making a lot of s^^ a hSidS' '' ^' \"^ ^^^^ ^ \"^* *° take The giant Ry had stood apart, watchful and ruminant ri ! 7u T^^ '°\"^^'^' ^ the Mayor turned to him' and stretched out a",
         "hand. 226 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" I am for peace,\" the old man said. \" To keep the peace the law must be strong.\" In spite of the gravity of the situation the Mayor smiled. \" You wouldn't need much disguise to stand for the law, Mr. Druse,\" he remarked. \" When the law is seven feet high, it stands well up.\" The Ry did not smile. \" Hake me the head of the constables, and I will keep the peace,\" he said. There was a sudden silence. The proposal had come so quietly, and it was so startling, that even the calm Rockwell was taken aback. But his eye and the eye of the Mayor met, and the look in both their faces was the same. \" That's bold play,\" the Mayor said, \" but I guess it goes. Yesterday it couldn't be done. To-day it can. The Chief Constable's down with smallpox. Got it from an Injun prisoner days ago. He's been bad for three days, but hung on. Now he's down, and there's no Chief. I was going to act myself, but the trouble was, if anything happened to me, there'd be no head of anjrthing. It's better to have two strings to your bow. It's a go — ^it's a straight go, Mr. Druse. Seven foot of Chief Constable ought to have its weight with the roughnecks.\" A look of hopefulness came into his face. This sage, huge, commanding figure would have a good moral effect on the rude elements of disorder. \" I'll have you read the Riot Act instead of doing it myself,\" added the Mayor. \" It'll be a good introduction for you, and as you live in Manitou, it'll be a knock-out blow to the tou{^. Sometimes one man is as good as a hundred. Come on to the Court-house with me,\" he continued cheerfully. \"We'll fix the whole thing. All the special constables are waiting there with the regular police. ^ extra foot on a captain's shoulders is as good as a battery of guni.\" \" You're sure it's according to Hoyle ?\" asked Jowett",
         "quizzically. THE MAYOR FILLS AN OFFICE 227 He was so delighted that he felt he must \"make the Mayor show off self,\" as he put it aftenvaids. ^Td not m«\u003c^culate; the Mayor rose to his challenge, if ni.T. 1: ^^i^^'^^' he said, ■' and I can go it alone t^^-^J't\"}^' '°*\"'^ '\" ^^'' '^^ *!\u003e« '^^'^ being t^lfv l ^r * '\"'**'\"8 °* ^^'\u003e CouncU and I've go? the saihngorders I want. I'm boss of the place, Jd Mr Druse is my-\" he stopped, because there w«aTook in \"L.d'^S^ Dn\"\"*- ^^ ::!\"* ^\"^'\"' co-^ideration- And Mr. Druse is law-boss,\" he added The old ineradicable look of command shone in the ^es of Gabnel Druse. Leadership was written ai over ^ L^^ 1^ ^^^ •\" \"^^'y \"«\u003e\"°\"- The square, un- bowed shouldersthe heavily lined face, with the Jatria^cral Sm K^^'•^'''\"'^' '^^ ^'^gh-hewn limbs, the eye of bnght, brooding force proclaimed authority .mm'' T.t^^ T\"\"\"\"^ *''*'\"'' \u003c=*'\"« *\"t° the face of the old Nomad the look it had not worn for many a day. The self-esled iiiler had paid a heavy price for L daighter's ^w, though he had never acknoWdged it to ^se f His self-ordained impotency, in a camp that was never Wl wth the mormng; where his feet trod the same road-way day after day; where no man asked for j^ti^ or sought his counsel or fell back on his protection; ^ere he drank from the same spring and tethered his ho^7^ had «?* P»\u003cidock from mom to mom: all these things himseS!'\" \"^^ ^^\"^ ^' 'P^* ^ ^P\"« ^f He was not now of the Romany worid, and he was not of the Gorgio world; but here at last was the ofd thing come back to him in a new way, and his bones Zn ;h\"r *\"\"'•' '°\"*^' ^^ •^*'^*«^ t° her X among the Gorgios. Perhaps also it would be riven him^rn the name of the law, to deal with a num",
         "he 228 THE WORLD FOR SALE •• We've got Mister Marchand now,\" said Towett softly to the old chieftain. The Ry's eyes lighted and his jaw set. He did not speak, but his hands clenched, opened and clenched again. Jowett saw and grinned. \" The Mayor and the law-boss'll win out, I guess \" he said to himself.",
         "' CHAPTER XVII THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD OrLJeLe^\"\"!^\" '\" ^\"r\" °\" *he day of the hi fo the fi^rr *^^ °* ^' *°'^\"\"'^^' Wt him so hard. ^Dnii th^fl^ V\"'' \"\"•* •\"= '^•=^'\"« ^ barber, his razor ^Mb nnn!^.^ K ^^^\" P*^*\u003c^ self-control 4h a not be reguiated. 'vith a face covered by lather and two fnto^'n^H *\"* diplomacy, Bei.y corkscrewed his way into confidence, and when he dipped a white cloth in bay-rum ^nd eau-de^ologne, and ^ it over thetS of A^Vrti!/=,«^u 1 ^'^* \"\"°*''*\" *° J''™''\" individuality. An artist after his kind, he no sooner got what he wanted than he carefully coaxed his victim alayfrom",
         "thZte 280 THE WORLD FOR SALE cut with a collar on. When his customers had corns, oft came the boots also, and then Berry's triumph over the white man was complete. To call attention to an exag-gerated bunion when the odorous towel lay upon the hidden features of what once was a \" human,\" was the last act in the drama of the Unmaking of Man. Only when the client had felt in his pocket for the price of the flaying, and laid it, with a ten-cent fee, on the ledge beneath the mirror, where all the implements of the inquisition and the restoration were assembled, did he feel manhood restored. If, however, he tried to keep a vow of silence in the chair of execution, he paid a heavy price; for Berry had his own methods of punishment. A little tighter grasp of the nose; a little rougher scrape of the razor, and some sharp, stinging liquid suddenly slapped with a cold palm on the excoriated spot, with the devilish hs^pocrisy of healing it ; a longer smothering-period under the towel, when the comers of it were tucked behind the ears and a crease of it in the mouth — all these soon induced vocal expression again, and Berry started on his inquisi-tion with gentle certainty. When at last he dusted the face with a little fine flour of oatmeal, \" to heal the cuticle and ' manoor ' the roots,\" and smelled with content the hands which had embalmed the hair in verbena-scented oil, a man left his presence feeling that he was ready for the wrath to come. Such was Berry when he had under his razor one of Ingolby's business foes of Manitou, who had of late been in touch with Felix Marchand. Both were working for the same end, but with difierent intentions. Marchand worked with that inherent devilishness which sometimes takes possession of low minds; but the other worked as he would have done against his own brother, for his own business success ; and it was his view that one man could only succeed by taking the place of another, as though the Age of Expansion had ceased and the Age of Smother had",
         "begun. THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD 231 From this client while in a state of abject subjection, Beny, whose heart was hard that day, but whose diplo-macy was impeccable, discovered a thing of moment. There was to be a procession of strikers from two factories in Manitou, who would throw down their tools or leave their machines at a certain moment. Falling into line these stnkere would march across the bridge between the towns at such time as would bring them into touch with the hne of the Orange funeral— two processions meeting at right angles. If neither procession gave way, the Orange funeral could be broken up, ostensibly not from religious fanaticism, but from the \" unhappy accident \" of two straight lines colliding. It was a juicy plot ; and in a few minutes the Mayor and Gabriel Druse knew of it from the faithful Beiry. The bell of the meeting-house began to toll as the Orange-man whose death had caused such commotion was carried to the waiting carriage where he would ride alone. Almost ^ultaneously with the starting of the gaudy yet sombre Orange cortege, with its yeUow scarfs, glaring banners, charcoal plumes and black clothes, the labour procession approached the Manitou end of the Sagalac bridge. The strikers carried only three or four banners, but they had a band of seven pieces, with a drum and a pair of cymbals. With frequent discord, but with much spirit, the Bleaters as these musicians were caUed in Lebanon, inspired the steps of the Mamtou fanatics and toughs. As they came upon the bridge they were playing a gross paraphrase of The Marseillaise. At the head of the Orange procession was a silver-comet band which the enterprise of Lebanon had made possible. Its leader was a ne'er-do-well young Welshman, who had been dismissed from leader-ship after leadership of bands in the East till at last he had dnfted into Lebanon. Here, strange to say, he had never been drunk but once; and that was the night",
         "before 28S THE WORLD FOR SALE S. ^f seven per cent., and who knew how to handle tL^I^I' °1 *^« ^\"y °* ^«- When she married iTr.it^^u-^\"' ^\"^^ '\"\"'«^'^' ^ -^\"k °\" an average then he died and had as fine a funeral as a judge. There AhZat\" \":^ ,*^m!* ** ^- T°\"\u003e was in the bosom of Abraham, and Wilham Jones, who was never called any- t^IZ^n* '\"^*'*'°\"' *° \"\"\"^ ''t ^: but he smoked twenty-cent agars at the ex-widow's expense. ^To-day WiUy Welsh played with heart and courage, Jj*(fO\"'eHome to Glory, •' at the head of the Orange £te«. k / y^\",\"-\"!\"! fear the onset of faction nS^ elt f rv'' *\" '^\"^ \"\"*'^** °* '^^ South Seas will fall^ !^ f .Chmaman, so a Western man will never Smbl.? ho\"\"-.^,\"**\"\"!' \"^e^'t^tes, sheriffs, police, gamblers horse-stealers, bankers, and broncho-riders aU ie unnatural deaths at times, but a musician in the West V^^ ^T \"\" \"\"\"P* '^' \"^^ °* ^''*«- Not one can t« spai^. Even a tough convicted of cheating at cards, or breatang a boom on a river, has escaped punishn^t because he played the concertina. P«msnment The discord and jangle between the two bands was the first coUision of this fateful day. While yet there was a space between the two processions, the J^ds broke \"to ,^:,\"t ~\"*^*- I* ^^ then that, through the long funeral Ime men v,ith hard-set faces came doser up to^ gether and forty, detaching themselves from the weU kert run of marching Jodgemen, closed up around thThoS and the hearse, making a solid flanking force. a1 S mtervals also, outside the lodgemen in the lines were speaal constables, many of whom had b^n he",
         "st^^ THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD 233 driven, hunters, cattlemen, prospectors, and pioneers of the eariy days. Most of them had come of good religious stock ^^J^VJ'^T: .?*P*''*'- Methodists, Unitarians; and l^^^.t^,^^^ \"*\"* P***y' *\"d ^ °«^« bee\" able to tw •• cf '*iT\"* r^**\"\"' ^^ babits of their chUdhood, they Stood for the Thing the Old Folks stand for.\" tliey were m a mood which would tear cotton, as the tw\"Lr'' ^.'^^'' T \"°* \"\"^ °' 'bem but expected that broken heads and bloodshed would be the order of the^day, and they were stonily, fearlessly prepared for the Since the appearance of Gabriel Druse on the scene, mifK\"^/\"'^ f°*\" *^** ^^^ '«'='' ^0\"ld be with them. When he started at the head of the cortege, they could scarce forbear to cheer. Such a champion in appearance had never been seen i,. the West, and, the nighibefore, he had proved his nght to the title by shakinra knot of toughs mto spots of disconcerted humanity As they approached the crossroads of the bridge, his thTnrV'i «\"«\"-°'^' «\"J\u003ci be heard commanding the Orange band to cease playing. th^*^ *^\\u'\"'l °* *^^ '\"\"\"^ procession was opposite the bndge-the band, the hearse, the bodyguardTthe ^^T~:^''^!i:'\\^^'^ ^*°^ \"'''e, and took hit place at the point where the Imesof the two processions would intersect. It was at this moment that the coUision came. There c«l^^ l^\"\"^ ''^y ^^* °* ^P^'^^ between the two pro-cessions, when a voice rang out in a challenge so offensive, ITTl^r, *^,r=*^^es- Every Orangeman of the Lodge of Lebanon afterwards denied that he had raised the c^- and the chances are that every one spoke the truth. It rnd^f/'''1^K''^^\"''*°\"'^\"S«f°^J^t^'»\u003c=banei^sode and ^ throw the burden of responsibility on the Orangemen To heU with the Pope ! To hell with the Pope !\" the voice rang out, and it had hardly ceased before the Manitou",
         "'I 234 THE WORLD FOR SALE procession made a rush forward. The apparent leader of the Manitou roughs was a Wack-bearded man of middle height, who spoke raucously to the crowd behind him. Suddenly a powerful voice rang out. \" Halt, in the namt of th* Queen /\" it called. Surprise is the very essence of successful war. The roughs of Manitou had not looked for this. They had foreseen the appearance of the official Chief Constable of Lebanon; they had expected his challenge and warning in the vernacular; but here was something which struck them with consternation— first, the giant of Manitou m the post of command, looking like some berserker; and then the formal reading of that stately document in the name of the Queen. Far back in the minds of every French habitant present was the old monarchical sense. He makes, at worst, a poor anarchist, though he is a good revolutionist; and the French colonials had never been divorced from monarchical France. In the eyes of the most forward of those on the Sagalac bridge, there was a sudden wonderment and confusion. To the dramatic French mind, ceremonial is ever welcome; and for a moment it had them in its grip, as old Gabriel Druse read out in his ringing voice, the trenchant royal summons. It was a strange and dramatic scene— the Orange funeral standing stiD, garish yet solemn, with hundreds of men, rough and coarse, quiet and refined, dissolute and careless, sober and puritanic, broad and tolerant, sharp and fanatical ; the ibour procession, polyglot in appearance, but with Gallic features and looseness of dress predominating; excitable, brutish, generous, cruel; without intellect, but with an intelligence which in the lowest was acute, and with temperaments responsive to drama. As Druse read, his eyes now and then flashed, at first he knew not why, to the slim, bearded figure of the",
         "ap- THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD S8S parent leader. At length he caught the feverish eye of the man, and held it for a moment. It was familiar, but it eluded him; he could not place it. He heard, however, Jowett's voice say to him, scarce above a whisper: \" It's Felix Marchand, boss I\" Jowett also had been puzzled at first by the bearded figure, but it suddenly flashed upon him that the beard and wig were a disguise, that Marchand had resorted to Ingolby's device. It might prove as dangerous a stratagem with him as it had to Ingolby. There was a moment's hesitation after Druse had finished reading— as though the men of Manitou had not quite recovered from their surprise— then the man with the black beard said something to those nearest him. There was a start forward, and someone cried, \" Down with the Orangemen— d bas I'Orangi I\" Like a well-disciplined battalion the Orangemen rolled up quickly into a compact mass, showing that they had planned their defence well, and the moment was black with danger, when, suddenly. Druse strode forward. Flinging right and left two or three river-drivers, he caught the man with the black beard, snatched him out from among the oncoming crowd, and tore ofi the black beard and wig. Felix Marchand stood exposed. A cry of fury rang out from the Orangemen behind, and a dozen men rushed forward, but Gabriel Druse acted with the instant decision of a real commander. Seeing that it would be a mistake to arrest Marchand at that moment, he raised the struggling figure of the wrecker above his head and, with Herculean effort, threw him up over the heads of the Frenchmen in front of him. So extraordinary was the sight thct, as if fascinated, the crowd before and behind followed the action with staring eyes and tense bodies. The faces of all the contending forces were as concentrated for the instant, as though the sun were falling out of the sky. It was",
         "so SM THE WORLD FOR SALE ttU, instead of trying to catch him, broke awav from beneath the bundle of faUing humaj^ity, a^d MwchZ IS X^'oftlr ■\"\"* °' \"•• ^''«- «\"•\u003e ^ ^-^s holding them were lost in th^eieT \"\"\" Hme had only been gained, however Th-r- . . ™«,. ., uyjj, ,1,., ,i! i™,iir:r;„'^'',^,e: I)™»«,41 M fv. 1„ .Mk. ta.y 1*„ to ,to™ an almost unearthly fire U^J^l i, ^ }\" ^^^^ *^ Lourde. ^'\"^ \"\"^e- \" was the beloved Monseigneur Last St,*^^^°\"' ^ '^SS^'^ y°« *° prfservethe peace o^riy^LLtr' rs\u003eo'L^r;rT.*°/^^ \"p y°- ^- duty;UT\"oice^fa 3 sU'nIo'r 7 T\"\" aeo I carrioH \u002bK\u003c. .1 ^^ , spoKen to me. An hour UbaioH^J Sve trScf As'fL\"°T ''^^^ '\" bell rang out. a^d tt ^eTme, tLtL 'L'ttZ''' had spoken, that peace would b;",
         "slaS.lSd'Ss^re^^! THE MONSEIGNEUR AND THE NOMAD 287 wlted by all of you-by all of you, Catholic and Protestant. God 8 voice bade me come to you from the bed of one who hM gone hence from peace to Peace. In the name of thnst, peace, I say ! Peace, in the name of Christ I\" He raised the sacred vessel high above his head, so that hjs eyes looked through the walls of his «pUfted armi. Kneel !\" he called in a dear, ringing voice which yet quavered with age. There was an instant's hush, and then great number* of the crowd in front of him, toughs and wreckers, blasphemers turbulent ones and evil-livers, yet Catholics ail, with the anaent root of the Great Thing in them, sank down; and the banners of the labour societies drooped before the symbol of peace won by sacrifice. Even the Orangemen bared their heads in the presence of that Popery which was anathema to them, which they existed to combat, and had been taught to hate. Some, no doubt, would rather have fought than have had peace at the price; but they could not free their minds from the sacred force which had brought most of the crowd of faction-fighters to their knees. With a wave of the hand, Gabriel Druse ordered the cortige forward, and silently the procession with its yellow banners and its sable, drooping plumes moved on. Once on its way again, Willy Welsh and his silver-comet band struck up the hymn, \" Lead Kindly Light.\" It was the one real coincidence of the day that this moving hymn was written by a cardinal of the Catholic Church. It was also an irony that, as the crowd of sullen Frenchmen turned back to Manitou, the train beanng the Mounted PoUce, for whom the Mayor had sent to the capital, steamed noisily in, and redcoats showed at its windows and on the stej-s of the cars. The only casualty that the day saw was the broken arm and badly bruised body of Felix Marchand, who was gloomily helped back to his home across the",
         "Sagalac. CHAPTER XVIII raE BEACONS glimmer of a ^ml£VtJ^^ *^ *'*'' '\"\"^\"8 one light glowed soKk^st;^ Tekewam preservation made and chased safetv^,„tl!f- .^^ ^^ ^\"^ \" ^\"•'y- monarch. ^ *''* doorway of a 2~. even as Gahriel'Zi^^rrLf.'SleS so.'th^to'^Ltr a£ro7i\" ttt^n'\" ■\"\"\"\" his confidence and told his story It camrto ^ ^'^'' time, when the blood of th^ vm,„= k ^ \"* ^P\"\"6- and the ancient s^ l^'lS S^reTa/'\"^!! ♦k. ■ **'\"^ enemies m battle- had \u003c.i»^ the comely women of their foes and mad^'tfctlTi, \"^ own. No thrill of the hunter's trail C'Uw^t^i::",
         "388 THE BEACONS 239 overflow of \u003cfcsire. In the days of rising sap, there were only the young maidens or wives of their own tribe to pmue, and it lacked in glory. Also in the springtime. Tekewam himself had his own trials, for in his blood the kI\"^ °.°!v \"\"^- ^ ^'^ *'\"\"«'l towards the prairie North and the mountain West where yet remained the hunter s quarry ; and he longed to be away with rifle and pm, with his squaw and the papooses traiUng after like camp.foUowers, to eat the fruits of victory. But that could not be; he must remain in the place the Great White Mother had reserved for him; he and his braves must assemble, and draw their rations at the appointed times and seasons, and grunt thanks to those who ruled over It was on one of these virginal days, when there was a restless stimng among the young bucks, who smelled the wide waters, the pines and the wild shrubs; who heard the CTy of the loon on the lonely lake and the whir of the wUd ducks wings, who answered to the phantom cry of ^n!!, ♦r'^u'* ^ °° '\"•* ^ •^'^y th'^t tJ^e two chiefs opened their hearts to each other. Near to the boscage on a little hill overlooking the great nver, Gabnel Druse had come upon Tekewani seated in the pme-dust, rocking to and fro, and chanting a low sorrowful refrain, with eyes fixed on the setting sun. And the Ry of Rys understood, with the understanding which only those have who live close to the earth, and also near to the heavens of their own gods. He sat down beside the forlorn chief, and in the silence their souls spoke to each other. There swept into the veins of the Romany ruler somethmg of the immitigable sadness of the Indian Chief; and, with a sudden premonition that he also was oome to the sunset of his life, his big nomad eyes sought the WMtenag rim of the heavens, and his breast heaved In that hour the two men declared themselves to each other, and Gabriel Druse told Tekewani all that he",
         "had 240 THE WORLD FOR SALE h^ KnH^ ^^ P*^P'* °' *^^ Sagalac, and was answered w kind. It seemed to them that they were as brothers W,?^' r '^t *^° ^'^ ^\"^ '° '^'^^ 1°\"8 gone; and ^rtir Zr *° ?.'^ ^\"^ disappear once more, begin- ning stUl another trail in an endless reincarnation. l,ri/\"'?f''^ \"^^ Tekewani, \"it was while thei« was a bridge of land between the continents at the North that we met. Again I see it. I forgot it, but again I see. ^ere was war, and you went upon one path and I upon another, and we met no more under all the moons till now.\" Rv ^'^ \"*\" M r^ *\"•* ^* \"''*='' ^ \"\"«'\" answered the fi!l «■ ^J- . ^^ \"\"\"^ '\"°''« *« will follow after the iti^:^£?ntf r„iS •• \" ^'^ \"^^ '\"\"^ '\"^ \"\"^^ bu?srtiy\"h?:Ji° ^\"^ \"- ^«^\"' -\"^^\"8 *° '^-w. o \"^t *v*i''f\" **'^ ''^\"'^ °* ^^°^ «'lio have driven away the bufialo, the deer, and the beaver; and the young bucks do naught to earn the joy of women. They are If^. \"^.^^^f\" °°* ^ ^^^ ^^-^-eoat that cLes «t .«f r *,^* ?'^*=^' °^ ^^*^' \"\" it '^'\"es upon her h ^*°c '^'. ■\" *\"'\"\"P^ \"^«^ her as she kAeels at r/nH ;*., t^- ^\"^ ^\"\"^ ^'^^ *« «at from the hand of the white man, and the white man leaves his own camp where his own women are, and prowls in our_ camps, so that not even our own women we left to It was then t^t Gabriel Druse leamed of the hatred of Tekewam for Fehx Marchand, because of what he had done m the r^rvation, prowling at night like a fox or a coyote m the folds. ■ ^-^u^*^ *•\"* •*\"'\"' helieving that the epoch of life in which they were and the fortunes of time which had been or were to come, were but turns of a wheel that stiU went on turning; and that whatever chanced of good or bad fortune m the one span of being, might be",
         "rep^red THE BEACONS ^i !.ri^°*'^'P^'°' *^'' \"''^' °^ *^^ \"o^rt; so, through their the hfe they now hved. Not by logic or the teachiiut of any schoolhadthey reached this revelation, but th^^ S r- ^\"^ *T \"°* ^\"^^\"^ '\"'\"l wonderiiTa^ timid; they were only sure. Their philosophy their rel^on, whether heathen or human, wL inborn Sy had comfort m it and in each other. ^ After that day Gabriel Druse always set a light in his mndow which burned all night, answering to th! lan?em! li^t at the door of Tekewani's home-the lights of exile and of an alliance which had behind it the secrffinflueres of past ages and vanished peoples. 'nnuences There came a night, however, when the light at the h^e^ wT\"'V'r'\"''\"°*''«™- AtsuSLthwS Si ' °\"^ ^^°\"' ™'^'6^* 't \"^ extinguished. I/)ok,ng out from the doorway of his home, (it was the night after the Orange funej). Gabriel Dr^se, rll^S^ from his new duties at Lebanon, saw no light in thS^ reservation. With anxiety, he set forth in thr^nf^ the moon to visit it. Arrived at the chiefs tepee, he saw that the lantern of tonour was gone and waking Tekewani, he br^t h^out to see. When the old Indian knew his lossX of dust from the ground, sprinkled it on his head. Then with arms outstretched he cursed the thief who ^ robS hini of what ha^ been to him like a never-fading mi^e an musion bhnding his eyes to the bitter facts of his^n^ MMitou had had one source; and now the malign spirit had stretched its hand to spoU those alreadySlS o all but the right to live. One name was uS^h^ o^^th men, as they stood in the moonlight b^^klwa^^",
         "18 242 THE WORLD FOR SALE '' There shaU be an end of this,\" growled the Romany. I wU have my own,\" said Tekewani, with malediction on the thief who had so shamed him. Black anger was in the heart of Gabriel Druse as he turned agam towards his own home, and he was glad of what he had done to Felix Marchand at the Oranee funeral.",
         "° CHAPTER XIX THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE \" Like the darkness ot the grave, which is darkness itseU— \" Most of tiiose who break out of the zaieba of life, who lay violent hands upon themselves, do so with a complete reasomng. whidii in itself is proof of their insanity It may be domestic tragedy, or ill-health, or crime, or broken taith, or shame, or insomnia, or betrayed trust— whatever It IS, many a one who suffers from such things, tries to end It all with that deUberation, that strategy, hid that cunning which belong only to the abnormal. A mind which has known a score or more of sleepless nights acquires an invincible clearness of its own, swine an end which is without peradventure. It finds a hundred perfect reasons for not going on, every one of which is in Itself sufficient; every one of which knits into the other mnety and nine with inevitable affinity. To the mind of Ingolby came a hundred such reasons for breaJnng out of hfe's enclosure, as the efiect of the opiate RockweU had given him wore ofi, and he regained con-sciousness As he did so, someone in the room was telling °! .^^^ \"'^f \"'\" °* ^^''\"^^ ^^™^ \"«i the Monseigneur at the Orange funeral, which had saved the situation. At first he hstened to what was said-it was the nurse talking to Jim Beadle-with no sharp perception of the significant of the story; though it slowly pierced the lethargy of his '*^'^t \" ^^^ \"\"^^ '° **\"* ^ *° ^'^ the watchers. _What time is it, Jim ?\" he asked heavily. They told him it was sunset.",
         "243 244 THE WORLD FOR SALE \"Is it quiet in both towns ?\" he asked after i They told him that it was. ' Any telegrams for me ?\" he asked. pause. There was an instant's hesitation, .^^y ^ ^ ^o say but Jim s mind had its own logic, and the truth seemed v^?w°T- \"* '^^^red that there were several wires, but that they \" didn't amount to nothin' \" Have they been opened ?\" Ingolby asked with a frown half-raising himself. It was hard to resign the old masterfulness and self-will. \" I'd like to see anybody open 'em 'thout my pe'mission,\" answered Jim unperiously. \"When you's adeep, Chief, I m awake; and I take care of you' things, same L ever I done. There ain t no wires been opened, and there ain't gom to be whiles I'm runnin* the show for you \" \"Open and read them to me,\" commanded Ingolby. Again Ingolby was conscious of hesitation on Jim?pait Already the acuteness of the blind was possessing to sharpening the senses left unimpaired. AlthonZ Tim mov«l. pr^umably, towards the place where the tXi^ms lay, Ingolby reahzed that his own authority was bring crossed by that of the doctor and the nurse '•You will leave the room for a moment, nurse,\" he said with a brassy vibration in the voice-* sign of nervous strain. With a smothered protest the nurse left, and Tim stood beside the bed with the telegrams. \" Be^m^k \"*\" *° \"*' ^''\"' ^°8olby' repeated irritably. They were not wdres which Ingolby should have heard at the time, when his wound was stiU inflamed, when he was still on the outer circle of that artificial sleep which the opiates had secured. They were from Montreal and New York, and, resolved from their half-hidden sug-gestion into bare elements, they meant that heaoeforOi others would do the work he had done. They",
         "meant THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE 245 hehSt;^!?*^*'* ^°' *•\"* ^\"'^ *~'« »' thousand dollars iSn^mh,??\"\".^''\"'\"'**'\"' *''«\"''\u003c'\u003c=»•»« West, backonthlnill '^\"'f ed «adi„g them. Ingolby sank oacK on the pillows and said quietly • and nil^*' ^'^K ^* *''\"\" '\" *h^ ^''''^^ of the table and I U answer them to-morrow. I want to get a little S.th ?^' r r*' ™ *,^\"''' ^\"-^ then W ^e iS o':l\"?^le!trtLe\" .' '\"^ ^'^^ '^\"- ^-'^ ^ •-\" be?*a^d^m'LT ^ ^K^/ *°*^^'^ *he table beside the bed, and J,m soft y pushed the beU under his fingeis. turb2 2l \"f I; ^' Z^^- \" ^°*' ^'\"\u003e \"°t to he dis-turbed unless the doctor comes. I'm all right and I is wnat I want. You understand, Jim ?\" My head's just as good to get at what you want as ever it was, and you goin' have what you wan\" T^^ wlule I'm on deck,\" was Jim's reply. ' ^ ' Jim put a glass of water into his hand. He drank verv slowly was indeed only mechanically conscious ?hat Z was dnnking, for his mind was far away the^S, th^'gKm' '\"\" '°^' J™ '''' ^*°°\u003c^ '^^'^ y,^^ *'\"'* ^°\" «°' '^ ^ *'\" y°'^' J'\" '\" ^\"8°% asked •• I'm \"^^^^^k'T^u\" *'\"''\"^ the bedclothes in carefully- I m goin , but, boss, I jes' want to say dat dis tWne jS^w^l^S r'°'\" \"^ ^^^^'\u003e'\"^' \"'^ i-' \"•''^ -hat Ingolby did not reply. He held out his hand, and black fingers shot over and took it. A moment late^ the bS man was alone in the room. The Hght of day vanished, and the stars came out ^ere ^ no moon, but it was one of those nights of the\" West when millions of stars glimmer in the Wue",
         "vaiSt 246 THE WORLD FOR SALE above, and every planet and every star and duster of stars are so near that it might almost seem they could be caught by an expert human hand. The air was very still Md a mantle of peace was spread over the tender scene! The wmdow and the glass doors that gave from Ingolby's room upon the veranda on the south side of the house Vn!! ,!,?^?: *°5u *•\" *^.''\" \"*\"\" »* *\" Midsummer! Now and then the note of a night-bird broke the stillness but nothing more. It was such a night as Ingolby loved ; it was such a night as often found him out in the restful gloom of the treTs thinlong aad brooding, planning, revelling in memories' of books he had read, and in dreaming of books he SS .r^l\" *^V ''^'^ **•\"•■ Such a night insu- lated the dwk moods which possessed him occasionally ^awt as effectively as fishing did; and that was sayi4 But the darkest mood of all his days was upon him now. When RockweU came, soon after Jim and the nurse left lum, he simulated sleep, for he had no mind to talk; and the doctor, deceived by his even breathing, had left contented. At last he was whoUy alone with his owii thou^its, as he desired. From the moment Jim had twd him the wires, which were the real revelation of the Mtuation to which he had come, he had been travelling hard on the road leading to a cui-de-sac. from which there was no e^s save by breaking through the wall. Never It might have seemed, hid his mind been dearer but it was a deamess belonging to the abnormal. It was a strai^t Bne of thought whidi, in its intensity, gathered all other thoughts into its wake, reduced them to the control of an obsession. It was borne in on his mind that his day J«w uone, that nothing could right the disorder which had strewn his path with broken hopes and shattered ambitions. No Ufe-work left, no sdH.iS to accomS no construction to adiieve, no wealth to gain, no",
         "public THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE 247 good to be won, no home to be his, no woman, his very own, to be his counsellor and guide in the natural way ! As myriad thoughts drove through his brain on thi» Indian-summer night, they all merged into the one obses-sion that he could no longer stay. The irresistible logic of the brain stretched to an abnormal tenuity, and an mtolerable brightness was with him. He was in the throes of that intense visnaliiation which comes with insomnia, when one is awake yet apart from the waking world, where nothing is reaUy real and nothing normal. He had a call to go hence, and be must go. Minute after minute passed, hours passed, and the fight of the soul to maintain itself against the disordered mind went on. All his past seemed but part of a desert, lonely and barren and strange. In the previous year he had made a journey to Arizona with Jowett, to see some raUway construction there, and at a ranch he had visited he came upon some verses which had haunted his mind ever since. They fastened upon his senses now. They were like a lonesome monotone which at length gave calm to his torturing reflections. In his darkness the verses kept repeating themselves : \" ' ^iS?\"* **\" desert calling, and my heart stood stiU— There was Winter in my world and in my heart- A breath came from the mesa and a message stirred my wiU And my soul and I arose up fe depart/^ I heard the desert calling; and I knew that over there In an oUve-sheltered garden where the mesquite btows Was a woman of the sunrise, with the starve in her hair And a beauty that the almond-blossom blows. ^\"■^ night-time when the ghost-trees gUmmered in the moos Where the mesa by the watercourse was spanned Her loveliness enwrapped me like the blessedness of June And all my hfe was thrilling in her hand. I hear the desert calling, and my heart stands still- There is Summer in my world and in my heart- ' A breath comes from the mesa, and a will beyond' mv will Biuda my footsteps as I rise up to",
         "depart.\" S48 THE WORLD FOR SALE ohve^ves, of the ghost-trees and the moon, kept playing upon his own heated senses like the spray fit\u003em^ L\u003ehn| rt««m and at last it quieted him. ^e dark spirit of self-destruction loosened its hold. nn^n.''^\",''*,? ^^ '*'^'\"'^ ^y°\"^ the normal; almost nnsonsaously his fingers had fastened on the pistol in the drawer of the table by his bed. It had been^hwe since I. i* t''7^*\" ^*^^^ ^\"\"\"^^^ ^\"\"^ f'\"\"\" Alaska-loaded tn 1 B„ITk^ fi\" ^' had carried it down the southern d^ath ^l^^ fingers tightened on the little engine of Imh^fl k\" r\"^ 'T'\"* •\"\"^ '^\" \"\"Sing in his brain came the flash of a revelation : • ■ • . . . And a will beyond my will Had* my footsteps « I rise up tb depart.\" w.«Tvh'*'^\"''u\" '^ ' It ''^ as though Fleda's fingers I?Jh k\"T ^l\"\"^' *\" *''°\"8h she whispered in his ear and her breath swept his cheek; as thouri, she was there m the room beside him, making the dartoess light tempering the wind of chastisement to his naked soul' rSJ^.^r'S\"!^ **' ^^ nervous-system th'e illusion was SSH\" ^V^\"^^ ^^ heard her voice. TTie pis^ shpped from his fingers, and he fell back on the ^llow wrth a s,gh. The will beyoq^ his will bomid his footstei^ in ^r ^ '\" ' ^ ^\"'' \"\"^6\" ''^™n\u003c=e \u003c\u003e* Fl«^a m her bedroom with the Thing she thought was from beyond the bounds of her own Ufe; the v^ce *ha?sS ' ^^T 4 'f 1'\" ''^'^ ^ ^\"\"^\"^ ''^^•' '^'^n the corporea p^nce of Jethro Fawe in one case and of Fleda^e m the oth«!r. It may be that in very truth Fleda Druse's spmt with Its poignant soUcitude controlled his will as he rose up to depart.\" But if it was only an illusion, rt was not le« a miracle. Some powef of su^estion boukd his fleeing footsteps, drew him back from",
         "t^Brink THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE 249 ~t!?™!iT\\u°°!t*''* '\"*™' **\"« »\"«' ''^k««J « Wm and ItL^ 2T *\"'*/'^!'«» \"K^i\" to his own chamber. Tie JI^!^» f.,'\" u'\"' '^°°'' *''** °I*\"««» \"-^t '«»« the quiet f^T.^r^'l\"'^''\"; *•'•' ^**''' »^id« the bed ticW on. the fox-temer which always slept on a mat at the foot of the Sn itn /nT!f\"*' \"^^^^ ^' ■\"\"*\" ''^'\"hed heavily in a s eep fuU of dreams that hurried past like phantas- aTth:r^f; hundred t^ngs that hadVn ^K\", torte^L- ,\"\"''\" ^\"' °* P*°P'*' he had known, dis^ of fiHHi ^\"l '^'' tremendous. There were dreams ■n ,1'\" *.** ^\"^''' °' \"^^^^ writhing in passion ho^.r'\" *?.\"' '^r \"\"^ \"^ billiard-table Ind a luck? mWiJr °\" '^ Z^,- '^''^ *'« \u003c*'«\"'•\"= that tossed and Zt k\" T\" \"\"''''P\"\"' ^^'°\"= ''\"'I *hen at last came a river^ hU K .^* \"^ «\"*\" •'\"'^S'' °^\" » swift-flowing bLr^'dlf^ \"7 bndge over the Sagalac-of that bridge bemg destroyed by men who crept through the night with dynamite in their hands. \"\u003c= ragm witn With a hoarse, smothered cry he awoke His eves SS htlide^'n \"\"rl '^*'^^\"\"« '\"« ^ ^™ gainst his side. Only the terrier at his feet heard the tTthe'll.r\"''- '^\"'' \"\" '\"T'' '^ \"^ °^' \" ^\"P^ an?/ff \"\"^ \"' \"\"\"*\" «\"* °\"* °* hed, cross the room ?nd feel for a coat along the wall^n overcoat whicrh\" used as a dressmg-gown at times. Putting it on hastilv with outstretched hands Ingolby felt his w'ay to t' e g£ hl!^\"JP'T« °\" ^^^ ^^^\"\"''^- Th« d°g' ^^ thoufch tot? h^m know he was there, rubbed against his legs. Ingolby murmured a soft, unintelligible word, and, in Ws bare fej pas^ out on to the veranda, and from there to the garc^n and towards the gate at the front of the house. The nurse heard the gate click lightly, but she was only half-awake, and as all was quiet in the next room,",
         "The «• THE WORLD FOR SALE oompoMd henelf in her chair again with the vain idea that she was not sleeping. And Jim the faithftil one, a* though under a narcotic of fate, was snoring softly beside the vacant room. The streets were still. No lights burned anywhere so far as eye could see. But now and then, in the stillness through which the river flowed on, murmuring and rhythmic, there rose the distant sounds of disorderly voices. Ingolby was in a state which was neither sleep nor waking, which was in part delirium, in part oblivion to all things in the worid save one— an obsession so complete, that he moved automatically through the street in which he lived towards that which led to the bridge. His terrier, as though realizing exactly what he wished, seemed to guide him by rubbing against his legs, and even pressing hard against them when he was in any danger of losing the middle of the road, or swerving towards a ditch or some obstruction. Only once did they pass any human being, and that was when they came upon a camp of road-buUders, where a red light burned, and two men slept in the open by a dying fire. One of them raised his head when Ingolby passed, but being more than half -asleep, and seeing only a man and a dog, thought nothing of it, and dropped back again upon his rough pillow. He was a stranger to Lebanon, and there was little chance of his recognizing Ingolby in the semi-darkness. As they neared the river, Ingolby became deeply agitated . He moved with his hands outstretched. Had it not been for his dog he would probably have walked into the Sagalac; for though he seemed to have an instinct that was extra-natural, he swayed and staggered in the delirium driving him on. There was one dreadful moment when, having swerved from the road leading on to the bridge, he was within a foot of the river-bank. One step farther, and he would have plunged down thirty feet into the stream, to be swept to the Rapids",
         "below. THE KEEPER OF THE BRIDGE S61 But tor the fint time the terrier made a tound. He give a whining bark almost human in its meaning, and threw himself at the legs of his master, pushing him back-wards and over towards the road leading upon the bridge, as a collie guides sheep. Presently Ingolby felt the floor of the bridge under his feet ; and now he hastened on, with outstretched arms and her 1 bent forward, listening in-tently, the dog trottini; \u003e ^ij,,-, with what knowledge working in him Heaven lor. In^^. The roar cf the Rapi '■= .lut, v was . f norous accom-paniment to Ingolb, .viia houghn. .,ie thing only he felt, one thing o.-u, .i^-ard— tlje n)»n m Barbazon's Tavern saying that he bn. k». J.or\\v b. huwn up on the Saturday night; ai, I Uiis .ms '■;;itu'c'ay night— the night of the day following ih .t • \\h- On ige funeral. He had heard the criminal hirel)i;£; of Win 'iai hand say that it should be done at midnight, . :• ;nat tr,u explosive should be laid under that part of the bridge which joined the Mamtou bank of the Sagalac. As though in very truth he saw with his eyes, he stopped short not far from the point where the bridge joined the land, and stood still, listening. For several minutes he was motionless, intent as an animal waiting for its foe. At last his newly-sensitive ears heard footsteps approaching and low voices. The foot-steps came nearer, the voices, though so low, became more distinct. They were now not fifty feet away, but to the delirious Ingolby they were as near as death had been when his fingers closed on the pistol in his room. He took a step forward, and with passionate voice and arms outstretched, he cried : \"You shall not do it— by God, you shall not touch my bridge I I built it. You shall not touch it. Back you devils— back !\" The terrier barked loudly. The two men in the semi-darkness in front of him cowered at the sight of this weird figure holding the bridge they had come to destroy. His words, uttered in",
         "so «« THE WORLD FOR SAIE strange and unnatural a voice, shook their nerves. They shrank away from the ghostly form with the outstretched arms. In the minute's pause foUowing on his words, a giant figure suddenly appeared behind the dynamiters. It was the temporary Chief Constable of Lebanon, returning from his v^it to Tekewani. He had heard Ingolby's wild words, and he reahzed the situation. \" Ingolby-«teady there, Ingolby !\" hecalled. \" Steady I Steady! Gabriel Druse is here. It's all right.\" At the first sound of Druse's voice the two wreckers turned and ran. As they did so, Ingolby's hands feU to his side, and he staggered forward. and fcU*^*\"\"^**^'\" ^' '\"'=^\"^' *e\" swayed, trembled With wor^ that stuck in his throat Gabriel Druse stooped and hfted him up in his arms. At first he turned towards the bridge, as though to cross over to Lebanon, but the last word Ingolby had uttered rang in his ears and he earned him away mto the trees towards his own house, the faithful terrier following. Jl^^lT':^^''^\".'^''^ ^*« *« ^^^ o* one who had suddenly emerged from the obsession of delirium into sanity and then had fallen into as sudden unconsciousness. Fleda I Fleda !\" called Gabriel Druse outside the door of his house a quarter of an hour later, and her voice in reply was that of one who knew that the feet of Fate were at her",
         "threshold. CHAPTER XX TWO LIFE PIECES \" It's a fine day,\" \" Yes, it's beautiful.\" Fleda wanted to ask how he knew, but hesitated from feehngs of dehcacy. Ingolby seemed to miderstand. A t^J'^^'^f'' °* *•\"\" °^^ whimsical smile touched hishps :^? a ':;rk£im:r\"^ ''^ ^°^^^'''* \" *'°'^' \"•^^ ■« i'fS^^v\"\"** T^ f *' \"\"\"\"^ ^\"^•\" ^^ ^^ dreamUy. I feel things where I used to see them. How did I know oJ^ X \" ^^\\ ^^^^^ ^°°'^- When the doo^ opened there w^ only the hghtest breath of wind, and the air was fresh and crisp, and I could smeU the sun One sense less, more degree of power to the other senses' The sun warms the air, gives it a flavour, and between it and the Ught frost, which showed that it was d^ou^de I got the smeU of a fine Fall day. Also, I he^ the ct' of the wild fowl going South, and they wouldn't have made a sound if it hadn't been a fine day. And also, and likewise, ^d besides, and howsomever, I heard T.in singing, and that nigger never sings in bad weather. Jim's a air-weather raven, and this morning he was singing like a lav'rock in the glen.' \" * ^ Being bUnd, he could not see that, suddenly, a storm of emotion swept over her face. iwmoi ,ni^' **v \"J^^' ^^ ^y^^ simplicity, his indomitable spmt, which had survived so much, and must still fa™ so much, his almost childlike ways, and the nai^",
         "205 106 THE WORLD FOR SALE descnption of a blind man's perception, waked in her an almost intolerable yearning. It was not the yearning of a maid for a man. It was the uncontroUable woman in her, the mother-thing, belonging to the first woman that ever was— protection of the weak, hovering love for the suffering, the ministering spirit. Since Ingolby had been brought to the house in the pmes, Madame Bulteel and herself, with Jim, had nursed him through the Valley of the Shadow. They had nursed him through brain-fever, through agonies which could not have been borne with consciousness. The tempest of the mind and the pains of misfortune went on from hour to hour, from day to day, almost without ceasing, until at last, a shadow of his former self, but with a wonderful hght on his face which came from something within, he waited patiently for returning strength, propped up with pillows in the bed which had been Fleda's own, in the room outside which Jethro Fawe had sung his heathen serenade. It was the room of the house which, catching the morning sun, was best suited for an invahd. So she had given it to him with an eagerness behind which was the feeling that somehow it made him more of the inner circle of her own life; for apart from every other feeling she had, there was m her a deep spirit of comradeship belonging to far-off times when her life was that of the open road, the hiUside and the vale. In those days no man was a stranger- all belonged. ' To lueet, and greet, and pass was the hourly event, but the meeting and the greeting had in it the familiarity of a common wandering, the sympathy of the homeless. Had Ingolby been less to her than he was, there would still have been the comradeship which made her the great creature she was fast becoming. It was odd that, as Ingolby became thinner and thinner, and ever more wan, she, in spite of her ceaseless nursing, appeared to",
         "thrive TWO LIFE PIECES 267 physiciUly. She fiad even slightly increased the fulness aid W^- /^^^'''^^^\"\"'\"'^•^^eekshadpown™^:^ King aTd feelin\".rH\"^' ''' ^^\"\"^ \"\" ^^^''^ \"\"ves of D^nXl h. rf ?^ \"P*\"^** \"P ^tl^in her and had ex- panded her hfe hke some fine flower ;; What .s it ?■• Ingolby asked, with startled face. CbaX:th:?:air\"'^' \"\"°*\"\"«- ' p-^^^^ -y bro^gtt'St;f;itS;-- \u003e-* t^t would not have he;^t;k^'''.r^^«L7or'^ '^\"^r'»'»p'- a bad pain inside.\" '^ °^ ^\"\"^ ^'^ ^^' « ^ ^^^ tw:Srs'7e7Sherr'k:'^ ''\"\"''^^^ \"^*^^' *'^°'^'' With an effort she recovered herself \" It'\u003c! tJm„ *, UZ S'='\"..t '''\"^- ^\"'^ ^''^ busief herscH^rjviS It to him. As soon as you have taken it, I'm goinL for sleT;.-' \" '\"^ \"'\"* \"\"'^ \"P y°- niind'to ha'^li°e gri^tc/in^Srce^'\"\"^ '\" '' '-'^' \"^'^ - — «i ;; Madame Bulteel will stay with you,\" she replied ^^^^Do you need a walk so very badly ?\" he ^S pre- •' Mv iSlyjT IT\"^ \"' ''\"* ^ ^''\"* \"'\" ^he answered. My teet and the earth are very friendly.\" __ Where do you walk ?\" he asked. river slrr\"*''';^' \"\"' ^'' '^P'^- \" Sometimes up the nver, sometimes down, sometimes miles away in^S^",
         "17 S88 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" Do you never take a gun with you ?\" \" Of course,\" she answered, nodding, as though he could »ee. \" I get wild pigeons and sometimes a wild duck or a prairie-hen.\" \" That's right,\" he remarked; \" that's right.\" \" I don't believe in walking just for the sake of walking,\" she continued. \" It doesn't do you any good, but if you go for something and get it, that's what puts the mind and ;iie body right.\" Suddenly his face grew grave. \"Yes, that's it,\" he remarked. \" To go for something you want, a long way off. You don't feel the fag when you're thinking of the thing at the end ; but you've got to have the thing at the end, to keep making for it, or there's no good going — none at all. That's hfe; that's how it is. It's no good only walking— you've got to walk somewhere. It's no good simply going— you've got to go somewhere. You've got to fight for something. That's why, when they take the something you fight for away— when they break you and cripple you, and you can't go anywhere for what you want badly, life isn't worth Hving.\" An anxious look came into her face. This was the first time, since recovering consciousness, that he had referred, even indirectly, to all that had happened. She under-stood him well— ah, terribly well ! It was the tragedy of the man stopped in his com^o because of one mistake, though he had done ten thousand wise things. The power taken from his hands, the interrupted life, the dark future, the beginning again, if ever his sight came back: it was sickening, heartbreaking. She saw it all in his face, b ■\u002b as if some inward voice had spoken to him, his face cleared, the swift-moving hands clasped in front of him, and he said quietly: \" But because it's life, there it is. You have to take it as it comes.\" He stopped a moment, and in the pause she reached",
         "out TWO LIFE PIECES SM smjed^nd then he said : \" How wondlful you \"et Y^^ He checked himself, then added with a quizzical smile • You are looking very well to-day. Miss S Hnl d«ss_^wi„:.o,oilv' her a heTLZ\"\";' -t ^^''-d Madame Bulteel called it. '^CoSdt 2*1': aCX\"'\" voice^Tal^i^\"\" ^°\" '* \"\" '\"'-^\"^ ^■' ^^'^ -'^?^- M^^^iVriSTtildai^r:^^--- glee- guess r \"''''\"''■\" ^\"^^ ^°^\"«-'^- \"Was it really a \" Ah. but the guessiest kind of a ctipcc \" k. i- ^ But who can tell ? I couldn^ see it^but is th^'' ' reason why the mind shouldn't see when thV^ \"\"^ longer working ? Come now \" he aL^ ^?.^ *\"* \"° that I can te/things wTthTy mi dli?;^ i rLVS Con\"\"- . ' \" ^\"^^ *'\"'' time now-vlith my mi^d^s et^' Concentration came into his face \" Ifo th^^ '^' to twelve o'clock,\" he said decis^ely '^^ °\"'\"'*'^ Jhe^took up the watch which lay on the table beside derful you ar^ '' * ' marvelious-^how won- '■ So-wT^g ^i^^ ''-'' '' -*- -\u003c^",
         "-ner,\\rS: 260 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" You mean, since you came here ?\" she asked, divining what was in his mind. \"Exactly. How long?\" \" Six weeks,\" she answered. \" Six weeks and three days.\" \" Why don't you add the hour, too,\" he urged half- pV. ntively, though he smiled. ■ ' Well, it was three o'clock in the morning to the minute,\" sh» —ered. :d Father Time ought to make you his chief of staff,\" 1,-' remarked gaily. \" Now, I want to know,\" he added, with a visible efiort of determination, \" what has happened since three o'clock in the morning, six weeks and three days ago. I want you to tell me what has happened to my concerns — ^to the railwaj^, and also to the towns. I don't want you to hide anything, because, if you do, I'll have Jim in, and Jim, under proper control, will tell me the whole truth, and perhaps more than the truth. That's the way with Jim. When he gets started he can't stop. Tell me exactly everything.\" Anxiety drove the colour from her cheeks. She shrank back. \" You must tell me,\" he urged. \" I'd rather hear it from you than from Dr. Rockwell, or Jim, or your father. Your telling wouldn't hurt as much as anybody else's, if there has to be any hurt. Don't you uiiderjtand — but don't 3n)u understand ?\" he urged. She nodded to herself in the mirror on the wall opposite. \" I'll try to understand,\" she replied presently. \" Tell me, then: have they put someone in my place ?\" \" I understand so,\" she replied. He remained silent for a moment, his face very pale. \" Who is running the show ?\" he asked. She told him. \" Oh, him !\" he exclaimed. \" He's dead against my policy. He'll make a",
         "mess.\" TWO LIFE PIECES 2«1 \" They say he's doing that,\" she remarked. He asked her a series of questions which she tried to answer frankly, and he came to know that the trouble between the two towns, which, after the Orange funeral and his own disaster had subsided, was up again; that the rail-ways were in difficulties ; that there had been several failures in the town; that one of the banks— the Regent— had closed its doors; that FeUx Marchand, having recovered from the injury he had received from Gabriel Druse on the day of the Orange funeral, had gone East for a month and had returned; that the old trouble was reviving in ■L'iXB mills, and that Marchand had linked himself with the enemies of the group controUing the railways hitherto directed by himself. For a moment after she had answered his questions, there was strong emotion in his face, and then it cleared. He reached out a hand towards her. How eagerly she clasped it ! It was cold, and hers was so warm and firm and kind. \" True friend o' mine I\" he said with feeling. \" How wonderful it is that somehow it all doesn't seem to matter so much. I wonder why? I wonder— Tell me about yourself, about your Ufe,\" he added abruptly, as though it had been a question he had long wished to ask. In the tone was a quiet certainty suggesting that she would not hesitate to answer. ^^ \"We have both had big breaks in our lives,\" he went on. \" I know that. I've lost everything, in a way, by the break in my life, and I've an idea that you gained every-thing when the break in yours came. I didn't believe the story Jethro Fawe told me, but still I knew there was some truth in it ; something that he twisted to suit himself. I started life feeUng I could conquer the world like another Alexander or Napoleon. I don't know that it was all conceit. It was the wish to do, to see how far this thing on my shoulders \"—he touched his head— \" and",
         "this 262 THE WORLD FOR SALE peat physical machine \"-he touched his breast with a tftln hand— would carry me. I don't believe the main dea was yiaous. It was wanting to worlt a human brain to Its last volt of capacity, and to see what it could do. I s^ppose I became selfish as I foiled on. I didn't mean to be. but concentration upon the things I had to do pre-vented me from being the thing I ought to be. I wanted, as they say, to get there. I had a lot of irons in the fire- too many-but they weren't put there deliberately. One thmg led to another, and one thing, as it were, hung upon another, until they all got to be part of the scheme. Chice tuey got there, I had to carry them all on, I couldn't drop any of them ; they got to be my life. It didn't matter that It aU grew bigger and bigger, and the risks got greater and greater. I thought I could weather it through, and so I could have done, if it hadn't been for a mistake and an accident; but the mistake was mine. That's where the thmg nips— the mistake was mine. I took too big a risk. You see. I'd got so used to being lucky, it seemed as II I couldn t go wrong. Everything had come my way. Ever since I began in that Montreal railway office, after leaving college. I hadn't a single setback. I pulled things off. I made money, and I plumped it all into my raUways and the Regent Bank; and as you said a minute ago. the Regent Bank has closed down. That cuts me clean out of the game. What was the matter with the bank ? The manager ?\" His voice was almost monotonous in its quietness It was as though he told the story of something which had pasoeu leyond chance or change. As it unfolded to her underc:anding, she had seated herself near to his bed. The door of the room was open, and in view outside on the landing sat Madame Bulteel reading. She was not, how-ever, near enough to hear the conversation. Ingolby's voice was low, but it sounded as loud as a waterfall m the ears of the girl. who. in a few weeks,",
         "had TWO UFE PIECES 2es travelled great distances on the iom) called Experience, that other name for life. •' It was the manager ?\" he repeated. \"Yes, they say so,\" she answered. \" He speculated with bank money.\" \" In what ?\" \"^ In your railways.\" she answered hesitatingly. ' Curious— I dreamed that,\" Ingolby remarked quietly, and leaned down and stroked the dog lying at his feet. It had been with him through all his sickness. -It must have been part of my delirium, because, now that I ve got my senses back, it's as though someone had told me about it. Speculated in my railways, eh ? Chickens come home to roost, don't they ? I suppose I ought to be excited over it aU,\" he continued. \" I suppose I ought. But the fact is, you only have just the one long, big moment of excitement when great trouble and tragedy come, or else it's aU excitement, aU the time, and then you go mad. That's the test, I think. When you're struck by Fate, as a hideous war-machine might strike you, and the whole terror of loss and ruin bears down on you, you're either swept away in an excitement that hasn't any end, or you brace yourself, and become master of the shatterine thing.\" \" \" You are a master,\" she interposed. \" You are the Master Man,\" she repeated admiringly. He waved a hand deprecatingly. \"Do you know when we talk-sd together in the woods soon after you ran the rapids— you remember the day— if you had said that to me then, I'd have cocked my head and thought I was a jim-dandy, as they say. A Master Man was what I wanted to be. But it's a pretty barren thing to think, or to feel, that you're a Master Man; because, if you are —if you've had a ' scoop ' all the way, as Jowett calls it, you can be as sure as anything that no one cares a rap farthing what happens to you. There are plenty",
         "who MICROCOPY RESOIUTION TEST CHART (ANSI and ISO TEST CHART No. 2| ^ APPLIED IfVMGE li ^f ^ 1653 East Wdin StTcet S-^ Rochester, Utt. rork 1*609 USA •^SS (^16) 482 - 0300 - Phone ^S (^'6) 288 - 5989",
         "-Fa- 264 THE WORLD FOR SALE pretend they care but it's only because they're saihng with the wind and with your even keel. Ifs only the Master Man h.mself that doesn't know in the least he's that who gets anything out of it all.\" Jm^\"'-'a^°''. ^'\"'\"^ ^^ythins out of it ?\" she asked softly. Aren't you— Chief ?\" At the familiar word-Jowett always called him Chief- L /i^ w^ '*°'' ^\"\"'^ ^'' ^^\u003c=«- \" I really believe I , am, thanks to you,\" he said nodding. restramed himself. He had no right to be familiar, to give an intimate turn to things. His game was over; his ^urney of ambition was done. He saw this girl with his ^Tk '/^yf-^.\"* ,7\"^!^ 1\u003e« 'o\"ged to see her with the eyes even iA°hi'~'\" f\\ ^'''^'^\"S^ beauty; and he knew that even if she cared for h.m, such a sacrifice as linking her hfe with his was impossible. Yet her very presence there was like a garden of bloom to him: a garden full of the odour of hfe, of vital things, of sweet energy and happy being. Somehow, he and she were strangely alike. He knew ,t. From the time he held her in his arms at Carillon i.Ll7 '* ., , ^^** adventurous spirit which was in SlTknelr *° ^''- ''^^' \"\"^^ ^ '\"^* ^' \"g^t and \"No, there's no master man in me, but I think I know what one could be like.\" he remarked at last He straightened himself against the pillows. The old ook of power came to a face hardly strong enough to bear It. It was so fine and thin now, and the spirit in him was so prodigious. \" No one cares what happens to the man who always succeeds; no one loves him,\" he continued. \"Do you k«ow, m my trouble I've had more out of nigger Jim's affection than I've ever had in my life. Then there's Rockwell, Osterhaut and Jowett, and there's your father It was worth while hving to feel the real thing.\" His",
         "hands' TWO LIFE PIECES 265 went out as though grasping something good and comforting. I don't suppose every man needs to be struck as hard as I ve been to learn what's what, but I've learned it. I give you my word of honour, I've learned it.\" Her face flushed and her eyes kindled greatly. \" Jim Rockwell, Osterhaut, Jo-./ett, and my father !\" she ex-claimed. \"Of course trouble wouldn't do anything but make them come closer round you. Poor people live so near to misfortune all the time— I mean poor people like Jim. Osterhaut, and Jowett— that changes of fortune are just natural things to them. As for my father, he has had to stretch out his hands so often to those in trouble \" \" That he carried me home on his shoulders from the bridge six weeks and three days ago, at three o'clock in the morning,\" interjected Ingolby with a quizzical smile. \" Why did you omit Madame Bulteel and myself when you mentioned those who showed their— friendship ?\" she asked, hesitating at the last word. \" Haven't we done our part ?\" \"I was talking of men,\" he answered. \" One knows what women do. They may leave you in the bright days, not in the dark days. On the majority of them you couldn't rely in prosperity, but in misfortune you couldn't do anything else. They are there with you. They're made that way. The best life can give you in misfortune IS a woman. It's the great beginning-of-the-world thing in them. Men can't stand prosperity, but women can stand misfortune. Why, if Jim and Osterhaut and Jowett and all the men of Lebanon and Manitou had deserted me, I shouldn't have been surprised ; but I'd have had to recast my philosophy if Fleda Druse had turned her bonny brown head away.\" It was evident he was making an effort to conquer emotions which were rising in him; that he was playing on the surface to prevent his deep feelings from breaking forth. \" Instead of which,\" he added jubilantly, \" here",
         "I 26« THE WORLD FOR SALE am, in the nicest room in the world, in a fine bed with spnngs like an antelope's heels.\" ** It was^Xn^r^.K^\"**'' ^'' ^\"\"'^ *°*° *•\u003e« ■n-ttress. self Sh^ rtt^ . \"'* T^^''- ^^ •»« *^^ \"\"-^Wng him- Ssaid nr^h^H \"'■^™'l*«*-\"d. It was a nice rofm, as ^en it \"h- ^1 u''''\" \"**\" ** \"^^^ h'^ «y«s- but if he had Tdorablv I^k'^k ^'^'' \"■*\"^'^'' ''°* like herself it was- adorably fresh, happily coloured, sumptuous and fine It had srapie curtains, white sheets, and a warn, c^et on the ofThfrout^l\"*** \"\"^*'''\"«- ^°°' '''^' -™'^he not two oft S ^ P\"\"\"*\"* °' \"\"\"y '=°\u003e°\"\" hung where h^ doJrTaV^ ■ '\"'•^T'^' '\"■* \"* *^^ ^'\"dow and over was 2Z '^ •,*\"\"\"\"* \"^^^^^ •\" bronze and gold. It but an ancient ^\"l\"'!'\"\" ''\"'' \"^ ^^'^ \"-\"dern world, TLJl * °\"* *^\"=h bad become a symbol of the wX» 'tLT *° \"\"!' tbe highways, the^uide of tt KtenTin ^^r ^\"\"''\"* .^ad been on the pole of the the girrhe^lf'^r ^^ lu '^' Roumelian c^ntry. In ^ril. c \"■\"* \"\"\" ^''^t ''bich conesponded to the gorgeous pennant and the bronze cross. iVwas not in trolM i ' ^^''\"\"f '\"='\"°\" =be was as well con- rSs~;i:?,if!,'^*P*^^ °* tbe eyes there was s'^me aWr^ to th. ^\"«' *\"'\"'' ^^'^'\"^^ °^ ^t^^ng« banners Sere had b.^:\"*\"* f*-*'*' r\"'\"^ of the pink curtains. ev«^n fK ^ «\"»«*h,ng of the same look in Ingolby's eyes m the past, only with him it was the sense of great adventure, intrepid- enterprise, a touch of vis\"o^ and thi beckoning thing. That look was not in Ws eyes now Nothing was there; no life, no soul; only darkness Zt\" did that look ,till inhabit the eyes oi the^soul ? He answered the question himself. \" I'd start aeain in a different way if I could,\" he said musingly Ws ?a e sJ^i'tlf th- \" '''' ^\"^ *° ^*y *''^*- but' woSd. isn t only the things you get, it's how you use them.",
         "It TWO LIFE PIECES 267 rn n!\"!^ l^^ ^'''\"f y°\" ^°- '*'' \"^^y y°^ do them. But trv T \" ''If'^ \"°*= ^'\" \"«^\" ''ave a chance to try the new way. I'm done.\" bit^!^!!r*\"^/J'\"°'* '^^^^^ '\"^P*''' '\"t\" !\u003e«' eyes-* v«]d, ?eeain ^^^ L'^J\"^ ^' ^'\"^^y- *°°' \" he was not to regain his sight. The great impulse of a nature which had been disciphned into reserve broke forth. thJi!^* f'i ^^^ ^^^ *^\"' * *'^emor in her voice. AU her °rr^'*,f e-*f in danger of losing came home to h«r It isnt so You shall get well again. Your sight will come back. To-morrow, perhaps to '-v. Hindhp fhe great ocuhst comes from New York. , beck the Montreal man, holds out hopes. If the :.ew Vork man V^S br- \"'^ ^P\"'^ ' P^''\"^'^^ - another mo\" S you will be on your feet again, out i:. the world, fighting working, mastering, just as you used to do\" ^' Hitli™ t\".'f \"k''\\''T'^ *° '\"^ P°^essi°\" of him. though he saw something in the distance. He sooke scarcely above a whisper. P^^ '• I didn't know the New York man was coming I n: his tor *'\"^ ^'' \"^ '^\"^^ ^* ^\"'\" \u003e\u003e^ -\"^ - \"h -e \" We told you there was,\" she answered. to mak; 1^°\"' f\"^ ^ *^°''«^* y\"\" *\"e all only trying P„.T n u '[ *°'' '\"''' ^\"\"^ ^ ^»e\"d Warbeck say to agaiS\" \"\" '\" *'°\"^''' ' \"^ \"''\"P- ' I*'^ *- to'^one \" Did you hear that ?\" she said sorrowfully. \" I'm so '°^^a; ti;* 1,'- '^'\"\"'^'^^ '\"''' afterwards-^nly a week ag^ ,\"^ rf i ^ \"\", \"\"\"' \"'\"'\"■ That's the truth. On my so^ and honour it's the truth. He said the chances were even. It was he suggested Mr. Hindiip, and Hindlio is coming now. He's on the way. He mij be here tol; Oh, be sure, be sure, be sure, it isn't all over. You .aid your hfe was broken. It isn't. You said my Ufe",
         "h^ 268 THE WORLD FOR SALE been broken. It wasn't. It was only the wrench of a great change. Well, it's only the wrench of a great change in your life. You said I gained everything in the great change of my life. I did; and the great change in your We won't be lost, it will be gain, too. I know it; in my heart I know it.\" With sudden impulse she caught his hand in both of hers, and then with another impulse, which she could not control, she caught his head to her bosom. For one mstant her arms wrapped him round, and she murmured somethmg m a language he did not understand— the language of the Roumclian country. It was only one swift instant, and then with shocked exclamation she broke away from him, dropped into a chair, and buried her face m her hands. He blindly reached out his hand towards her as if to touch her. \"Mother-girl, dear mother-girl— that 's what you are,\" he said huskily. \" What a great, kind heart you ve got !\" She did not reply, but sat with face hidden in her hands, rocking backwards and forwards. He understood ; he tried to help her. There was •, great joy in his heart, but he dared not give it utterance. . '.' ^}^^^ *^'l ™e about your life— about that great change in It, he said at last in a low voice. \" Perhaps it would help me. Anyhow, I'd like to know, if you feel you can tell me. For a moment she was silent. Then she said to him with an anxious note in her voice: \"What do you know atout my life-about the ' great change,' as you call He reached out over the coverlet, felt for a sock which he had been learning to knit and, slowly plying the needles, replied : I only know what Jethro Fawe told me, and he was a promiscuous liar.\" \" I don't think he lied about me,\" she answered",
         "quietly. TWO LIFE PIECES 269 \" He told you I was a Gipsy ; he told you that I was married to him. That was true. I was a Gipsy. I was married to him in the Romany way, when I was a child of three, and I never saw him again untii here, the other day, on the Sagalac.\" \" You were married to him as much as I am,\" he inter-jected scornfully. \" That was a farce. It \\,as only a promise to pay on the part of your father. There was nothing in that. Jethro Fawe could not claim on that.\" \" He has tried to do so,\" she answered, \" and if I were still a Gipsy he would have the right to do so from his standpoint.\" \" That sounds silly to me,\" Ingolby remarked, his fingers moving now more quickly with the needles. \" No, it isn't silly,\" she said, her voice almost as softly monotonous as his had been when he told her of his life a little while before. It was as though she was looking into her own mind and heart and speaking to herself. \" It isn't silly,\" she repeated. \" I don't think you understand. Just because a race like the Gipsies have no country and no home, so they must have things that bind them which other people don't need in the same way. Being the vagrants of the earth, so they must have things that hold them tighter than any written laws made by King or Parliament. Unless the Gipsies kept their laws sacred they couldn't hold together at all. They're iron and steel, the Gipsy laws. They can't be stretched, and they can't be twisted. They can only be broken, and then there's no argument about it. When they are broken, there's the penalty, and it has to be met.\" Ingolby stopped knitting for a moment. \" You don't mean that a penalty could touch you ?\" he asked in-credulously. \" Not for breaking a law,\" she answered. \" I'm not a Gipsy any more. I gave my word about that, and so did my father; and I'll keep it.\"",
         "V| 870 THE WORLD FOR SALE but at LT F1.HV. ^ \"\"' \"^\"'^ ^'•'^^ ''« «as doing, ofa great dUtl?. T, 'T *° •\u003e'•\"' ^' *' ^««'\"e'i \"\"t and drew for him . ll * /\"'\"''*' ^\"'' *he Black Sea, No« and a^lin ^t^?\\ f \"\" °^ **'*' ^^^^ '^at followed. seemed a if*; ^°'« became low and pained. It belonged to U would J \\'^' ''°*'^\" ^\" ''^^y ^\" t'^-* -^.f^J^oi?;-r-aS£ natural to hr anTthat\" ^ 't.\"^'' *° '*' ** \"\"^ ^^\"\"'l J^t^^^^\"^T-^-^^^^^ andhe^'kiewsSdfd:\"'\"' ^'^ °^^^-^°'°\"^^'^ ^^'^ P-*-' calwtth'oSi; 'rr\"\"' '°'\"'' ''^1\"'=*^ \"f *he old",
         "life TWO LIFE PIECES 271 revealed as great a poetic as dramatic instinct. As she taiked, Ingolby in his imagination pictured her as a girl of ten or twelve, in a dark-red dress, brown curls falling in profusion on her shoulders, with a clear, honest, beau- tiful eye, and a face that only spoke of a joy of living, in which the small things were the small things and the great things were the great: the perfect proportion of sane life in a sane world. Now and again, carried away by the history of things remembered, she visualized scenes for him with the ardour of an artist and a lover of created things. He realized how powerful a hold the old life still had upon her She understood it, too, for when at last she told of the great event in England which changed her life, and made her a deserter from Gipsy life; when she came to the giving of the pledge to a dying woman, and how she had kept that pledge, and how her father had kept It, sternly, faithfully, in spite of all it involved, she said to him : \"It may seem strange to you, living as I live now in one spot, with everything to make life easy, that I should lone sometimes for that old life. I hate it in my heart of hearts, yet there's something about ii that belongs to me, that s behind me, if that tells you anything. Ifs as though there was some other self in me which reached far far back into centuries, that wills me to do this and wills me to do that. It sounds mad to you of course, but there have been times when I have had a wild longing to go back to It all, to what some Gorgio writers call the pariah world— the Ishmaelites.\" More than once Ingolby's heart throbbed heavily against his breast as he felt the passion of her nature, its extra-ordinary truthfuhiess, making it clear to him by indirect phrases that even Jethro Fawe, whom she despised, still had a hateful fascination for her. It was all at variance to her present self, but it summoned her through the",
         "long 272 THE WORLD FOR SALE avenues of ancestry, predisposition; through the secret communion of those who, being dead, yet speak. \" It's a great story told in a great way,\" he said, when she had finished. \" It's the most honest thing I ever heard, but it's not the most truthful thing I ever heard. I don't think we can tell the exact truth about ourselves. We try to be honest ; we are savagely in earnest about it, and so we exaggerate the bad things we do, and we often show distrust of the good things we do. That 's not a fair picture. I believe you've told me the truth as you see it and feel it, but I don't think it's the real truth. In my mind I sometimes see an oriel window in the college where I spent three years. I used to work and think for hours m that oriel window, and in the fights I've been having lately I've looked back and thought I wanted it again; wanted to be there in the peace of it all, with the books, and the lectures, and the drone of history, and the drudgery of examinations; but if I did go back to it, three days'd sicken me, and if you went back to the Gipsy life three days'd sicken you.\" \" Yes, I know. Three hours would sicken me. But what might not happen in those three hours ! Can't you understand ?\" Suddenly she got to her feet with a passionate exclama-tion, her clenched hands went to her temples in an agony of emotion. \" Can't you understand ?\" she repeated. ■' It's the going back at all for three days, for three hours, for three minutes that counts. It might spoil evervthine ■ it might kill my life.\" J' - 6. His face flushed, crimsoned, then became pale; his hands ceased moving ; the knitting lay still on his knee. \" Maybe, but you aren't going back for three minutes, any more than I'm going back to the oriel window for three seconds,\" he said. \" We dreamers have a lot of agony in thinking about the things we're never going to do— just as much agony as in thinking about the",
         "things TWO LIFE PIECES 273 ca rtoff t^hr -^ ° **\" \"'\"''\"°\"'\" lightning-rods to carry off the brain-waves into the ground. after Jn ^Z\"..: \"\"\"j''''^.'' *°\"derful story,\" he added, arms ?o her .nH ^,f\" \"\"'\"''' '\"\"^ing to hold out his wron. A Ki i^ '*'\" \"\"''\" *\"*«\"^ *'\" \"\u003e d° no such Tne?' for th\"f '\"''\" 't' \"\" \"«'\u003e* °^ '\"'« *\u003c\u003e ^e a slave- A wife wr IH ?i \"\"*'• ''•''\"* \"\"\"\"\"S^ *° '''\"i ^ould be. A wife would be a victim. Ho saw himself felt himself £r';o'nsid\"r'\"' '7*1\"\"'^' \"'*'' °\"'y the icid bTaJ eft, considering only the problem of hourly comfort and trying to neutralize the penalties of blindness. She must ^reatner„f,\"J^ h° *''t*- '\"^ '\"\"P*^ '™\"' '''^ «'^e ^^e had hid safd of the r'^ '\" ?*'• \"^ ''\"«* *'»' l**\"*^ than he sh. htn * *°\"\" °' •''\"°\"°\" '\" her, and he knew that S ear? \"trT\"''\" t\"\"' **\"\"P^**'°\" ^'''^h sang m hfm and v! .k ^^^''^-'he thought of the man revested him, and yet there was something about the feUow a Z^TZI '\"\"r' *^^ ^'^'\"°'^ \"\"^ garishnes^'of e^ion^I ' P'lf ^■'ted though they were, nnding ;• Have you seen Jithro Fawe lately ?\" he asked. herfatherhL~^'''TP\"«*°'''y\"°*^*°\"=\"hemorning hZ K ! V P^''*\"^ \"'\"' \"*\"tenc.. of the palrin upon hun; but she paused in time. \"Not since everytW happened to you,\" she added presently everything forr^!.h''\"T^ ^^^ ^*r *' \"P-\" ^\"6\"% remarked with •• ft' S ''\" •^'^ ^■°\"'* ''^ ^^'''\"g ^- any \"'ore \" far-P \u003c;!,» f °^ purpose coming into her hish\\nd S^^fi*^ °\"* ^^^ '^■i\"''^- ^\"\"i gave the glass info his hand. His lingers touched hers. .' r 'J^..^*\".'^' ^\"\"^ ''°^'^'\" 'he said to him. Cold hands, warm heart,\" he chattered. A curious, wilful, rebellious look came into her eyes.",
         "18 274 THE WORLD FOR SALE \" I shouldn't have thought it in your case,\" she said, and with sudden resolve turned towards the dotr. \" I'll send Madame Bulteel,\" she added. \" I'm going for a walk.\" She had betrayed herself so much, had shown so reck-lessly what she felt, and yet. yet why did he not— she did not know what she wanted him to do. It was all a great confusion. Vaguely she realized what had been working in him, but yet the knowledge was dim indeed. She was a woman. In her heart of hearts she knew that he did care for her, and yet in her heart of hearts she denied that he cared. She was suddenly angry with herself, angry with him, the poor blind man, back from the Valley of the Shadow. She had not reached the door, however, when Madame Bulteel entered the room. \" The doctor from New York has come,\" she said, holding out a note from Dr. Rockwell. \" He will be here in a couple of hours.\" Fleda turned hack towards the bed. \"Good luckl\" she said. \"You'll see, it will be all right.\" \"Certainly I'll s\u003cre if it's all right,\" he said cheerfully. \"Am I tidy? Have I used Pears' soap?\" He would have his joke at his own funeral if possible. \" There are two hours to get you fit to be seen,\" she rejoined with raillery, infected by his cheerfulness in spite of herself. \" Madame Bulteel is very brave. Nothing is too hard for her !\" An instant later she was gone, with her heart tellii to go back to him, not to leave him, but yet with a lo^Pg stronger still driving her to the open world, to which she could breathe her trouble in great gasps, as she sped onward through the woods and by the river. To love a blind man was sheer madness, but in her was a super- stitiaus belief that he would see again. It",
         "prevailed TWO LIFE PIECES 278 against the doubts and lerrors It m» u i own sens, of fatality, his own b..li»f ?uf.'\" '''•\"' ^'^ darkness all his days \"' \"''\" *\" *\"»W be in he tS's^g ro'hl^S,?.*'\"\"\" \"•« -'^'^^ «\u003e' ^•'e expert. it coShTve Je'en!\" \"\"'\"' *^'='^'\"\"« ^'^ •-\"",
         "^\"eap-if CHAPTER XXI THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER The last rays of the setting sun touched the gorgeous Autumn woods with a loving, bright glow, and the day stole pensively away into a purple bed beyond the sight of the eyes. From a lonely spot by the river, Fleda watched the westenng gleam until it vanished, her soul alive to the melancholy beauty of it all. Not a human being seemed to be withm the restricted circle of her vision. There were only to be seen the deep woods, in myriad tints of bronze and red and saffron, and the swift -flowing river Overhead was the Northern sky, so clear, so tiirilling, and the stars were beginning to sparkle in the iacredibly swift , twilight which links daytime and nighttime in that Upper Land. Lonely and delicately sad it all looked, but there was no feeling of loneliness among those who lived the hfe of the Sagalac. Many a man has stood on a wide plain of snow, white to the uttermost horizon, or in the yeUow- brown grass of the Summer prairie, empty of all human life so far as eye could see, and yet has felt no solitude. It IS as though the air itself is inhabited by a throng of happy comrades whispering in the communion of the invisible world. As a child Fleda had often gazed upon just such scenes, lonely and luminous, but she was only conscious then of a vague and pleasant awe, a kindly confusion, which, Uke the din of innumerable bees, lulled wonder to sleep. Even as a child, however, something of what it meant had pierced her awe and wonder. Once as she crossed a broken, bare mountain of Roumania she had seen a wild",
         "276 THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER 277 asses wand^rS Th!r ■ ^\"\"\"\"^ ^\"\"^ ^°=^' °*her wild this immoS-wiS^LTrreTafFfe'd \"h ^^^^\"''-\"''^ ■\" till it was hid from her view Vv a i'^t*' had watched it thing which made a lastirrmnression H? \"°\"\\ ^\"* '^' to nature-Hfe than all fWufv ' '^'^^^'\"e he^ nearer born, was the fact that! .'^^ '\"'\"^ \"\"'^^ *« ^^^ ass ;as still sfandJgZrr;\"'' '°r/\"^^' ^'^^ ^^ gazing across the vflley\"^ Or wasTl: *'' '\"'' ^*'\" vallev ? Was th^r- , t gazing across the sight V \"•''\" '\"\"\"^ \"^''^^ ^i^i°n commanding its toSherin\"' vtfa\"o/ ^'* ' ?\"°*''^^ '°^^^ »\u003e\"=«\" '- \"ours pafsed on out'f Sight o\"fThf'^H '\"P\"™\"^\" ^1^'''' \"ad ever after ihl Z ^ } \"^'^^ *^^ °° t^^e hills, but for hVtized vrtiiSXSzrbTiJ: 'r^- ^•\"^ existence ^^P*\"\"' *•\"* everlasting question of swSt Ite^hSesIttt*': t'r. 'T\"^- ^\"\"^ -^ht with theRoumaniaTL~rt;£ rir^T^\"''-^^ those farK,ff days which had Wn vfT' ^^^ '\"'\"\"•=* \"' finest animal inCllTgence had now h \"'\", '^T-^'''^ '^\"^ the Brain and soul stro^^eSal r=.^'^ \"^ *'\"'\"^''*- the revelation was ^e^ZT^:^:':^^'^^^^ ^ i^S^iiT^rir'^n^^?-^^^\"^ '^'-- telescopefof years- but s^'^v''.^*''''\" T\" '^'\"'^^ th^ the ci. ;L vail.t; Sant' \"wl's\\'h \"''*\"' '\"\"' relation between the vast?im5rt JrhaSfelrtT fts\" \"'' Sl^^td'itTa-yr-m''^^^!,^^-^^ -ce,",
         "Di;:Se^S;?^:a:^t^-ri^- 278 THE WORLD FOR SALE only, as it were, vermin infesting the desirable world ? Did they belong to each other ? It meant so much if they did belong, and she loved to think they did. Many a time she kissed the smooth bole of a maple or whispered to it ; or laid her cheek against a mossy rock and murmured a greeting in the spirit of a companionship as old as the making of the world. On the evening of this day of her destiny— carrying the story of her own fate within its twenty-four hours— she was in a mood of detachment from life's routine. As at a great opera, a sensitive spirit loses itself in visions alien to the music and yet born of it, so she, lost in this primeval scene before her, saw visions of things to be. If Ingolby's sight came back ! In her abstraction she saw him with sight restored and by her side, and even in that joy her mind felt a hovering sense of invasion, no definite, visible thing, but a presence which made shadow. Suddenly oppressed by it, she turned back into the woods from the river-bank to make for home. She had explored nearly every portion of this river-country for miles up and down, but on this evening, lost in her dreams, she had wandered into less familiar regions. There was no chance of her being lost, so long as she kept near to the river, and indeed by instinct and not by thought or cal-culation she made her way about at all times. Turned homeward, she walked for about a quarter of a mile, retreading the path by which she had come. It was growing darker, and, being in unfamiliar surroundings, she hurried on, though she knew well what course to take. Following the bank of the river she would have increased her walk greatly, as the stream made a curve at a point above Manitou, and then came back again to its original course; so rfo: cut across the promontory, taking the most direct line homeward. Presently, however, she became conscious of other people in the wood besides herself. She saw no one,",
         "but THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER 279 she heard breaking twigs, the stir of leaves, the flutter of a partridge which told of human presence. The underbrush was considerable, darkness was coming on, and she had a sense of being surrounded. It agitated her, but she pulled herself together, stood still and admonished herself. She called herself a fool ; she asked herself if she was going to be a coward . She laughed out loud at her own apprehension ; but a chill stole into her blood when she heard near by —there was no doubt about it now— mockery of her own laughter. Then suddenly, before she could organize her senses, a score of men seemed to rise up from the ground around her, to burst out from the bushes, to drop from the trees, and to storm upon her. She had only time to realize that they were Romanys, before scarves were thrown around her head, bound around her body, and, unconscious, she was carried away into the deep woods. When she regained consciousness Fleda found herself in a tent, set in a kind of prairie amphitheatre valanced by shrubs and trees. Bright fires burned here and there, and dark-featured men squatted upon the ground, cared for their horses, or busied themselves near two large caravans, at the doors or on the steps of which now and again appeared a woman. She had waked without moving, had observed the scene without drawing the attention of a man— a sentry— who sat beside the tent -door. The tent was empty save for herself. There v. as little in it besides the camp-bed against the tent wall, upon which she lay, and the cushions supporting her head . She had waked carefully, as it were : as though some inward monitor had warned her of impend-ing danger. She realized that she had been kidnapped by Romanys, and that the hand behind the business was that of Jethro Fawe. The adventurous and reckless Fawe family had its many adherents in the Romany world,",
         "and 280 THE WORLD FOR SALE IS!\" \"\"\" \"' *\"\"\"** **\" ^''\"^'^'\"y '^^'^i for its leader- dratnt«rlr\"'\"T *'\"' \"^^ °^ ^y'' Prohibition, there had worU he hi/ ^\"^7\" \"\"\"er to him, from the Romany ever i^n.^f abandoned, many of his people, never, how- ance „f T t^'' T'\"^ ^\"^'\" ^'' ^'^'o\" *\"' th« appear-ance of Jethro Fawe. Here and there on the prairk to a pomt ,ust beyond Gabriel Druse's horizon, '^hey had and defiant under the Sentence, and knowing that the chances agamst his life were a million to one, had deter! SeT\"' '°'' '*;°''' \"''**• « •* ^^'«d' -ould r^ake wife and mTJf' t\"^'l * ''^\"\"''*''' ^\"\"^ ^^^ ^im his Fnru, u' ^^^' headship over all the Romany world. woods with his adherents, secretly following Fleda day SrfS'- Zi-:' '\"I' *!■' P'''^^' ''■^ opportunity, seemed £th;rv ''^r^^he.lay in a Romany tan once more, wrth the flickenng fires outside in the night, and the sentry at her doorway. This watchman was not Jethro Fawe but she knew well that Jethro was not far off ' Through the open door of the tent, for some minutes her eyes stud.ed the segment of the circle within her vi^o Setr h r'.^'ll* 'L\"* \"'^ ''\" organized attempt to force her back mto the Romany world. If she repudiated the Gorgio life and acknowledged herself a Romfny once agam. she knew her safety would be secured; but in^truth tt rI of P '\" '7 ••\" ''''■ '°' \"° one would dare to defy the Ry of Rys so far as to kill his daughter. But she was m danger of another kind-in deep Ind terrible danger of her herT ^l\"'\"\" ^/ '''' ''''\"'^''' °^ \"* *ook possession aL\"',nH ''\"'\"}. ^^'»«'l a'n-ost to burst. Not fear, but anger and emotion possessed her. All the Romany in her stormed back again from the past. It sent her to\\ r feet with a scarcely smothered cry*. She was not quicker however, than was the figure at the tent door, which,",
         "vrith THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER 281 a half-dozen others, sprang up as she appeared. A hand was r^,sed. and, as if by magic, groupsTf Gipsies, some sitting, some standmg, some with the Gipsy fiddle, one or two wi h flutes, began a Romany chant in a high, ZT'T\\7' \"\"f ''°'\"''\" ^^''^ \"P°\" ^^^ fi« powders from which flamed up many coloured lights. In a moment the camp was transformed. From the woods around came swarthy-faced men, with great gold nngs m their ears and bright scarfs around their necks or waists, sonie of them handsome, dirty and insolent ; others ugly watchful, and quiet in manner and face; others still most friendly and kind in face and manner. All showed ZTr 'f '^'l ^?' ^^'^''- '^^\"y ^^'^«=\u003c^ *\"«'' h'^nd^ in a gesture of sa utation as a Zulu chief thrusts up a long arm and shouts Inkoos !'• to one whom he honours. Som\" however, made the sweeping Oriental gesture of the right hand, palm upward, and almost touching the ground-a sign of obedience and infinite respect. It had all hiH,n wellarranged. Skilfully managed afit wa^howevei thTre was somtcning in it deeper than theatrical display or dramatic purpose. dl \"\"^.t\"' *^** \"\"^\"y °f them were deeply moved at wLl'!5 \\ P\"\"?^\"'* °^ *''« daughter of the Ry of Rys, who had for so long exiled himself. Racial, family, clan feeling spoke in voice and gesture, in look and attitude; sal .t^tL!»\"^ were small groups of younger men whose salutations were perfunctory, not to say mocking. These tnTu n'^?° J''\"\"*\"'^ ^''P^y ^^'^'\"'^ defecfion, and ruthfuUy felt that she had passed out of th«ir drcle for ever; that she despised them, and looked down on them from another sphere. They were all about the and hi?*'\"'°/T'-^''* \"\"^ °* \u003c\" '«^ civilized tyj!^^ and had semi-barbansm written all over them. Unlike Jethro they had never known the world of cities. Thev repudiated Fleda, because their ambition could not reach to her. They recognized the touch of fashion and of",
         "form. 282 THE WORLD FOR SALE of a worldly education, of a convention which lifted her away from the tan and the caravan, from the everlasting itmerary. They had not had Jethro's experiences in lashionable hotels of Europe, at midnight parties, at gay suppers, at garish dances, where Gorgio ladies answered the amorous looks of the ambitious Romany with the hddle at his chin. Because these young Romanys knew they dare not aspire, they were resentful; but Jethro, the head of the rival family and the son of the dead claimant to the headship, had not such compulsory modesty. He had ranged far and wide, and his expectations were extensive. He was nowhere to be seen in the groups which sang and gestured in the light of the many coloured fires, though once or twice Fleda's quickened ear detected his voice, exulting, in the chorus of song. Presently, as she stood watching, listening, and strangely moved in spite of herself by the sudden dramatic turn which things had taken, a seat was brought to her. It was a handsome stool, looted perhaps from some chiteau \"1 the Old World, and over it was thrown a dark-red cloth which gave a semblance of dignity to the seat of authority, which it was meant to be. Fleda did not refuse the honour. She had choked back the indignant words which had rushed to her lips as she left the tent where she had been lying. Prudence had bade her await developments. She could not yet make up her mind what to do. It was clear that a bold and deep purpose lay behind it all, and she could not tell how far- r aching it was, nor what it represented of rebellion against her lather's authority. That it did represent rebellion she had no doubt. She was well enough aware of the claims of Jethro 's dead father to the leadership, abandoned for three thousand pounds and marriage with herself; and she was also aware that while her father's mysterious isolation might possibly have developed a reverence for him, yet active pressure and calumny might well",
         "have THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER 283 done its work. Also, if the marriage was repudiated, Jethro would be justified in resuming the family claim to the leadership. She seated herself upon the scarlet seat with a gesture of thanks, while the salutations and greetings increased ; then she awaited events, thrilled by the weird and pleasant music, with its touches of Eastern fantasy. In spite of herself she was moved, as Romanys, men and women, ran forward in excitement with arms raised towards her as though they meant to strike her, then suddenly stopped short, made obeisance, called a greeting, and ran backwards to their places. Presently a group of men began a ceremony or ritual, before which the spectators now and again covered their eyes, or bent their heads low, or turned their backs, and raised their hands in a sort of ascription . As the ceremony neared its end, with its strange genuflections, a woman dressed in white was brought forward, her hands bound behind her, her hair falling over her shoulders, and after a moment of apparent denunciation on the part of the head of the ceremony, she was suddenly thrown to the ground, and the pretence of drawing a knife across her throat was made. As Fleda watched it she shuddered, but presently braced herself, because she knew that this ritual was meant to show what the end must be of those who, like herself, proved traitor to the traditions of race. It was at this point, when fifty knives flashed in the air, with vengeful exclamations, that Jethro Fawe appeared in the midst of the crowd. He was dressed in the well- known clothes which he had worn since the day he first declared himself at Gabriel Druse's home, and, compared with his friends around him, he showed to advantage. There was command in his bearing, and experience of life had given him primitive distinction. For a moment he stood looking at Fleda in undisguised admiration, for she made a remarkable picture.",
         "Animal 284 THE WORLD FOR SALE beauty was hers, too. There was a delicate athletic charm ,„ her body and bearing; but it add^ t'o raSer than took away from, the authority of her pres;nce ^ differing from Tethrr \u003c;h« \u003e,.j presence, so wijh o^ers. aJd^tr paS:„r SVere^'Sd'S; rjZT ^ J ^' °'** *^^ •'*'* ^™e mental vanity and it placed mind so far above matter that her beau v nlatn oneinthe crowd andachonisofsaluttionfre \"\" rln^T'^r'^ '^f '*'\" *^ *»\"«*J for him to come quite close to her, and the look in her face was like thaTof one who was scarcely conscious of what was passing aroi^d he^whoseeyessawdistantthingsofinfinitrmomLt A few feet away from her he spoke. Tn thrZrld th T° ' ^' '''^- \" ^^°'\" ^ver^vhere lou V^n M ^ ^\"\"\"^ ^°\"«' *° ^how their love for Romany people before the Druses came to Jo^r We Z2\\l^! \"T''\"' ^^°°^- y«t *« '^^ faitM to the Druse that rules over u8. His word prevails, althouKh h^ daughter ,s mad. Daughter of the Ry of R« \"S have seen us once again. We have sung to you; w^ have spoken to you; we have told you what is in our",
         "hearts THE SNARE OF THE FOWLER 285 we have shown you how good is the end of those who are fwthful. and how terrible is the end of the traitor. Do not forget It. Speak to us.\" Fleda had a fierce desire to spring to her feet and declare !° l?!\"* ,*••** **•* \"*\"*«\"\u003c=« \"^ the falHn had been passed upon Jethro Fawe, but she laid a hand upon herself, ihe knew they were unaware that the Sentence had been passed, else they would not have been with Jethro. in that case none would give him food or shelter or the hand of fnendship ; none dare show him any kindness ; and It was the law that anyone against whom he committed an offence, however small, might take his life. The Sen-tence had been hke a cloud upon her mind ever since her father had passed it; she could not endure the thought of It. She could not bring herself to speak of it-to denounce him. Soorer or later the Sentence would reach every Romany everywhere, and Jethro would pass into the Trr °i°''''^\"»°- not in Ws own time nor in the time »,. tK ■ t \"\"^nwa* abhorrent to her, yet his claim was there. Mad and bad as it was, he made his claim of her upon ancient rights, and she was still enough a Romany to see his pomt of view. Getting to her feet slowly, she ignored Jethro, looked into the face of the crowd, and said : \" I am the daughter of the Ry of Rys still, though I am RamTn?^ T °\"^n'-, ' \"^^ * P^«\u003c^8e to be no more a Romany and I wiU keep it; yet you and all Romany t^nr,r k'\" Z \"\"^^\"^^ t»»r«\"gh long generations the Druses have been of you. You have brought me here agaanst my will. Do you think the Ry of Rys will forgive that ? In your words you have been kind to me, but vet you have threatened me. Do you think that a Druse has any fear ? Did a Druse ever turn his cheek to be smitten ? You know what the Druses are. I am a Druse still. I wiU not talk longer, I have nothing to say to you all except that you must take me back to my father, and I will",
         "see 286 THE WORLD FOR SALE that he forgives you. Some of you have done this out of love ; some of you have done it out of hate ; yet set me free again upon the path to my home, and I shall forget it, and the Ry of Rys will forget it.\" At that instant there suddenly came forward from the doorway of a tent on the outskirts of the crowd a stalwart woman, with a strong face and a self-reliant manner. She was still young, but her slightly pock- marked countenance showed the wear and tear of sorrow of some kind. She had. indeed, lost her husband and her lather m the Montenegrin wars. Hastening forward to rleda she reached out a hand. \" Come with me,\" she said ; \" come and sleep in my tent to-night. To-morrow you shall go back to the Ry of Rvs perhaps. Come with me.\" ' There was a sudden murmuring in the crowd, which was stilled by a motion of Jethro Fawe's hand, and a moment afterwards Fleda gaVe her hand to the woman T 1^ \"*'\" f *'*^ y°\"'\" ^''*** ^*'^- Then she turned to Jethro: I wish to speak to you alone, Jethro Fawe \" she added. ' He laughed triumphantly. \" The wife of Jethro Fawe wishes to speak with him,\" he bombastically cried aloud to the assembled people, and he prepared to follow Fleda. As Fleda entered the woman's tent a black-eyed girl with tousled hair and a bold, sensual face, ran up to Jethro' and in an undertone of evil suggestion said to him • \" To-night is yours, Jethro. You can make to-morrow",
         "sure. CHAPTER XXII THE SECRKT MAN \" Vou are wasting your tiir. \" Fleda said the words witu a quiet determination, and yet in the tone was a slight over-emphasis which was like a call upon reserve forces within herself. \"Time is nothing to me,\" was the complete reply, clothed in a tone ol soft irony. \"I'm young enough to waste it. I've plenty of it in my knapsack.\" \" Have you forgotten the Sentence of the Patrin ?\" Fleda asked the question in a voice which showed a sudden access of determination. \" He wiU have to wipe it out after to-morrow\" replied the other with a gleam of sulky meaning and furtive purpose in his eyes. \" If you mean that I will change my mind to-morrow, and be your wife, and return to the Gipsy Ufe. it is the thought of a fool. I asked you to come here to speak with me because I was sure I could make you see things as they truly are. I wanted to explain why I did not tell the Romanys outside there that the Se.-^tence had been passed on you. I did not tell them because I can't forget that your people and my people have been sib for hundreds of years; that you and I were children together; that we were sealed to one another when neither of us could have any say about it. If I had remained a Gipsy, who can tell— my mind might have become like yours I I think there must be something rash and bad in me somewhere because I tell you frankly now that a chord in my heart rang when you made your wild speeches to me there in the",
         "287 288 THE WORLD FOR SALE Hut in the Wood months ago, evon when I hated you, knowing you for v;hat you are.\" \" That was because there was another man,\" interjected Jethro. She inclined her head. \" Yes, it was partly because of another man,\" she replied. \" It is a man who suffers because of you. When he was alone among his foes, a hundred to one, you betrayed him. That itself would have maue me despise you to the end of my Ufe, even if the man had been nothing at all to me. It was a low, cowardly thing to do. You did it ; and if you were my brother, I would hate you for it ; if you were my father, I should leave your house; if you were my husband, I should kill you. I asked you to speak with me now because I thought that if you would go away— far away— promising never to cross my father's path, or my path, again, I could get him to withdraw the Sentence. You have kid-napped me. Where do you think you are ? In Mesopo-tamia ? Youcan'tbreakthelawofthiscountryandescape as you would there. They don't take count of Romany custom here. Not only you, but every one of the Fawes here will be punished if the law reaches for your throat. I want you to escape, and I tell you to go now. Go back to Europe. I advise you this for your own sake— because you are a Fawe and of the clan.\" The blood mounted to Jethro's forehead, and he made an angry gesture. \" And leave you here for him ! Mi Duvel / I can only die once, and I would rather die near you than far away,\" he exclaimed. His eyes had a sardonic look, there was a savage edge to his tongue, yet his face was flushed with devouring emotion and he was quivering with hope. That which he called love was flooding the field of his feelings, - d the mad thing— the toxic impulse which is deep in the brain of Eastern races bled into his brain now. He was reckless, rebellious against fate insanely wilful, and what she",
         "had THE SECRET MAN sag Mid concerning Ingolby had r ,used in him the soul of She realized it, and «he was apprehensive of lome desperate act ; yet she had no physical fear of him sTtS^! wlhT^I *' *'\" ^'' *^»*' \"° \"»«\" ''hat hap~n^, eyes \"*'\"\" '^\"'' *\"\" love-light in her .hi •°\"* 'v**\" *° '\"'•' J**'\"'o «id, with an unnatural think you can come it over me with your Gorgio talk and the clever hmgs youVe learned in the Gorgio worid You try to look down on me. I'm as well te™ or „ ni bon. as you The only difference between us ™ the^y you dress, the way you live and use your tongue. AU thlt belongs to the life of the cities. Anyone c^ learn h Anyone well bom like you and me, with a little prartise can talk hke Gorgio dukes and earls. IVe be^n amo„- hem and I know. I've had my friends amonjTh\" m tc^' w-nt It. It s all part of a set piece. There's no inde. pendence in that life; you live byVule. Diabu' Ttaow ,-„li^\"/\" P T'= ^'^* P'*y*^ \"\"y ^\u003c^ to the women\" m high places who can't blush. It's n- good; it brinw nothing in the end. If s all hollow. Look^^ur S llT^ He swept a hand to the tent door. \"tK tanned and rough, as all out-door things are roueh w they've got their share of happiness, and^very K«^S exultation. \" Listen to that I\" iwe oi of ?rf ?'!°\"\"\"\u003e«'ly left Fleda's face. Outside in the light tl t,^\"^ ^\"'' '^'^^' **\"* «\"«''\"°8 ^tars, in the shade of the trees, groups of Romanys were singing the Romanv weddmg melody, called \"The Song of the S^ne\" It was not like the ringing of weddinf belts L^S*;eali blessing upon the man and the wonSm. Itwa8ap\u003c^mS",
         "M 290 THE WORLD FOR SALE praise of marriage passion ; it was a paan proclaiming the accomplishment of life. Crude, primitive, it thrilled with Eastern feeUng; a weird charm was showered from its notes. \" Listen !\" exclaimed Jethro again, a fire burning in his face. \" That's for you and me. To them you are my wife, and I am your man. Mi Duvel— it shall be so ! I know women. For an hour you will hate me ; for a day you will resent me, and then you will begin to love me. You will fight me, but I will conquer. I know you— I know you— all you women. But no, it will not be I that will conquer. It's my love that will do it. It's a den of tigers. When it breaks loose it will have its way. Here it is. Can't you see it in my face ? Can't you hear it in my voice ? Don't you hear my heart beating ? Every throb says, ' Fleda— Fleda— Fleda, come to me.' I have loved you since you were three. I want you now. We can be happy. Every night we will make a new home. The world will be ours ; the best that is in it will come to us. We will tap the trees of happiness— they're hid from the Gorgio world. You and I will know where to find them. Every land shall be ours ; every gift of paradise within our reach — riches, power, children. Come back to your own people; be a true daughter of the Ry of Rys; live with your Romany chal. You will never be at home anywhere else. It's in your bones; it's in your blood; it's deeper than all. Here, now, come to me — my wife.\" He flung the flap of the tent door across the opening, shutting out the camp-fires and the people. \" Here — now —come. Be mine while they sing.\" For one swift moment the great passion and eloquence of the man hfted her ofi her feet; for one instant the Romany in her triumphed, and a thrill of passion passed through her, storming her senses, hke a mist shutting out all the rest of the world. This Romany was right; there was in her the wild thing — the everlasting strain",
         "of THE SECRET MAN 291 race and years breaking down all the defences which cmhzed hfe had built up within her. Just for one in^fant ^It^'\"\" *'^^^ \"^\"\"^ ^^^- '^^ '^ face°\"4rtw: Like a stream of ether playing upon warm flesh, making t icy cold, so something of the ineradicable good in he? ^ir*. w.^'ri 'P'^y \"P°\" *»\u003e« «'«'»«nt^ of emotion and w.th both hands she made a gesture of repulsion nefrernr w'^lM'^'^'''' «'°^ bumed^earer and nearer to her. He bulked over her, driving her bark tw!!!! H^.r* \\'''' *^\"* \"^'- F- -» instant's Swift as had been the change in her, so a change like a cyclone swept over him. The hysterical passio^n wSch had possessed h.m suddenly passed, and Tdark, sXn determination swept into his eyes and over his face. His hps parted in a savage smile. \"Hell, so that's what you've learned in the Goreio world IS It ?-' he asked malevolently. \" Then I'll te^h you what they do in the Romany world; and to-monrot you can put the two together and see what they look Mke \" the^lnttn^\"'\"'\"^'^/'*'^'' ^' ^\"\"S ^\"'^ ^^' =\"rtain of tne tent and passed out into the night. the side of the couch, her brain tortured by a thousand thoughts. She knew there was no immediate esca-S the encampment. She could only rely upon the hue and cry which would be raised and the cert^n h4t wWch would be made for her. But what might not hIZS before any rescue cam. ? The ancient grudge of ?^e bvThefir* *''/T' \"^ ^\"\"\"^\"^ P°-' «' -ctivhy by the self-imposed exile of Gabriel Druse; and Jethro had rn\"^.\"\"^\"/*- '^'^ \"''''^ *^^«^t^ ^hich Jethro ha3 made she did not despise. He was a barbiian.",
         "He 292 THE WORLD FOR SALE would kill what he loved; he would have his way with what he loved, whether or not it was the way of law oi custom or right. Outside, the wedding song still made musical the night. Women's voices, shrill, and with falsetto notes, made the trees ring with it ; low, bass voices gave it a kind of solemnity. The view which the en-campment took of her captivity was clear. Where was the woman that brought her to the tent — whose tent it was? She seemed kind. Though her face had a hard look, surely she meant to be friendly. Or did she only mean to betray her; to give her a fancied security, and leave her to Jethro— and the night ? She looked round for some weapon. There was nothing available save two brass candlesticks. Though the door of the tent was closed, she knew that there were watchers outside; that any break for liberty would only mean defeat, and yet she was determined to save herself. As she tried to take the measure of the situation and plan what she would do, the noise of the music suddenly ceased, and she heard a voice, though low in tone, give some sort of command. Then there was a cry, and what seemed the chaotic noise of a struggle followed; then a voice a little louder speaking, a voice of someone she remembered, though she could not place it. Something vital was happening outside, something punctuated by sharp, angry exclamations; afterwards a voice speaking soothingly, firmly, prevailed ; and then there was silence. As she listened there was a footstep at the door of the tent, a voice called to her softly, and a hand drew aside the tent curtain. The woman who had brought her to this place entered. \" You are all safe now,\" she said, reaching out both hands to Fleda. \" By long and by last, but it was a close shave I He meant to make you his wife to-night, whether you would or no. I'm a Fawe, but I'd have none of that. I was on my way to your father's house when I met",
         "someone THE SECRET MAN He carries your father's voice —someone that you know, in his mouth.\" She stepped to the tent door and beckoned; and out of the darkness, only faintly lightened by the dying fires, there entered one whom Fleda had seen not more than nity times m her life, and never but twice since she had ceased to be a Romany. It was her father's secret agent, Khodo, the Roumelian, now grizzled and gaunt, but with the same vitality which had been his in the days when she was a little child. Here and there in the world went Rhodo, the voice of the Ry of Rys to do his bidding, to say his sav. No minister of a Czar was ever more dreaded or loved. His words were ever few, but his deeds had been many. Now, as he looked at Fleda, his old eyes gleamed, and he showed a double row of teeth, not one of which was imperfect, though he was seventy years of age. Would you Uke to come ?\" he asked. \"Would you like to come home to the Ry ? \" ou^i*^,*v'\"^ ^^\"^ ''\"\"S ''^\"^«\" \"P°n Wm. \"Rhodo I Khodo ! she exclaimed, and now the tears broke forth and her body shook with sobs. A few moments later he said to her: \" It's fifteen years since you kissed me last. I thought you were ashamed of old Rhodo. ' She did not answer, but looked a- uim with eyes stream- Ing, drawing back from him. Her embrace was astonish-ing even to herself, for as a child Rhodo had been a figure of awe to her, and the feeling had deepened as the years had gone on, knowing as she did his worlc throughout the world for the Ry of Rys. In his face was secrecy, knowledge, and some tragic underthing which gave him apart from his office, a singular loneliness of figure and manner. He was so closely knit in form; there was such concentration in face, bearing and gesture, that the isola- tion of his position was greatly deepened. \" No, you never kissed me after you were old",
         "enough 294 THE WORLD FOR SALE reflSk.r '\"'\"^' ' *** ^^ \"^^^ mournful and ironical might feel who beheld afar off a promised land, and vet was denied its joys. Rhodo was wifeless, childless, and f^n f? '^ '\"\"^y years. He had had no intimates among the Romany people. His life he lived alone. That the daughter of the Ry of Rys should kiss him was a thing of whicn he would dream when deeds were done and over and the shadows threatened. J'aK\"^!^ ^^ y°\" *S*'\" '\" *n°*her fifteen years,\" she said half-smiling through her tears. \" But tell me— tell me what has happened.\" \" Jethro Fawe has gone,\" he answered with a sweeping outward gesture. ° ^J Where has he gone ?\" she asked, apprehension seizing \"A journey into. the night,\" responded the old man with scorn and wrath in his tone, and his lips were set. ^^ Is he going far ?\" she asked. \" The road you might think long would be short to him \" he answered. ' beltin ^^\"^ ^\"^\"\"^ '\"'^'' ^\" ^\"\"\"^ ^^\"\"^^ *° ^*°P \" What road is that ?\" she asked. She knew, but she must ask. \"Everybody knows it ; everybody goes it some time or another, he answered darkly. \"What was it you said to all of them outsiJe ?\"-she made a gesture towards the doorway. \" There were angry ones, and I heard Jethro Fawe's voice.\" \" Yes, he was blaspheming,\" remarked the old man gninly. \" Tell me what it was you said, and tell me what has happened, she persisted. The old man hesitated a moment, then said grimly: \"",
         "1 THE SECRET MAN 295 told them they must go one way and Jethro Fawe another. I told them the Ry of Rys had said no patrins should mark the road Jethro Fawe's feet walked. I had heard of this gathering here, and I was on my way to bid them begone, for in following the Ry they have broken his command. As I came, I met the woman of this tent who has been your friend. She is a good woman ; she has suffered. Her people are gone, but she has a heart for others. I met her. She told me of what that rogue and devil had done and would do. He is the head of the Fawes, but the Ry of Rys is the head of all the Romanys of the world. He has spoken the Word against Jethro, and the Word shall prevail. The Word of the Ry when it is given cannot be withdrawn. It is like the rock on which the hill rests.\" \" They did not go with him ?\" she asked. \"It is not the custom,\" he answered sardonically. \" That is a path a Romany walks alone.\" Her face was white. \" But he has not come to the end of the path— has he ?\" she asked tremulously. \" Who can tell ? This day, or twenty years from now, or to-morrow, or next moon, he will come to the end of the path. No one knows, he least of all. He will not see the end, because the road is dark. I don't think it will be soon,\" he added, because he saw how haggard her face had grown. \" No, I don't think it will be soon. He is a Fawe, at the head of all the Fawes; so perhaps there will be time for him to think, and no doubt it will not be soon.\" \" Perhaps it will not be at all. My father spoke, but he can withdraw his word,\" she urged. Suddenly the old Gipsy's face hardened. A look of dark resolve and iron force came into it. \" The Ry will not withdraw. He has spoken, and it must be. If he spoke lightly he is not fit to rule. Unless the word of the Ry of Rys is good against breaking, then the Romanys are no more than scattered leaves at the w^U of the wind. It is the word of the",
         "Ry 290 THE WORLD FOR SALE It shall not bless, and it that holds our folk together, •nail not curse in vain.\" \" But the ni^ 7o:^l u^^\" ^°' ^^'^^' ^ «lded: Md if it ^ou?d bItZ .r?,''\\'°\"«' \"'''\"8h it is lonely. of the Ld c!Ses to Tithr' 1^ '^°\"i^ P''^^ •«'^''« the end Word isXe wh'cl JnH« °' ^'\"l ? ^''^° ^\"^- *'»« «»e \" K\"ne wnicn binds his feet for the pitfiU \" .. ^ \"\u003e,««* °°t die,\" she insisted. ^ With^i:;„XSfe'ho'\"*n\"\"^''^'«i'\u003e'\"«^^t''™ly. \" Come S^ \"!;uTT' ''\" '*'\"*='''=d out his hand. ioumey''a„dsoSttbeSoubleSh T\"^\"^ '\"\"\" J^\" There will be an h^.. , t'^°\"'\u003e'ed by having missed you. rises,\" rcontin^edlih?^ \"'''\"\"\"'y^'^P before the sun he greeted her fix? -^.nf ,\"1! \"T^' ''\"\"« ^t^ ^l^* pasfTout into?h\" kiglf'\" \"\"' \"**'\u003c^ \"P ^'^^ \u003c='^ain and Jhe^oman .h^ LTb1fSS^~l--;- E^gland^Stt 'grLXr^^r ^\"^^ ^^^ '^^^ ^ .«Xt^:hide?t^^:i\"i4^^^^^ '^Tuy\"f •*, \"P- ^\"'^ '- «5.? nTe get^agTin r\" A flush slowly stole ovpr PiLi,' ^ ^ again I hoiTor came into Wyes Shi rid /r' \"W\"*\"^ «\" \"=i eyes, sue read the parable",
         "aright. THE SECRET MAN 297 F\\Ju T \" ^\"'/\"^ * '^\"'''* *° P^y '^d can never pay it \" woman s neck and kissing her. Then she took the brooch from the woman^ h d, ,„d pi„„^, j^ ^^ her throat \"^ she ll^ A ^\"^^ °' ^^^ ^\"\"\"^ sometimes,\" she sa d and she laid a hand upon the woman's breast . peered into it \"vl-.. t*\"\" '*\"«'** ''^^'^^s hand and and on \". hi' ^7! ' '* ', ^W'ness for you now, and on ti's^ir '. w'' \"''\"^\"\"S'y- ^\"\"l ^*1\u003e *!\u003e« fortune\" s^is^rSfr^^X-;,^^^^^^^^^^^ In confusion, Fleda snatched her hand awav \" nn^ t^' ^- Y rSr\";\" ^\"^^ '''' -pa\"X yet gSr.5: Fleda took both her handa \" n.* t wh. has happened her^t sai^t^LSr'\" ^^a? JSZ4X' '\"'' \"''*^- \"^\"^ •\"'-■\" *'•• ai^latn\"\" \"^'^ ''^ ^'^ ^^^'\" '\" ^'^\u003c^ ^^''^ »",
         "great Ml THE WORLD FOR SALE \" The Montreal doctor said that the chances were even,\" answered Madame Bulteel. \" This man from the States says it is a sure thing.\" With a murmur Fleda sank into a chair, and a faintness came over her. \" That's not like a Romany,\" remarked old Rhodo. \"No, it's certainly not Uke a Romany,\" remarked Madame Bulteel",
         "meaningly. CHAPTER XXIII THE RETURN OF BELISARIUS Grey days in the prairie country do not come very often, but they are very depressing when they arrive. The landscape is not of the luscious kind; it has no close cor-respondence with a picture byCorot or Constable ; sunlight IS needed to give it the touch of the habitable and the homehke. It was, therefore, unfortunate for the spirits of the Lebanon people that the meeting summoned by local agitators to discuss with asperity affairs on both sides of the Sagalac should, while starting with fitful sunhght m the eariy morning, have developed to a bleak greyness by three o'clock in the afternoon, the time set for the meeting. Another strike was imminent in the factories at Manitou and in the railway-shops at Lebanon, due to the stupidity of the policy of Ingolby's successor as to the raUways and other financial and manufacturing interests. If he had planned a campaign of maladroitness he could not have more happily fulfilled his object. It was not a good time for reducing wages, or for quarrelling with the Town Councils of Manitou and Lebanon concerning assess-ments and other matters. November and May always found Manitou, as though to say, \" upset.\" In the former month, men were pouring through the place on their way to the shanties for their Winter's work, and generally celebrating their coming internment by \"irriga-tion;\" in the latter month, they were returning from their Winter's imprisonment, thirsty for excitement, and with",
         "299 soo THE WORLD FOR SALE pass ng through on his way to the woodsA^natu.^ InH tK r ',°\"*r!.^\" practically whipped into action, and the Councils of the two towns were sting into bitter- ness against the new provocative raUway policy. Thin£» l^df»,'^\"?''\"°\"^- The trouble between the LoS and the change of control and policy of the railways building values m Lebanon, and a black eye, as it were Lad been given to the whole district for the moment »!^,.^T^\\'^ *•** '\"\"''\"°\" *«\u003e«\" \"gadded that the ?nt»M °' ^'«\"«\u003e\"' «'th Halliday the lawyer and another notable citizen, all friends of Ingolby, had •' gone East \"l a^ a journey to Montreal, Toronto, or Quebec was generally of heT .° l '^ ^''^ *\"'' '\"*'''' \"PP\"'^ '° *h« directorate hi- f tl K^'T- ^^y *«\"* ^^^ «\"•»« elation and hope, for they had arguments of an unexpected kind in their possession, carefully hidden from the rest of the population They had returned only the day before the meeting which was to be held in the square in front of the Town HaU, to find that a platform had been built at the very steps of the Town Hall with the assent of the One Constable now recovered from illness and retuiBed A^T/' JV^\" ^!P\"*y ^'\"y\"^ *\"d the Council, the Chief Constable, on the advice of Gabriel Druse, had said that It was far better to have the meeting in front of the TowTi Hall where he could, on the instant, summon special constables from within if necessary, while the influe^e of a well-built platform and the orderly arrangement of a tTof aThTrlr \"^\"^ ^'^^\" ^ '\"°'' \"^^\"°\" '-\" *he r..2'L',r'7r '\"\"'\"°\"'- ^\" ^ \"l^y °^ ^\"\"shine the rebeUious and discontented spirit docs not thrive; on",
         "a THE RETURN OF BELISARIUS 301 wet day it it apt to take shelter; on a bleak, grey day men are prone to huddle together in their anger with consequent stimulation of their passions. It was a grey enough day at Ubanon, and dark-faced visitors from Manitou felt the need of Winter clothing as they shiveringly crossed the Sagalac by Ingolby's bridge. The air was raw and searching; Nature was sulky. In the sharp wind the trees shook themselves angrily free of leaves. The taverns were greatly frequented, which was not good for Manitou and Lebanon. Up to the time of the meeting, however, the expected strike had not occurred. This was mainly due to the fact that Felix Marchand, the evil genjus of Manitou, had not been seen in the town or in the district for over a week. It was not generally known that he was absent because a man by the name of Dennis, whose wife he had wronged, was dogging him with no good intent. Marchand had treated the woman's warning viith contempt, but at sight of her injured husband he had himself withdrawn from the scene of his dark enterprises. His malign influence was therefore not at work at the moment. '^^ The tactics of the Lebanon Town Council had been careful and wise. So that the meeting should not be composed only of the roughest elements, they privately urged all responsible citizens to attend, and if possible capture the meeting for law and order and legitimate agitation. That was why Osterhaut, the town-crier, went about with a large dinner-bell announcing the hour of the meeting and admonishing all \"good folks\" to attend. No one had ever seen Osterhaut quite so cheerful— and he had a bonny cheerfulness on occasion — as on this grisly October day when Nature was very sour and the spirit of the winds was in a \" scratchy \" mood. But Osterhaut was not more cheerful than Jowett who, in a very un-dignified way, described the state of his feelings, on re-ceiving a certain confidence from Halliday, the",
         "lawyer, SOS THE WORLD FOR SALE mon^.!^ ^-operation wa. directed against the com- ^rtn^., 1 ' *\"\". *\"• '\"•»• ''°*«^«'' *«e able to fo^?na . T '°\"8 '\"\"\"I* to have the resolution passed for fo™ th- r '' *.^\"' *^* \"\"\"•* °' those who were to A^rA? ^\"\"I'ttee were being selected, in a storm of disorder ansmg from the Manitou section of the crow™the «,^U*!.'! ri*\"V *\", *••\" \"tonishment of all, there ap- K. ♦K* ^'^ °' *^* P^\"o\"» between Jowett «d vanisned from their calcuiatio..;-. It was th*ir ^m ch^on, Ingolby. Slowly a hush ciLe^erlhe vS S™ 1, ■ *PP*^*°\"y 8»id«d by his friends on toe platform, he was given a seat on the right of the Chairman's he w^Totin^h. -.^\" \"\" ^\"° ^\"\"^ « ^»\u003e»»on, but ne was not m the picture now. His day was done. It was no place for him. Yet it was a pleasant om^n",
         "tha^ THE RETURN OF BELISARIUS 803 the tan broke clear and shining over the platform at Ingolby took his seat. Ppsently in the silence he half- tunied hu head, murmured something to the Chairman, and then got to his feet, stretching out a hand towards the crowd. For one moment there was silence, a little awe-stricken, a httle painful, and then as from one man a great cheer went up. For a moment they had thought him incon-siderate to come among them in this crisis, for he was no longer of their scheme of things, and must be counted out, a beaten, battered, blind bankrupt. Yet the sight of him on his feet was too much for them. Blind he might be, but there was the personality which had conquered them m the past— brave, adroit, reckless, renowned. None of them, or very few of them, had seen him since that night at Barbaion's Tavern, yet in spite of his tragedy there seemed Mttle change in him. There was the same quirk at the comer of the mouth, the same humour in the strong face, not so ruddy now; and strangely enough the eyes were neither guarded by spectacles, nor were they shiiinken, glazed, or diseased, so far as could be seen. Stretching out a hand Ingolby gave a crisp laugh and said: \"So there's been troi-bk- sLice I've been gone, has there ?\" The comer of his mouth quirked, his eyelids drooped in the old quizzical way, and the crowd laughed in spite of themselves. What a spirit he had to take it aU that way. \" Got a little deeper in the mire, have you, boys ?\" he added. \" They tell me the town's a frost just now. but it seems nice and warm here in the sun. Yes, boys, it's nice and warm here among you all— the same good old crowd that's made the two towns what they are. The same good old crowd,\" he repeated, \" —and up to the same old games I\" ^^ At this point he could scarcely proceed for laughter. \"Like true pioneers,\" he wvA CT, \"wt Satisfle ,",
         "\\ith. 804 THE WORLD FOR SALE It by his blinSs- I^hV. ^\"^''* ^^ ^\"^ ^\"^ \"\"^de softer JmlL r- \"\"'^ ''\"P'\" '\" '\"^'\"'er and with thai something m his voice and face V^t ;t ,«o^ Vu *\"\" ^?\" Presently his hand shot out again •• Th. =, crowd !\" he said \" T„ct *., ^ , ^^^ ^^\"^ °M looking for trouble-looking ^orTrouhrr?''\" '°'^''^\" 1^ Barager. there you",
         "^m^^^J^^:^:^^ THE RETORN OF BELISARIUS 306 t^^r* ^?^ \"\"\"\"\" McLeary.\" The last named was the butt of every tavern and every street comer. \" There you are, Berry-H)id brown Berry; my barber.\" r^lL M *^* \"\"\"\"^ ^^ °°* 1\"'*« understand, did not he nann M, but preset ly, as Berry the barber threw up his hands v.t , a faket -, cry of understanding, there was a s.multan«.-us, wiid ;ush forward to the platform He sees, boys— he sees I\" they shouted. commS'' ^\"\"^ '*'°* \"'' ^^\"^ *''*'\" ^'^^ '^ 8««*\"« °' .il7-^' ^^' } *^*~^ '*' y°\" »\"• I'™ cured- My hf LMT '■f':^' f«t*^^*'* \"-ore \"-he snatched from h.s pocket a folded sheet of paper and held it aloft- .Z^ ! Il^'^'i''^ *'°* \"y commission to do the old job a«am; to boss the railways, to help the two towns. The Mayor brought .t back from Montreal yesterday; and ogether, boys together, we'll make Manitou and Jbanon Irl^nT\" °^*^' '^''*' *•\"' '^^'^ ^y ^hich to swing prosperity round our centre.\" The platform swayed with the wild enthusiasm of the crowd stormmg it to shake hands with him, when sud-denly a bell rang out across the river, wildly, clamorously. A bell only rang hke that for a fire. Those on the platform could see a horseman galloping across the bridge. A moment later someone shouted, \" It's the Cathohc church at Manitou on fire",
         "!\" CHAPTER XXiy AT LONG LAST Originally the Catholic church at Manitou had stood quite by itself, well back from the river, but as the town grew its dignified isolation was invaded and houses kept creeping nearer and nearer to it. So that when it caught fire there was general danger, because the town possessed only a hand fire-engine. Since the first settlement of the place there had been but few fires, and these had had pretty much their own way. When one broke out the plan was to form a long Une of men, who passed buckets of water between the nearest pump, well, or river, and the burning building. It had been useful in incipient fires, but it was child's play in a serious outburst. The mourn-ful fact that Manitou had never equipped itself with a first-class fire-engine or a fire-brigade was now to play a great part in the future career of the two towns. Oster- haut put the thing in a nutsheU as he slithered up the main street of Lebanon on his way to the manning of the two fire-engines at the Lebanon fire-brigade station. This thing is going to link up Lebanon and Manitou like a trace-chain,\" he declared with a chuckle. \" Every-thing's come at the right minute. Here's Ingolby back on the locomotive, running the good old train of Progress, and here's Ingolby's fire-brigade, which cost Lebanon twenty thousand dollars and himself five thou-sand, going to put out the fires of hate consuming two loving hamulets. Out with Ingolby's fire-brigade ! This is the day the doctor ordered I Hooray !\" Osterhaut had a gift of being able to do two things at",
         "306 AT LONG LAST 307 ^id i^v^. JIT'^J\"*\" *^*«**' •* ^ l\"\"^ certain he could have talked under water. His words had Wn Sf^^fdiVsT*'\"'\"'^''^*\"^''\"\"\"^\"^-^*^^^^^^^^^ w« 1^ * regiment to the main body. Jowett views, but on this occasion they were of one mind. \" wi ^\"^'^ '* ' Ingolby's day all right,\" answered Jowett .^'?J°u '*y \"°°'^y '' Osterhaut, I agree, but Wve got better breath'n I have. I can't talk like I used tTbut ll^X^^\" f ' '^^' ^'^■^\"e'\"« t° «^ve the old Mon- seenoor s church— or bust.\" Both Jowett and Osterhaut belonged to the Lebanon ptSon^\"'.'t was composed of o'nly a few pemanent profession^, helped by capable amateurs. The two bZ'helmets't/'^' ^\"' ^ ^^ moments later^Lri^g vn'.ir^'^^w'l.*''^ ^^^^ \u003c^°'\" '^^'^ Osterhaut. \"Did you see what happened to him ?\" Esn2f '\"°J:!'?- , \" ^^* \u003c^° y°\" *'»'\"'' M^' Max Ingolby rawbone I bought from the Reverend Tripple, and awav knorl^'j^^'\"'\"'^ \"Shtning over the bridge I S know why I drove that trotter to-day, nor why I went 1 that sulky, for I couldn't hear good where I was on the fnl T ^^! ^^'^^ 'P°\"«\u003c^ ■\"« s°on as the fire-bell rung. In a second he bundled me off, straddled the sX and was away 'fore you could say snakes.\" ^' «in'f \u003c,*^K* ^^\"^vil'e's strong enough for aU this. He ^teruttgely.^'\"^ '^ \"\" •\"^\"^^ ^^ ^-'\" -\"\u003e- \"^ \" War-that business at Barbazon's ! You call that war. It wasn't war,\" declared Jowett",
         "spasmTdlcSy, 308 THE WORLD FOR SALE grasping the rail of the fire-engine as the wheel struck a stone and nearly shot them from their seats. \" It wasn't war. It was terrible low-down treachery. That Gipsy gent, Fawe, pulled the lever, but Marchand buUt the scaffold.\" \" Heard anything more about Marchand— where he is ?\" asked Osterhaut, as the hoofs of the horses clattered on the bridge. \" Yes, I've heard— there's news,\" responded Jowett. \" He's been lying drunk at Gantry's caboose ever since yesterday morning at five o'clock, when he got off the West -bound train. Nice sort of guy he is. What's the good of being rich, if you can't be decent ! Some men are born low. They always find their level, no matter what's done for them, and Marchand's level is the ditch.\" \"Gautry's tavern- that joint,\" exclaimed Osterhaut with repulsion. \" Well, that ranchman, Dennis What's-his-name, is looking for him, and Felix can't go home or to the usual places. I dunno why he comes back at all till this Dennis feller gits out.\" \" Doesn't make any bones about it, does he ? Dennis Doane's the name, ain't it ? Marchand spoiled his wife- run away with her up along the Wind River, eh ?\" asked Osterhaut. Jowett nodded: \" Yes, that's it, and Mr. Dennis Doane ain't careful; that's the trouble. He's looking for Mar-chand, and blabbing what he means to do when he finds him. That ain't good for Dennis. If he kills Marchand, it's murder, and even if the lawyers plead unwritten law, and he ain't huijg. and his wife ain't a widow, you can't have much married Ufe in gaol. It don't do you any good to be punished for punishing someone else. Jonas George Almighty— look I Look, Osterhaut !\" Jowett s hand was pointing towards the Cathohc church, from a window of which smoke was rolling.",
         "\"There's AT LONG LAST 300 going to be something to do there. It ain't a false alarm, anorty. \" Well, this engine'll do anything you ask it,\" rejoined Osterhaut. When did you have a fire last, Billy ?\" he shouted to the driver of the engine, as the horses' feet caught the dusty road of Manitou. \"Six months,\" was the reply, \"but she's working ^T/v, ?.,\"\"!'\"=;, ^'\"''* =\" eood as anything 'twixt here and the Atlantic.\" •' ^*„*'\".'^ V™* ^°^ W'\"**\"\" ''■■\"s- I wonder what set it going, said Jowett, shaking his head ominously. Something wrong with the furnace, I s'pose,\" returned ^erhaut. \"Probably trying the first h^t-up of the Osterhaut was right. No one had set the church on fire. The sexton had lighted the furnace for the first time to test It for the Winter's working, but had not stayed to see the result. There was a defect in the furnace, the place had caught fire, and some of the wooden flooring had been burnt before the aged Monseigneur Lourde dis-covered It. It was he who had given the alarm and had rescued the silver altar-vessels from the sacristy. Manitou offered brute force, physical energy, native athletics, muscle and brawn ; but it was of no avail. Five hundred men, with five hundred buckets of water would have had no effect upon the fire at St. Michael's Church at Manitou; wilhng hands and loving Christian hearts would have been helpless to save the building without the scientific aid of the I^banon fire-brigade. Ingolby. on founding the brigade, had equipped it to the point where it could deal with anv ordinary fire. The work it had to do at St Michael s was critical. If the church could not be saved then the wooden houses by which it was surrounded would be swept away, and the whole town would be ablaze; for though it was Autumn, everything was",
         "dry 310 THE WORLD FOR SALE wind was sufficient to fan and spread the and the flames. Lebanon took command of the whole situation, and for the first time in the history of the two towns men worked together under one control like brothers. The red-shirted nver-dnver from Manitou and the lawyer's clerk from Ubanon ; the Presbyterian minister and a Christian brother of the Catholic school; a Salvation Army captain and a black-headed Catholic shantyman; the President of the Order of Good Templars and a switchman member of the Confraternity of the Blessed Sacrament slaved together on the hand-engine, to supplement the work of the two splendid engines of the Lebanon fire-brigade- or else they climbed the roofs of houses, side by side to throw on the burning shingles the buckets of water handed up to them. For some time it seemed as though the church could not be saved. The fir? had made good headway with the flooring, and had also made progress in the chancel and the altar. Skill and organization, combined with good luck, conquered, however. Though a portion of the roof was destroyed and the chancel gutted, the church was not beyond repair, and a few thousand doUars would put it nght. There was danger, however, among the smaUer houses surrounding the church, and there men from both towns worked with great gallantry. By one of those accidents which make fatality, a small wooden house some distance away, with a roof as dry as wool, caught fire from a flying cinder. As everybody had fled from their own homes and shops to the church, this fire was not noticed until it had made headway. Then it was that the cries of Madame Thibadeau, who was confined to her bed m the house opposite, were heard, and the crowd poured down towards the burning building. It was Gantry's \" caboose.\" Gautry himself had been among the crowd at the",
         "church, AT LONG LAST 311 As Gautry came reeling and plunging down the street, someone shouted, \" Is there anyone in the house, Gautry ?\" Gautry was speechless with drink. He threw his hands up m the air with a gesture of maudlin despair, and shouted something which no one understood. The crowd gathered like magic in the wide street before the house— the one wide street in Manitou— from the roof and upper windows of which flames were bursting. Far up the street was heard the noisy approach of the fire-engine, which now would be able to do little more than save adjoining build-ings. Gautry, reeling, mumbling and whining, gestured and wept. A man shook him roughly by the shoulder. \" Brace up, get steady, you damned old geezer ! Is there anybody in the house ? Do you hear ? Is there anybody in the house ?\" he roared. Madame Thibadeau, who had dragged herself from her bed, was now at the window of the house opposite. Seeing Fleda Druse passing beneath, she called to her. \" Ma'm'selle, Fehx Marchand is in Gantry's house drunk,\" she cried. \" He'll bum to death— but yes, bum to death.\" In agitation Fleda hastened to where the stranger stood shaking old Gautry. \" There's a man asleep inside the house,\" she said to the stranger, and then all at once she realized who he was. It was Dennis Doane, whose wife was staying in Gabriel Druse's home: it was the husband of Marchand's victim. \" A man in there, is there ?\" exclaimed Dennis. \" Well, he's got to be saved.\" He made a rush for the door. Men called to him to come back, that the roof would fall in. In the smoking doorway he looked back. \" What floor ?\"\" he shouted. From the window opposite, her fat old face lighted by the blazing roof, Madame Thibadeau called out, \" Second floor 1 It's the second floor",
         "I\" 312 THE WORLD FOR SALE In an instant Dennis was lost in the smoke and flame. In . L ''V*^'*^™\"\"*'* I^'**- ^ fire-engine arrived; tea moment the hose was paid out to the river near by fh. K u \"T\" ^T^ *•\u003e* \"\"\"\"^ *° t«in the water upon «.e bu.ld.ng the roof M m with a crash. At tha* inst«? Denms stumbled out of the house, blind with sm^ke, hi, h^nnf '^%?'''^\"« * • in his arms. A score of d^^ T^K****\"\"' ~**' ^-nothered Dennis's burning ctothes, and the man he had rescued was carried acros! the street and laid upon the pavement. \"Great glory, it's Marchandl It's Felix Marchandl\" someone shouted. \" Is he dead ?\" asked another. J^^^ ^\"^^l- \"** *''* comment of Osterhaut, who had helped to carry him across the street. '\"^af'^,1i.Tr?\"V'°«?''7 ''PP**''\"^ \"^ tJ'e scene. ch!^H .. w ■ ^^ \\ '^^- '^''° ^^ recognized Mar- chand. Hes been playing with fire again,\" he added wrcasticaUy, and there was a look of contempt on his {.X^t l\"**-.\"' cf\"™' ''\"'\"' ^^\"\"\"^ *'»e crowd and made faL Stooping over, he looked into Marchand's \"Hell and damnation-you !\" he growled. \"I risked my l.fe to save you I\" With a sudden access of rage his hand suddenly went to t^hLt'orFTdff)!^:. \"•\"*'''' \"^' *- •^'^'''-- ^* -- \" No-no,\" she said, her fingers on his wrist. \" You have had your revenge. For the rest of his life he will have to bear his punishment-that you have saved him. l.eave him alone. It was to be. It is fate \" If hrr^t I^^^e ^as not a man of great thinking capacity. 1 JTf ? **!; '\"*° ^' ^'^ ■* *t»ye\u003cl thererill it was dislodged, and dislodging was a real business",
         "with AT LONG LAST SIS I If you want her to live with you again, you had better ' '***!\"* be M 't 1».\" whispered Fleda, for the crowd were surging round and cheering the new hero. „ l^^ escaped the roof falling in.\" said one. Got the strength of two. for a drunk man weighs twice M heavy as a sober one.\" exclaimed another admiringly, third dwS ' **\"\" '' \"'' °\" '''* Sagalac,\" declared a The excitement was so great, however, that only a very kn'I™^ f'lS \u003e\u003cnew what they were saying, and fewer stiU knew th. t Dennis Doane had risked his hfe to save the man he had been stalking for weeks past. Marchand had been lying on his face m the smoke-fiUed room when Dennis t\u003ehll°K- i ' *!!'*. *•* ^'^ '^\" «^ed down the stairs without his face being seen at all. To Dennh it was as though he had been made a fool of by Fate or Providence, or whatever controlled the destinies of men ; as though the dangerous episode had been arranged to trap him into this situation. Ingolby drew near and laid a hand upon Dennis's arm. Fleda s hand was on the other arm. \" You can't kill a man and save him too.\" said Ingolbv qtnetly. and holding the abashed bl,ie eyes of Demiis. There were two ways to punish him; taking away his We at great cost, or giving it him at great cost. If you'd taken away his life, the cost would probably have been your own uie; in giving him his life you only risked your own; you haa a chance to save it. You're a bit scorched -hair, eyebrows, moustache, clothes too, but he'll have bnmstone inside him. Come along. Your wife would St along.\"\"* *'\" \"^^= ^\"\"^ \" ^' y-' *— w. „ ^ennis suddenly swung round with a gesture of fury. He spoiled her-treated her like dirt.\" he cried huskily. WW. u'*?**., ?'?\"\"' •\"\" \"^\"^^ * movement towari where Marchand had lain ; but Marchand was gone.",
         "With m THE WORLD FOR SALE foiwight Ingolby had quickly and quietly accomplished that wh e Dennis's back was turned. , \\ y,?y\\^ treating her like a brute if you went to prison for killmgMarchand,\" urged Ingolby. \" Give her a chance, bhe s fretting her heart out.\" \"She wants to go back to Elk Mountain with you,\" r*^^,f '^* 8'°*'y- \" ^^ ^\"l^'t do that if the law took hold of you. \" Ain't there to be any punishment for men like him ?\" demanded Dennis, stubbornly yet helplessly. \"Why didnt I let him bum I I'd have been wUUng to burn myself to have seen him sizzHng. Ain't men Uke that to be pumshed at all ?\" \"When he knows who has saved him, he'U sizzle inside tor the rest of his life,\" remarked Ingolby. \" Don't think he hasn't got a heart. He's done wrong and gone wrong i he has belonged to the sewer, but he isn't aU bad, and maybe this is the turning-point. Drink'U make a man do anything.\" \"His kind are never sorry for what they do,\" commented Dennis bitterly. \"They're sorry for what comes from what they do, but not for the doing of it. I can't think the thing out. It makes me sick. I was hunting for him to kill him; I was watching this town Uke a lynx, and I've been and gone and saved his body from Hell on earth.\" ' Well, perhaps you've saved his soul from Hell below \" said Fleda. \"Ah, come! Your face and hands are burned your hair is scorched— your clothes need mending. ArabeUa IS waiting for you. Come home with me to Arabella.\" .. !!^'^- ^^^^^^ '■^^'^^ ^®\"\"'^ squared his shoulders. All nght, ' he said. \" This thing's too much for me. I can t get the hang of it. I've lost my head.\" \" No, I won't come, I can't come now,\" said Ingolby m response to an inquiring look from Fleda. \" Not now' but before sundown, please.\"",
         "' AT LONG LAST 818 As Fleda and Dennis disappeared, Ingolby looked back towards the fire. \" How good it is to see again even l sight like that,\" he said. \" Nothing that the eyes see is so hornble as the pictures that come to the mind when the , eyes don t see. As Dennis said, 1 can't get the hang ol It, but I'll try— I'll try.\" The burning of Gautry's tavern had been conquered, though not before it was a shell; and the houses on either side had been saved. Lebanon had shown itself masterful m organization, but it haa also shown that that which makes enemies is not so deep or great a thing as that which makes friends. Jealous, envious, narrow and bitter, Manitou had been, but she now saw Lebanon in a new light. It was a strange truth that if Lebanon had saved the whole town of Manitou, it would not have been the same to the people as the saving of the church. Beneath everything in Manitou— beneath its dirt and its drunkenness, its irresponsibility and the signs of primeval savagery which were part of its life, there was the tra- dition of religion, the almost fanatical worship of that which was their master, first and last, in spite of all— the Church. Not one of its citizens but would have turned with horror from the man who cursed his baptism ; not one but would want the last sacrament when his time came. Lebanon had saved the Catholic church, the temple of their faith, and in an hour was accomplished what years had not wrought. The fire at the church was out. A few houses had been destroyed, and hundreds of others had been saved. The fire-bngade of Lebanon, with its two engines, had per-formed prodigies of valour. The work done, the men marched back, but with Osterhaut sitting on one fire- engine and Jowett on the other, through crowds of cheer-ing, roaring workmen, rivermen, shantymen, and black- eyed habitants. When Ingolby walked past Barbazon's Tavern arm in arm with Monseigneur Lourde, to the",
         "tiny THE WORLD FOR SALE houM where the good priest lived, the old nuui't f«» bewMng with gratitude, and with . piety which w. hi. d^ '\"£:*'« J»l\u003eil«t crowd foUowed them to the very tl^T^nl^!!' u • •f'\"*'^ P'\"\"**'\" ««Pr«»««l the feeling ol Srr JLdt'\" '• \"''^ •'^ ^-\"\"^ - '-\"«\"'*- -er Lord make his face to shine upon you and give you peace now and for ever more.\" *• o you",
         "peace CHAPTER XXV MAN PROPOSES Before sunset, as Ingolby had promised, he made his way towards Gabriel Druse's house. A month had gone since he had left its hospitaUty behind. What had hap-pened between that time and this day of fate for Lebanon and Manitou ? It is not a long story, and needs but a brief backward look. This had happened : The New York expert performed the operation upon Ingolb/s eyes, announced it successful, declared that his sight would be restored, and then vanished with a thousand dollars in his pocket. For days thereafter the suspense was almost more than Fleda could bear. She grew sud-denly thin and a httle worn, and her big eyes had that look of yearning which only comes to those whose sorrow IS for another. Old Gabriel Druse was emphatic in his encouragement, but his face reflected the trouble in that of his daughter. He knew well that if Ingolby remained bhnd he would never marry Fleda, though he also knew well that, with her nature, almost fanatical in its con-victions, she would sacrifice herself, if sacrifice was the name for it. The New York expert had prophesied and promised, but who could tell ! There was the chance of failure, and the vanished eye-surgeon had the thousand dollars in his pocket. Two people, however, were cheerful; they were Ingolby and Jim. Jim went about the place humming a nigger melody to himself, and twice he brought Berry the barber to play to his Chief on the cotton-field fiddle. Nigger",
         "317 us THE WORLD FOR SALE Jim, though It was two generations gone which linked him with the wilds of the Gold Coast, was the slave of lanatical imagination, and in Ingolby's own mind there was the persistent superstition that all would be well because of a dream he had had. He dreamed he heard nis dead mother's voice in the room, where he lay. She had called him by name, and had said, \" Look at me, Max, and he had replied, \" I cannot see,\" and she had said again. Look at me, my son!\" Then he tiought that he had looked at her, had seen her face clearly, and it was as the last time they parted, shining and swwt and good. She had said to him in days long gone, that if she could ever speak to him across the Void, she would; and he had the fullest belief now that she had done so. So it was that this dreadnought of industry and organiza-tion, in dock for repairs, cheerfully awaited the hour when he would be launched again upon the tide of work- healthy healed and whole. At last there came the day vjen, for an instant, the bandages could be removed. There were present, Rockwell. Fleda, and Jim-Jim, pale but gnnmng, at the foot of the bed; Fleda, with her bwk against the door and her hands clenched behind her as though to shut out the invading world. Never had her hwrt beat as it beat now, but her eyes were steady and bnght. There was in them, however, a kind of pleading look She could not see Ingolby's face; did not want to see It when the bandages were taken off; but at the critical moment she shut her eyes and her back held the door, as though a thousand were trying to force an entrance. The first words after the bandages were removed came from Ingolby. •' Well, Jim, you look all right I\" he said. Swaying as she went, Fleda half-blindly moved towards a chair near by and sank into it. She scarcely heard Jim's reply.",
         "^ MAN PROPOSES 319 \" Looking all right yourself. Chief. You won't see much Change m this here old town.\" Ingolby's hand was in Rockwell's. \" It's all right, isn't It ? he asked. ^ \"You can see it is,\" answered Rockwell with a chuckle mius voice, and then suddenly he put the bandages round I^olbys eyes again. \"That's enough for to^ay,\" he A moment later the bandages were secured and Rockwell stood back from the bed. \"In another week you'll see as well as ever you did \" Kockwellsaid. \" I'm proud of you.\" \" Well, I hope ru see a little better than ever I did \" Stfo:^\"''' '''^''- \"' \"^^ ^\"^''^ ''^°^- ♦•■^V^^* ir'*^* •** ^^^^ 'P'^da's footstep approaching the bed His senses had grown very acute since the advent of his bhndness. He held out his hand into space. .nf„^ w?r 'r™ ^^^ •' '\" ^ ^^ *= ^^^ fingers slid into his. It s the nicest room I was ever in. It's too nice for me. In a few days I'U hand the lease over again moS ir^''^ ^\"^ ^\"^ *° ^^^ P'^*y J'\" ^^P' ^ Stor- i*. \" ^*\"' l^^!^ *^'* ^y P'«P '° *-^^* sty now. Chief; but It s all ready, said Jim, indignant and sarcastic. It was a lucky speech. It broke the spell of emotion which was greatly straining everybody's endurance. That's one in the eye for somebody,\" remarked Rock-well drily. \"What would you like for lunch ?\" asked Fleda, letting go Ingolby s hand, but laying her fingers on his arm for a moment. 4.^u cu\"? •** ^^ *°'\" '\"\"'='' ' Here was a man back from the Shadows, from broken hopes and shattered career, from the helplessness and eternal patience of the blind: here he was on the hard, bright high-road again, with",
         "a •«» THE WORLD FOR SALE procession of restored things coming towards him. with life m«l!!L* *'*^°,'\"f erasp; and the woman to whom it mattered most of all, who was worth it aU, and more than all where he was concerned, said to him in this moment of reydation, \" What would you like for lunch ?\" With an air as casuaUy friendly as her own, he put another hand on the fingers lying on his arm, patted them. Md said gaJy, •• Anything I can see. As a drover once said to me, I can clean as fur as I can reach ' \" u»nt rV?*^.*.!^'\"P*^ '^ *^^y ^^ parted when he went back to his pigsty \" with Jim. To Gabriel Druse ne had said all that one man might say to another without excess of feeling; to Madame Bulteel he had given a gold pencil which he had always worn ; to Fleda he gave notWng, said little but the few words he did say told the story, if not the whole story. \"It's a nice room,\" he said, and she had flushed at his words, and I'vfc had the best time of my life in it. I'd hke to buy it, but I know ifs not for sale. Love and money couldn't buy it— isn't that so ?\" Then had come days in his own home, stiU with bandaged eyes, but with the bandages removed for increasing hours every day; yet no one at aU in the town knowing the truth except the Mayor, Halliday the lawyer, and one or two others who kept the faith until Ingolby gave them the word to speak. Then had come the Mayor's visit to Montreal, the great meeting, the fire at Manitou, and now ingolby on the way to his tryst with Fleda. They had met twice only since he had left Gabriel Druse's house, and on the last occasion they had looked each other full in the ey^, and Ingolby had said to her in the moment they had had alone: \" I'm going to get back, but I can't do it without you \" .u^°. ^''\" '■'P'y had been. \" I hope it's not so bad as that, and she had looked provokingly in his eyes. Now she knew beyond peradventure that he cared",
         "for MAN PROPOSES 321 caught his LdTherbeSh \"^* '\"T\" ^''^ ''^ Many a time when he wt 1 P*'\"°\" °^ *''*' \"\"\"\"\"^nt- She h^ad care::;rh3S£.^rhetr2s:h?\u003c^^ not count, because he did not know H^ HiH V\"^ y wnen X^banon and Manitou were reconciled the red and brov^'leav \" S^^^^^^^^ \"*°\"' \"'\"''*'' *^' '^* up gaunt arms to he Ce Ihl l^t \"'\" '^'l-^^^ vocal anH \u002b1, ■ • '*™'^'^' '\"6 woods Were no loneer t^r^ a ScktZfef nof %\"'' '^\u003c^' ''\"^'^''^ ^^^ -\" was busy and incr^Lw hi T ^\"\"^ *° '^^*«^ 1»^rte.,, across h6 path H^'!fn h f\"\" ^ e^°\"\"d-hog scuttle that one 'i h\" w^lltTle J'^r.'^!,\"' *^\"'\"S ^'^^ hog. and She had'LrdU!.\"^ he';etmt::l^?hrG\"\"'- name for ground.hog_Ao/cA.,„fcW w«\"Kord N^ as the shapeless creature made for ks hnlJ^t ^' niflcant of the historv nf hJc rf ^ ■ **' '* \"^ ^'S\"",
         "21 322 THE WORLD FOR SALE of her seemed to come like a wave towards him. In his philosophy, intellect alone had never been the governing influence. Intellect must find its play through the senses, be vitaUzed by the elements of physical life, or it could' not prevail. There was not one sensual strain in him, but with a sensuous mind he loved the vital thing. He was sure that presently Gabriel Druse would disappear, leaving her behind with him. That was what he meant to ask her to-day— to be and stay with him always. He knew that the Romanys were gathering in the prairie. They had been heard of here and there, and some of them had been seen along the Sagalac, though he knew nothing of that dramatic incident in the woods when Fleda was kidnapped and Jethro Fawe vanished from the scene. As Fleda came towards him, under the same trees which had shieldeiJ her from the sun months ago— now nearly naked and bare— something in her look and bearing sharply caught his interest. He asked himself what it was. So often a face familiar over half a hfetime perhaps, suddenly at some new angle, or because, by chance, one has looked at it searchingly, shows a new expression, a new contour never before observed, giving fresh signifi-cance to the character. There was that in Ingolby's mind, a depth of desire, a resolve to stake two lives against the chances of Fate, which made him look at Fleda now with a revealing intensity. What was the new thing in her carriage which captured his eye ? Presently it flashed upon him— memories of Mexico and the Southern United States; native women with jars of water upon their heads; the erect, well-balanced form; the sure, sinuous movement; the step measured, yet free; the dignity come of carrying the head as though it were a pillar of an Athenian temple, one of the beautiful Caryatides yonder by the Mgean Sea. It smote him as a sudden breath of warm air strikes a face in the night coolness of the veldt. His pulses quick-ened, he flushed with the soft shock of it. There she",
         "was. MAN PROPOSES 323 remote-brS\"^^.!, eT\"'\"'* .*\"'' ^\"\"^t, something Starzke; suppose that it sS:!'\"'' \"\"'' \"' '\"\"^ ^^- to him, she smUed, sho^ngthriVr ^l\"?' '\"\"\"^ ^'°^ her eyes softened to a Tamy reS Ltll' tV'\"' ?\"\"' ever felt for h^r .„ *i. \"'\"J' '^egara of him, all he had into tS ?n?mo;.m^ ^Y^the'dS ^^r ^^ \"*^^*^\u003c* gnishiag lover- raXr li J!! • t \"?* ^°°^ '\"''« ^ 'an- or st^fd t^'grTaSeioir^ \"'^\"^'^ \"^*^ ^ ^-^^ •\u003c^- woSd SMe'-S: tShireaKtle^s^'^--^'' ^^^^ «^s all eager, yet timorZ^ he was Sv.d'^''; ^^^ when the great moment h;d co^e 2 wLf V^^' stammerer fearing the sound of Us own voVe ' TvT ^ w.« so much to say that he could not sp^ak ^''^ She broke the spell. \" I am here \u003e?„.* ' «fc,\" lue eyes now lookme mto hprs anri",
         "*„n- 824 THE WORLD FOR SALE all that was between them, or was to be between them, its real meaning. A beautiful woman is dear to man simply as woman, and not as the woman; virtue has slain its thou-sands, but physical charm has slain its tens of thoiisands I Whatever Ingolby's defects, however, infinitely more than the girl's beauty, more than the palpitating life in her, than red lips and bright eye, than warm breast and clasping hand, was something beneath all which would last, or should last, when the hand was palsied and the eye was dim. \" / am here. Can't you see me ?\" All that he had regained in life in her little upper room rushed upon him, and with outstretched arms and in a voice choked with feeling, he said : ' ' See you ! Dear God To see you and all the world •nee more I It is being bom again to me. I haven't learned to-^lk in my new world yet ; but I know three words of the language. I love you. Come — I'll be good to you.\" She drew back from him, and her look said that she would read him to the uttermost word in his Ufe's book, would see the heart of this wonderful thing; and then with a hungry cry, she flung her arms around his neck and pressed her wet eyes against his flushed cheek. A half-hour later, as they wandered back to the house he suddenly stopped, put his hands on her shoulders, looked earnestly in her eyes, and said: \" God 's good to me. I hope I'll remember that.\" \" You won't be so blind as to forget,\" she answered, and she wound her fingers in his with a feeling which was more than the simple love of woman for man. \" I've got much more to remember than you have,\" she added. Suddenly she put both hands upon his breast. \" You don't understand; you can't understand, but I tell you that I shall have to fight hard if I am to be all you want me to be. I have got a past to forget; you have a",
         "past MAN PROPOSES 326 yon want to remember— that's the difference. I must tell you the truth: it's in my veins, that old life, in spite of all. Listen. I ought to have told you, and I meant to tell you before this happened, but when I saw you there, and you held out your arms to me, I forgot everything. Yet still I must tell you now, though perhaps you will hate me when you know. The old Ufe— I hate it, but it calls me, and I have an impulse to go back to it even though I hate it. ^ Listen. I'll tell you what happened the other day. It's terrible, but it's true. I was walking in the woods \" Thereupon she told him of her being seized and carried . to the Gipsy camp, and of all that happened there to the last detail. She even had the courage to tell of all she felt there; but when she had finished, with a half -frightened look in her eyes, her face pale, and her hands clasped before, her, he did not speak for a minute. Suddenly, however, he seemed to tower over her, his two big hands were raised as though they would strike, and then the palms spread out and enclosed her cheeks lovingly, and his eyes fastened upon hers. \" I know,\" he said gently. \" I always understood— everything; but you'U never have the same fight again, because I'll be with you. You understand, Fleda— I'll be with you.\" With an exclamation of gratitude she nestled into his arms. Before the thrill of his embrace had passed from their pulses, they heard the breaking of twigs under a quick footstep, and Rhodo stood before them. \" Come,\" he said to Fleda. His voice was as solemn and strange as his manner. peremptorily. Fleda sprang to his side. has happened ?\" she cried. The old man waved her aside, and pointed towards the house. \" Come !\" he repeated ' Is it my father ?",
         "What CHAPTER XXVI THE SLEEPER L?«n^v ^ ?^' ^^ 1° '^^ ''\"Se armchair, his broad-brimmed c'^ajr-arm the other clasped the hat as though he would punt on, but his head was fallen forward on Ws brea^ It was a picture of profound repose, but it was the \"X °^t'\"l''- '* \"\"^ ^^'\u003c^«\"* that the Ryha^ pTLJS S£7o hU r- ^^ '*\" '^ ^\"'^'^«° weaLss,^aLd^S taken to his chair to recover himself. As was evident from the normal w^y in which his fingers held Ws hat and his ha^d rested on the chair-arm, death had come as gent^J as a beam of light. With his stick lying on the^Se ^ide him, and his hat on his knee, he wfs hke one ^o rested a moment before renewing a journey, liere coidd not have been a pang in his passing. £ had gone as most men wish to go-in the midst of the business of Hfe domg the usual things, and so passing intoX^ sph/re of Etenuty as one would go f^om this room to tha? Only a few days before had he yielded up hirtemoorai^ position as chief constable, and had spent ^mo\"C[^ planned would never be known to his daughter now It was Rh«lo himself who had found his maffer vTh head bowed before the Master of all men Before Fleda entered the room she knew what awaited Zl^ \"C' \"' \"'f \"\" \"^^ \"\"\"*-^ t^« Sc tThe? senses. Yet wnen she saw the Ry on his thronp of rt.oti, a moan broke from her lips hke tLt of one who seS'S the last time someone indeUbly dear, and tu^s",
         "t^faL THE SLEEPER 327 strange paths with uncertain feet. She did no^ go to the giant figure seated in the chair. In what she did there was no panic or hysteria of lacerated heart and shocked sense; she only sank to her knees in the room a tew feet away from him, and looked at him \" Father ! Oh, Ry I Oh, my Ry !\" she whispered in agony and admiration, too, and kept on whispering. Fleda had whispered to him in such awe, not only because he was her father, but because he was so much a man among men, a giant, with a great, lumbering mind, slow to conceive, but moving in a large, impressive way when once conception came. To her he had been mote than father; he had been a patriarch, a leader, a viking, capable of the fury of a Scythian lord, but with the tender-ness of a peasant father to his first child. \"MyRy! My father ! Oh, my Ry of Rys !\" she kept murmunng to herself. ^ On either side of h^r. but a few feet behind, stood Rhodo and Ingolby. Presently in a low, firm voice Rhodo spoke. •The Ry of Rys is dead, but his daughter must stand upon her feet, and in his place speak for him. Is It not weU with him ? He sleeps. Sleep is better than pain. Let his daughter speak.\" Slowly Fleda arose. Not so much what Rhodo had said as the meaning in his voice, aroused her to a situation which she must face. Rhodo had said that she must speak for her father. What did it mean ? -'.' ^^' '\"■ '* ^°\" ^^^ *° ^^y *° '\"^' ^°do ?■• she asked. What I have to say is for your ears only,\" was the low reply. \" I wiU go,\" said Ingolby. \" But is it a time for talk ?\" He made a motion towards the dead man. \" There are things to be said which can only be said now, and things to be done which can only be done according to what is said now,\" grimly remarked",
         "Rhodo. SS8 THE WORLD FOR SALE JLLT**\"- T *\" «\"»»•\" said Fleda to Ingolbv with cnair where the dead man sat. \" What is it vn.. «,..„**» say to me ?\" she asked Rhodo again ^°\" \"\"\"\"^ *** Must a Romany bare his soul before a stramrer ?\" ZXTkIs i: T.'' '\"''\" ^''° •\"\" bce^thfvr of a^ with lh.^p °^ l°\"« y*''\" '\"'^« \"° *°^ds fece to lace with the Ry s daughter now that he is cone ? M„st the^secret of the dead be spoken before the rXr ofthe the mrfw\"**'''* '\"\"\"' ^'*'* P^^'°\" *\" working i„ -hZ\"\"\"!\"\"* '*\"\"'''\"'\" •\"* \"'^''^ *° ^'\"'Ja- To Rhodo he added: I am not a robber of the dead. That's hi.,h fa^utmg talk. What I have of his was given to me by hfm She was for me If I could win her. He said so. Ss a free country. I will wait outside,\" he added to Fledl She made a gesture as though she would detain him thatt; o'ih'^ . that the hour of her fate was at hand and that the old hfe and the new were face to face, Rhodo standmg for one and she for the other. When they were alone. Rhodo's eyes softened, and he came near to her \" You asked me what I wished to teU you, he said. •' See then, I want to tell you that it is foryoutotaketheplaceof thedead Ry. Everywhere in he world where the Romanys wander they will rejoice to hear that a Druse rules us still. The word of the Ry of Rvs was law; what he wished to be done was done; what he wished to be undone was undone. Because of you he hid himself from his people; because of you I was for ever wandenng, keeping the peace by Hes for love of the Rv ai . for Jove of you.\" ■' His voice shook. \" Since your mother died-and .he was km of mme-you were to me the soul of the Romanv people everywhere. As a barren woman loves a child",
         "so THE SLEEPER 329 ^u iL^ ,*^^ \"^\"^ **\" P'*\"^- So it is I would have you 1\u003eB luler over ns, and I would serve you as I serv J your father until I, also, fall asleep \" \"^^ ^\"^ ^ '■ **\"\"^ r^ „,v ^•/J°«=« \"°^- \"I'^no longer a Romany. L^n ^- \"^/'^ ''^\"Shter, but I have not been a Romany smce I was iU in England. I wiU not goTck* Gorgio world. You believed my father when he .poke! «^. beheve me-I speak the truth. It was my fetter's £\u003e? kLv°\"''' ^ r^\"* ' \"■\"■ \"^^ \u003c^° ^hat I am now aoing. Nothing can alter me.\" tJ V\\ ^ *''*/ ^*'° ^^\"'^ '\" «*'\" a\"ve he is free from kt ^rafd fh °' *'\u003e«-P'\"\":''- -nd he will become the Ry of Kys, said the old man with sudden passion loravth^f wr\" ^,^^°^ '* '' '\"• \"' '^ \"^t\"\"* \"ood, and The old man raised both hands, and made a gesture as though he would drive her from his sight. My life has been wasted,\" he said. \" I wish I were Sh I'at '. '\"t ';\"■\" «^ «^\u003c^ ^'^ *he ^JaS man with the affection of a clansman for his chief „-^ .?\"^ \"/ ''°'^ *° ^'\"'- \" Rhodo ! Rhode !\" she said gently and sadly. \"Think of him and all he was and not of me. Suppose I had died in England-think oi rt in that way. Let me be dead to you and to all Romanys. and then you will think no evil.\" The old man drew himself up. \" Let no more be said \" herephed. \" Let it end here. The Ry of Rys is dead His body and all things that are his belong now to ht people, bay fareweU to him,\" he added, with",
         "authority. 330 THE WORLD FOR SALE \"You win take him away ?\" Fleda asked. hTS r^ **'\" ''''° ^*'' \"*• Say your farewelh.\" he added, with gesture of command. A cry of protest rose from Fleda's soul, and yet she knew buned by his own people where they would. and VrL' V ^T \"'u *^ *''' ^\"''^ ■\"*\"• »\"«» J'^\"*^ over t^e ^^ *'«^ '''^''- S''* •^''^ \"°* '^eJ' ♦» 'ook into she wished to keep this picture of him while she lived; ta« rH\"??*\"*!^' 'H'^ hand which held the hat upon the Sa It W ^*V'\"* '\"^ \"P°\" *•«= ^h^r-arm. Then, with a mist before her eyes, she passed from the",
         "room. CHAPTER XXVII THE WORLD FOR SALE thJly^ by magic, like the pictures of a dream out of and king. For months, hundreds of them had no[ Sll A clot of blood in the heart had been the verdict of th. tTS^'c^JfT\" \"\"^ *'''\"*'\"' had -S hi S; to T^e^^ r ^ ^ ?^ P^P'\" *° '^' °P«» P^rie near to Tekewan, s reservation. There, in the hours between the midnight and the dawn, aU Gabriel Drus^wS fnJh^^A /' ••'^ ^^\"^ \"\" \"^^'\"^ ^« Slept, were brought So^L? '\"^*^^'\"*° a Py«. as was the Romany wtv Nothmg personal of his chattels remained behkid -ni^ wa^tang-stick which lay beside him in the momTntof Ws death was the last thing placed upon the ovre Thpn came the match, and the flames made ashes of aU tWe things which once he called hi. own. Stan^L anart ShTslmr^t^'^ braves watched the ceremon^'l oTS witli a sympathy bom of primitive custom It was ^.11 in tune with the traditions of their race a ^eat^oJSntoi^aXr'trS^S\"- towards the East, to which aU^ waTdeSg^^oSu",
         "331 332 THE WORLD FOR SALE peoples turn their eyes. With it, all that was mortal of Gabriel Druse went to its hidden burial. Only to the Romany people would his last resting-place be known; it would be as obscure as the grave of him who was laid \" By Nebo's lonely mountain, On this side Jordan's wave.\" Many people from Manitou and Lebanon watched the long procession pass, and two remained until the last wagon had disappeared over the crest of the prairie. Behind them were the tents of the Indian reservation; before them was the alert mom and the rising sun; and ever moving on to the rest his body had earned was the great chief lovingly attended by his own Romany folk; while his daughter, forbidden to share in the cere-monial of race, rtemained with the stranger. With a face as pale and cold as the western sky, the desolation of this last parting and a tragic renunciation giving her a deathly beauty, Fleda stood beside the man who must hereafter be to her. father, people, and all else. Shuddering with the pain of this hour, yet resolved to begin the new life here and now, as the old life faded before her eyes, she turned to him, and, with the passing of the last Romany over the crest of the hill, she said bravely : \" I want to help you do the big things. They will be yours. The world is all for you yet.\" Ingolby shook his head. He had had his Moscow. His was the true measure of things now; his lesson had been learned; values were got by new standards; he knew in a real sense the things that mattered. \" I have you— the world for sale !\" he said, with the air | of one discarding a useless",
         "thing. GLOSSARY OF ROMANY WORDS Bosk — fiddle, noiso, music. Bor — an exclamation (literally, a hedge). Choi — lad. fellow, CA»— child, daughter, girl. Dadia — an exclamation. Dordi — an exclamation. Hotchewitchi — ^hedgehog. Kek — no, none. Koppa — blanket. Mi Duvel — ^My God. Palrin — small heaps of grass, or leaves, or twigs, or string, laid at cross-roads to indicate the roata that must be followed. PriU. — brother or friend. Rinkne takli — ^pretty girl Rj — King or ruler. Tan — tent, camp. Vellgouris — ^fair. BILUNG AND SONS, LTD., niHTEKS, CUILUPORD,"
      ],
